THE KNIGHTS OF THE HORSE-SHOE.
CHAPTER I.
A VIRGINIA FARM HOUSE.
At
a moderate distance from Yorktown, (since so famous by the surrender
of
Cornwallis
,) there stood a plain looking structure, covering a
considerable
pertion of ground, embracing, under one common roof, a long range of
buildings of various dimensions, and surrounded with cool looking verandahs,
which extended entirely round the lower story of the house; here entirely
closing one portion from view, with the extension of green slats, and there
throwing open another from the ceiling to the floor, so that the inmates
might choose sunshine or shade, as suited their fancy. Besides this main
building, there were others of various sizes and shapes, from the kitchen
to the coach house, forming, altogether, quite an imposing looking
establishment
.
One side of the dwelling commanded a fine prospect of the
Chesapeake Bay, while the other faced a garden, at that day a curiosity in
the colony. It extended beyond the reach of the eye landwards, until it
was lost in a beautiful green lawn, which fell off abruptly towards a little
bubbling brook which wound its way around the extended bluff upon which
the mansion stood. This garden was laid out after the prim and rather
pragmatical fashion of that day in the old country, and adorned with
statues and grotoes, and curiously devised box hedges. In the centre of
these, a
jet d'eau
constantly threw up its glittering spray, giving a most
inviting air of coolness and repose to the place. The whole establishment
was surrounded by a fence, painted white, the entrance to which was through
a high arched gate in the fashion of the times.
This was called Temple Farm, from a circumstance which will appear
in the course of our narrative, and was one of the country seats of Sir
Alexander Spotswood, then Governor of Virginia, and Commander-in-Chief
of Her Majesty's forces in the colony.
Further along the shores of the bay, stood a double row of small white
cottages, with a narrow street running between, and one large building of two
stories, in the centre, surmounted with a small cupola and weathercock; this
was the negro quarter. Beyond this, again, stood the overseer's house; still
following the same line.
The whole settlement presented a most inviting prospect to the eye of the
weary traveller; and from the water was still more imposing; because, on
that side, was one unbroken front, giving the idea of quite a village, from
the number of the buildings. No one will wonder at the extent, even of this
country establishment, when we state from undoubted authority, that his
Excellency's income, at that time, exceeded twenty thousand pounds, per
annum, independent of his official salary.
It was near sundown of a sultry day in the summer of 1714; the dim blue
outlines of Acomac and North Ampton could just be discovered across the
misty surface of the bay. Sir Alexander Spotswood was seated in a large
arm chair in the front porch of the building, entirely alone, except his
dogs, which were snoozing away around his chair in various groups. He
had a pipe in his mouth, held from time to time in his fingers, while he
blew away the smoke, and cast his eye now and then along the surface
of the water. He wore a cocked hat on his head, which was thrown
rather to one side, so as to exhibit a profusion of iron-grey hair, done up
in the bob wig fashion. His features were large and strong, but not
unpleasing, especially when a smile broke over the otherwise bronzed and
statue-like countenance. His face, from the brow to the chin, was covered
with wrinkles. The sure guarantee that the youth of their possessor had
not been passed in inglorious ease and luxury. He had a fine set of white
teeth, which greatly redeemed his countenance from a look of premature
age, assisted by an eye which, when under excitement, was black and
brilliant with the unspent fires of youth or genius. Surmounting this
weather-beaten countenance, was a high forehead, falling back at the temple,
so as to leave a hollow on each side, and thus to produce what is called,
in common parlance, the hatchet face. His limbs were brawny and athletic,
showing their possessor capable of extraordinary physical exertion. He
wore knee breeches, met by cloth gaiter leggings buttoned close to his
well turned limbs, which, truth to say, were Virginia fashion, thrown over
the bannisters, in the most careless attitude possible. Over his person
he wore a hunting coat, thrown carelessly back from off his shoulders,
while near by rested a fowling piece he had apparently just set down,
being his almost inseparable companion in his long and celebrated walks.
While his Excellency thus lazily smoked away alone, in the front of his
house, the other portions of the building were by no means in the same state
of dreamy repose. About the entrance gate there was much bustle and
confusion
,
incident to the departure of some guests and the arrival of others.
His extensive and princely hospitalities were renowned, even in the Old
Dominion, and his establishment, whether in town or country, was the centre
and focus of all the elite of the colony. Over that portion, he had already
swayed a most happy and judicious influence, far better suited in its free and
easy grace, to the age of the country, than the stately formalities of his
predecessors
.
Upon occasions of public ceremony, he by no means abated the
pomp and parapharnalia of his office. His previous life had been too purely
military for that, but that very education of the camp, lent to the privaces of
his own home all the careless ease and grace so common to the undress of
the camp.
His being thus seated so long and so indolently gazing out upon the
slumbering
waves, was by no means accidental. Suddenly there appeared a faint
flash and a quick report of fire arms in the offing, followed almost
instantaneously
by two others, so faint and far off as just to be heard and seen. These
reports proceeded from small arms, and were very different from those of a
vessel in distress, which idea, indeed, the dead calm of the bay itself
precluded
.
Nevertheless, they seemed to rouse the Governor, the pipe was thrown
over the bannister, his legs were drawn to the floor, and in the next instant he
had snatched a spy glass, and looked long and silently over the water. After
he had hurriedly replaced his glass, he seized his gun and fired three charges
as rapidly as he could perform the evolutions of loading and firing. He had
no sooner done this, than he ordered one of his servants to light a large pine
torch, and having manned one of his boats, jumped in, followed by the boy
holding aloft his burning brand. They steered out to a considerable distance
from the landing, and then again he folded his arms, and looked long and
ardently as before over the expanse of waters, the oarsmen resting upon their
oars.
While he is thus employed, let us return to the mansion; over the windows
of which, various lights are now seen, indicative of some more busy life
within, than is usually to be found of summer evenings at an ordinary farm
house.
CHAPTER II.
AN OLD FASHIONED FIRESIDE PARTY.
Before
we introduce our readers into this drawing room, let us pause at
that old fashioned hall door, and read the inscription over the coat of arms,
(the plate on which it was inscribed was in existence within the memory of
many now living,) we think it reads thus:
Patior et Portior
; the most
appropriate that could be conceived for its possessor, it was his life, both
previous
and subsequent, in an epigraph. Through this large old dining hall we
pass into a parlor well lighted up, and furnished with much taste and elegance.
The room was nearly full of company; and we shall proceed to introduce
such of them as we take a fancy to.
But, before we do so, let us premise, that that drawing-room contained at
that moment the future fathers and mothers of some of the most celebrated
characters of our country. First, of course, we shall present the lady of the
mansion; she was seated with some half dozen others of her own sex at a
small table, around which they were working at the needle, busily chatting
all the while, sometimes with the gentlemen standing around, and sometimes
with other ladies similarly seated and occupied in other parts of the room.
Lady Spotswood, notwithstanding the stiff fashion of the female costume and
head dress at that time, was the very bean ideal of a rich farmer's wife. She
looked quite young in comparison with her husband, and possessed the remains
of a beauty that must have been formidable among courtiers of the royal
household, from which atmosphere the General had plucked her. How many
ladies thus transplanted, would not have carried with them the faded pomps
and ceremonies of their former sphere? Not so, however, with lady
Spotswood
.
No one could ever have imagined, that she had figured in her younger
days within the cold formalities of a courtly circle, for there was a whole
heartedness, a
bon hommie
of expression, a freedom of conversation in the
highest degree enthusiastic sometimes, which we, simple hearted republicans,
believe dies within the purlieus of the royal household. She seemed to enjoy
her company with the highest relish, and, of course, she entertained them with
ease.
At an opposite table sat her two daughters; Ann Catherine, the elder, by
the General called Kate, and Dorothea, the younger. The eldest of these
was about seventeen, and the other about two years younger. However much
we might lament the unromantic sound of their names, we cannot help it,
having previously pledged ourselves to adhere to the real ones. Sure we are,
that if we cannot interest our readers in them under their real, we could not
under fictitious ones. Being familiar with these, (aye, and with their
characters
,)
almost from our youth, we shall use the Governor's privilege, and
abbreviate them whenever we please.
Kate, then, was a fair girl in every sense of the word, or, in other words,
she was a blonde. Light hair, dress, and every thing light; even her voice
and laughter seemed to indicate a light heart, and that is a very important
point upon which to assure our readers. But in all this field of white, there
were shades of most delicate tints; her eyes, though not white, were light
blue, and the lashes over them, fell down so low sometimes as to form a fine
shading for those laughing and rather mischievous, we should rather say
merry, looking eyes.
It is a dangerous thing, looking too deep into the color and texture of a
lady's eyes; they become very unfathomable, very, and have an aspect of
wounderful profundity; and the longer one looks, the deeper they get, until,
like looking down into the deep, deep sea, or the high blue arch above, we
begin to wonder at the heighth and depth. It is a kind of star gazing, which
may bewilder the brain as well as another.
Occasionally she would drop her needle and work, and clap her hands with
the most heartfelt delight at the sallies of the youth standing over her chair.
She was dressed with much simplicity, and her hair seemed to follow the
pyramidical fashion of the day with great reluctance, for here and there a
stray curl wandered down her pure white neck. The expression of her
countenance
was rather arch, produced by a slight contraction of the outer angle
of the eye, and a constant dubiousness about her pouting lips, as if they did
not know their own intention, whether to laugh or not. On one side of her,
stood Bernard Moore; and on the other, sat the Rev. Commissary, Blair, who
will be described presently. Her changing countenance, as she turned to one
or the other, no doubt formed a pleasing study to the youth at least. One
while, all quivering with archness and pent up mischief, and the next
moment
exhibiting the simplicity of childhood, as she caught the words that fell
from the lips of the excellent prelate. She was a fine, tall girl, and one who
performed whatever was in hand gracefully, it was impossible for her to be
awkward; all this did not seem the result of education, but appeared like
nature itself.
Dorothea was a full, round, plump little figure, not so tall as her sister, and
of a beauty not quite so spiritual, and differing from her in many essentials,
both of appearance and manners as well as character. Her hair was brown,
her eyes hazel, her cheeks red. She wore an apron with a bunch of keys
dangling at her side, giving one an idea of domestic operations, for which
she seemed to have a peculiar turn. She was slightly inclined to
embonpoint
,
yet a neat, tidy, trim, little figure.
Dorothea assigned to herself an humbler position than that allowed to her
more brilliant sister, but the assent to this was by no means universal in the
court circles. She was the favorite with many, and was in the habit of
saying
sometimes very pungent things in her demure way. Not with the ease,
grace, and perfect self-possession of her sister, to be sure; but, perhaps, they
told better from popping out as unexpectedly to the hearers as the speaker.
She was a decided pet of the old gentleman, and was mostly to be found in
his wake, when he chose to throw off the cares and toils of official life, for the
more heart cheering enjoyments of the social circle. If no one else laughed at
her observations upon things and men, as they passed in review in such
constant
rounds of society, he did; and it was no uncommon thing to see them
sitting quite apart from the company, she chatting away most volubly, and he
bursting every now and then into a laugh.
The two brothers were John and Robertthe former and elder of these
sat apart from the rest of the company dressed in the green uniform of the
Rangers, of which corps he was an officer. His arms were folded and he
did not seem to be at his ease. His face had a general resemblance to that of
the Governor and might once have been handsome, but it now bore the impress
2
of early dissipation, and consequently of care and sorrow. The family
seemed to look upon him with pain and commiseration, if not of smypathy,
though it is questionable whether they understood exactly the cause of his general
moodishness. The Rangers, of which John was a Captain, were composed
of about twenty or thirty men each corps, and stationed at convenient
distances along the then circumscribed frontier, of the colony. He seemed
to consider his present position what it truly was, one of honorable exile;
consequently, he seized every opportunity to visit the capital. His presence
at the fireside circle, was by no means a common circumstance. The sort of
innocent gaiety that prevailed there at all times, had no charms for him. He
was there now in the performance of imperative military duty, which he dared
not disobey; he had ridden express to communicate with the Governor and
wait his orders concerning frontier matterswhich indeed he had done some
time, and as it seemed to him without much chance of a speedy gratification
of his impatience, for no Governor appeared. Others in that little party
began to feel some surprise at his long absence, for the evening was now on
the wane.
The Rev. Commissary Blair, as many of our readers know, was then at the
head of William and Mary College, which was at that time as much a school
for christianizing the savages as for general purposes of education. He was
a hale, hearty, red faced old gentleman, dressed entirely in black velvet, with
ruffles at his wrists and broad shining silver buckles at his knees and shoes,
and much addicted to taking snuff, a box for which he carried often in his
hand. He was a lively old gentleman, though grave at times. On the
present
occasion, he evidently enjoyed the merry sallies of Kate by whose side he
sat. Bernard Moore, the youth who stood on the opposite side of her
chair, had been but a few years emancipated from his government,
consequently
he stood rather in awe of his old master, but still fully amenable to
the more lively impressions of his fair young friend. He will speak for
himself.
The youngest son of the Governor, Robert, was quite a lad, and therefore
to some extent, like all other lads, he was teazing his moodish brother after
the most approved fashion, where we will leave him for the present, while
we introduce some more of that company to our readers.
There was walking along the room a tall grey headed old man, of
uncommonly
benevolent countenance and prepossessing appearance. His hair was
combed back from his high polished forehead and fell in long white locks upon
his coat collar. He was dressed very much after the same style as his friend
the Rev. Commissary, and at first sight might readily have been mistaken
for some venerable old father of the church. It was Dr. Evylin, the most
celebrated Physican of his day in the colony, and the bosom friend of his
excellency
*
*
We believe this fact is inscribed upon his cenotaph at Williamsburg.
. He stooped much in the shoulders, so as to give him the
appearance
of greater age than he really was. He carried in his hand an ivory
headed cane almost as long as himself. Occasionally he stopped to hear a
few words of her ladyship, not addressed immediately to him, said a word or
twoshook his head perhapsor smiled assent, and passed on. He was a
man of few words but much thought. No one could converse in the room
without feeling that he was present.
There were many others present at that snug little country fire-side party
stowed away in one end of that old parlor, but it is needless to bewilder the
reader with them at present. The various parties were grouped as we have
described, when the door was thrown open by a man in livery and the
Governor
entered. Nearly every one rose and bowed at his entrance, except his
youngest daughter, who, as usual, ran up and threw herself into his arms.
He however gently put her away and threw himself abruptly into a vacant
chair, a proceeding so very unusual with him as to attract the particular
attention of every one in the room. It was now observed that his face was of
an ashy paleness, and her ladyship, who had approached and laid her hand upon
his arm, started back in terror as she observed a spot of blood upon his face.
The whole party now gathered around his chair in the utmost surprise, each
one enquiring what was the matter; some to the Governor in person and
others to those nearest him. He told them that it was nothinga mere
scratch; but there was excitement, subdued it is true, but deep and intense
excitement in the countenance of the veteran, which these words by no means
allayed. He heeded them not however, but taking the arm of Dr. Evylin,
walked away in the direction of his library.
CHAPTER III.
A NIGHT FUNERAL.
We
left the Governor and his boat in a preceding chapter, quietly reposing
upon the bosom of the silent and motionless waves of the Chesapeake. He
had not remained long in that position before the stealthy sound of muffled
oars were heard approaching. He stood up in his boat and leaned forward
with eagerness to catch the sound which grew more and more distinct until
the boat itself hove in sight, which proved to be a yawl manned by sailors, and
under the command of the second officer of a ship. This official when the
yawl came along side, rose and touched his cap, and enquired if he had the
honor to address Gen. Spotswood. He replied in the affirmative, when the
mate handed him a sealed packet, which he broke open and glanced over by
the light of the torch. While he read the letter he trembled, and seemed
agitated for one whose nerves had been braced and hardened in the fierce
school of contending armies. Have you the box here, said he at length
addressing the same official.
He replied that it was in the yawl.
The boats were run gunnel to gunnel and lashed together, while all hands
proceeded to lift a box of about seven feet long and three broad into the
Governor's
boat, after which he counted out money to the sailor, and departed as
he had come, having ordered the slaves to pull for the little inlet formed by the
small stream before described. After rowing some half an hour the boat was
run aground high and dry, upon his own lands. The box was lifted out and
placed upon poles, and the six oarsmen bore it through the garden until they
came to the farthest extremity of the lawn, where had recently been erected
a small tomb-like building,
*
*
The remains of the temple were still standing a few years ago.
with the ground floor bare and a new made grave
open in the centre. On one side of this the box was deposited and the negroes
ordered to depart.
About half an hour afterwards the Governor returned bearing in one hand
a dark lantern, followed by his carpenter, with various tools on his shoulder.
The door was again unlocked and the man ordered to open the box, which he
proceeded to do, not without fear and trembling. The outer boards being
removed, exhibited a leaden coffin; this also he was ordered to cut through.
When it was completed, the man was turned out and the Governor left alone.
He then proceeded to roll down the lead about two feet; beneath this, were
various folds of what once had been white satin, but now sadly stained and
tarnished; this he likewise removed, when a ghastly spectacle exhibited
itself. It was the body of a large fine looking man, in the uniform of a
General
Officer, his head severed entirely from the trunk and all much disfigured
with blood. The Governor threw himself upon his knees and hung over this
sad spectacle, and wept long and bitterly. Many times he took the last look
of the features of that beheaded man, before he finally assumed composure
enough to close it again and summon the workman. This he did at length
and having changed his apparel, appeared in the drawing-room, as we have seen.
About midnight, there sat round the table in the Governor's library,
himself
,
the Rev. Commissary and Dr. Evylin. The countenance of the former
exhibited still the same ghastly appearance, and those of the other two
gentlemen
were not unmoved. We shall break into their conversation at the
moment.
You say truly, your Excellency, that secrecy in this business is of the
last importance, not only to the due preservation of your proper authority, but
for the interest of the colony itself, as at present situated.
I differ with you my dear sir, replied the Doctor, because I conceive
that it can neither offend King nor Council, for one, however high in authority,
to honor the remains of his own near kinsman with Christian burial.
You forget, Doctor, rejoined the Commissary, that that kinsman died the
death of a traitor.
Hell and fury! shouted the Governor, striking his clenched fist upon the
tablehe died a patriota martyra victim!
Softly, softly, said the Rev. gentleman, laying his hand upon the arm of
the Governor, I only spoke the language of common rumorof the
government
of
the laws.
May a thousand furies seize the governmentthe laws and rumor, all
together!
Let me explain all this, mildly put in the Doctor. Thus stands the
case. Here is a gentleman, an officer of high rank, who is beheaded in
Scotland for the alleged crime of high treasonalleged remember, seeing
the Governor again start. This gentleman who suffered is the half brother
of another military man who has been appointed Governor of one of the
colonies
under the very government which beheaded his kinsman. This is not
allthis government at home had the same suspicious of this very Governor,
and many of his friends shrewdly suspect that he was sent hither to keep him
out of harm's wayin other words, on account of former brilliant military
servicesthat he was sent hither in a sort of honorable exile. Is it not so?
You are rightyou are right, Doctor, said the Governor, between his
his teeth, go on.
Then the question presented is, shall he clandestinely inter these remains
which have arrived here to-night, or shall he bury them openly in his own
burying grounds? I think it better to make no mystery of it, and trust to the
liberality and good sense of the ministry, should they hear of it. Such a
proceeding would be very natural, surely.
But you forget, Doctor, said the Commissary, that this thing is to
produce
a vast effect upon others beside the ministry, and the first effect too.
Recollect the state of the colony. Every party at home is exactly represented
here. It is useless to conceal from ourselves, that the government of our
friend meets with powerful opposition. What is it that prevents him from
leading an army now across the mountains into that unknown eldorado
beyond
,
but this very jealousy of his power and popularity; and would this
opposition dare, for a moment, to show head, were it not for the more than
encouragement they receive at home. Now, what effect would such a funeral
have, when the subject of it was proclaimed through the colony?--that is the
question.
There is force in your reasoning, said the Doctor.
Besides, there is another point upon which we have not touched, said
the Commissary. The Govenor will, doubtless, desire to have his friend
and kinsman interred with the rights and ceremonies of the church; now, as
he is the secular head of that church, and I am the unworthy representative
of my lord Bishop, how can we publicly bestow funeral honors upon one who
has fallen like this unfortunate gentleman?
You have settled the matter, reverend sir, said the Governor, musing,
you have settled the matter; and as every one seems now asleep, let us
betake
ourselves to our melancholy task.
It was a most strange looking group that, of the two reverend looking
old gentlemen: the doctor with his long ivory headed cane, and the reverend
Commissary in his surplice, following the Governor to a surreptitious grave,
by the dubious light of a dark lanthorn. As they approached the temple, they
all bared their heads, and the clergyman taking the lamp, commenced that
most solemn and imposing ceremony of the English church. When he
came to the appropriate place, the coffin was lowered by the Doctor and
Governor
,
after which the grave was filled up, and they retired as they had come,
the Governor leading the way.
The mansion house by this time, and all the surrounding scene, lay
wrapped
in the most profound repose; not a single light relieved the dark outlines
of the now gloomy looking mansion, and even the statues, which in daytime
gave a classic air of lightness and grace to the picture, now rather added to
the solemn silence and mystic gloom by their shadowy figures. The late
occupation of our three adventurers, too, added not a little to the sombre
aspect of these dim outlines. There was that magnificent sheet of water,
too, beyond, sending up forever its melancholy roar of the distant waves, and
heralding the coming morn with its broken fragments of misty drapery,
towering
up here in huge abutments, and there arching to the horizon. Away
towards the ocean, between the dim outlines of Cape Charles and Cape Henry,
the bay seemed relieved by a darker outline of clouds piled up against the
sky like a chain of mountains.
CHAPTER IV.
COUNTRY LIFEITS DUTIES AND ENJOYMENTS.
The
next morning broke bright and cheerful, emancipated by the morning
sun from the mists and clouds of the previous night. Kate Spotswood was
up with the lark, brushing the dew from the grass and flowers with an elastic
foot, which seemed made on purpose only to bound over nature's brightest and
freshest beauties, so fawn-like were her movements. Yet her occupation on
this morning seemed of a quite homely and domestic kind. She wore a sun
bonnet, and carried a basket on her arm. She took the path leading across
the garden and down towards the brook and in a few minutes ascended the
rising ground opposite, leading towards the negro quarter. In the basket
were various phials and papers, all labelled in the most careful manner, and
arranged so as to be of instant use. She entered the door of one of the white
cottages rather apart from, and larger than the others, and called, in
plantation
language, the sick house. Here, around a pretty extensive and well
ventilated room, were arranged sundry cots, upon which lay about one dozen
negroes; some tossing in the restless delirium of fever, and others cadaverous
with the hues of an ague. She approached their bedsides in succession,
followed
by an old crone, called the nurse, who scarcely ceased to bless her
young mistress even to put a spoon between the teeth of a refractory patient.
God a mighty, bress miss Kate; poor nigger been dead but for her.
Sheneber
forget em! neber!
She had not been long thus engaged, when a little pale faced white girl,
dressed in linsey woolsey, entered the sick house, and stood before the young
lady, dropping an awkward curtesy.
Father begs, ma'm, that you'll come down and see him this morning,
he's laid up with the rheumatis, and can't move a hand or foot.
And who is your father, child!
He lives, ma'm, in the small log house on the other side of the overseer's,
just beyond the nigger landing.
Oh! old Jarvis, the fisherman? I remember him now. Run home, and
tell your father that I will be there directly.
This fisherman's hut was full half a mile beyond the negro quarter, but
she never hesitated. With alacrity she tripped over the damp grass,
throwing
back her hood as the blood came bounding into her cheeks with the glow
of health and exercise, her fair cheeks fanned by the gentle breeze just
rippling
the bay. Neither ditches nor fences stopped her progress: she bounded
over the one and climbed the other, like one accustomed to such obstacles.
When she arrived within the fisherman's hut, she found old Jarvis laid up
indeed, as his daughter had described, and racked with fever and pain. She
felt his pulse long and carefully, looked at his tongue, and made many
enquiries
as to the manner of contracting his disease.
I fear, Jarvis, she said at length, that your case is rather beyond my
skill, not that I would fail to try some of my simples to relieve you, but good
old Dr. Evylin is at the house, and I will bring him to see you presently.
And then she turned to the old woman, his wife, and made many kind
enquiries
as to their means of living and present supplies, stroking her hand over
the white headed urchins clustering around all the while. She soon after
took her leave, promising to send supplies to the old woman as soon as she
got home.
A goodly company assembled that morning at breakfast. Dorothea at the
head of the table, and lady Spotswood on her right hand, with many other
ladies, married and single, occupying the upper, while the gentlemen sat round
the Governor at the lower end.
Dorothea seemed to have enjoyed the benefits of exercise, and the
consequent
glow and bloom of health as well as her sister, but she had been drilling
the dairy maids, and marshalling fine pans of new milk, eggs, and butter, and,
truth to say, her fair, ruddy face looked as if she enjoyed these good things
herself with no little relish. Not that she was at all coarse or vulgar in her
appearance, or that there was any thing in these rural occupations, tending
that way. We only meant to say, that she looked more like a red cheeked
country lass, the daughter of some respectable farmer, than a descendant of
an aristocratic stock. She chatted volubly, but with no effort. She laughed
heartily whenever she felt like it, and that was not seldom.
Ha, Miss Catherine, said the Rev. Commissary, as that young lady
entered and took her seat at the table, had you been up with the lark this
fine morning, and engaged as I saw your sister, you might have transferred
the bloom of that pretty flower in your hair to your fair cheek.
If your Reverence will but examine that flower, plucking it from her
hair and handing it across the table to him, you will perceive that it is not
one to be had by stepping into the garden. I plead guilty to the remissness of
dairy duty.
This is truly a flower, said the old gentleman, examining it with his glass,
which is not to be found among your father's exotics. Is it not so? handing
it to Bernard Moore, you have just returned from the hot houses and parterres
of Europe. Bernard quietly slipped the beautiful little subject of dispute
into the button-hole of his vest, before he replied, That it was a native plant,
and scarcely grew within a mile of the house.
Dorothea laughed a low musical chuckle, at the sly way in which Bernard
appropriated the flower, and the blush with which her sister watched the
proceeding. I think, Reverend Sir, said she slily, that the pursuit and
capture
of that flower has given sister quite as much color as my dairy
performances
.
The Governor did not seem to enjoy this small talk with his usual relish, for
he was wont to encourage these playful sallies of his children, and loved
above all things to see them cheerful. But now he sat silent and dispirited;
and an occasional glance at his son John, who was beside him, seemed by no
means calculated to inspirit him. That youth was so nervous that he could
scarcely carry his cap to his head at all, and had not touched any thing to eat.
He looked, too, haggard, bloated and sullen. He had once been the
Governor's
chief hope and delight, and he was equally the favorite of the old
clergyman
,
who sat opposite to him, for his brilliant native abilities, and the highly
creditable manner in which he acquitted himself of all his collegiate duties.
It is true, that he was known then to be wild, but not viciously so. Now,
however, his whole nature was changed. He scarcely noticed his sisters,
whose still clinging affection he seemed to loathe. His mother he avoided
on all possible occasions, and for these general family meetings in the
country
he had an especial abhorrence. There was a stealthy, suspicious glance
about his eye, as foreign to his former nature as it was inexplicable to his
father now, as he, from time to time, cast a sidelong glance at his rapidly
depreciating heir.
There was one person at that table who understood the mystery of John
Spotswood's peculiar behavior of late, and that was old Dr. Evylin, but he
seemed to observe him even less than any other person at the table. Many
strange things were told about John by the servants, such as his great
precautions
at night before he would go to bed; getting up in the night and calling for
lights, swearing that some one was under the bed; at other times he would
take a notion that some one was locked up in a certain closet. These things
the whole family knew; they had been observed at his former visits, and now
he was an object of the most undisguished solicitude to the whole of them,
and to his father of dread. He thought his mind touched, and that ere long
he would lose his reason, if, indeed, he had not partially done so already.
Catherine's brightest smiles were instantly clouded, if poor John happened
to come within the range of her vision. At this very breakfast, she sat
scarcely listening to the playful, bantering mood of Bernard Moore, so entirely
was she abstracted by observing the more than commonly ferocious aspect of
her elder brother. She would sit looking at him, lost in abstraction, until the
speaker had twice or thrice repeated his words, and then she would reply
without
seeming entirely conscious of what she said. In short, a settled dejection
brooded over the party since John had entered and taken his seat.
As Dr. Evylin was about to leave the table, Kate stepped behind his chair,
and whispered a few words into his ear, which brightened up the old man's
countenance instantly. Ha! said he aloud, catching her hand, and
drawing
back her retreating figure, this young lady suffered herself to lie under
mistaken imputations, when she ought not to have done so; she has been a
mile this morning on foot, before breakfast, to visit a poor sick fisherman.
Ah! said the Governor, is old Jarvis sick?
He is, continued the Doctor, and so ill that my pretty pupil has called a
consultation upon his case.
I owe you an apology, my dear Catherine, said the good Commissary,
and hope whenever I do get in your debt, it may be always for a similar
cause, and as happily liquidated. You were right not to divulge the matter;
the right hand should not know what the left doeth. These are services
which God reserves for his own special pleasure of rewarding, and not subject
to the poor payment of worldly praise. Kate had broken away and ran,
before the old Doctor's sermon (as John called it,) was half over.
CHAPTER V.
AN EXCURSION ON HORSEBACK.
Soon
after breakfast a number of horses were brought round to the front
entrance of the house, to a gravelled court, separated from the box-bound
flower beds before described, so as to admit horses and carriages to the very
portico of the mansion.
The horses were of various sorts and degrees; some fine generous animals,
others common cobs, while the rear was brought up by ponies and dogs in
great abundance.
This was the daily custom of the establishment, at least every fair day.
The Governor himself rode a fine imported war-horse, of fine proportions and
admirably drilled. He stood at the porch door with his high erect head,
waiting
for his master, with as much pride and gaiety as if he had been a thinking
animal. Various were the jokes and rejoinders passed among the grooms and
stable boys, as they stood there, each one holding a horse by the bridle.
Any one must have visited a Virginia, family party in the country to form
any idea what an essential ingredient this morning excursion is in their
domestic pleasure, and how highly it is enjoyed by young and old. We shall
perhaps have occasion, before we part with our readers, to trace this and many
other customs, which have survived the revolution to our British ancestry.
At length the party issued from the house. Every one at liberty to consult
his own fancy as to his company, unless some previous expedition had been
such as a visit to some natural curiosity or to church on Sunday.
Accordingly Kate on a fine pacing poney and Dr. Evylin by her side, had
already set off in the direction of the fisherman's hut. The old gentleman
was quite gallant, and managed his sensible looking little poney cavalier
fashion.
It may seem strange that Bernard Moore should thus suffer the old
gentleman
to monopolize the attention of a young lady, for whose favors he was
generally
understood to be paying the most anxious and solicitous court; but the
fact is, she herself had sent him off cantering in an opposite direction. Let
our fair readers be not alarmed; he had not already proposed and been
rejected
.
The case stood thus: Kate had expressed some regret that she could
not accompany her brother a mile or two on his way to the capital, owing to
her engagement with the Doctor. Bernard, in the most self-sacrificing and
disinterested
manner imaginable, proposed to be her substitute, which offer was
most thankfully accepted. He and John were old class-mates and once very
intimate, and she desired of all things to see that intimacy renewed, now that
Bernard had returned from his foreign tour, acknowledgely one of the first
young men in the colony.
Strange to say, the youth was so blinded by his self-doubting mood, as
never once to reflect that this was the very highest compliment which she
could, in the then position of affairs, pay to him.
He and John had also now cantered off in quite a different style from Kate
and her venerable old beau. They made the fire fly from their horses heels, as
they careered, like winged messengers, over the road to Yorktown and
Williamsburg
.
A very few moments ride at that gait brought them to the door of
the tavern in the centre of the former, and Bernard was quite surprised to see
John alight and give his bridle to the servant, for he knew not that he so
purposed
on setting out. He was invited to do likewise, which of course he did;
not knowing the business which detained his friend. That was soon
explained
;
for John, instantly upon setting foot within the bar-room, ordered a bottle
of spirits. It was with no little astonishment that Bernard saw him pour out
and gulph down a tumbler of brandy and water, half and half, enough to have
staggered any youth at a single blow. But he was still more astonished at the
wonderful transformation, which this short and simple process effected. His
old friend was himself again: he now chatted cheerfully, rode alongside of
his companion without restraint and without effort to leave him; and above
all, he appeared the highly intellectual and gifted man he had once known
him to be. He spoke freely of European and colonial affairs, and took now
an interest in many little things which he seemed not at all to notice before.
Moore conversed with him freely, and at length fell into stories of former days
and youthful frolics, until the woods rang again with their merriment.
Having
thus wrought up his subject to a proper key, as he supposed, purely by
his own address, he ventured to ask him for an explanation of his late singular
and inexplicable mood; but John passed it off in the slightingest manner
imaginable; said it was nothing but a fit of the blue-devilsa constitutional
infirmity, to which he was subject.
But how comes it John, said Moore, most innocently, that you were
not subject to these when we were so long and so constantly together. I do
not recollect of your being once so afflicted; during those ever happy and
memorable school-boy days, you were the life and soul of every party. If
any two started together upon an expedition and you were left behind, it was
always`come let's get Spotswood, there's no sport without him.'
Truetrue Bernard, but those happy hours of idleness do not last forever,
indeed I presume that the change which you see in me is but the natural
one of thoughtless boyhood, into the higher and more care-giving
responsibilities
of man's estate.
Thus they conversed; Moore pleased and amused at the half playfulhalf
melancholy mood of his old friend, but not more than half convinced, by his
reasoning, backed, as it was, by the change of mood itselfthen that ungodly
drink of brandythat the son and heir of the Governor of Virginia should
alight at a common tavern and thus quaff spirits like a sailorit was
inexplicable
to him, but he finally set it down in his own mind to the effect of the
military life in which his father was now attempting to train him. He
therefore
shook hands with his reanimated friend, as he supposed, with scarce
concealed impatience, and galloped back to carry news of the pleasing change
to Kate. Little did he imagine the real cause of that change and how very
short a time it would last, or he would not thus exulting have sought an
opportunity
of returning his credentials. He met the Governor and Dr. Blair
riding along the road at a staid and sober gait, and seemingly engaged in a
conversation little less desponding than that from which he supposed he had
just rescued poor John. He did not pursue them to see whether they too
would be thus suddenly transformed by a glass of brandy and water. He
was rather rejoiced than otherwise, for it assured him that this Excellency
would not command his attendance, and thus detain him from the point at
which he was aiming. Alas! true love never did run smooth; and Mr.
Bernard Moore, after all his haste to join Kate and the Doctor, only arrived to
find the position he sought already occupied by another young gallant from
the capital, not less highly gifted by nature and fortune than himself. It was
Mr. Kit Carter, a scion of the genuine aristocratic stock, and heir expectant
of the splendid seat of Shirley. Moore was too highly schooled in all the
3
courtesies of conventional breeding to shew chagrin at such an acquisition
to the company at the mansion house, as Mr. Carter undoubtedly was; but
we may say at once that he was disappointed in not being able to
communicate
the result of his diplomacy. It would have taken a shrewd and
sagacious
observer of human nature to have discovered even this, beneath all the
courtly grace which they manifested. Carter and he met for the first time
since the return of the latter, and that meeting was most warm and cordial.
This was magnanimous, certainly, in Bernard; for, from their school days
they had been rivals for the favor of Kate. The good old Doctor had not felt
pulses so long and not yet be able to see a little into matters as they now
stood, accordingly the old gentleman, with a sly smile, reigned in his pony
and dropped in the rear, to muse upon one not less lovely and admired than
her whose lively chat he had surrendered. Not a lady-love, nor even a wife
for the old gentleman was a widowerit was his lone and only daughter,
almost a recluse within the walls of his own house at Williamsburg; yet so
young, so highly cultivated, and, withal, so fascinating in every personal
grace, she was fast becoming a devotee in religion. The good Doctor did
not regret this, but he was naturally one of those calm, cheerful, philosophic
minds, that are enabled to appreciate all that is excellent in our holy religion,
without surrendering up the choicest blessing of social lifea cheerful and
happy spirit. But we anticipate, the Doctor's lone idol will be introduced to
the reader in due progress of our story.
In the meantime Kate was like powder between flint and steel; every
spark elicited, fell upon her.
An encounter of wits between two highly endowed young men, and
paying
court to the same lady, is a study to those curious in psychological
matters
.
But we will leave the whole party to dismount and dress for dinner,
while we take a peep into other things having relation to the main thread of
our narrative; until then, we bid our readers a cheerful and hearty
goodnight
.
CHAPTER VI.
A KITCHEN FIRE-SIDE IN THE OLD DOMINION.
Imagine
to yourself, reader, a fire-place large enough to roast an ox whole,
and within which a common wagon load of wood might be absorbed in such
a speedy manner as to horrify one of our city economical house wivesthough
now, it was late in summer and of course no such pile of combustibles
enlivened
the scenebesides, it was night, and the culinary operations of the day
were over. A few blazing fagots of rich pine, however, still threw a lurid
glare over the murky atmosphere, and here and there sat the several
domestics
of the establishment; some nodding until they almost tumbled into the
fire, but speedily regaining the perpendicular without ever opening their eyes,
or giving any evidence of discomposure, except a loud snort, perhaps, and
then dosing away again as comfortably as ever. Others were conversing
without exhibiting any symptoms of weariness or drowsiness.
In one corner of the fire-place sat old Sylvia, a Moor, who had
accompanied
the father of the Governor (a British naval officer) all the way from
Africa, the birth place of his Excellency. She had straight hair, which was
now white as the driven snow, and hung in long matted locks about her
shoulders, not unlike a bunch of candles. She was by the negroes called
outlandish, and talked a sort of jargon entirely different from the broken
of that race. She was a general scape-goat for the whole plantation, and held
in especial dread by the Ethiopian tribe. She was not asleep, nor dozing,
but sat rocking her body back and forth, without moving the stool, and
humming
a most mournful and monotonous ditty, all the while throwing her large
stealthy eyes around the room. In the opposite corner sat a regular
hangeron
of the establishment, and one of those who kept a greedy eye always
directed towards the fleshpots, whenever he kept them open at all. His name
was June, and he wore an old cast-off coat of the Governor's, the waist
buttons
of which just touched his hips, while the skirts hung down to the ground
in straight lines, or rather in the rear of the perpendicular, as if afraid of the
constant kicking which his heels kept up against them when walking His
legs were bandied, and set so much in the middle of the foot, as to render it
rather a difficult matter to tell which end went foremost. His face was of
the true African stamp: large mouth, flat nose, and a brow, overhung with
long, plaited queus, like so many whip cords, cut off short and even all round,
and now quite grey. The expression of his countenance was full of
mirthfulness
and good humor, mixed with just enough of shrewdness to redeem it
from utter vacuity. There was a slight degree of cunning twinkled from his
small terrapin-looking eye, but wholly swallowed up, by his large mouth, kept
constantly on the stretch. He had the run of the kitchen; and, for these
perquisites, was expected and required to perform no other labor than running
and riding errands to and from the capital; and it is because he will
sometimes
be thus employed, that we have been so particular in describing him,
and because he was the banjo player to all the small fry at Temple Farm.
He had his instrument across his lap, on the evening in question, his hands
in the very attitude of playing, his eyes closed, and every now and then, as
he rose up from a profound inclination to old Somnus, twang, twang, went
the strings, accompanied by some negro doggrel, just lazily let slip through
his lips in half utterance, such as the following:
Massa is a wealthy man, and all de nebor's know it,
Keeps good liquors in his house, and always says, here goes it.
The last words were lost in another declination of the head, until cat-gut
and voice became merged in a grunt or snort, when he would start up, perhaps
strain his eyes wide open, and go on again:
Sister Sally's mighty sick, oh what de debil ails her.
She used to eat good beef and beans, but now her stomach fails her.
The last words spun out again into a drawl to accompany a monotonous
symphony, until all were lost together, by his head being brought in
wonderful
propinquity to his heels in the ashes.
While old June thus kept up a running accompaniment to Sylvia's
Moorish
monotony, on the opposite side of the fire; the front of the circle was
occupied by more important characters.
Old Essex, the
major domo
of the establishment, sat there in all the
panoply
of state. He was a tall, dignified old negro, with his hair queued up
behind and powdered all over, and not a little of it sprinkled upon the red
collar of his otherwise scrupulously clean livery. He wore small clothes
and knee-buckles, and was altogether a fine specimen of the gentlemanly
old family servant. He felt himself just as much a part and parcel of the
Governor's family, as if he had been related to it by blood. The manners of
Essex were very far above his mental culture; this, no one could perceive by
a slight and superficial observation, because he had acquired a most
admirable
tact (like some of his betters,) by which he never travelled beyond his
depth; added to this, whatever he did say, was in the most appropriate
manner
,
narrowly discerning nice shades of character, and suiting his replies to
every one who addressed him. For instance, were a
gentleman
to alight at
the Hall door, and meet old Essex, he would instantly receive the attentions
due to a gentleman; whereas, were a gentlemanly dressed man to come, who
feared that his whole importance might not be impressed upon this important
functionary, Essex would instantly elevate his dignity in exact proportion to
the fussiness of his visitor. Alas! the days of Essex's class are fast fading
away. Many of them survived the Revolution, but the Mississippi fever has
nearly made them extinct.
On the present occasion, though presumed to be not upon his dignity, the
old Major sat with folded arms and a benignant, but yet contemptuous smile
playing upon his features, illumined as they were by the lurid fire light, while
Martin, the carpenter, told one of the most marvelous and wonder-stirring
stories of the headless corpse, ever heard within those walls, teeming, as they
were, with the marvelous. Essex had often heard stories first told over the
gentlemens' wine, and then the kitchen version, and of course knew how to
estimate them exactly: now that before mentioned incredulous smile began
to spread until he was forced to laugh outright as Martin capped the climax
of his tale of horror, by some supernatural appearance of blue flames over the
grave. Not so the other domestics, male and female, clustering around his
chair; they were worked up to the highest pitch of the marvelous. Even old
June ceased to twang his banjo, and at length got his eyes wide open, as the
carpenter came to the sage conclusion, that the place would be haunted.
It was really wonderful, with what rapidity this same point was arrived at
by every negro upon the plantation, numbering more than a hundred; and
these having wives and connexions on neighboring plantations, the news that
Temple Farm was haunted, became a settled matter for ten miles round, in
less than a week, and so it has remained from that day to this.
On the occasion alluded to, the story-teller for the night had worked his
audience up to such a pitch of terror, that not one individual dared stir for
his life, every one seeming to apprehend an instant apparition. This effect
on their terrified imaginations, was not a little heightened by the storm raging
without. The distant thunder had been some time reverberating from the
shores of the bay, mingling with the angry roar of the waves as they splashed
and foamed against the beach, breaking and then retreating for a fresh onset.
It was yet quite early in the evening, and all the white family had gone to
the house of one of the neighboring gentry to spend the evening. No one
was apprehending their return for some hours, when a thundering clatter of
horses and wheels were heard on the gravelled road, followed by several loud
peals upon the knocker of the hall door. A lurid glare of lightning at the
same instant flashed athwart the sky, tinging every living and inanimate
thing, to the farthest corner of the room, with a bluish silver white, and
revealing
the mansion-house, on the opposite side of the yard, through the window,
in magnified proportions like some giant castle looming up for an instant in
goblin outlines, and then vanishing amidst a most astounding and
overwhelming
crash. During this terrible uproar of the elements, and a deluging
torrent
of rain, the same incessant rattle of the knocker was kept up on the hall
door. No one dared to answer it except old Essex, who sat pinioned to
the floor by the poor affrighted creatures clinging to his legs, and arms,
and neck; his lips moving all the while in threatening pantomine, vainly
endeavoring to be heard amidst the screams around him, and the
continuous
roar overhead. At every pause in the furious storm, raprap
rap went the knocker, a signal for the closer gathering of the terrified
domestics. At length the storm took breath, allowing a small interval of
repose, which old Essex taking advantage of, threw the crowd from him,
in despair of getting his subordinate to answer the summons, and rushed
across the court and into the back door of the mansion-house himself, and
speedily let go the fastenings of the hall door. Stern, and schooled as he
was in the outward show of calmness, borrowed from his betters, the old
Major's knees knocked a little as he threw open the hall door and let the light
of the lamp fall over the portico and gravelled road.
There stood at the threshold of the door, three persons, two males and a
female dressed in black, with black silk masks over their faces. The lady
was leaning upon the arm of him who appeared the younger of her two
companions, while a carriage and four horses stood opposite the door. The
elder of the visitors requested leave to enter for a moment's shelter from the
furious peltings of the storm. Essex knew the hospitable habits of the place
too well to have paused thus long, had he not been confounded by the
studious
appearance of mystery in his visitors, and apprehension for the safety of
his master's goods and chattels; but these impressions lasted only for a moment,
when the old fellow again resumed his courtly air and bowed them into the hall
with inimitable grace. His unerring tact had already discovered that these, if
robbers at all, were not of the common sort, and were of no ordinary address.
One attitude, a wave of the hand, the general air, was enough for the
practised
eye of the major domo, to discover that they were no ruffians; besides,
there was a shrinking, a clinging dependence about the lady, which at once
interested him. If he was surprised at this singular visit, thus far, how much
more so, when he saw them, after entering the hall, walk straight up to the
picture of a soldier in armor, hanging against the wall. It was the
wellknown
portrait of Gen. Elliot, half brother to the Governor, and one of the
most renowned soldiers, as well as unfortunate men of his day.
*
*
This incident was related to the author by a descendant of the Governor.
Before
this picture, the mysterious three stood, the two males conversing in a
suppressed
voice, while the young lady sobbed audibly and most painfully, and,
finally became so much affected that a chair had to be brought her, which, she
turned towards the picture, gazing upon it and weeping by turns. Old
Essex handed her a glass of wine and water, which she declined. They
presently moved opposite to the full length picture of the Governor, in his
court dress, and examined it stadionsly and with some interest, but not of the
painful sort with which they had looked at the other. The lady soon returned
to her former position, and there she clung, until removed almost by force; one
gentleman taking her under each arm.
As they left the hall, the elder of the two threw a sealed packet upon the
table, stopping to turn up the direction, and place it in so conspicuous a place
as to be sure to attract attention. The steps were put up, the door shut and
offering Essex a piece of coin, the whip cracked and the coach and four moved
away as it had come, leaving the old Major in sad perplexity, whether the
whole occurrences of the night had not been a part of the goblin stories of Old
Martin, among the frightened domestics. The sight of the package, was a
sure guarantee that it was no such dream of the imagination, and he turned it
over and examined it most carefully, seal and surperscription. Not being able
to read even the outside, he of course made little progress with its contents, but
he examined the coat of arms upon the seal with the eyes of one not entirely
unaccustomed to such thingscoming to the sage conclusion, that the writer
was some body at all events. He did not return to his late affrighted colleagues
in the kitchen, but seated himself to wait the return of the family.
The storm was now clearing away, and there was a prospect that he would
not long be left to chew the cud of sweet and bitter fancies. He was
presently
aroused by the sound of horses and carriages, and soon after by the
entrance of the whole party, which had by this time received several
accessions
.
These with sundry other matters appertaining thereto, will found in
the next chapter.
CHAPTER VII.
A FAMILY SCENE.
The
party entered the hall in fine glee, with the exception of the Governor,
who still remained dejected, pale, and entirely different from his usually hearty
and even gleeful mood. Kate had again been on horseback, in which she
delighted, and entered the room with her skirt upon her arm, and a black cap
upon her head, full of drooping feathers. She was quite flushed and really
looked charming with the excitement of the ride, or that clashing of rival
wits, she so well knew how to keep up between her two assiduous attendants,
but it was all playful and courteous in the highest degree. It was the daily
practice of Carter and Moore to walk off arm in arm, after one of these
sprightly encounters for her favor. The fact was that Kate did not perceive
as yet, that either of these youths were in that die-away state, usually called
being in love. They had all played together for the last five years, except
when the young gentlemen were upon their travels and now that they were
returned so much improved, she saw no cause of rejecting attentions due to
her and which she really enjoyed. Neither of them had approached the
threshold of love-makingthe Virginia system requires a much longer
probation
than that, and the good old custom prevails still, thanks to the good
sense of our charming lassies, that even this old prescriptive right of their sex
is left willed to them by their great grandmothers.
One addition to the party was Mr. Nathaniel Dandrige, a youth just
emerging
from his teens and his syntax, and a scion of the same class to which the
two others belonged. In the language of the times he was a young
gentleman
of fortune and birththe former in expectation of course. As he
entered
Dorothea had his arm, and was carrying on a most desperate juvenile
flirtation
in which his Excellency seemed only prevented from taking part by his
painful reflections, which every now and then came over him; as it was, he
hung in their near neighborhood, and gave way to a smile in spite of himself,
occasionally, at the perfect good humor and
naivette
of his favorite.
Old Essex had replaced the letter and was standing in most respectful
deference, awaiting the movements of his master.
Who brought this, Essex? was his instant enquiry as he broke the seal.
Two gentlemen and a lady, all in masks, sir.
The Governor threw himself into a chair and commenced the perusal, with
not a little interest. The whole party by this time were seated and waiting
impatiently for further developments.
Did the people in masks run away with any of my spoons and cream pots,
Essex? asked Dorothea.
No, Miss, they were quite of another sort when I came to see them.
And the lady, said Carter, was she pretty, and young?
I could not see her face, sir, but she was very young.
Had she a pretty foot and hand? continued Carter.
The prettiest I ever saw in my life, sir.
All the young people laughed outright at old Essex's close observation upon
points which the gentleman seemed to consider so essential a test.
And her figure, Essex asked Carter, did that correspond with the two
beautiful members?
Most happily, sir. Very much such a figure as Miss Catherine's.
Thank you, Essex, for your compliment.
The Governor, though reading rapidly, lost not a word of all this, trifling
though it was, meanwhile he was racking his imagination for some other clue
to their identity, than any he found in the letter. As soon as he had finished
he handed the epistle to Dr. Blair, and then turned to Essex, but the faithful
and discreet old Major, maintained his reserve. He said not a word about
pictures, nor the lady's weeping, but dealt entirely in a general account of the
visit, the ostensible objects of which were to avoid the storm and leave the
letter. No one in the room perceived that the old fellow still held something
back, but his master. He knew him so well, that he divined some cause for
his reluctance to make a clean breast of it; accordingly he soon after retired
to his library, followed by Essex, and there learned the whole affair, as our
readers have done likewise.
Dr. Blair seeing nothing in the letter to conceal, and knowing that if there was
it would soon become public, commenced reading it aloud, it ran as follows:
London
,
1714.
To His Excellency, Alexander Spotswood, Esq.
Dear Sir
This letter will be handed to you by one of the most
unfortunate
adherents of the Pretender. Start not my dear Sirhe is but one of the
Scottish jacobins, and will in no wise compromise you. The very fact of his
seeking your country is evidence enough if it were wanting, that he desires to
be at peace from the toils and dangers of political partizanship. These are
claims enough for citizenship you may think, but not warrant sufficient to
claim your personal friendship. He has these also, for he was one of those
unfortunate men who befriended and supported your late kinsman to the last.
He protests that he will in no wise compromise your Excellency with the
ministry
or their adherents on your side of the water, and has begged me not to
write, but knowing that you would delight to befriend so staunch an adherent
of the unfortunate General, I have insisted on his taking a sealed packet at
all events, as it would contain other matters than those relating purely to
himself. And now for those matters. He will be accompanied by a great
many ruined families of rather a higher class than that from which your
immigrants
are generally furnishedthey, too, are worn out in spirit and in
fortune
,
with the ceaseless struggles between the hereditary claimant of the
crown and the present occupant. They see, also, breakers ahead. The
Queen's health is far from being stable, and in case of her sudden demise
there will be an awful struggle here. Are they not right then to gather up
the little remnant of their property and seek an asylum on your peaceful
shores?
Your scheme of scaling the mountains, and cutting asunder the French
settlements, meets with the hearty approbation of all the military men about
the Court, and not a question of the Queen's approbation would remain, were
it not for the everlasting squabbles between Bolinbroke and Oxford. Your
friend Mr. , ceaselessly urges the matter, and contends that now is
the very time to strike the blow; but my dear Sir, there is a desire for peace
on the other side of the channel, and I would advise you to have your
preparations
in readiness to set out upon the first intimation of her Majesty's
consent
,
so that the news of it cannot possibly reach here before your grand
scheme is accomplished.
It is a magnificent one, and at any other time would fire the minds, of our
young military men. Hold on then, my dear Sir, to the end, and you will be the
ultimate means of laying the foundation of a future Empire, greater than all
Europe in extent, and pregnant with a vast future which even your
experienced
and sagacious eye cannot as yet discover.
There is a young lady to accompany this gentleman, but she is even more
loth han himself to burden your Excellency with what she calls the taint of the
rebel. I know full well, that you will be a father to this poor heart-broken
houseless
girl, thrown upon our unfeeling world; not only poor, but suffering untold
wretchedness, whether she looks to the past or the future. God Almighty
have mercy upon her tender years. All her gentle rearing will now be turned
into sources of sorrow. Her cup is poisoned forever, where she is known
and where she is not, she will bear with her recollections enough, to
overshadow
her future days with a vision so dark, that no human hand may ever
raise the veil. I cannot say more, for I have promised that I would not, but I
think that I have said enough to interest you in these most unfortunate
strangers
,
and make you cherish them. Your heart has changed since we served
together, if I have not directed them to the very man of all the world, and in
the very position to most befriend them. There is a new world opened to
them in more senses of the word than onelet it be as happy as possible.
Your old friend and companion in arms,
G. B. L.
Dear me, said Kate, and our visitors were doubtless some of these.
Poor girl, she has followed her father and her brother to these wildsbut
perhaps
the young gentleman was her lover. That would give quite a romantic
turn to the affair.
I think that hard shower of rain, if they were out in it, would drench
what little romance out of them the sea voyage left, said Dorothea.
Poor child, said Dr. Blair, seeming rather to commune with his own
charitable thoughts, I pity her from my soul.
I do not see, whispered Carter to Kate, that a lady with such a foot
and ankle, is any such object of commiseration after all.
Perhaps an orphan, said Lady Spotswood, glancing at her own happy
little circle with a tear almost starting in her eye.
These various remarks upon the visitors were cut short by the re-entrance
of the Governor, who walked to that portion of the room where the young
gentlemen were seated, and asked which of them would volunteer to ride to
York on such a night, in search of these unhappy visitors? Moore
immediately
rose to his feet and volunteered his services, as indeed did both the
others, but the former being first, the Governor commissioned him to go, and
find them out if possible and bring them back as his guests.
Kate seeing how earnest and grave her father seemed, gave her beau a
look of gratitude, which he considered ample remuneration for riding half an
hour in a wet night.
The party were soon after assembled for family prayersthe young ladies
having hastily retired to throw off their riding skirts and hats. A small
reading
desk was placed before Dr. Blair, while Kate ascended a platform erected
before an organ, fitting into the recess formed by the projecting abutment of
the chimney. Then the servants came filing in one by one and ranged
themselves
against the wall on the opposite side of the room. The old Major at
their head.
The whole group being composed to a proper and becoming solemnity, the
Doctor commenced reading a hymn. When he had finished, the slow and
solemn tones of the organ began to ascend in a prelude of great beauty.
Kate raised the tune in a fine mellow voice, which, in that high old fashioned
apartment, reverberated through its lofty ceilings, mingled with the tones of
the organ, so as to attune all their hearts to this befitting close of the scenes
of the day. The fine enthusiasm of the young musician's eye and mein,
told how earnestly her heart was concerned in what was before her. When
she had finished, the whole party by one accord sat breathless and
motionless
,
evidently desirous to catch the last note as it died away amidst the
solemn moan of the waves without. All then bowed the knee to the throne
of mercy to follow in humble response the petitions of one of the purest men
that ever adorned the church in the Old Dominion, or illustrated his Master's
divine system of Heavenly charity, by a life of spotless purity.
What a fitting prelude to the excellent Prelate's solemn reading, was Kate's
musical exaltation of spirit. Surely the voice of ardent and honest
supplication
ascends all the nearer to Heaven by being heralded in such divine
strains. If there is any inspiration known and felt by the creatures of this
earth, as pure and refined above all earthly pollution, it is this musical
enthusiasm
mingling with the sublimations of deeply prayerful and humble hearts.
Surely God looks down upon such scenes on earth, with benignity. It is at
all events the purest earthly feelingthe freest from the dross and corruptions
of this world, of any thing that we know of, and in such an attitude would
we present most of the personages kneeling around that family altar. A
purer and more guileless group of beings has seldom before or since
assembled
in one room, and ere an all wise Providence scatters them and their
descendants upon a wider and a longer pilgrimage than ever was decreed to
the Israelitcs, we would fix them in the affections of our readers.
CHAPTER VIII.
AMALGAMATION IN THE OLDEN TIME.
Moore
returned to breakfast looking rather haggard, after a sleepless night
and a fruitless journey. He said he had traced the coach back to York, but
there it had been dismissed and there in all probability it belonged. There
was a faint clue he said to the supposition that they had gone on to the
capital
,
directly after their return from Temple Farm. Kate, as she entered and
took her seat at the table, welcomed him with a cheerful mood, and asked in
a playful way if he had discovered their Hero and Heroine of the masks.
She looked quite disappointed at the result, and expressed her regret
especially
that Bernard had not brought the lady back. It is such an unusual
thing, she said, people calling at a house in the night with masks on, in a
country like thisand that house too belonging to the Chief Magistrate of the
Colony.
If you had been in York last night, and seen the crowds of houseless
strangers that I saw, said Moore, just arrived from England, you could not
have been at a loss to select any sort of character from among them.
Let us all then ride there this morning? said Kate, and see for
ourselves
.
No objection being made, it was settled that they would make a general
descent upon York, and see one of those human swarms from the European
hives, by which this country was populated. The letter of the previous night
also, added a zest to the general curiosity to see that portion of these said to
be of a higher order than usual.
Who can that hot headed man be? said Kate, whom papa's friend
speaks of in his letter, as having compromised himself by meddling in matters
that did not concern him.
Our College, said the Reverend Commissary, will one day or other,
save our young gentry from the temptation of meddling in transatlantic affairs.
Now it is made a mere grammar schoolthis is all wrong. What say you
Mr. Carter? Mr. Moore?
I think, Sir, to speak with frankness, said Moore, that it will never be
any thing else, while it remains half savage, half civilized.
Both Kate and Dorothea smiled at the rude interpretation which might be
put upon this speech. The Doctor replied:
I understand, you allude to Mr. Boyle's plan of educating the Indians.
4
Exactly, and to the utter impracticability of ever carrying on a literary
institution with two such heterogeneous classes as those now in College.
Why Sir, said Carter, I have been looking for bloodshed between your
Indian hostage pupils and our native young bloods for some time.
Alas, replied the Doctor, that the most benevolent intentions, devised with
the truest apparent wisdom, are ever thus thwarted by the wickedness of man.
We grant you the intentions, said Moore, but for the wisdom of
shutting
up twenty or thirty wild young Indians, in the same building with an equal
number of whites, quite as wild in one sense, we cannot vouch. You must
recollect, Doctor, that Carter and myself have been personal witnesses of the
experiment, and we can testify to the ceaseless arrogance on the part of the
whites, and the consequent deadly enmity of the Indians. They are most of
them princes of the blood, too, and may ill brook indignity from mere plebeian
youths, even of our color. Why Sir, it was no longer ago than one night last
week, being in the capital and hearing a great noise and confusion in the
College, I walked up to ascertain the cause. Must I tell it, Doctor?
Tell ittell it, said Kate.
Tell it, said Dorothea.
I see the two Doctors and the Governor, hang their heads, but being put
upon the stand I must tell the whole truth. Thus, then, you know ladies, that
there is a particular wing of the College, devised by Sir Christopher Wren,
for the express accommodation of their young savage majesties. Two occupy
each room, and for their farther accommodation, there are two cots. Now on
the night alluded to, half an hour after the Indian class was dismissed to their
quarters, and after prayers, such a yelling was heard from that wing that the
people of the town actually thought the College again on fire, and some of
the wicked lads in the other end began tolling the bell, which brought also the
firemen with their buckets and ladders. In the melee I arrived and found
upon enquiring, that the connecting pins from every cot in the Indian wing
had been removed, so that each one caught a tumble when he supposed
himself
only leaping into bed, and that was not all. Every tub and bucket in old
Mrs. Stites' kitchen (the Stewardess of the College) had been filled with
water, and as far as they would go, placed under the cots, so that many of
them got a ducking into the bargain. Such yelling, and screeching, and
whooping, never was heard. The savage youngsters were for rushing in a
body upon their white assailants, and it required all the authority of the Indian
master, backed by the other Professors and citizens who had assembled, to
quell the riot. A party of citizens had to patrol the College the whole night,
to prevent bad consequences between the two races.
It is too true, said Dr. Blair, but that is the fault of our boys, and not
of the original design.
I beg your pardon, Reverend Sir, for controverting your position, said
Carter, but the original design to be entitled to the wisdom which you claim
for it, should have provided for the liability in boys of one race to play pranks
upon another. This is not a solitary instance. Moore and myself could
entertain
this goodly company till dinner time, with accounts of these disasters.
The Reverend Commissary had risen from the table and was walking along
the room back and forth, his hands locked behind him, thrown into painful
reflections by the testimony and the arguments of his former pupils. The
girls were still laughing over the ridiculous figures which the savages must
have cut, but not daring to give full vent to their feelings because they knew
that it was a tender subject with all three of the elderly gentlemen.
In this very different state of feeling in the twothe elder and the younger'
the breakfast table was soon deserted. The young people to prepare for the
contemplated excursion, and the elders to debate that matter gravely, over
which the others were still amusing themselves.
CHAPTER XI.
YORKTOWN BEFORE THE REVOLUTION.
It
is not known to most of our readers, perhaps, that Yorktown, the closing
scene of the Revolution, was once the principal importing mart for all that
region of country, now supplied by Baltimore, Richmond and Norfolk. Such
was its importance at the date of our story. The roadsted, now occupied by
a few miserable fishing smacks, was once occupied by merchant-ships, and a
tall forest of masts crowded a quay, now only the mart of the celebrated York
River Oysters. Large ware-houses and imposing edifices, both public and
private, and brisk business occupied its streets. Such was its appearance as
Kate Spotswood cantered up its principal avenue, Moore on one side and
Carter on the other, the whole cavalcade following. They rode through the
principal streets of the city, until they came to that point, since known as
the location of the wind-millthere on both sides of the angle formed by the
entrance of the river into the waters of the bay, in every vacant lot, and even
in the unfrequented streets were tents, and camp-fires, many of the latter
without the comforts of the former, while the hotels were filled to overflowing
with strangers of higher grade. The party rode in among the encamped
emigrants, and commenced making enquiries for their mysterious visitors, but
there were so many for whom the description would answer, and so many
had already set out to the interior, that it was impossible to trace them.
Both the young ladies dismounted and walked among the poorer sort,
dispensing
their charities: they found so many really needy applicants and in some
instances sufferers, that they promised to send them a wagon with more
substantial
supplies as soon as they got home. The Governor had alighted at
the house of Mr. Diggs, a member of the general assembly, and a personal
and political friend, and here again he sent out messengers for the bearer of
the letter, but all in vain. While thus occupied a young stranger presented
himself as a candidate for employment. He stated that he was one of the
emigrants, and without means to prosecute his journey into the interior, and
without a single relation among all those who had arrived with himthat he
was a classical scholar and desirous of obtaining the situation of private tutor
in some gentleman's family, for a short time, in order to obtain means to
prosecute
his designs in coming over; that his name was Henry Hall
twenty-four
years of age, and intended to reside permanently in the colony. The
Governor was pleased with the young man, and wanted just such an one to
direct Mr. Robert's studies. He told the applicant, therefore, that he would
send a horse for him as soon as he arrived at home, and as no credentials or
testimonials of qualification had been exhibited, he would place him in the
hands of Dr. Blair, who would put him through his syntax, and as for the
mathematics, said the veteran, his eyes glistening with delight, and rubbing
his hands, I will try you about that myself. Do you know anything about
military engineering, young man, continued he, as he saw him about to
depart
?
Yes, Sir.
Ha, then, you are just my man, we will make a night of it, depend upon it.
The party soon after returned to Temple Farm without having obtained
any clue to the route of those whom they were so anxious to find. The
Governor
dispatched old June with a horse for the young man who proposed
becoming tutor to Robert, as he had promised. Each one now sought out
his own amusement until dinner time, some strolled upon the lawn, while
others walked upon the beach and gathered shells. Old Dr. Evylin retired
into the house to read a letter from his daughter, which the post brought him
that morning, in answer to a most pressing invitation from the ladies of
the mansion to visit them. As it was characteristic of the lady, and as
she is quite an important little personage, we will give it entire:
Williamsburg
,
July, 1714.
Dear Father:
Your note of last night, containing an invitation to Temple Farm, from
Kate, has just been received. I will go, but for a reason, among others,
which I fear my ever kind friend, Kate, will consider any thing but
complimentary
it
is because this house is haunted, and I can no longer stay in it.
Look not so grave, dear father, 'tis no ghost. I wish it was, or he was, for
it is that same tedious, tiresome, persecuting, Harry Lee. I have been most
anxiously expecting your return; but, as it seems, you have become a
permanent
fixture at Temple Farm, it is but right that I should grow along side
of the parent stem. The townsfolk are even more anxious for your return
than I am. I tell them you ran away from practice, but it seems the more
you desire to run away from it, the more they run after you. Few people in
this dreary world have been able to effect so much unmixed good as you have,
and for that, I thank God. Dear Father, I have no desire to live but for your
sake, and that the short time we are to live together may not be diminished by
any act of mine, I will be with you presently. Our poor pensioners and
invalids
are all doing as well as usual, and I leave them in the hands of the Rev.
Mr. Jones, who, I know, will care for them as we would. He is surely one
of God's chosen instruments for doing good in this world. He has shouldered
his cross in earnest, and devoutly does he labor to advance the Redeemer's
kingdom.
The week that you have been absent, dear father, has appeared the longest
seven days of my life. I do not know what my flowers and birds will do
without
me, but I am sure they can better spare my presence than I can yours.
Ever your affectionate and devoted daughter,
ELLEN EVYLIN.
Kate was sitting anxiously waiting to hear from the old gentleman what
answer his daughter returned, and she saw a tear glistening in his eye, as
he handed her the note. She read it over; the old gentleman sitting silent
until she had finished and returned it. Poor Ellen, said she, as she looked
up in his face, from which the tears were now stealing down, but despond
not, dear Doctor, the change of scene and air will surely do her good.
I fear her case is beyond the reach of human aid, replied he.
Indeed! do you consider it so hopeless?
Her's is a crushed spirit, my dear Kate, she has no physical disease
except such as is produced by it, and you know it is hard to pluck up the
cooted sorrow.
Never despair, dear Doctor, cheerful company and fresh air on horseback,
and long rambling walks among the flowers and green leaves, and the
seabreeze
,
may do wonders for her. I'll show you that I have not been your
disciple for nothing.
They separated; the old man to walk along the beach, and try to relieve
his melancholy forebodings by watching the sparkling wave, and the white
sails as they spread for that land from which he had brought the mother of
his drooping daughter. Let no desponding heart walk upon the sea-shore
to cultivate cheerfulness; it is too much like standing on the borders of
eternity. The melancholy and monotonous roar of the distant waves is too
depressing; they are too much like the great current of human life, forever
pouring onwards, regardless of individual suffering.
That evening the Doctor's old family coach came rumbling up to the hall
door, at a staid and sober gait, and the whole party in the parlor turned out
to receive so unusual a visitor. There stood the gentlemen, old and young,
bare headed, and the ladies likewise, surrounding the steps of the carriage,
each one anxious to render assistance, but all giving way for the Doctor to
receive his daughter in his arms, carrying her, poor old man, to the platform
before he suffered her to regain her feet. Fondly she hung upon his neck
as they stood there, he within one step of the landing, and she on the top;
no one ventured to disturb them, for both were weeping and seemed to have
forgotten the presence of any body else.
One hour afterwards she entered the parlor, supported by Kate on one
side and Dorothea on the other, to a large arm chair, made soft with shawls.
She was rather a
petil
figure, but what was lost in majesty of form was fully
compensated for by symmetry of mould, or rather had been, for she was now
thin and shadowy. Her face was almost transparent, it was so purely white,
and the blue veins upon her temples shone through her wax-like skin, as if
the current of life was restrained but by a gossamer texture. Her eyes were
large, and of a fine deep blue, so that when they slowly moved over the objects
in the room, it almost startled one, so shadow-like was her general
appearance
.
Her hair was of a brown color, but when the rays of light fell upon
its rich folds, they played among them, so as to bring out their fine auburn
tintsat one moment exhibition a black shade, and the next a purple. She had
no cough, nor any apparent symptoms of physical disease, yet she was
evidently
wasting away in the very first bloom of her youth and beauty, for beautiful she
still was, and in perfect health, must have been a fascinating little fairy. How
those two girls tried to entertain her, hanging round her chair, and bringing
to her in succession, every object of curiosity or interest about the place!
Even little Robert had piled her lap with curious shells, and Kate was turning
over some new volumes of Pope's and Swift's poetry, just then in the first novelty
of their recent publication; every now and then reading her passages which
struck their fancy. How the whole conversation of a room full of company
became subdued by the presence of one poor little valetudinarian, instead of
chosing the most cheerful and enlivening subjects, the sufferer is sure to be
painfully impressed with the fact that he or she, is a drawback to the
enjoyment
of others; and so it was on the present occasion, for she soon observed
it, and spoke of it to Kate.
You must not let me engross the attention of every one, my dear Kate,
said she, in a suppressed voice, it is painful to me.
The Governor, who was sitting near, heard it, and replied, Suppose, then,
we have in the young tutor, and put him through his facings: Essex tells me
he is waiting.
No, no, papa, said Kate, it will never do, remember the young man has
some feeling, and may not choose to be examined upon his proficiency in a
room full of company.
Poh! poh, said the Governor, bring him in Essex, we will treat Bob to
a scene of his master learning some of his own lessons, before he administers
the birch to him.
The boy rubbed his hands with delight at the proposition, and his father sent
him off to bring in an armful of Latin and Greek books from the library.
The Reverend Commissary was sent for too, who came, spectacles on nose,
just fresh from his books. He, too, objected to the publicity of the
examination
,
but knowing the peculiarities of his friend, his sudden whims and
eccentricities
,
he attempted like a skilful tactitian, to compromise the matter.
I left the young man in the library, said he, and I will return and ask
him if he has any objection.
Tell him then, said the Governor, that I will require these young
gentlemen
to construe verse about with him, and we will try which has the best
of it, Old Oxford or William and Mary.
The youngsters seemed not quite so ready for the exhibition, now that they
were to take part in the performance, as they were before, but they
acquiesced
of course.
The Rev. Commissary returned with the young scholar. He was dressed
in black, rather the worse for the wear, but still scrupulously neat and clean.
The deep impress of long familiarity with persons of high breeding was in
every step and movement.
Egad, he's a gentleman at all events, said the Governor, as he eyed him
coming up the room, and rather abashed himself, that he had proposed such a
boyish freak to such a man: such was his way, however, and he attempted
to smooth over the matter.
Mr. Hall, here are two or three young gentlemen, alumni of our Western
College, which you have doubtless heard of, and I have proposed that the
Rev. Commissary shall play the pedagogue to-night with the the whole of
us; what say you, will you be one of the class?
Most willingly, your Excellency; seeming to understand the Governor's
mood at once.
Get the books, Bob, the books, the books.
But just at that moment, Kate and her sister ran up to poor Ellen Evylin,
who would have fallen had they not caught her, she was almost gone. She
had been sitting in her big arm chair, so arranged that she had not seem the
proposed tutor. As she recovered a little, she whispered to Kate, upon
whose shoulder her head was leaning, Oh, that voice, it was so like
then she stopped, and Kate prepared to wheel her into another room, but she
strenuously opposed it, and even desired her chair to be turned round, so that
she could see the occupants of the other side of the table.
From that moment, her eye seemed absolately rivetted to the face of the
stanger, and whenever it came to his turn to read, Kate felt her whole
system
thrill and vibrate like one in an ague. This was very strange; and still
more surprised Kate, but she kept these thoughts to herself.
The Governor was once more in high glee with his new class, and was
really taking it turn about with the youngsters at the bucolics. Indeed it
seemed to afford fine sport for all concerned.
Once or twice the stranger youth raised his eyes above his book and
examined
the group, now located on the other side of the room.
The new tutor was far from being an an ordinary looking man. To use
a common homely saying, he was one who had evidently seen better days.
This alone invests one with some interest. The thread-bare garments which
he wears, are deprived at once of all their shabbiness and meanness, and
invested with a compound interest. A graceful movement, an uncommon
expression rivets the eye upon him. We are carried back in imagination to
the place and scenes of his birth and naturally our curiosity is excited. Nor
was this all in the present instance, there was a desponding sadness in the
voice of this young man, a depth in its tones which affected his lady hearers
powerfully. They were all more or less interested in him. Then that deep
scar across his face; how came that there? had he been a soldier? This
question was destined to have some light thrown upon it sooner than they
expected. The Governor being satisfied with his classical attainments, in his
impatience for his favorite studies, soon had Robert's black board brought in
and was figuring away with his chalk at a great rate. He was becoming
delighted with his prize, for even Dr. Blair whispered to him that he was a
ripe scholar. From mathematics it was an easy transition to their military
application, and in less than half an hour his Excellency had one of
Marlborough's
late battles drawn fully out, and he and his new antagonist engaged
in a most animated discussion. The veteran's eye glistened with delight
as he listened to the young man's glowing description of the
battle
.
He placed if in an entirely new light, and the Governor now understood
some matters which had been puzzling him ever since the accounts were
received. He therefore gave up the controversy, which was quite a new
thing for him in military matters and no mean compliment to his new
adversary
.
After reposing his eye in a brown study for a few moments on the
black board, where the lipes of attack and defence still remained, he
wheeled
suddenly upon his antagonist and exclaimed: I'll tell you what it is, Mr.
Tutor, you must have seen servicenone but a true military eye could
correct
the errors of my lines.
The poor youth was struck dumb, all his late animation and military ardor
engendered amidst the clashing of imaginary armies, vanished in a moment.
He was confused. His antagonist seeing this, continued: Never mind
young man on which side you took up armsthere shall be no tales out of
school here. You are in a freer atmosphere than that which you lately
leftwhere the Dutchess and Mrs. Masham alternately sway the fate of
contending
armies. I have been a soldier of fortune myself, and it boots little to
me in what school you learned you tacties. Sufficient that you are a
soldier.
Gad, Bob, with such a master you will beat John yet, if you only spur up,
my man.
Your Excellency seems fully informed of the shameful wrangling of the
Queen's Ministers, replied Hall modestly.
Rather say the wrangling of the female gossips of the Court, and you
would come nearer the mark. It is no longer Oxford and Bolinbroke, and
that was bad enough, but it is now a fair fight of petticoat against petticoat.
The instructions which I receive by one packet are countermanded by the
next. If this state of things continue I must divide my papers into two
packages and label one, `despatches from her grace of Marlborough,' and the
other `from her high Mightiness, Mrs. Masham.'
Any further news from home, Governor? asked Carter, concerning the
grand expedition across the mountains.
Not one syllable. I have been twice ordered to prepare my little army,
and twice has it been countermanded, ere I could cleverly commence
operations
.
The council, dama themI beg your Reverences pardon as being of
themis too much like the Queen's privy council, they are under petticoat
government too, and thus far have most effectually thwarted me.
By this time he had become quite excited, and was walking with immense
strides across the floor and talked on, almost in a continuous strain. They
hope to unhorse me before I can set out, but upon the very first intimation
from the ministry that my measures are approved, I will set outthen arrest
me who can. Curse the block-heads of the council.
Softly, softly, your Excellency, said the Commissary, you should not
denounce these men, because they cannot think exactly with us. The
General
Assembly were fully as much to blame, for they refused to vote the
necessary
funds. They could not see with our eyes.
See with our eyes! replied the Governor, contemptuously, nor with
any other, damn them, they cannot see an inch from from their noses. What
do they know about military matters? turning to Henry Hall, as he
continued
vehementlyyou see, Sir, those rascally Frenchmen are hemming us
in, in every direction. They are gradually approximating their military
settlements
up the branches of the Mississippi, on the one hand, and down the
lakes on the other, until they are just about to meet on the other side of the
mountains. Now I propose to march an expedition across these mountains
and by force, if necessary, seize the strip of land lying between their
settlements
.
No military eye could look upon the thing for one single moment,
without being struck with the magnificence of the conception. I have
written
to the ministry, sent maps of the rivers and mountains, and urged them
before it is too late,but while they are carrying on their cursed
squshbles
between the rival factions of two old wives, our enemies will have
already seized upon the ground.
While he spoke thus, he had seized the chalk, and was rapidly
sketching
the course of the principal rivers, having their sources most directly
among the mountains, and the Blue Ridge, and beyond that again, the
sources of the Mississippi, running South and South-west, and the rivers
on the North emptying into the great lakes. He was a fine
draughtsman
,
and a military engineer of the highest repute in that day, and when
he had finished his handy work, really presented a field for a martial
enterprise
,
calculated to fire up the enthusiasm of much tamer spirits than
those he addressed. Hall especially, entered into his views with an
ardor
and a zeal which captivated the old veteran at once. His practised
eye ran over the plan of the campaign with the rapidity of intuition, and
in less than half an hour, he had mastered all the then known
geography
of the country, together with the forces, position and number of the
French settlements. It is true, that they knew not of the double chain
of mountains, and had never heard of the great valley of Virginia,that
garden spot of the land,but with that exception, these plans were
wouderfully
correct, and into that mistake they were purpesely betrayed, as
will be seen as we progress.
They supposed that the head waters of the Mississippi, had their source
immediately beyond the mountains, which could be just faintly discovered
from the then frontier settlements of the Colony.
The table was soon strewed with papers and mans, giving an exact detail of
the militia and regular force of the Colony, and all the known Geography of
Virginia.
I see, remarked Hall, that your population numbers an hundred
thousand, your militia nine thousand five hundred and twenty two, of which
two thousand three hundred and sixty-three are light horse, and seven
thousand
one hundred and fifty-nine are foot and dragoons.
Exactly, said the Governor, and yet these craven hearted delegrates
and councillors contend that I want to strip the colony of its military
protection
,
to go upon some wild Quixotic expedition beyond the borders of
civilization
,
from whence we will never return, and if we do, to find them all
butchered at home. Was any thing over heard so supremely ridieulous?
Can you not raise an entirely new force for the transmontaise expedition?
asked Hall.
As how? said his Excellency, eagerly.
Suppose you issue a proclamation, calling upon all the young gentry of
the colony to come forward, with each so many followers of his own enlisting,
or chosing. Say three hundred gentlemen, with each fifty followers. If
you take possession of this fine country beyond the mountains in her Majesty's
name, surely her Ministers will make liberal grauts to those who thus conquer
or acquire it.
A glorious conception, by Heavens, hugging the new tutor actually in
his arms, and giving way to other evidences of delight.
I'll tell you what it is, Harry Hall, you shall draw up that proclamation
this very night. I'll read it before I go to bed.
No, no papa, said Kate, interfering, Mr. Hall is already fatigued with
his day's toil, and is besides just from the confinement of a ship, he has
already
been wearying himself reading at least a bushel of your dry papers,
Dry papers! replied the father, they are far more interesting than the
gingling nonsense which Bernard has been reading to you young ladies the
last half hour.
Fie, fie papa, to call Mr. Pope's beautiful pastorals gingling nonsense. I
appeal to Dr. Blair, whether there is not food in them to satisfy minds of even
masculine vigor.
Right, right my Kate, said the old prelate, in both cases. The young
man is doubtless fatigued and the poetry is good.
I am not the least weary, your Excellency, and will draft your
proclamation
on the spot, if you say so.
No, no, the general voice is against me, and we will adjourn the subject
until after breakfast in the morning, especially as I see Bob is coming already
for his first lesson.
The youngster had been standing some time leaning upon a pair of
foils, and now approaching bashfully, asked Hall if he could give him lessons
with these also.
Oh, yes, said he, taking one of the instruments out of his hand, and
telling
Robert to pat on his basket, while he laid his own on the table, and placed
himself bare-headed in a posture of defence. He suffered the boy to make a
few passes at him, and then disarmed him so handsomely and so easily that
he threw the foil entirely over, end for end, and caught it in his own hand.
A trick of the Continental army, by Heavens! exclaimed the Governor.
Come here, Moore, this gentleman needs a more formidable competitor, than
Bob. Here, Mr. Hall, is one of my holiday pupils; toast him a little for the
amusement of these girls.
At it they went in fine style, both evidently playing shy until they should
see a little into the others fence, and both giving and parrying with caution
and dexterity. Neither had much advantage in length of limb, and both were
practised swordsmen, but Moore rather undervaluing his plebeian adversary,
began to push at him pretty fiercely; instantly his foil was seen turning
pirouetts in the air.
Ha, said the-old veteran, rising and rabbing his hands, have I found an
antagonist at last? Now for it, Mr. Hall.
Even the ladies began to take some interest in the game, for they were
quite accustomed to such scenes, and did not usually turn even to notice so
ordinary an affair; but now when two such extraordinary swordsmen
encountered
,
every one was looking on with pleased interest. Long and dexterously
did they thrust and parry, advancing and retreating, until they were so worn
down that the two blades lay against each other in close pressure, neither
willing or daring to renew the encounter.
Come, come, said Dr. Blair, that's enoughyou are both satisfied.
Like two boys tired out with fighting, they were willing enough to desist.
The tutor was soon after shewn to his own room. When he had gone, the
Governor was loud in his praise, and pronounced him a most extraordinary
young man, and the finest swordsman that he had encountered since he left
the army.
I'll tell you what it is, GovernorI have been thinking what an
acquisition
that young man would be to our College,' said the Commissary.
The College may go a begging this time, Dr. Blair, I intend that Henry
Hall shall see the highest blue peak of the Apelachian mountains before I
am done with him. Providence has doubtless sent him to me with some such
design, and when I have caught the bird in my net, you come and open your
cage, and say, let him fly in here. No, noI have engaged Mr. Hall for
Bob, and your College must get along without him, I assure you.
Well, well, it will be time enough for us when you return from the
mountains
,
if indeed you don't leave the bones of the fine youth bleaching upon
their highest peaks.
Rather an unkind cut of the old Doctor, and which set the Governor to
thinking for a moment ere he replied.
Just as sure as the sun shines to-morrow, I tell you, Dr. Blair, that I will
5
lead an expedition over yonder blue mountains, and I will triumph over the
Frenchthe Indians, and the Devil, if he chooses to join forces with them.
No doubt of itno doubt of it. I did not question the result at all, I only
meant to allude to the mishaps inevitable from all human undertakings, and
against these, even your great military experience cannot guarantee this
youth.
The evening closed as previous ones had done, with family prayer, after
which the party separated for the night.
CHAPTER X.
LOVE'S YOUNG DREAM.
The
morning broke still and serene over the shores of the Chesapeake,
now in the full fruition of their summer glories, and the flowers clustering
with a rich harvest of beauties o'er hill and dale, garden and lawn, meadow
and brook. The sun was just scattering his ruddy rays over the eastern
shores, and lighting up the sleepy waters of that glorious inland sea, like a
burnished mirror clearing itself from the taint of human breath. The marine
birds soared in lazy flights along the surface, admiring their own graceful
shadows, perhaps, while out toward the ocean, they seemed like white feathers
floating lazily in the sun beams. It was a morning to give wings to the
imagination
,
yet the picture cannot be embodied perfectly to the mind of another,
it must be felt as well as seen. The accessaries of temperature, health,
position
,
and, above all, the true, mood must be present to insure its perfect
enjoyment
.
To exist, to breathe, is then a positive enjoyment.
Kate Spotswood was of a temperament to enjoy all these summer glories,
with a relish only known to nature's poets and painters. She was not
disposed
to indulge in the dreamy mood alone, however, for at the first peep of
dawn she was in Ellen Evylin's room, and had roused up the valetudmarian.
That wakeful child of sorrow lay with her eyes as preternaturally bright as
they were the night before, and Kate saw that they had been very differently
employed than in sleeping, for her pillow was yet moist with tears. She
begged her friend to leave her to her thoughts; but no, Kate said, she was
her physician, that her father had put her under her care, and she was now
about to administer the first prescription; she drew the curtain from the
window, and pointed to the glorious scene without, stretching away in the
distance, until it was lost is the misty junction of the watery horizon. Look,
dear Ellen, at those long blue pennants sweeping out towards Cape Charles,
did you ever see any thing more beautiful? see how they contrast with the
lighter blue of the sky, and now how the sun, rolling up behind, tips their
edges with crimson. Get up, dear Ellen, God never made these morning
glories to be seen in bed; it is the salutation of Heaven to Earth; nature is
just drawing the first curtain from before his altar, and we of the earth should
not reject the proffered boon.
Dear Kate, what an enthusiast you are? said poor Ellen, still longing
to be alone.
Enthusiast, Ellen? indeed I am an enthusiast, God loves enthusiasts, and
the wicked only hate them. They chime not with gross and grovelling
pursuits
;
they are of Heaven, not of Earth. All that is bright and lovely and
beneficent of Earth, is born of enthusiasm. Enthusiasm first discovered this
glorious land; it fired the hearts of the Crusaders; and if they recovered not
the Holy Land, did far more, for they exalted our sex to their true position
and dignity. My father, too, he is called an enthusiast by the cold-blooded
common senso men; look at him, dear Ellen, his thoughts soar forever over
those blue mountains, and that very passion will cary him one day to their
summits, and does it not ennoble his character? Is he not elevated by it; see
how pure and guileless he walks among the poor intriguing politicians who
clog his steps, and yet cannot advance one of their own. Is he not the life
and soul of the whole Colony?
Kate, you bear down all opposition, I give up to enthusiasm: only bring
me back to its brilliant hopes and aspirations, and you will earn your title of
Doctress, indeed!
That will I, my poor scared bird; you have been caged so long, that you
have forgotten how to flutter, much less fly; but come, soar along with me
among the bright wings that surround us without, and your pinlons will come
back again. You were never made, dear Ellen, to grovel, and pine, and
die among the tamer duties and every day drudgeries of life.
I have substituted duty for enthusiasm, Kate.
Duty! well, come Mrs. Duty, only give me your hand and I will trip you
over field and flower, and brae and brake, and moor and lawn, until we shall
accomplish all Mrs. Duty's task, and far more besides. I tell you, Ellen, that
duty is none the worse for a little of the genuine fire, she goes lame without
wings, and even hobbles on crutches, but clap the pinions to her, and she soars
aloft, and sips the very beauties which God created to be met half way by
such a spirit. Heaven itself is but one continued scene of enthusiasm; we
cannot form a conception of its glories without bidding good-day to Earth.
And leave poor old Duty behind.
There you are wrong, dear Ellen, to separate them; I would only clothe
the dame in brilliant bues, while you want to murder her with rags and
poverty.
Oh, Kate, how you do run away with the argument.
Not at all, Ellen, I only want to convince you that there are more ways than
one to do right, and that even doing right in in a peculiar way, is very near
a kin to doing wrong.
Why, Kate, one would think to hear you talk, that I had been doing
something
very wrong.
It is not exactly that, dear Ellen, but I wish to convince you that there
are higher and nobler duties than those, with the performance of which you
satisfy your conscience.
You surprise me exceedingly! tell me what those high duties are?
A cheerful spirit is the first and greatest thing which you lack, seeing
the poor valetudinarian burst into tears, she pushed away her woman and
threw her arms round her, while she continued:
Nay, nay, nay, Ellen, I would not wound you for the world; I wished
rather to coax than scold you from your settled dejection.
Kate, you know not what I suffer, you cannot, no one can know.
There is the very point dearesttry it with me, no mother ever listened
to daughter with the same indulgence that I will listen to you. If your
imagination magnifies trifles into matters of importance, it is enough for me
that they are so to you, and I will look at them with your eyes. Dear Ellen, I
seek your confidence with the most sincere desire to befriend youI promise
you I will feel too much as you feelI will weep when you weep, and if you
cannot laugh when I laugh, why, we will e'en cry together. Dear Ellen,
throw me not off, I love you like my own, own Sister.
I cannot withstand your appeal, Kate, you have made a child of me, and
you must put up with my childishness.
By this time Kate had her arm round the walst of the invalid, and was
urging her through the garden, to the grove beyond.
Here is a lovely seat, said she, and we can sit here at the foot of this
old tree and talk till we are tiredor rather till you are tired, for when that
comes, then I will talk to you. The birds you see are warbling their pretty
stories among the fresh green leaves. See that mocking bird, how it chatters
to its mate, that is me, Ellen, and the silent one represents you, only I'm sure
I cannot discourse such sweet music as my prototype.
Dear Kate, the very sound of your voico, cheers my heart,before I left
home, I had not walked this far, for many, many months.
Oh how I rejoice, that you are come at lastyou don't know how I have
longed to have you here, just as now, your whole confidence mine.
I shall be so, Kate, and I have often wished for such a confident, but my
whole being shrinks from disclosing the weaknesses of earlier days.
One to hear you talk, would suppose you fifty at the least.
I may appear staid and sober enough, but I have not always been so.
Do you not recollect when we first met at the Capital, what a thoughtless
rattlebrain I was?
I recollect only that you took me captive, heart and soul, little girls as we
were, and if I remember right, I was not the only one.
Oh, Kate! what memories your words recallwhat happinesswhat
weaknesses! those of childhood, to be sure,but is not the sturdy oak bent
when it is a twig, and grows it not so forever? You know it is so Kate,
with our sex at least. The world is all wrong in supposing that we wait to
come out into the world to prepare for the world. Those things which fix
irretrievably fix our destiny, are the legitimate fruits of childhoodthey are
matters of feeling, not of judgment. I am almost wicked enough to repine
sometimes when I think that my destiny for this life was cast and lost before
I was perfectly a responsible being, but it was doubtless so designed by an
All-Wise Providence, to teach me that this is not my true home.
There now, Ellen, we might begin the argument again, were I disposed
to interrupt you, but I am not. You were speaking at the time when we
first met.
Or rather Kate, when I first met Frank Lee. You see I can even call
his name now, which my poor fond father would no more do in my presence,
than he would explode a petard at my feet. Poor Frank was left a ward of
my father's, you know. Papa attended old Mr. Lee in his last illness, he was
unprepared to dieno will made. Papa wrote his will and agreed to accept the
trust of his two sons, Francis and Henry. He brought them from
Westmoreland
with him and they went to College from our house. Oh, what
happy, joyous, frolicksome days were those of the first year. I saw no
difference
in the boys, they were both my seniors, and both as brothers to me.
Those happy, happy evenings during the long winter nights, when my father
used to sit and talk to us about the structure of the earthits revolutions,
and those of the other planets, and then of the innumerable worlds beyond
and sometimes he would perform chemical experiments for our amusement
in short he became a child among children, in order that they might become
men. But I went hand in hand in all their studies, aye, and plays toothey
almost made a little Amazon of me, and I really believe they would have
taken me out gunning with them, if papa had not put his veto upon it. This
he could not do however with all the unfeminine amusements into which they
forced me. You recollect my little sorrel poney, and how we three cantered
over the neighborhood of Williamsburg. Not an old fish or oyster negro, but
knew us a mile off. Oh, how merry Frank wasso full of buoyant spirits
so exhiliarated with hopeso cheerfulso kind to every body, so obliging
so repentant when he did wrong, so stern and steady when right. I
think I can see his pouting lip now maintaining his boyish rights.
Do you know Kate, that I saw a fearful resemblance to the expression of
his mouth in that strange tutor last night. I know it was only a chance
resemblance
,
wholly accidental, but it has interested me in that young man.
When I saw him throw his eyes to the floor and become lost in a reverie, until
they had to jog him quite rudely, when it came to his turn to read, I would
have given any thing in this world to have travelled with his thoughts to
his distant home, and proscribed friends. Perhaps thought I, he too has been
left an orphan like poor Frank, and wandered as he did, from the happy scenes
of his childhood, and is now calling them up one by one, in painful pictures
of the past. I longed to compare notes with him, I know it was very foolish,
but it was all conjured up by that smile.
Oh such an expression, never but one youth before had. It told a history
there were years of association with it, long years of memory lent their
shadows
,
and that bright smile was like the dimples round a stone thrown at
random
into the river, slowly receding and vanishingleaving the shores and
their histories as if the stone had never been thrown. But where was I?
Oh! up to this time, I had never perceived any difference between the
brother's
,
or never analyzed it, if I had. Frank being the elder, seemed very
naturally
to take the lead in everything. One circumstance I did remark, by the
bywhenever he went away to spend a day or a week, with some neighboring
youth among the gentry, we were all moped to death. Father and Harry
were as much rejoiced to see him return as I was, but this was attributed by
me at the time, to the breaking up of our little family party. I knew not but
it would have been the same if any other one had gone. I perceived not that he
was the very life and soul of our little meetings. Neither had I perceived up
to this time, that Frank was at all different from other youths of his age, he
appeared just like them to mehe dressed like the rest of the young gentry
rode like themtalked like them. No, not exactly eitherhe did not talk
like common boys, for there was a winning gentleness about him mingled
with the manliness of riper years, which the old negroes used to say
betokened
an early death. Alas, how true those forebodings were. You see I
cannot
keep up the history of the two boys together, I so runaway with the
memory
of Frank. There was no perceptible difference in their attainments at
school, more than could easily be accounted for by disparity of years. This
was not great, but two or three years is greater I believe in mental than
physical
growth.
As I began to approach my fourteenth year, now five years ago, I marked
the distinctive identity of my father's wards. I observed little things, but not
great onesthose on the surface, but nothing deeply. Henry was the more
silent of the two, more cautious, prouder and more given to the pomps and
vanities of his station. He loved to affect the gentleman even thus early,
would seldom ridc out without a servant, and loved to be waited upon for show
and ceremony's sake, as well as from convenience or actual necessity. He
could not bear a joke, of playfulness of any sort at his own expense, while he
was very willing to be amused at the expense of others; yet, when he
laughed
or played, it was never with his whole heart and soul, like his brother.
You see, dear Kate, I am answering your oft repeated appeals in behalf of
Henry Lee, in giving his history.
Henry, to tell the truth, loved self too much, and regarded others too little,
while his brother was the very reverse in every respect. Frank, you know, by
the laws of the land, inherited the bulk of his father's property, which had
been in no way disturbed by the will, except to give Harry his mother's
share, which was amply sufficient, I am told, to have made him independent,
and better off than younger brothers generally are. Yet there was now
evidently
growing up a jealousy of his brother's great possessions. Though the
younger he would sneer at his brother's position, as the head of the family
bow to him when rebuked, in mock humility.
In all their College squabbles with other boys, Harry was sure to be the
aggressor
in the quarrel, and Frank was sure to do the fighting; not that Harry
was a coward at all, but his brother was so much more of a generous
and ohivalrous nature. I have seen him come home all bloody from
fighting
Harry's battles, and cannot remember an instance of the latter
becoming
the champion of the other.
He was the younger, said Kate.
True, but he was the stouter and stronger too, I believe. However, give
him all the advantages of his position; I would not detract one iota from his
claims, of any kind. These distinctive marks in their character began to
develope themselves more and more every day, until the very servants
plainly showed their partiality for Frank. My father, too, impartial, calm
and temperate, as you know him to be in his feelings, could not help
showing
his greater fondness for the elder brother, and this brings me to the
relation of a fact, a small one it is true, but these develope character.
Harry perceived this growing partiality of my fatherif that may be called
partiality, which was nothing more than the love of good and generous actions,
and was not long in telling him of it. Not only did he charge him with
it, but he alleged that it was the result of interested motives, and grew
entirely out of his desire to secure Frank and his fortune for his
daughter
.
We were all present, and I am very sure that I shall never forget the
scene which succeeded. My venerable old father was terribly shocked, as
you may suppose, and he rebuked Harry, as I never heard him rebuke any
one before. If Harry had possessed any genuine feeling, he would have
shrunk into nothing, at such a withering castigation, from a source usually
so mild and gentle. But he was far from feeling remorse on the occasion,
and never retracted.
It was a beautiful moonlight night, and I ran out into the garden, and there,
in that old summer house which you have so often chided me for making my
home, I had like to have cried my very eyes out, for mortification. I had
never had such a thought pass through my mind, any more than if Frank had
been my brother. Now that it was distinctly presented, and in such a
startling
light, too, shall I confess it to you, my dear Kate, my kind confessor, that
it was not wholly unpleasant. The mortification was profound, but I fear the
poison had sunk equally deep with it. I, of course, at that age, could not
enter into a very rigid self-examination; my powers of self-analysis, if I had
even been disposed to exercise them, could not be very great, but I can trace
my feelings now, and I confess to you, that that charge, a disgraceful one if
true, carried with it a surmise that, though wholly untrue on our parts, it
might not be so on Frank's Oh, what a terrible quarrel succeeded between
those two young brothers; Frank poured down such a torrent of indignation
upon his brother, as no one could have supposed would ever issue from lips usually
so mild and gentle; and, must I confess all, it was mingled with such praises of
me, as no poor motherless girl of fourteen could hear in safety. I did not
eave'sdrop
,
but hearing the quarrel somewhat abate, I essayed to get to my own
room, which could only be approached through the one in which they were
sitting. I retreated to my seat again. My poor, almost heart broken father,
was already locked up in his chamber, and did not again make his appearance
that night.
At length Henry was silenced, but not abashed or repentant, and walked
himself off in great state, declaring he would never enterour doors again. He
slept that night, truly enough, in College. When he was gone, Frank came
in search of me. You, dear Kate, can imagine my feelings; young as I was,
I was covered with shame, and must have looked to him like the guilty
participator
in the interested scheme with which his brother charged me, but it
was from a very different cause.
I was beginning to have a faint idea that the youth before me was indeed
dearer to me than a brother; and after what had been said, and feeling as I
did, how could I look him in the face? And how could he look at my evident
shame and embarrassment, without having a suspicion, at least, that that part
was true; but he was a brave, noble, generous boy; his own nature was too
bright and pure to suspect others. He seated himself on the grass at my feet,
and took both my hands, and then poured out his whole soul to me, boy as he
was, with all its generous treasures and lofty aspirations. He, too, it seemed,
had been unconscious of the slumbering passion within, until it had been
revealed sometime before by a similar scene between him and his brother,
when quite alone. Kate, I had to respond to his eloquent, pleading passion,
or else give further grounds for suspecting me of some sinister design in
future, because I had betrayed too much already to affect concealment now,
and I met his confiding nature with a frankness equal to his own.
Oh, that bright, fair youth! how the true fervor of passion, in its first
and brightest dream, gushed from his heart. How brilliantly his graceful and
chaste imagination entwined our future lives, through vistas all green and
luxuriant with flowers, and from which even the rude blasts were most
carefully
excluded. He knew little of the real world; he was as guileless and
unpractised in wickedness as a babe, and I was quite as inexperienced. Is it
surprising, then, that I listened to him with a charmed ear and a willing
heart? No, Kate; no girl reared as I had been could anticipate my sad
experience; and it springs not up in the mind by intuition. I listened and
believed; my faith was laid in the deepest foundations of my being; it was
grounded in my very soul. You, Kate, know something of a woman's love,
even in its inception; you know that it is not only a part of her being, but it
is the whole, at least, the layer upon which all else is built. But I not only
had true and unwavering faith in Frank himself, but I believed in his
imaginary
paradise, which his glowing and delighted imagination had painted for
us. I believe that all of our sex spend at least the first quarter of their lives
under a similar illusion, if accident or circumstances produce not the youth
who is to walk hand in hand with us through these bowers of Eden,
imagination
furnishes him at once, clothed in the same ideal colors which we throw
around the real youth, when he rises up before us. Oh, what a gorgeous
dream it is while it lasts! how its hues are thrown around every thing in our
little circumscribed world! your beautiful horizon this morning, Kate, crimson
lit, as it was, seemed poor and tame compared with these pictures, which
memory was even then rearing up over all the past. Can you wonder that
when I turn from them, and look into the cold and dreary future, my physical
strength, and even my moral courage, should sink under the withering
contrast
?
Even our little Eden found a tempter, I will not call him a serpent, for you
know Harry Lee and respect him, and he is often your father's guest, but I
will say that he is by no means exempt from the fierce and deadly passions of
our nature. Nay, more, and let this be the answer once for all to his suit, his
long and persevering suit, pleaded by so many able advocates. Though so
calm and high-bred in all his exterior man, he is but a common man stillall
his passions and deadly enmities are only schooled into good behavior; though
wreaths and flowers grow upon the surface, serpents slumber beneath.
He returned to our house next morning, nothwithstanding his anathmas of
the evening before, and his stealthy and watchful jealousy very soon discovered
that there was an understanding between Frank and me, if not approved by
my father, and this brings me to the latter's view of the matter. He has
always been mother and father both, to me, consequently the most unreserved
confidence existed between us, as much so as ever existed between parent and
daughter. I went, after a sleepless night, and told him the whole story of our
youthful love and its premature revelation; for I can call it nothing else but a
discovery, and an accidental one on our parts. He was most deeply moved,
aye, and interested too, beyond that which a fond parent might be supposed to
feel, for he was struck with the novelty of such a youthful engagement.
I
know
that that youthful sentiment, or call it what you will has interwoven
itself into the very essence of my moral existenceit has become purified
and chastened, still more, I know, by poor Frank's untimely fate. Here she
was interrupted for a while by her tears, but presently proceeded. I say it
has become sublimated until it mingles with my higher sentiments, and has
become a part of my religious faith. I know of no aspirations after Heaven
and its enjoyments, that are not mixed up with thoughts of his pure spirit.
And yet, Ellen, you chided my enthusiasm this very morning?
Aye, dear Kate, not because I did not understand your feelingsI realized
them too vividly, and it brought a shudder over me to think how soon that pure
fountain of your own might be poisoned at its source.
Let me not interrupt you.
My father, I could see, was pleased in spite of himself, and in spite of
Harry's poisonous breath having been blown into our cup of happiness; but
he decided at once, that Frank must anticipate his Edinburgh course, before
determined upon, and they had a long interview that morning, the result of
which was that he was to set out forthwith. Here again, let me say that this
very thing constantly rises up in judgment against Harry. It is unjust,
perhaps
,
but I cannot help viewing him as in part the cause of poor Frank's
unhappy fate. True, he would have gone some time or other, like all the
youth among our gentry, to finish his education in Europe, but he would not
have gone then, and might have escaped the entanglement with your unhappy
relative's affairs, at any other time. Harry could not conceal his delight at
the new arrangement, even under his cold, proud exterior, and positively
refused to accompany his brother.
The parting between Frank and me was at yonder town, and as you may
imagine was only supportable from the hope of our soon uniting again. My
father accompanied us to the ship, and we lay upon the water in our little
boat, waving our handkerchiefs, until that noble vessel had become a speck not
much bigger than the boat itself. I could have stayed there forever, or until
he came back, for he carried with him my present existence as well as future.
The past only is now my own, and its treasures I have been pouring out with
a lavish hand to you, my trnest and oldest friend. Harry seemed to think that
he had the whole game in his own hands, after Frank's departurehe could
not conceal his exultationhe attempted to assume his position in our family,
and even went so far as to affect his easy, careless ways and winning
manners
.
You know enough of that proud and haughty spirit, to estimate how
very unbecoming it appeared in him, but why need I dwell upon that
particular
assumption of what was not his ownhas he not assumed the hues of the
chameleon; and above all, has he not taken every thing that was Franks?
There, dear Ellen, I think you are a little unjust, for he, of course, must
inherit his brother's property.
Of course, but it is not just thatit was the indecent haste to step into
his shoes in all respects, to which I intended to allude, but perhaps I am
unjust to Harry in detailing particulars. I do not wrong him, however, in the
spirit which I attribute to him as to his past life. I know the man, Kate,
most thoroughly and intimately. Has not our childhood been spent
together
and
is he not now ever at our house? No, no, Kate, I have not
wronged him on the wholeI have drawn a flattering likeness of him, and
now contrast poor Frank's personal outlines with his, and you have the two
pictures complete. Saying which she drew forth a small picture hanging to
a ribbon, and looked at it steadily for a moment as a mother hangs over some
memento of her lost one, and then handed it to Kate. It was the miniature
of a fair haired youth, yet in his teens, in a crimson velvet dressthe ruffles
falling from his very white neck and hands, so as rather to add to the extreme
youthfulness of the general air. It was a face to look upon and remember
foreveran eye that sparkled with the high impulses of genius as well as the
flush of health and ardor of youth.
No wonder, dear Ellen, that you cannot look upon Henry with favor, when
you cherish ever near your person such a rival as this. Oh, 'tis a noble
youth!
But let us put it by, Kate. It is not well for me to add to my own regrets
by hearing him praised by others. You already know all that sad part of his
history connected with your uncle's execution. You know that he fell
fighting
like a hero for his rescue.
Would it not be well, my Ellen, to lay it out of sight altogether. I would
certainly advise the step, as the first preparation to fit you for resuming your
proper duties in society.
Dear Kate, what inconsistent creatures we poor mortals arebut now I
had almost taken your place, and become the enthusiast of the morningand
you have almost taken mine, and gone to preaching of duty.
It is only the different lights in which circumstances place us. We are
not so dissimilar by nature as these have made us.
Oh, Kate, may yours never change so as to render us alike in
circumstances
,
as in nature, if it should so unfortunately turn out, all those brilliant
colors and gay flowers in which you are wont to clothe every thing, will be
changed to a vision of darkness. A young girl with hope blotted from the
catalogue of her attributes, is like the sky with the lights extinguishedthe
longer and deeper you look into it, the blacker and more cheerless it looks. In
other words, it is despair, so far as this world is concerned. A woman who
can re-enact the scenes through which I have gone, must be like a tragedy
queen at rehearsal. No, no, Kate, we are formed for but one great trial of
this sort, and my probation is over. I long to sleep forever from the feverish
dream of this life's false hopes and bitter delusions. Death has no terrors for
me; I look at it as a kind friend, and I solemnly believe, that nothing but my
duty to the living has inspired me thus far to carry my troubles amongst the
joy of others. Yes, Kate, to make my confession the whole truth, without
reserve, there is one faint shadow at which I still cling. Do you know, that
sometimes, even yet, I cannot believe that Frank is dead? I cannot realize
it, you will say, because I was not present at the sad ceremonles. That is
something, doubtless, but I cling to things a little more substantial; two
chcumstances
,
so slight, that none but the hopeless could grasp at such straws.
First, then, we have never been enabled to hear those sad particulars, the last
scene I mean; and, secondly, Harry has some such faint notion himself; I will
not call it either a fear or a hope, for I cannot name it, but there is such a
surmise; and now, to conclude, let me confess further, that I came here
with the expectation of having this hope quenched or revived.
Indeed! said Kate, truly surprised.
Yes, Kate, there has been a secret funeral here, of one near and dear
to your father, and with whose death Franks was most intimately connected.
Your father has received many papers relating to these things, and I am
going to commission you sometime soon to be my embassador. Upon that
hope I live, Kate.'
Most willingly will I assist you, for I do believe that something
certain
in that matter is absolutely necessary for you, and that shall be
obtained
at all events, now or hereafter; but do tell me, what funeral do you
allude to, and how could it be secret?
The remains of Gen. Elliot have been clandestinely removed here,
6
whether by your father's orders or by his friends in Europe, I know not,
but certainly with the Governor's approbation, for he had the place of
their reception prepared before the body arrived.
How, you astonish me! first at the facts themselves, and next at your
obtaining the information before me; but tell me how you know this to be true?
I received the intelligence in a letter from my papa, the very same
which enclosed your pressing invitation; he told it to me as a secret,
however
,
never supposing for a moment that I could divulge it to anybody,
much less that I would be down here almost as soon as the answer; and
brought, too, by this news. I obtained his permission to mention all this
to you, last night, as he said your father intended to communicate it to
the family, the first moment you were all alone.
This is very strange, but now I recollect, that gloomy looking structure
at the foot of the lawn, in the centre of a cluster of trees; and this
accounts
,
too, for papa's strange appearance the night we saw blood on his
face, and his unusually grave demeanor ever since. And this it was that
brought you to Temple Farm, a desire to pry further into these matters
that made me your confidant, after all.
Nay, nay, Kate, could I not as well have chosen Dorothea?
Yes, and got laughed at for your pains; sister has no more idea of any one
wasting away from immsterial afflictions, than she has of alchemy. Ten to
one but she would prescribe for your case a bowl of new cream, drank at her
dairy before breakfast. Dear, langhing little jade, she will never die the
victim
of sentiment, depend upon it.
Thrice happy she, replied Ellen with a deep drawn sigh, such should be
all the daughters of this world, but she has yet to be tried, Kate. You may
underrate her susceptibilities.
I meant no more myself, Ellendear gool natured laughing little
baggage. I am sure I underrate her in nothing. I think this wide, wide
world, contains few such. Father lives over his own youth in her; but
we are forgetting the business in hand, and while we talk of our plans,
let us be moving towards the house slowly, the sun is getting too warm
here for you. Now let me know exactly what I am to do.
Why, you are to seize the first opportunity of having a private
interview
with your father, at which you are to inform him how far we are
already let into his secrets, and then beg as a special favor for me the
the perusal of all the papers relating to the trial, death and attempted
rescue of General Elliot.
And will you, my Ellen, go into his library and pour over those piles
of musty papers, at the same table with this new private secretary of his,
for I understand that he is going to confer that vacant office, also, upon
the stranger who has so captivated him?
No Kate, no, we must have them in your room, and then we will
search them together, you have become interested sufficiently in my story,
to take that much interest, or if you dislike the task I will do it alone.
No mother ever read an epistle from a sick child with the same avidity that I
will pour over those musty papers.
By this time they had reached the house, and seated themselves at the
breakfast table.
CHAPTER XI.
MATCH MAKING.
The
Governor's guests and family were already seated at breakfast, more
than one messenger having been despatched for the two missing young ladies.
They entered at the very moment, when some surprise was being expressed at
the unwonted length of Miss Evylin's walk.
So, so, Doctor, said the Governor, looking in triumph at his worthy old
friend, I told you Kate was the better Doctor of the two, now look at your
daughter and tell me if that is not pretty well for the first morning?
The Doctor made room near himself, for his daughter, and looked indeed
with much interest for the refreshened bloom to which his Excellency alluded.
There it was sure enough, two round red spots in her cheekswhether the
result of health or disease he seemed somewhat puzzled to tell.
Be that as it might, the effect upon her beauty was indeed lustrous. Her
eyes too, which on the previous night, seemed to move slowly and painfully
over objects in the room, were bright as diamonds, with the late excitement.
Every one approved of Kate's practice, and the Doctor was free to confess
himself out-done, yet he was not so sanguine as others as to the final result.
He would rather have seen that red and white blending imperceptibly in her
cheeks like Kate's. His professional experience led him to distrust those
deceitful heralds of an early grave. The effect for the present was
much the same however, for the trinmphant and enthusiastic Kate
herself
,
had not brought in from the fields and flowers a richer harvest of beauty.
Sickness rather lent an interest to, than diminished from, the loveliness of that
delicate young creature. In that large company of gay and fashionable
people
,
she looked like a little nun, just escaped from the gates of a living tomb.
Those two, father and daughter, were objects of peculiar solicitude and
interest
there
was a sweet, confidential air between them, quite different from
the ordinary manifestations in similar relations, so placed. They appeared to
be all in all to each otherthey had of late lived with and for no one else
of course that air of monastic seclusion about the daughter particularly, was
far removed from the conventional courtly grace of most of those around her.
Not that there was any
gaucherie
, far from it, she was rather elevated above
the conventional standard, than fallen below itso much did that constant,
self-sustained spirit and mental endowments of the rarest order, elevate her
above any mere temporary rules of propriety. She scarcely seemed to think that
she was called upon to bear a part in the general conversation, and yet, when
the Governor or Reverend Commissary, addressed any remark to her, she
answered in a manner to convince every one, that she had read and reflected
upon most subjects comprehended under the terms of general information, even
in the sterner sex.
It had been one of the favorite projects of the Governor, in days gone by,
to unite his eldest son and heir to the daughter of his oldest and best friend.
There seemed a peculiar propriety in this, on every account. Some persons
thought they could perceive a remarkable similarity of mental constitution.
John Spotswood was then one of the ablest men within the boundaries of the
Old Dominionof vigorous intellectlearned and subtle in the use of
scholastic
weapons, and with a power of eloquence, when he chose to use it, which a
public assembly could rarely withstand. There seemed then a propriety in the
proposed union of these most carefully educated persons, but a greater mutual
repugnance sprung up between them than could could have been imagined
from the premises stated. These are matters our fair readers have doubtless
discovered ere this, which are not soluble either by mathematical or logical
rules. So it seemed in this case. Any one to have become acquainted with
the parties, separately, would have declared at once, that they were just made
for each other, and yet all things, thus conspiring thereto, the match could not
be brought about. We are speaking of John rather as he once was, than as
he has been presented to the reader. He was now a walking mystery to his
friendspast finding outperhaps that mystery may be solved ere we progress
much farther in our narrative. He paid her several visits, and spent some
long evenings with the Doctor, but when his father catechised him in his
bantering
way upon the progress of the affair, he answered abruptly that she was
a prude.
Ellen ran her eyes over the company at the table, in search of the new
tutor, anxious to see how he would appear by daylight, and almost afraid to
see those lips again that called up so many painful memorieswhile she was
in the very act, a servant entered with an answer to a message, which the
Governor
had despatched to him previous to her entranceto the effect, that he
would pay his respects to his Excellency and his guests directly.
Poor fellow, said the Governor, he doubts his position in our little circle,
and was too unpresuming to present himself, but I will soon shew him that if Lady
Spotswood marshals her guests to the table in order of their rank, that I range
mine in the order of their merit.
Her Ladyship laughed at this saily and replied That it was the first time
in her recollection that she had been charged with too exact an observance
of form and ceremony. What says the Commissary?
I think that the papers relating to the Tramontaine expedition might answer
that question for his Excellency. Are not three-fourths of the aristocracy of
the land ranged against it? said he.
It was not her Ladyship who offended them; that sin lies upon my
shoulders
.
Indeed I did but jest about the order of precedence.
A cloud came over that hard weather-beaten face, as soon as the great subject
of all his meditations were mentioned, and he remained in a thoughtful mood
for a while, and then continued: My first offence was that I, a military man,
and nothing else, arrived in the Colony most unexpectedly to take the place
of a gentleman who was captured on his way hither by the French. He was
expected to espouse the cause of the clique whom I have
mortally
offended by attending to the real interests of the whole Colony. Instead
of being too much of a political partizan, I have not been enough so to please
them. In the second place, I have established ware-houses for the inspection
of tobacco at convenient places throughout the land, and this touches the
pockets of the planting interest. In the third place, I have established a
large iron furnace and forge, and this separates me still more from that
interest
.
And fourthly and lastly, I have advocated the establishment of military
posts from the frontiers to the head waters of the Mississippi, thus disuniting
the grasping French from forming in our rear, and this they say, all the men
and tobacco in the Colony could not accomplish. Is it truly put, Mr.
Commissary
?
Very fairly stated, but you forgot to mention the Indian hostages at the
College.
Oh, aye. They say farther that I am putting a stick into the hands of
savages to break our own heads. Now we have the whole case; was ever a
glorious and magnificent scheme of conquering an Empire, thwarted from
from such pitiful and contemptible motives. Oh, if I only had some of
Marlborough's brave boys here, how I would shame these poor sordid narrow
minded creatures. I would plant the British Lion on the most commandin
position which it has ever yet occupied. Grand as the enterprise is, in a
military
point of view, it is far surpassed in importance by its civil and social
relations. The discovery of Columbus itself was nothingthe achievements
of Smith and Raleigh are nothing if we are to be hemmed in here within a
narrow strip of land along the Atlantic coast. Accomplish my design and
resources are opened to the west, which the most enthusiastic visionary
cannot
now foresee.
Kate exchanged a smile with some of the young gentlemen. She had so
often heard him dilate upon the same subject, while Dorothea looked up in his
face and remarked, Papa, I have always heard that old soldiers love to fight
their battles over again, but you are always fighting them by anticipation.
Patting her on the head, he replied, Then I am a gasconader, am I?
Before any reply was uttered, the tutor entered, dressed pretty much as he
had been the night before, but looking weary and haggard as if he had spent
a sleepless night. Notwithstanding this, his carriage was erect, and he
walked
to his place and made the salutations of the morning with a grace and
ease, more like a courtier just from the saloons of the Queen, than a poor
houseless tutor and private secretary. There was nothing extravagant at all
in his manners; on the contrary, they were regulated with the best possible
taste, with the exception, that he had seemingly not yet schooled himself into
the humble deferential air, usually supposed to become one in his position.
Before he was seated, the Governor named the ladies to him, and he again
bowed to them, bending over very low and gracefully saluted Kate and
Ellen, but not uttering a syllable. He passed the hour of breakfast
very much in the same way, scarcely ever speaking, except when the
Governor
addressed some questions directly to him, and which he answered like
a man possessed of ample information touching all the interesting questions
then involved in the subject of the succession.
It was curious to watch the painful sort of interest with which Ellen
Evylin's
eyes seemed to gloat on his face every now and then, before she would turn
away with a dissatisfied air.
His face was one which, like the Governor's, had seen some little
vicissitudes
of weather, with this difference, that old Boreas had put his marks on
the first after the zenith of life had been passed, while in the other, it was
scarcely approached. He wore large brown whiskers, overshadowing much
of his face, retained no coubt from his military life, and stretching from one
of them, the scar of a deep sabre cut ran along his face and down into his
very month. So that his countenance, when in repose, had rather a ferocious
look, from which, however, it was instantly redeemed when lighted up in
conversation
.
He was tall and slender, and not apparently in good health.
Altogether
,
he was a remarkable looking man.
Kate whispered to Ellen, as they were leaving the room, arm in arm, Our
new tutor has quite as aristocratic an air as any person at the table, and more
of the camp grace about him than even papa himself.
Did you ever hear such a deep toned voice, Kate? said Ellen, it sounds
like the bass pipes of your organ; I could not help fancying him giving
commands
along a line of soldiers in battle array.
The very idea, Ellen! there is command in it, aye, and in more than that
about him; poor man, he has not always been a tutor, I dare say.
Kate, I always feel sorry for your broken down gentleman; there is no
more melancholy expression in our language, han `such a one has seen
better
days,' and how instantly they occur en looking at Mr. Hall. Without
the slightest appearance of an attempt to excite sympathyindeed quite the
reverseevery tone and attitude tells of fallen fortunes. Papa seems to have
fallen in love with him at first sight, but that big scar over his face would
captivate
him, at any time. He loves a soldier for his own sake, independent of
the cause he has been engaged in!
And what cause, Kate, did Mr. Hall espouse?
I do not know, Ellen, perhaps papa enquired into that; but, as I said just
now, it would matter little with him, if his soldiership and personal honor
remained unimpeached.
I would almost be a surety for them myself, so firmly persuaded am I that
he is a true man.
What strange prejudices you do take up, Ellen, and almost at first sight.
Here is Mr. Harry Lee, a gentleman of princely fortune, high birth, great
personal
accomplishments, and a plavmate of your childhood, whom you cannot bear
the sight of; while on the other hand, you are ready to vonch for the honor
and honesty of a poor stanger whom you never saw but once before in your
life.
True, Kate, I believe it is the nature of our sex to judge more by the heart
than the head, and I don't know but they err as seldom in their estimates of
character as the other. As to the fortune and birth, and all that, which you
have tossed into Harry Lee's scale in balancing these two characters. I do
not value them at that, (snapping her fingers.) I would not marry him
if he was heir apparent to the throne of England.
I heard a servant announce to my father, as I left the room, that Mr. Lee
would be here to-day.
Yes, I recognized the livery, and so odious has even the poor servant's
badge of office become, that it hurried me from the table.
Why, my Ellen, I had no idea, that you were such a spiteful, bitter little
jade!
Did you suppose because out of health, I was a poor tame somebody that
said yea and nay, with a drawl, and nasal twang, and that I would be Mr.
Lee's humble servant as soon as he laid his fortune at my feet. No, no Kate,
you, if placed in my position, without ehanging characters, would do just as
I have done.
I confess Ellen, that I never admired him myself, even before your sketch,
and I cannot say that my estimate has increased since; he is a gentleman for
all that.
Yes, as your holyday world has ityour world that estimates every thing
by the surface,
he is
a gentleman, but oh, Kate, how I have come to despise
that hollow, deceitful, average of all men to one common conventional standard.
A certain quantity of broad-cloth or velvetquantum sufficit (as father's
prescriptions
say) of lace, four silver bucklesor perhaps golda pair of pumps
and a cocked hatand there is your gentleman.
Oh no, Ellen, that is a mere stuffed figure, such as the tailors shew their
fine clothes upon.
Well, what more is your ball room gentleman, just give this figure a
motion backwards and forwards, whenever it meets a lady and is spoken to,
and is not the picture complete?
Oh no, Ellen, it must talk and laugh.
Yes, Kate, and to be very excruciating, it must weep too, but how much
talk will answer, and how small a phial of tears? poh! poh! you know their
small talk is nothinghalf of it is about the weather, and the vane upon the
cupola does that a great deal better, and says nothing.
Why, Ellen! if the forthcoming shadow of Harry Lee makes you as
satirical
as that amusing churchman whom I read to you last night, what will his
real presence do?
Make me as stately and formal as he is, if not so pempous.
And is he one of your stuffed figures, that talks of the weather and one
thing or anothera walking weather-cock, or the clerk of the weather's
deputy?
No, not just that to give him his due, he has some mindcovered up,
beneath all the pomps and vanities of all the Lee's.
And what is the staple of his conversation?
His world material and immaterial, has one common centre, and that is
Mr. Harry Lee, member of the house of Burgesses. He is a philosopher too,
and has discovered a new theory of the solar system!
Indeed, and what is his grand principle?
Why, that Henry Lee, Esq., of Westmoreland, is the grand centre of that
system, and that the sun revolves around him.
Oh, Ellen, how we have all been slandering you here, in your absence.
One gentleman declared, that you were only prevented from taking the veil,
because there was no nunnery convenient. Another that you were going to
join the Dissenters, and another the Quakersand poor John, that you were a
man-hater.
I am sure I never gave your brother any reason to say so. He, I'm
certain
,
can never be ranked with the automaton figures. Neither of us had
much fancy I believe for each other, in a matrimonial point of view, but no
one can converse with John, for one hour, without respecting his
understanding
;
but do you know Kate, that he has imbibed deeply of Bolingbroke's most
dangerous opinions?
Ha! and that is the secret then of your sudden disagreement, or rather
agreement to disagree?
No, no, Kate, I have let you enough into the history of my past life, to
convince you, that I can never listen to the addresses of any living being
more, and this may explain also, the story of my man-hating; and
presbyterianism
,
and quakerism; but I will not disguise from you, that had those things
never happened, I could never love, honor, and obey any man who did not
honor and obey our holy religion. That creature, whether male or female,
who has lived in this world even no longer than we have, (and God knows I
have lived long enough) must be radically wrong in heart, mind, or education,
who can suppose that we poor mortals were placed upon this earth to grope
our way, without a guide or light of any kind. Look Kato, at the wonderful
disproportion in the grasp of our minds and the duration of our lives. We
are but beginning to live as rational creatures when we are called upon to
die. Father tells me that his mind is maturing every day, and that he is
conscious of no diminution of mental vigor, and his head is silvered o'er with
age. His mind is actually climbing the steps of knowledge and science,
while his body is going fast down the hill of mortality to the grave. Would
it not be the bitterest mockery, if this were our only stage of existence.
Why should the mind grow brighter and brighter, as the body grows weaker
and weaker, if the mind was not to survive the struggle? No, no, Kate, John
and I, could never have been more to each other, than the children of old,
long tried friends.
You astonish as well as afflict me, Ellen, by this statement.
I know it, my dear Kate, but seeing how ignorant you all are, of the
dangerous
precipice upon which he stands, could I be silent. I have debated the
matter with him, to the full extent of my poor capacity, but what can a
heart-sick
,
half educated girl do in an argument with a man like your brotherhis
natural endowments of the highest order, and polished by the culture of the
schools. Don't you undertake the subject Kate, he will only play with your
woman's argument as the fisherman plays with the trout. Your brother is an
antagonist, powerful enough for Dr. Blair. Tell
him
of it, Kate, and let his
long tried wisdom select the time and the manner of combatting these
pernicious
principles. Oh, I do hope he will be rescued before it is too late. I
could tell you more about your brother, but I have distressed you enough for
one occasion. Come, get ready for church, you are going to York with Dr.
Blair, I know. In the mean time, I will seek my own room and think over
all these things. Good day, Kate.
CHAPTER XII
GOING TO CHURCH IN THE COUNTRY.
About
twelve o'clock, a long cavalcade drove up to Old-York Church.
First came the outriders, in livery, then the body guard of the Governor, in
full uniform. This corps, numbering about twenty-seven men, consisted
mostly
of old veterans who had served with the Governor in his continental
campaigns
,
and one old fellow having a wooden leg. They were a martial
looking
band, and had the appearance of having seen service. The Governor's
country establishment had a range of dormitories for these, and stables for
their horses, but he never called them out, except on something like
public occasions. Next came the family coach, drawn by four horses,
and managed by two postillions in livery, and behind which stood two
powdered footmen. The coach contained her ladyship and
daughters
,
with the Reverend Commissary in his canonicals. Then came
the Governor, flanked on one side by Dr. Evylin, and on the other by
little Bob on his poney. The remainder was composed of the carriages of
visitors, followed by the young gentlemen: and then again by the family
servants, two and two, on horseback, many of them also in livery, and all
scrupulously neat and clean.
We have already said, that it was a beautiful Sabbath morning, accordingly
the road from Temple Farm to York was lined with neatly dressed people,
going to hear the celebrated Divine then at the head of the Episcopal Church
in Virginia. Many were on horseback, but many more on foot, and all filed to
the right and left to let the cavalcade pass. Scarcely a pedestrian but
touched
his hat, or bared his head entirely as his Excellency went by, while the
negroes did the same, grinning from ear to ear at the same time, at the
display
made by the grooms in livery, and soldiers in uniform. Many a poor
family from the neighborhood of Temple Farm, greeted Kate and Dorothea,
with rude courtesy as they passed.
With all the middle and lower ranks the Governor and his family were very
popular, perhaps for the very reason, that he was now at deadly feud with
some of the largest and most influential families in the land. The time was
now rapidly approaching when this very favor of the plebeian ranks stood him
in great stead. The favorite scheme of his lifeone for which he had
perilled
his officehis influencehis standinghis fortune, having been
accomplished
at last much through their means.
The old Church at York, was built like all those of that period in the shape
of a cross, and out of perhaps the strangest materials that ever entered into
the structure of a sacred edifice, or any other. These are square blocks hewn
from fossil shells, deeply imbedded in a basis of sand or marl stone, giving the
whole structure much the appearance of a toy house, built entirely of shells,
such as is seen often in the shops. Not that there was any thing puerile, or
beneath the dignity of a sacred edifice, in the general appearance of the
whole, for it was highly imposing, and must have looked grey and
venerable
,
when comparatively of recent structure. It stood on one of the highest
points of the town, commanding a prospect of the city of York, then one of
the first in importance in the Colony.
The party entered the main aisle, and proceeded to the two large pews set
apart for his Excellency's family, with the exception of Kate, who, attended by
Bernard Moore, and followed by a servant bearing an armful of music, entered
the gallery and took her station at the organ.
She greeted most sweetly the bevy of city damsels, forming the choir, and
taking the music from the servant, proceeded to distribute the score of the
pieces she was about to play. Moore seated himself at a respectable distance
among the masculine voices, but it is questionable, whether his attention was
not too much absorbed by the instrumental music to follow the score very
closely. Kate seeing the old prelate enter, commenced her prelude. Even
the venerable old clergyman seemed lost in a pleasing reverie, while she
attuned the hearts of the congregation to a fitting mood to bow before the
throne of mercy.
It was a beautiful picture, o see that fair young ereature, so full of life,
and health, and high hope, bend in such profound humility at the mercy seat,
her pure white neck bent over the prayer book, and uttering the responses, with
such a heartfelt gratitude, that the words seemed to gush up with the
emphasis
of her own fervid conceptions.
It was not so much that she felt the responsibility of her own position and
example at the head of the young ladies of that great Colony, as her own
inborn acknowledgment of the necessity of these stated confessions. A sense
of elevated position, and the force of example, are often talked largely of by
those in high places, but she knew and felt that these, to be of any avail,
must come from the heart; it is then, and only then, they reach the hearts of others.
The preacher chose a subject, in exact accordance not only with her views,
but her devotional feelings at the time. It was the sermon on the mount.
How it chimed in with Kate's previous thoughts, when the old man read
out slowly and solemnly, Blessed are the poor in spirit, for their's is the
Kingdom of Heaven. It seemed as if her very inmost mind had been
penetrated
by the preacher, and that the words of the text were only embodying
her own thoughts in appropriate language.
No better example in all that Church, whether among the gentry or
plebeians
,
could have been found of the very spirit blessed, than that fair daughter
of Virginia's aristocracy. She was indeed poor in spirit, as
contra-distinguished
from mean in spirit. Much of her very grace and beauty, came
from that sweet humility, which seemed to be all unconscious of the graces
it inspired. A beautiful maiden, without the true Christian graces, is only a
beautiful animal at last, from the Venus de Medici to Pocahontas, before her
baptism; it requires the finishing touch of the divine spirit upon the heart,
before
even the person becomes really lovely, in the highest acceptation of the term,
and that very grace spoken of by the preacher, she had; that humble,
self-condemning
,
self-sacrificing spirit, which seeks the lowest seat in the
synagogue
.
Kate Spotswood was a Christian; but she was scarcely conscious of
it, so truly had she taken to heart the first words of the sermon on the mount.
She had never even been confirmed, for the Commissary had not that power,
and as to her being a professed disciple, she never even dared to think herself
good enough. Often, during that solemn and heart-searching sermon, did the
silent tears steal down her unconscious face, and when it was concluded, she
looked round like one just waked up from a moving dream, so absorbed had
she been.
Bernard Moore, sad, wicked dog, as we fear our readers will consider him,
was sitting, leaning his head upon his hand, and gazing at the devout beauty,
and tracing the pearly dreps that stole from her eyelids with a true sympathy.
How beautiful are the poor in spirit, thought he. He admired religion
exceedingly, when the operations upon the heart, and mind, and person, were
thus exhibited; and, to do him justice, he had as high reverence for things
holy, as most of his order; but he was a gay young man of fortune for all
that. We shall see whether Kate proselyted him, as we progress with our
narrative.
What an excellent sermon, said she, as taking Bernard's arm in the
gallery
to join her family, it seemed to me, that I could see our Saviour's figure
in all its glorious majesty, proclaiming such welcome doctrines to the sons
7
and daughters of affliction on the earth, and such an unwelcome one to the
self-sufficient among the great and worldly-minded.
Excellent, indeed, said he, I never enjoyed a sermon more in my life,
and it was beautifully illustrated.
Yes, the imagery was grand indeed; that description of the mountain
scene must have touched papa upon a tender chord?
I did not allude to that exactly, said Moore, slily I meant rather to say,
that it was most happily personified.
Yes, I agree with you there too: never was precept better borne out by
personal example. Dear, good Dr. Blair, I love him almost as well as my
own father.
Still you do not take my meaning, though I agree with you on that point too.
To whom, then, do you allude? looking enquiringly into his smiling
face, not to me, surely?
Exactly and to no one else.
That is a far strained compliment, Mr. Moore; too much at variance with
truth and honesty for me to accept any part of it. How little you know my
heart, if you suppose me poor in spirit, in the true meaning of the preacher.
How little do you know its rebellion, its pride, its vanity, its self-deception, its
disingeniousness to othersme, poor in spirit, indeed! Why, I was
suffering
the pains of self-condemnation, during the whole sermon, for lacking that
greatest essential in the Christian character, that very poverty of spirit so
admirably described.
By this time they had arrived at the door of the carriage, and Moore helped
her in, where the other ladies were already seated, and then mounted his
own horse, held ready by his servant, and followed on as they had come.
During their return to Temple Farm, the company had an accession of
Henry Lee, Esq. He was a tall, elegantly dressed young man, about the
same age as Moore and Carter, but with rather more form and ceremony in
his address, and rather more studied attention to his toilet, than distinguished
either of them. His features were large and sharp, but well formed, and
indicative of more than ordinary mental power. His hair was harsh and
frizzled
,
and set close to his head, so as to give it rather a clean cut, statuary
look. When he smiled, the man shone out in his own identity. His teeth
were very regular, except two projecting tusks at each corner, which gave a
harsh expression to his whole physiognomy, so that when he gave himself
up to the freest mood of relaxation, he appeared in reality more forbidding, than
when his face was in entire repose, for in the former case, there was a
classic
air of high birth and breeding, under which the other peculiarities were
hidden. One single such guest, throws a damper over a whole company,
however much disposed to glee and hilarity. It is like a stream of cold air
blowing into a warm room, pile on the combustibles as much as you will, and
still the same chilling sensation comes over you.
How stately rode the representative of all the Lee's that day, followed by
two servants in livery, one bearing a portmanteau strapped to his saddle, as
large as a modern travelling appendage of the same sort for a whole family.
Mama, said Dorothea, her eye still fastened on the pompous young
cavalier
,
his cocked hat perched to its highest elevation upon his head. Mama,
do you think Mr. Henry Lee is very poor in spirit?
The old Commissary tried to look very grave, so as to suppress a fast
coming
smile, while Lady Spotswood, looked out of the opposite window of the
carriage, so as to get her eye the farthest possibly removed from the person
spoken of, and thus smooth down her gravity before she replied.
You should not apply the sermon just preached, to others, child, but to
yourself; do you not recollect the Pharisee?
La, mama, you have made the case worse, who could look at that young
gentleman now, and not imagine to himself, that he was saying `Lord I thank
thee that I am not as other men.'
The Commissary was compelled to laugh in spite of himself, in which
Kate and her mother now, joined with hearty good will. The picture was
too true and too happily applied, to be resisted; it was like a fortunate stroke
of a painter's pencil, which completes the likeness, and little Dorothea sat
and viewed her work, with a complacency, which nearly upset the prelate
every time he turned towards her. Now tossing her headexactly as the
gentleman mentioned, tossed his, and now waving a hand with a majestic air,
and presently inserting a thumb under the edge of her stomacher, as he placed
his in the arm hole of his vest. So inimitable was her mimicry, that the good
Commissary begged her to desist, lest he should arrive at home, in a plight
very unbecoming a minister of the gospel, just descended from the sacred
desk.
Even after a long silence, there was a flushed appearance of the whole four,
when they alighted from the carriage, which excited the curiosity of Moore.
He wondered what could have changed their mood so suddenly after he left
them. Kate would not, or could not tell, but broke away and ran into the
house, referring him to Dorothea for an explanation. Dorothea promised at
some other time, that she would go over the whole story, but now she could
not, for papa was shaking his finger at her. Don't you know, she
whispered
,
that Mr. Lee has a vote in the house of Burgesses. Papa says I
must learn to be a politician, or I shall frighten away all his political
friends
.
The party separated to dress for dinner, that great affair of the twenty-four
hours in the Old Dominion.
CHAPTER XIII.
MEMORY OF THE PAST.
How
silent a large hospitable establishment in the country, seems on
Sunday
,
just after being deserted by a large and gay party? how deserted the
halls and chambers? in what profound repose sleep the dogs? and the very
insects fly more more lazily and hum more monotonously. The fowls seek
the roost, and the geese stand upon one leg, and bury their heads under their
wings, while the cattle in the fields gather in clusters under the shade of some
umbrageous tree. So overpowering is this general feeling of repose, that
children often imagine that there is a Sabbath in naturea holyday for the
heavens and the earth, as well as for man. Such seemed the day to that
heart-sick young creature, Ellen Evylin, as she sat in a deep recess at a
window
of the parlor, the curtains falling down, and totally secluding her, even
from the interruption of a chance servant. She held in her hand Milton's
Paradise lost, and appropriate as the subject was to her own peculiar feelings,
and deeply attuned as they were to harmonize, with the solemn strains of
the poet, her hand lay still in her lap with the open book, and her eyes
followed
the dreamy expanse of waters, stretching out, and farther out, until they
filled with tears from mere exhaustion. Why did she thus look ever towards
the far off ocean? Why did her eyes attempt to penetrate beyond that long
white surf, that came tumbling up as an
avant courier
from the mighty deep
beyond, and rolled into the bay, as if glad to reach a haven once more. She
pursued the very track of the vessel, which years before, had borne from his
native shores, a youth with whose hopes and destinies, her own had been
linked in bonds, as durable as life itself. She lived upon the past alone, the
present and the future were almost blotted from the tablets of her mind. Is it
strange then, that she became what she now was, a pensive dreamer, who loved
to steal from society of the men, and open up there these her only treasures?
Is it strange that even her appearance should partake of this coloring
of the past, and indifference to the present, and that she should forever seek
the shades of her own sweet little conservatory at home, where she held
converse
with the silent and sometimes melancholy flowersthose little
miniature
pictures of a young girl's lifethose especially that come like angel's
visits, few and far betweenthat bloom but once in a life-time: or is it any
wonder that she should prefer the solitary house in which she now was, to all
the bustle and confusion, which had distracted her for the last few hours?
But was she indeed all alone with her own sad thoughts as she supposed? did
she not hear a step and deep breathing in the room? Slowly she drew aside
one corner of the curtain, beneath whose ample folds she might have been
rolled twenty times; why did her heart throb so tumultuously, and her vision
grow dim? It was because there was a man in that room, a strange man
using most strange gestures to a dumb picture. It was the new tutor,
standing
before the picture of General Elliott. What could he know of that
unfortunate
officer? Why should he be gesticulating to a picture he never saw
before a few hours back, and the original of which he never saw at all? It
was very strange. More than once she attempted to move towards him and
ask an explanation of his conduct, but as often her courage failed her, until
the man had disappeared as silently as he came, and she was left alone with
her own thoughts and the silent house, and the more solitary ocean beyond.
The tutor gonethe excitement of the moment once calmedand her
nervous
irritability stilled, the mystery did not appear so great after all. The
young man was generally supposed to have been some way connected with
the unfortunate troubles abroad, and thus to have laid the foundation of his
own. Was it any great stretch of imagination to suppose him to have known
something of one so famous as the original of that picture. This sufficed
for a time, but alas, how painfully and fearfully excitable are the children of
sorrow. To such, a spark of the fire exploding, sounds like a cannonthe
sudden slamming too of a door, is the herald of a convulsion of nature; a
black cloud in the horizon, the adumbration of the gathering tornado, and a
tale or a suggestion of horror, meets with too ready a response, and even the
imagination is ever instant with its sombre shadows, to clothe up the skeleton's
of the past in goblin outlines comformable to its wretched experience. The
ear is ready to start, the eye to dilate with fright, and the wonder working
kaleidescope of the mind, revolves in perpetual revolution, turning up in rapid
succession a gloomy catalogue of spectral images.
Poor Ellen, her imagination was roaming at large over the too certain past,
and the too uncertain future. Again and again the strange behavior of the
tutor rose up before her, and she would rear up a tale, in connexion with him,
improbable to a perfectly calm mind, until she would almost laugh at the trick
which her imagination was playing her. One sane and sound
suggestion
,
however, she retained from the dreamy and fitful reveries of the morning,
it was the probability that this individual could throw some light upon that
one subject, ever nearest to her heart, the last hours of poor Frank Lee, and
to ascertain that he was indeed numbered with the dead. She resolved at
once to seek him. She wandered through the house in eager pursuit of the
same individual who, but half an hour before had thrown her into such
painful
excitement; she regretted now, that she had not sought him upon the
instant, for no where was he to be found. She rang the bell, and called up a
servant, who informed her, that he had walked out into the fields about the
time he must have left the room.
Why appeared the divine poet so tame, so dull that morning, of all others
so fitting to discourse of Paradise, and the reader, of all others, to imagine its
loss so vividly? When the imagination is at its highest tension, no living or
dead author may bridle the unruly power, and tame it to the beaten track.
The judgment may be schooled, the heart purified by suffering and affliction,
but the wings of the mind, like the wind, goeth where it listeth. The book
was again thrown down, and a long reverie wound up that dreamy morning.
She was first roused from her mood by the clatter of the horses hoofs and
the carriage wheels of the party returning from church; she made a
precipitate
retreat to her own room, where she was scarcely seated before Kate came
flying in, exclaiming, Oh, Ellen, you don't know what you have missed by
staying away from Church, such a sermon from Dr. Blair! it was worth riding
twenty miles to hear. He preached from the Sermon on the Mount, and
is going to continue the series through the whole chapter.
I am sorry I could not go, Kate, but I was really scarcely able, and still
less in fitting mood; there is a preparation for going to church in other things
besides dress, and I believe it better to stay away, than go with one mind's
wandering, like the fool's eyes, to the ends of the earth.
Oh, I forgot to tell you, Mr. Henry Lee was there; and Dorothea has been
apostrophising him as a personification of the true spirit of the text. I m sure
I shall never hear of the Pharisee in the parable again, without thinking of
him. She says she means to call him henceforth the Pharisee. I need not
add that he joined our party, and you may expect to meet him at dinnerI
had like to have forgotten it, that was the object of my call, so now you may
be prepared to meet him.
If he is here, I would prefer not going down to dinner.
But he may here these three weeks, and you cannot avoid him all that
time.
If he stays three weeks I am very sure he will do so without my company,
for I will go home.
No, no, my Ellen, we are not going to part with you so soon, after such
difficulty in getting you here. I will dismiss the gentleman myself, with a
bee in his bonnet, rather than you should do that.
That would never do, Kate, what would your father say to such
treatment
of a gentleman whom he is so anxious to propitiate?
Then Dorothea and I will ridicule him off the field. Leave him to be
dealt with by us, or surrender him entirely into sister's hands; she will drive
him off, depend upon it, and escape under the plea of non-age. It is your
gentle ways, Ellen, that keeps the proud man forever dangling at your apron
string.
The maid entering to prepare her young mistress's toilet for dinner, the
parties
separated.
CHAPTER XIV.
AN OLD FASHIONED DINNER.
It
was a fine old Hall, that at Temple Farm, hung with many war-like
trophies, and stag-horns, and fox tails, while here and there were some little
peculiarities that distinguished the hospitable owner, from others of the
Cocked Hat Gentry. Near the centre of the room on one side, hung the
General's own martial implements, which he had worn upon the field, and
suspended over them in a small silk net was a rusty cannon ball of about
three pounds weight. This had struck the veteran himself when it was
nearly spent, and he was in the habit of showing it to his guests, when
fighting
his battles again over his wine. Dorothea used to insist upon it, that the
true signal for the departure of the ladies, was the introduction of the cannon
ball by her father, instead of the
lead
from Lady Spotswood.
Two immense fire places occupied the best part of each end of the hall,
surmounted by curiously carved work, reaching quite to the ceiling, while the
side pannels corresponding to these were painted with various scenes, intended
to represent the most remarkable military events of the age. The whole
appearance
of the room, bore rather a military than a feudal or baronial aspect,
for all the scenes and trophies were of that sort, and quite recent, even to the
antlers.
The dinner was on the table, and such a dinner! The reeking viands
would have furnished a French
restaurateur
a stock in trade for a month. A
whole surloin of beef formed the chief ornament of one end of the table. It
was furnished from the Governor's own stock, upon which he prided himself
not a little. At the opposite end was a ham, which if not the real, rivalled the
Westphalia in flavor. These were flanked with various dishes of fowls, both
wild and tame, not forgetting the canvass back ducks. They were all placed
on the table together, after the good old fashion, and the ladies soon after
entered
in the order of their rank, and placed themselves at the head of the
table; Ellen Evylin among the others. Mr. Lee walked entirely round the
table to greet her, which he did in a really warm manner for him, with many
compliments upon her improved looks, all which was received with the most
freezing courtesy; barely returning his repeated bows, with a single
inclination
of the head. Dorothea bit her lip till it almost bled, in her itching
restlessness
,
at such temporizing with so obstinately complacent a man. As he
returned to his seat, Mr. Hall was entering and met him full face, just as the
Governor presented him by name to the new guest. Hall held out his hand
in the most frank and open manner, but the other paid him off with one of the
cold bows he had just received from Miss Evylin, leaving the poor tutor with
his hand awkwardly extended, without a response. Every one seemed to feel
for the young man, except him who had inflicted the unnecessary indignity.
The subject of it recovered himself with great dignity, after the first awkward
moment, and as if fate intended on purpose to revenge him, his chair was
found to be next to Ellen Evylin and Kate. His late discomfiture was soon
forgotten amidst the lively chat of the two charming girls. Kate bearing the
burthen of the entertainment, of course, while her friend threw in a quiet
response occasionally. Both the young ladies seemed determined to make
amends to the slighted tutor, for the previous repulse, at the same time;
perhaps
,
rejoicing that they saw it rankling in the heart of him who inflicted it.
Several times, while Kate eagerly conversed with the tutor, Ellen sat looking
up through her long eye lashes, lost in painful reflections. Again she saw
the same smile flashing over that otherwise sad and sombre face, as the
summer
lightning blazes up behind the dark blue clouds of the horizon. The
impression was indescribable, so indistinct, so confused with memories of the
past; blending so strangely with the personal outlines of others, yet in spite of
all improbabilities and obstacles to the contrary, carrying her back to days and
scenes long passed byher days of childhood. She was of course very
absent
.
The tutor seemed desirous to draw her out, and for that purpose would
turn a question or reply to her, instead of her friend, but she would frequently
have to ask a second time, even the subject of discourse, then join in for a
moment quite brilliantly, and glide away again; busy with her memory.
She desired to become better acquainted with Mr. Hall, preparatory to her
asking the questions she meditated: yet he was himself the innocent and
unconscious cause of her becoming lost, again and again. But absent as she
was, and imperfectly as she may have borne her part in the conversation, it
was by far the most interesting dinner party that she had been present at
for many a long day. She had almost forgotten that such a man lived as
Mr. Henry Lee, until he suddenly addressed a question to her across the table.
Miss Evylin, here is the Rev. Commissary running a tirade against the
new Bolingbroke fashion of tying the hair, (he sported it himself with no small
complacency,) what say you, is it an improvement or not?
I will turn that grave matter over to my friend Dorothea, if you please,
Mr. Lee, I have been so long out of the world of fashion, that I do not feel
competent to answer, said Ellen.
Well, I think, said Dorothea, that it is far more important what a
gentleman
has in his head, than how it is tied outside.
Even the Commissary smiled at the home thrust which the little girl had
given the inquisitor, while the young ladies exchanged glances of satisfaction.
I do not like these innovations upon our good old customs, said his
Excellency
,
with all due deference to you younger gentlemen: they will put aside
our old Cocked Hats next, and gentlemen will cease to wear swords.
The war has commenced already, my good sir, said Dr. Evylin, for I
read in No. 526 of the Spectator, that John Sly, a haberdasher of hats and
tobacconist, is directed to take down the names of such country gentlemen as
have left the hunting, for the military Cock of the Hat; and in No. 532, is a
letter written in the name of the said John Sly, in which he states, that he is
preparing hats for the several kinds of heads that make figures in the realms
of Great Britain, with cocks significant of their powers and faculties. His
hats for law and physic, do but just turn to give a little life to their sagacity;
his military hats, glare full in the face; and he has proposed a familiar easy
cock, for all good companions between the two extremes.
Capital, said the Commissary, by and by we shall be enabled,
Dorothea
,
to tell what a man has in his head by the cut of his beaver, so that you
see the outside of the head has something to do at last with the inside; but
how are we to divine what lies beneath those ever towering pyramids upon
the ladies' heads? I hope they will take a fashion soon, that may indicate the
powers beneath.
They indicate pretty forcibly the powers above now, said Dorothea, for
I heard Kate declare, the other day, that the maid had screwed her's up so
tight, that she could not wink her eyes without crying.
Fie! fie! Dorothea, said Kate, laughing, nevertheless.
Castle-building, you see, Mr. Hall, said she turning to that gentleman,
is now done on the outside of our heads, while our grandmothers, if all tales of
them be true, were wont to erect them elsewhere.
You seem disposed to carry on Mr. Lee's craniological discussion, while
that gentleman has dropped out of the debate, replied he,
sotto voce
.
The conversation gradually merged into literary matters, in which the
Doctors
both of Theology and Physic took a part, as well as the Governor and
Mr. Hall. The latter seemed now more at home than he had been, and having
but recently arrived from the fountain head, added many new and interesting
materials to the common stock, from Newton's latest philosophical discoveries,
to Joe Miller's last and best.
Have you seen any of our native productions, Mr. Hall? enquired the
Commissary.
I have not, sir; indeed, I have not yet had an opportunity. I have seen
a small newspaper in his Excellency's library, published, I think, in
Philadelphia
,
and that of not very recent date, but nothing in durable shape.
Well, said Dorothea, if you will only excuse me for one moment, I will
run and fetch you a specimen of native poetry, which, I think, will satisfy you
at once, that there is one genius at least, this side of the water.
She rose from the table, notwithstanding that portentous finger of her father,
raised in a threatening attitude. The rest of the company being unanimous,
he was overruled, and she tripped away to bring it, and soon returned with a
narrow strip of paper, and handed it to Mr. Harry Lee, with a request to read
it. That gentleman's physiognomy perceptibly lengthened, and his eyes
dilated, while running over the two lines, which, as soon as he had finished,
he crumpled up and inserted into his pocket, protesting against such a
specimen
being taken as the standard of the colony. Dorothea declared she must
have the paper, that it was a genuine native production, and must be read.
All the company being more eager now than ever to see it, he was forced to
produce it, and she handed it to Mr. Hall, with a request that he would read it
aloud. He had no sooner cast his eyes over the lines, than he burst into a fit
of laughter, the first he had indulged in since landing upon the shores of
Virginia
.
When he had wiped the tears from his eyes, and was sufficiently
composed
,
he rose and read, in mock heroic intonations, the following lines:
God bless the Church, and the Queen, its defender,
Convert fanatics, and baulk the Pretender.
*
*
A genuine specimen.
Every one laughed, except the grave Mr. Lee, he seemed to writhe under
the infliction, as if his personal peculiarities were the subject of merriment.
Why, Mr. Lee, said Dorothea, you take the thing so much to heart,
that we shall suspect you of being the author, presently.
Those memorable lines, said his Excellency, seeing his guest's
confusion
,
remind me, that we have not yet drank a toast, never neglected at this
table, `Health and long life to the Queen, God bless her.'
Ladies and gentlemen paid it due homage, with one exception; Mr. Hall
merely raised his glass, as if about to touch it to his lips, but set it down again,
his hand trembling violently. Lee observed it, as did the young ladies, who
sat near him; the eye of the former twinkled with gratified feelings of some
sort, while the latter were all pained at the young man's embarrassment.
The Governor did not notice the affair; or, if he did, chose to wink at it.
The desert having been removed, Lady Spotswood soon after gave the
signal
to the ladies, and they retired to the drawing-room, leaving the gentlemen
over their wine. Before Kate departed she stepped behind her father's chair,
and in a whisper, begged a moment's conversation with him. He rose, led
his daughter to the door leading to the library. After they had passed the
threshold, she told him of the secret which Ellen had communicated to her,
and begged his permission to peruse the papers which he had received with
the body of General Elliot. What, said he, you and Ellen turn
diplomatists
and read my state papers. No, no, my child, it would never donever.
But Kate coaxed and intreated until the old gentleman was compelled to give
way, and he opened the door and called Mr. Hall, and directed him to gather up
those papers that he had been directed to copy, and hand them to his daughter.
He soon returned with the bundle and handed them to Kate, and as he did so,
she could not help observing, how excessively agitated he was, but she
attributed
it to the late patriotic toast which he had declined drinking, and
knowing
that her father was not the man to create a mountain out of that mole hill,
she thought she might as well assure him of it at once, and she did so,
endeavoring
at the same time to reassure the perplexed youth. He made no other
reply than an inclination of the head, and thanks for the interest she
manitested
in him. Having escaped from the dining-room, and supposing that a
poor tutor and private secretary would scarcely be missed, he made good his
retreat altogether. Kate secured her treasure in her pocket, resolved,
however
,
not to divulge the secret to Ellen, until they had found their own
apartments
for the night.
CHAPTER XV.
THE PAPERS.
That
night those two fair young creatures sat in one of the upper apartments
of the house, pouring over a pile of papers strewed over the table, consisting
of manuscripts and newspapers, some relating to the trial of Kate's
unfortunate
relative, all the testimony of which, was there before them; and some of
royal proclamations, and paragraphs from the govermental and opposition
papers. The clock down stairs struck twelve, and one, and two, in the
morning
,
still they sat in those high-backed gothic chairs, the taper burning dimly
beneath the accumulating wick, charred to a black mass, and yet neither of
them flagged or faltered. Ellen particularly devoured with eagerness, even
the advertisements in the newspapers, which she read from corner to corner,
in hopes to find some faint clue upon which to fasten her hopesfor hopes
she still had. The only things they could find at all bearing upon the objects
of their search, was the newspaper account of General Elliot's execution, and
the attempted rescue by a party, supposed to be adherents of the Chevalier
St. George, followed by a proclamation offering a reward for the production,
dead or alive, of the young officer who had headed the onset. He was
described, and his name given in full as Mr. Francis Lee, but no allusion
whatever was made to the place of his nativity. He was supposed to have
served under the unfortunate officer, for the rescue of whose life he had
perilled his own. The accounts went on to say that the party attempting
the rescue had been cut to pieces or captured, that the young man was seen
to fall early in the affair, that no efforts had been successful in tracing his
whereabouts. Little doubt was entertained that he died from the desperats
wounds he was known to have received, yet there was nothing absolutely
certain, touching the matter. So desperate had been the state of mind of
Ellen, that even this afforded comfort. She threw the papers aside, leaned
back in her chair, and came at last to the settled conviction that poor Frank
yet lived. So strong is youthful hope, even against a powerful array of
circumstantial
evidence.
From that moment a brighter light shone from her eyestoo bright, as her
friends feared, with those feverish fires which are only extinguished in the
grave. Kate was really astonished to see, instead of a sad and settled
dejection
upon her friend, a sort of hopeful composure steal over her features. Her
own convictions were stronger than ever, that there was not a vestige of
hope for her. Yet she held on to that frail shadow of a shadeso constant,
so persevering is the female heart, to hope against all probability of hope.
They separated for the night, but not to sleep on the part of her who most
needed its balmy and restorative influence. That whole night she paced her
silent and solitary chamber, or sat and strained her imagination, vainly
endeavoring
to penetrate the future. Towards morning she threw her feverish
limbs upon the bed, and caught a few hours of unsatisfactory sleep; mingled
with fitful dreams. She thought she saw her betrothed standing before her;
but that they were in a strange land, and surrounded with strange faces and
things; and that he was pale and emaciated, and grown quite grey with pain
and sorrow. Then a change came over the spirit of her dream, and the face
of the loved youth was gone, and a stranger stood in his place. She was
roused from these tantalizing shadows of a distempered imagination, by the
maid entering to assist at her morning toilet, where we will leave her, while
we glance at some other rooms in that building, and see what the inmates
are doing.
The mornings and evenings were now beginning to be a little cool, and
8
heavy damp fogs rose from the surface of the bay, to correct which it is usual
to build a brisk blazing fire, to last only until the revivifying effects of the
morning sun are felt. Some of the early planters were in the habit of
pursuing
this plan for three-fourths of the year.
Such a bright fire was blazing in the breakfast parlor, and there sat round
it, his Excellency, the two Doctors, Mr. Henry Lee, Bernard Moore, Carter,
Dandridge, and Harry Hall. Quite an interesting conversation was going
on; intensely so to some of the party. Mr. Lee finding what a universal
favorite the latter was becoming, not only with the Governor but with the
whole family, even down to Master Robert, perceptibly softened in his manner
towards the young stranger. He came down from his room determined to be
very amiable to this new favorite and pet of the eccentric man then at the
head of the colony. What his motives were, we leave our readers to
imagine
,
from the position of the various parties. Hall was quite surprised,
therefore, to hear himself addressed by the haughty young aristocrat, after the
demonstration of the previous day, and however justified he might have been
in returning that ill treatment, he took better council of his discretion, and
answered quite courteously.
Mr. Hall, said Lee, I have some relations of your name, both in this
country and in Englandon the mother's side, or rather I had in this
country
,
for the last of them recently died, a venerable old grand aunt.
And I have some in this country of your name, and when I was first
presented
to you yesterday, it was my intention to have enquired of you about them.
Indeed! will you be so good as to mention what family you are off, and
their place of residence?
The young man appeared not a little embarrassed, but proceeded to name
the place of his family residence in Scotland, as well as to describe his living
relations and their descent from the common stock of the Hall's ofshire.
Not only so, but he traced distinctly the collateral branch which had
emigrated
to America, some fifty years before, until he arrived at the last
remaining
female relation, whose death he had not heard of; the very person alluded
to by Mr. Lee.
How very strange! said Mr. Lee, and your christian name is Henry?
Hall nodded assent, but his face flushed a crimson hue.
And had you received no letters from America, previous to your
embarkation
?
None concerning my relations whatever.
What a strange coincidence, said Lee, I have the pleasure of informing
you, that you are the heir to a very snug little property, left by our venerable
old friend.
By this time the ladies had entered, and were also gathered round the fire,
and every one was listening with the deepest attention, to the singular
conversation
going on, and every one seemed pleased too, at the unexpected good
fortune of the young man, who was supposed to stand in such need of itall
but that young gentleman himself, he was very much embarrassed, so as to
attract the attention of every one in the room.
Of course, continued Mr. Lee, it will be quite easy for you to establish
your identity; you have brought letters to some persons in this country?
No, sir, I did not; and, I tear, that I shall meet with more difficulty than
you seem to imagine, in the matter. Becoming more and more embarrassed,
at every turn which the conversation seemed to take, or to be likely to take.
Perhaps you have letters addressed to you, in England, from some of our
common relations?
None with me, replied Hall, I expect the remainder of my baggage by
the next vessel from England, by which time, I may be enabled to produce
sufficient
testimony to claim the estate.
Among those expected letters, said Lee, pertinaciously, there are
doubtless, some from our venerable relation, for I see among her papers
numerous letters from you?
Hall was, by this time, almost speechless with vexation and embarrassment
and his face flushed to his ears. He merely nodded assent.
The Governor seeing the young man's painful position, and thinking in his
own mind, that he, perhaps, knew Hall's difficulty, determined to come to the
rescue. He had already had some suspicion that his protogee's expatriation
had not been altogether quite voluntary. Let us adjourn this discussion,
said he, I think I can put Mr. Hall upon a plan of proving his identity,
without even waiting for his papers or returns from the other side of the
water.
As he pronounced the last words of the sentence, he placed a peculiar
emphasis
upon them, casting a sly and playful glance at Hall, only remarked by
the person for whom they were intended, and perhaps one other very quiet little
individual in the room.
Agreed, said Mr. Lee, As I am the executor to my Aunt's will, it is, of
course, my duty to act in conformity to law; but I assure your Excellency,
and your friend, that no unnecessary difficulties shall be thrown in his way
by me; on the contrary, all possible facility shall be afforded him, and I will
immediately, upon my return to the capital, instruct my attorney, Mr.
Clayton
,
to draw out upon paper for his use, such steps as it will be necessary for
him to take. In the mean time, he can draw upon me for such sums as his
present necessities may call for, out of the proceeds of the property, which I
will advance upon my own responsibility.
Wonders will never cease, said Dorothea to Ellen, as they moved round
to the breakfast table. Mr. Henry Lee has been doing a generous thing,
but Mr. Hall should credit it to the account of Miss Ellen Evylin, and not to
Mr. Henry Lee.
Fie! fie! Dorothea, do give Mr. Lee credit for his good actions such as
they are, surely he has done nothing but what the strictest justice would
warrant
;
true, he might have withheld Mr. Hall's rights, but they are his after all,
and he could soon establish them as such. If, indeed, he is not prevented by
. There she stopped suddenly, as if recollecting herself. If he
is not prevented by what Ellen.
Hush, Dorothea, not a word of thisanother time I will explain it to
younow, it may be a dangerous subject; and one in which more than mere
property is involved.
CHAPTER XVI.
A NEW ARRIVALA STRANGE VISITOR.
Before
the party separated from the breakfast table, a servant threw open
the door and announced Chunoluskee. The Governor instantly rose and
extended to him his hand, at the same time ordered a chair to be placed for
him at the table. Chunoluskee was a young Indian chief, of the Shawneese
tribe, whom the Governor had rescued some four years before, while a
prisoner
with one of the tributary tribes. The tributaries, were those Indian
nations, which had either been subdued by force of arms, or were under
treaty stipulations by more peaceable means, to pay a nominal tribute yearly
to the Governor of Virginia. Nearly all the well known tribes along the
eastern borders of the colony, were thus happily situated. The tribute
consisted
of a few skins and Indian arrows. These tributaries, however, were
occasionally at war with other tribes farther removed, thus they sometimes
brought home prisoners. The young chief, who has just been introduced to
the reader, was one of them. The Governor invariably claimed these, and
placed them at one of his primary schools, one of which he had located
within
the borders of every tributary tribe in the Colony. When they had
remained
a certain time at these primary schools, say about two years, they were
then removed to the Indian department in William and Mary College, in
accordance with the benevolent bequest of the Hon. Robert Boyle.
Some of these pupils were first taken as hostages, and were brought the
distance of four hundred miles, so that the College was at once a sort of
honorable
prison, and a school for higher purposes.
Chunoluskee, the chief before us, had been four years at hard study; two
in the primary school, and two in the College, and, for his remarkable
proficiency
in the latter, he received an office from the Governor, that of Interpreter
to the Queen. He was the medium of communication between his
Excellency
and the various deputations of Indians from the tributaries, and those
beyond, which were constantly visiting the capital of Virginia. At no time,
since the settlement of the Colony, had there been such numerous
assemblages
of these. The extraordinary exertions of the Governor and the Rev.
Commissary among these native sons of the soil, excited curiosity even in
these stoics of the forest. They had heard of the Indian schools, which were
then in the first tide of experiment throughout the Colony. How far they
looked with approbation upon the singular trial, will, perhaps, appear in the
course of our narrative. Certainly, in the instance before us, it had been
crowned with success, and we take pleasure in presenting before our readers,
an educated Indian; a gentleman, who held office under the crown, sat at the
Governor's table, and mingled with the social circle that surrounded that
hospitable
board.
To a perfect stranger from abroad, he must have appeared by far the most
imposing character in that room, not excepting the Governor of Virginia; for
his dress exceeded that of his Excellency, both in the fineness of its texture, its
colors, and the fashion of the wearer, both as to cut and the manner of display.
He was about twenty-one years of age, tall and slender in form, but
handsomely
proportioned, with a very uncommon face for one of his race.
Nearly
the whole of the Indian stoicism was wanting; and, instead of neglecting
to notice those little things upon which good breeding so much depends, he
was scrupulously attentive to the least movement of any one around him.
His eye, instead of having the settled rattlesnake glare of his race, was soft
and humanized in its expression, and looked as if it
could weep
upon occasion,
which all those who have studied the forest specimen know, always seems
impossible with them. His hair grew long and straight to his shoulders, and
fell down his temples in perfectly straight lines. On his head, he wore a
scarlet velvet cap, bound round with gold lace, and surmounted with drooping
plumes of red and white, while he held gracefully upon his left arm, the skirts
of a robe of the same gaudy color, which fell in loose drapery from his
shoulders
.
He wore dressed buckskin small clothes, and long gaiters to meet them,
terminating at the foot in exquisitely worked moceasins, curiously inlaid with
beads and porcupine feathers, and covering a foot and ankle which any lady in
the room might have envied. Under his scarlet robe, he wore a buff jacket,
fitting so exactly to his rounded form, that, at the first glance, a stranger might
have supposed it the natural covering of the muscles, so exactly did it display
the outlines of his figure.
He had been taken prisoner when desperately fighting to save a blind
mother
and a sister, the latter then only twelve years of age. They, also, were
brought by the Governor to the capital, and the old blind Indian had been a
constant pensioner upon the bounty of the Governor and his family, while the
young girl had been placed with Mrs. Stith, (the Stewardess of the College.)
until very recently, when prudence suggested, that she was now becoming of
an age, to require that other quarters should be provided for her.
Accordingly
,
the Governor had erected for them a suitable house in the suburbs of the
capital, and the Interpreter, his sister and his mother, all lived together.
Such was the character and history of the being, who now walked up to
meet the Governor, with an air that might have put the blush upon any king in
Europe. He trod those boards with a majestic air, and a grace too, which
would have made the fortune of a hero of the buskin; and bowed over the
Governor's hand, in which his own was locked long and feelingly, as if he
designed to express both homage and gratitude.
Thank goodness, whispered Dorothea to her sister, Mr. Lee's nose is
put out of joint now.
Strange to say, that Mr. Lee was the least inclined to treat this descendant
of our forest kings with respect, of any person in the room. Such is the
apparent
inconsistency of human nature, when viewed only upon the surface.
To an impartial spectator, the two seemed wonderfully alike in mental
constitution
;
that son of a long line of aristocratic progenitors, and the son of an
Indian Sachem, alas, now in exile, and doubtless supplanted in his princedom
by some more successful young warrior.
The Governor presented him to Mr. Hall, after he had bowed respectfully to
the ladies, he being the only person in the room with whom he was
unacquainted
.
He was then placed at the table, and made his breakfast, observing
all the little formalities, which are so much of a second nature to us, that we
do not notice them except when wanting. Hall watched him closely, expecting
no doubt, to see him help himself with his hand, and eat with his fingers, but
he not only used knife and fork, but helped others to the dishes near him,
without
the slightest
faux pas
of any kind. He was rather more modest in
conversation
,
than one would have supposed from his princely carriage. He had
learned the first great lesson in the advancement of the mind, that is, to know
his own ignorance; yet, he took part in nearly all the conversation, being
appealed to directly by some of the worthies round him. The fact is, the Rov.
Commissary, as well as his Excellency, were proud of their pupil, and they
loved to exhibit him, as well to the stranger, as to such scoffers as Moore and
Carter, in regard to Indian capabilities.
There was another subject of pride and gratification with his Excellency,
he had received many of his views of the tramontaine country from this young
Indian, and he loved to hear him dwell upon its glories, and would sit
entranced
while his tawny young subordinate dilated upon these matters.
Now for it, whispered Kate to Ellen, as the ladies left the room to the
possession
of the gentlemen, papa will soon carry Mr. Hall over the moutains,
where he has before marched so many before him, whether with their own
free will or not, their own good breeding sayeth not. Just look back Ellen,
and see with what apparent relish Mr. Moore and Mr. Carter are preparing
themselves to listen to papa and that noble looking chief.
The Governor, truly enough, only waited for the Interpreter to finish with
his knife and fork before he commenced drawing him out. His maps were
spread out before him on the table, and he had called Mr. Hall to his side.
Not an individual in that room, but had occupied the same position repeatedly,
except himself, and he prepared the way by tracing out with his pencil, the
water courses which had their rise in the mountains.
Now Chunoluskee, here is a gentleman just from the mountains of my
own native land, (Scotland,) and glorious mountains they are too, and
delightful
vales between them, but I want you to shew him that there is a finer
country
beyond your blue hills, than any even in old Scotia. What say you my man?
The vales beyond those mountains are my native war paths, your
Excellency
,
and I look back to them with the same sort of pleasure which you
remember the scenes of your own childhood.
Ave, and you shall look forward to them, man. I will lead you back to
your native land, and place you in possession of your rights.
So your Excellency has promised, and it is therefore, that I have come to
look upon your proposed enterprise, with nearly as much delight, as your
Excellency.
But is the country worth the trouble. That is the point that touches
these lazy Virginians?
It is the most glorious land that ever the sun shone upon, there is a valley
beyond those moantains, almost a perfect terrestrial paradise, abounding in
deer, elk, buffalo, and game of every sortthe land teeming with wild fruits of
every kind, and bright with the purest fountains of water that ever gushed
from the solid rocks.
Oaye, I know that is your opinion, but it is contradicted by all the French
accounts, and all others which we have received, besides you were a mere boy
when you left that happy valley, and cannot know exactly its geography.
Indian boys, your Excellency, do not, it is true, study geography upon
paper, but they study it upon a much larger scale; they learn the original;
and what is more, they never forget it. I can take your Excellency to the
very spot where I was taken prisoner.
Well, well, leave the point about the double range of mountains to be
decided
by the event, and go on with your account.
Beyond that valley is the range of the real Apalachee, and when you
have crossed these, then you open into a new world indeed; one in which this
little Colony might be set down and not observed to enlarge or diminish it.
Before you entirely cross all its wonderful width and breadth however, there
are natural curiosities so remarkable, that these gentlemen will again laugh at
my presumption and your credulity, if I tell of them.
Tut, man, tut! a fig for Moore and Carter's skepticism; tell your story
as if they were not present.
I have often told your Excellency of the ever-boiling springs in which you
may cook an egg, and others, the medicinal virtues of which are so great, that
even the deer and buffalo, visit them constantly. Indian tribes from the mouth of
the Mississippi, on the one hand, and the lakes on the other, visit them in the
hunting season, bringing there, the lame and the blind, and the halt, just as I
have since read was the custom in the Jewish country.
Moore and Carter here laughed outright, and the latter asked the
Interpreter
,
if he could enumerate the diseases of which the buffalo and the deer
were cured, and how they undertook to administer the medicine; whether they
had Dr. Buffalo and Dr. Buck, and if they felt pulses and looked at the tongue.
What say you to this, Doctor, turning to the old physician?
The Interpreter did not give him time to answer, for he was now becoming
excited with his subject, and gouded with the repeated taunts and jeers of the
youngsters.
You may laugh, young gentlemen, said he, as you have often done
before
,
and you may call it romancing, but I tell you and his Excellency, that the
half has not been told. There are wonders of the natural world there, which
throws in the shade even these medic nal springs; apocryphal as you
consider
them, throwing down his knite and fork with which he had been trifling
with the remains of his breakfast, he strode once or twice rapidly through the
room, and again halted before the group seated at the lower end of the table,
and continued: There are palaces there under ground, far more magnificent
than the one inhabited by his Excellency at Williamsburg; long colonades,
that have supported the dome which they now bear since the world began, and
galleries with fancy work, which would shame the skill of any of your handy
craft-men, and there is also a noble arch of solid rockextending from
mountain to mountain, and beneath which the Governor's round tower at
the Capital could stand, without being a greater object to distract the
attention, when looking from above, than the binnacle is to the sailor at
the mast-head, when he casts his eye upon deck. The sachems who
went before me, have a tradition that the great spirit himself, once upon
a time was walking upon the earth, and came to the stupendous rent
between those two mountains, inaccessible from their perpendicular sides,
and that he threw the wonderful arch across, and then walked over upon
it. It looks indeed as if it might have been a causeway for the gods, or some
colossal race of men, who perhaps inhabited the earth, when animals dwelt
upon it tall enough to browse upon the tops of our fores trees.
Then you have, said Carter, in that fine valley of yours, medicines to
cure all the ills that flesh is heir to, forever pouring in perennial streams from
their bright fountains, so that you are free from the pains denounced against
the balance of our race; fruits forever tempting the hand to pluck them;
water
heated to your hand ever ready to perform your culinary operations, and
yet not content with this paradise, you have now erected a bridge between
heaven and earth, over the valley of death, upon which the gods and your
people freely interchange visits. Have you not also some springs or trees or
herbs, by which the whole curse of earning bread by the sweat of our brow
might be dispensed with? Methinks that the great spirit who first made
your fine country, would not have stopped half way, but would have remodelled
Eden over again, and upon a pattern too, which would have made Old
Adam laugh at himself, for being so taken in with that orchard, which proved
his ruin.
I understand your irony, Mr. Carter, said the chief, but it cannot alter
the facts of the case, for the truth of which I will pledge my life. Indeed
the half has not been told; there are springs beyond the great Apalachee,
which produce salt, made almost ready to your hands. You have only to boil
the water, which spouts out from the ground, and the work is done. In the
same neighborhood, is a burning spring; flames forever wreathing up from
the surface of the water. This the natives of the soil are afraid of, and
believe
that the great spirit of evil dwells there.
I thought so, rejoined Carter, you have only now to tell us of that
spring from whose fountain flows the life-giving power of perpetual youth, so
long sought for by the Spaniards at the other end of the continent, by all the
gods and goddesses in the mythology, we will bring back your Excellency so
rejuvenated, that Lady Spotswood herself will scarcely know you. By the by,
what a place of resort it will be for elderly ladies. I know several that would
accompany the expedition upon half the inducements held out by the Chief.
Poh, poh, Carter, with your nonsense; Chunoluskee has no motive for
deceiving us, said his Excellency, and if he had, and could succeed, in the
matter of the medicine springs, and the subterranean palaces, and the mighty
arch, suspended between heaven and earth; we know that the land is there,
and that is enough for us. The others will be so much clear gain, if we find
themand if we do not, you and Moore will not be much deceived, at all
events.
I see nothing so very improbable in the herds of deer and buffalo seeking
the medicinal springs, said Dr. Evylin. We know that these creatures,
and many far inferior to them, have an instinct by which they seek relief
from medicine, even in the vegetable kingdom, and we know moreover, that
the sulphur and salt springs commonly called salt licks, are plenty all over the
continent, and that the wild animals do seek them at certain seasons of the
year. I see no reason to believe that the chief has even colored the
impressions
of his youth with imaginary draperyin fact, there is a good deal of
internal
evidence of truth in his recollection of the country.
And his recollection of the sources and courses of the rivers this side of the
mountains, added the Governor, have been remarkably accurate, so far as
we have been enabled to trace them yet. Take, for instance, the James river,
he has always adhered to it, that this stream runs through this wonderful
valley
,
and through the mountains. This, the council at first laughed at, but
every succeeding survey only renders it more and more probable. Its source
or headwaters have never yet been reached, or any thing like it.
The youths professed to give in to the Governor's views, but walked off
nevertheless, indulging their merriment at the extravagant romancing of the
interpreter.
The Governor and the two Doctors hung over those maps for hours, tracing
out the future course of the expedition; sticking pins along the designated
route, and from time to time acquiring new information, as to the face of the
country, distances, means of supply, &c., all of which the former required
Hall to note down accurately.
The reader must, in order to realize the terra incognita, into which they
were about to plunge, remember that Virginia, at that day, consisted of some
twenty odd counties, clustering around the Seat of Government, and they only
thickly populated along the rich alluvia of the rivers, and the two shores of
the bay, and that the population of the colony was just one hundred
thousand
.
Few more bold, daring, and chivalrous adventures have ever been
undertaken
,
even in this land of wild adventure, than that planned and executed by
Governor Spotswood. It must be recollected, too, that his was among the
first of the kind; that he was the pioneer, even to Lewis and Clark, and that
his ingenuity invented many of those appliances now so common in such
adventures
.
He was going beyond the reach of civilized resourcesamong
savage tribesover monntains, hitherto considered impassibleand through
a trackless wilderness, in the last degree difficult for the transportation of the
necessary supplies.
Was it any wonder that it was opposed by most of the old men of the
Colony
;
by nearly all those considered wise and prudent? They confidently
predicted
that the Governor, and the mad youths whom he might induce to
accompany
him, would never return, and some exercised their parental authority,
so far as to forbid their sons from accompanying the Governor. To such a
height had this opposition ran during the preceding winter, that a public
meeting
was held, and a committee appointed to memorialize the ministry on the
subject. If successful, this of course was equivalent to the Governor's
removal
,
and he had been waiting in some anxiety to hear the result. The two
factions of Oxford and Bolinbroke, of which the ministry was composed, were
too busy fighting their own battles, to heed these petitions from beyond seas.
Sir Alexander Spotswood was fully determined to see the other side of the
mountains, either as Governor of Virginia, or as the leader of a private
expedition
,
which he was amply able to set on foot. The question of supplies had
been brought up also before the House of Burgesses the preceding winter, and
rejected by a very close vote. Since that time, he had been exerting no little
address to induce young men to come out for the vacant or uncontested seats,
especially such as were known to be favorable to his darling project. Two of
these we have already seen almost domesticated in his own house, the open
hospitalities of which was no mean auxiliary in the great cause, especially
when presided over by the elegant kinswoman of the Duke of Ormond, and
her not less fascinating daughters. In short, his personal influence, his
official
sway, his social position, his wealth, and every thing that was his, was
thrown into the scale by the Governor. He almost directed Mr. Boyle's
benevolent
scheme for christianizing the Indians into the same channel, and
he had enlisted the Rev. President of the College, warmly in his interests. A
new trial was now rapidly approachingthe members for another house of
Burgesses
had been elected, and were soon to assemble at the capital.
Proclamations
were sent to every county calling upon the young gentry to enlist fifty
men, and enrol themselves under his banner. The ranks of the Rangers had
been filled up, and new officers appointed, wherever opposition was manifested
to the expedition, and these were now undergoing daily drill, and performing
camp duty along the whole frontier of the colony, as preparatory to the grand
tour. The removal of these very corps was one strong ground of opposition
by the timid. They had for some time formed the main security of the Colony,
against the inroads of the savages. These Rangers were stationed along the
whole line of frontier, within communicating distance of each other, and were
perhaps the best security ever devised for a colony in the then condition of
Virginia. The Governor's son John, was now in command of these, and as
rapidly preparing them for field service as possible. The Governor proposed
to march the whole of these, as well as a certain portion of militia from each
battalion. Here was another cause of opposition; these men did not like the
idea of being marched five hundred miles through a trackless wilderness, and
over inaccessible mountains, while their families were perhaps starving at
home, and their crops totally neglected, as well the preparation for the coming
one as the proper curing of that already housed. The Governor's main
dependence
,
however, was upon the young gentry, and such men as they could
voluntarily enlist or persuade from among their own adherents. He thought
that if he could embody a sufficient number of them with the Rangers, that
the forcible objections against the expedition might be removed, as he would no
longer attempt to coerce the militia, from whom powerful opposition had
arisen. Indeed something like a pledge had been given at the late elections
that such should be the case, and the whole colony was now looking on with
anxiety, to see what would be the result. Such of the gentry as had united
in the remonstance to the ministry, despaired of ever receiving assistance from
that quarter, so that the great battle had to be fought at home.
In accordance with these views, the Governor on the morning in question,
despatched his new protegee to Yorktown to enlist, not only fifty followers for
his own share, but as many more of the emigrants as might choose to try their
fortunes in the far west. Largesses of land were most liberally promised,
besides
the pay, rations, and accontrements of the soldier. Among those who
had arrived with Hall, were a large number of Scotch, Irish, and
Presbyterians
,
a hardy, brave, intelligent set of people, as ever lived. These Hall
found to listen most readily to his tempting promises of land and a new
home, and freedom from religious restraint. The scheme chimed in extactly
with their views, and he was therefore not long in making up his complement
of fifty men, and enlisting as many more as the Governor might choose to
provide
for out of his own private purse. These were quartered in the suburbs of
York, and were soon busily engaged in preparing to march at a moment's
warning.
Governor Spotswood was not long in discovering that his new protegee was
exactly the sort of
aid-de-camp
which he had been looking for. He possessed
a thorough education, not a little of which had been learned in the school of
adversity, and a sufficiency for his purpose, in the camp. He accordingly set
to work in earnest, to have all things in readiness to seize upon that most
favorable
season of the year, now called Indian summer, for the march.
Before that could take place, many things had yet to be done, besides the
subsidies to be voted by an assembly, whose opinion were still somewhat
doubtful. Clothes, ammunition, horses and supplies of every kind, were to be
provided, and the latter in such a shape as to admit of their transportation
9
without inconvenience. Camp equipage, such as tents, iron, utensils, &c., &c.,
were not so easily gathered in that day in the Colony. He had already built
a round tower in the public square of the capital, for the reception of arms
and ammunition, and was accumulating them silently, but surely.
*
*
The remains of this curlous tower still stand at Williamsburg.
Both his
public and private stables were already crowded with horses, and he was still
purchasing more.
The time was now approaching when that happy family party were to leave
the delightful summer retreal on the shores of the Chesapeake bay, for the
bustle
,
the gaiety, and even the political intrigues of the capital. The female
inmates
would willingly have dwelt at Temple Farm forever. They loved the
quiet scenery of the place, and the privilege it gave them of, in some measure,
selecting their company, but the present busy season of preparation, on the
part of the lord of the manor, required that removal, and they acquiesced.
His presence was wanted at the capital, and it now began to form the staple
subject of conversation among the young people.
Bondboxes were not yet in requisition, but Kate was already paying
farewell
visits in the neighborhood, and visiting her pensioners for the last time
before a long separation. The negroes were already crowding round the
doors, whenever a leisure moment allowed them, to look for those never
failing
little tokens of good will and remembrance dispensed on such occasions.
Others, with purer motives, loved to return their humble thanks to their young
mistress, for her kindness in sickness. It was indeed a melancholy day
among the domestics of Temple Farm, when all that gave it life and
cheerfulness
were gone. Old June declared to Kate that the very poultry and stock
all looked melancholy, when the white folks were gone. On the evening
of that day, he brought out his old banjoe into the yard, seeing Kate and
Ellen
promenading the verandah, and was tuning it up preparatory to
improvising
their departure in most moving and melancholy strains. What Southron
is there who has not been moved by the mere tones of these monotonous
doggrels
?
Even in their liveliest strains, and when the words of the song are
ludicrous in the highest degree, these same mournful sounds accompany them.
The same may be said of their harvest and boat songs. On the present
occasion
June muttered something like the following, to one of his corn songs:
Oh Miss Kate, she's gwine away, g'wine away,
To leave poor nigger on de lone bay;
The house shut upthe windows closed
The fire put outden nigger froze.
Long time ago, long time ago.
The fine young men dey no more come,
On de prancin horse to our cold home,
To see Miss Kate, the flower of the bay,
So glad, so glad, de live long day.
Long time ago, &c.
Oh June, said Kate, sing of our return, not of our going away. Don't
you see that you affect the spirits of Ellen?
Oh, misses, it's for poor June's spirits to be 'fected; specially when he
aint had no spirits all de day long.
And do you think June that a glass of spirits would change the
melancholy
of your song.
De spirits make June feel berry happy misses long as he last, but be no
bring back Miss Kate, and all de fine young gentlemen, and de ladies, and de
carringes, and de hosses.
Why, what in the world can these things be to you, June; you eat the
same, and wear the same, whether we are here or at the capital?
'Oh, Miss Kate, dey all de world to June; de berry light ob he eye; when
white folks gone, it is all one long rainy day at de Farmno banjoe denfrog
hab all de fun to heself, and de whoopperwill, he sing so solemn, he make poor
nigger cry for true.
Why you are quite sentimental, June!
Don't know zactly what de sentinel is, but he see one at de arsenal at
Williamsburg, walking so lone list like June, when young missus gone. De
birds find out directly when de house shut uphe no fraid ob nigger; de owl
come on that big tree, and he sit and moan all night long ober de empty
house, make June tink some of de familey gwine to die; and de bay! oh, he
moan for true so far off, way down to the sea, and den he come back to de
house and fine ebery body gone, he go way along the water, sighing and
moaning
all de way; but when Miss Kate come back, all de birds sing glad for true!
You shall have the spirits June; tell Essex so; but no more banjoe to
night, June; it affects our spirits.
Good night, and tanky missus, June gwine to broke he eye, cryin till
you come back.
CHAPTER XVII.
A GRIM MONSTER.
In
the suburbs of the capital of Virginia, there stood a one story building,
containing several rooms, rather neatly, but plainly fornished. This house
was separated from one of the back streets by a vegetable garden, of no very
tasteful arrangement, and through its centre led a grass walk, opening from
the street directly toward the main entrance.
In the only sitting room which it contained, were three persons. One was
an aged Indian female, seated in the chimney corner on a low stool, her elbows
on her knees, and her head resting upon her hands, so that she seemed almost
doubled into a knot, as she crouched over a few smoking chips in the hearth,
over which an iron kettle was suspended. She was totally blind, and in some
measure, helpless. The other two consisted of a male and female; the
former
was John Spotswood, and the latter an Indian girl, about sixteen years of
age. She had the general appearance of her race, so far as color and general
outline of features went, but our readers must not suppose that she was an
ordinary young squaw, rolled in a blanket, for she had been delicately
nurtured
,
and had learned many of the customs, as well as the language and
costume of the whites. Her
Anglicised
name was Wingina, and she was a
sister of Chunoluskee the interpreter to the Queen, until lately a sort of
companion
to Mrs. Stith at the College, and recently removed with her mother
and brother to their new house. She was dressed mostly after the European
fashion, with however a few remnants of her Indian taste still clinging about
her. Instead of shoes and stockings, she wore moccasins, on a pair of the
most diminutive feet imaginable; and over her ankles and wrists, broad silver
clasps, and large gold rings in her ears. Her hair was plaited, and usually
hung down her back; and round her neck were many strands of gaudy
colored
beads. She was as perfect in feature as any of that race ever is;
preserving
nevertheless, all their distinctive characteristics, such as the high cheek
bones and wide set eyes. These were softened by a childlike simplicity of
expression in her countenance, and a general air of dependence and deference
in her manners; acquired no doubt, from her isolated and forlorn condition, in
the midst of the most polished capital in America, without friends of her own
race and rank.
Her position was a very peculiar one; while an inmate of Mrs. Stith's
household, she was half way between the two racestoo elevated to associate
with the negroes, and scarcely considered equal to the whites. We have
already said, that she had been removed from the College from prudential
motives; her age, and accumulated personal attractions, having already
subjected
her to very doubtful attentions from the gay youths of the capital; but
it was too late. In an evil hour, she in her guileless simplicity had listened
to professions from the young man before her, as ruinous to her, as they were
degrading to him.
John Spotswood was no premeditated seducor. He never for one moment
harbored the deliberate intention, indeed until it was too late he had never
analyzed his own feelings and intentions. He was as much overcome in an
evil hour, as his unfortunate victim; and he was consequently, a victim
himself
of never ceasing remorse. His visit on the present occasion, was not of
his seeking, but had been brought about by the earnest solicitations of
Wingina
herself. She seized the occasion of her brother's visit to Temple
Farm, to hold one more last interview with the youth who had unintentionally
wronged her; we say unintentionally, because he was under the influence of
wine at the time, and the world scarcely holds him a perfectly free agent, who
surrenders his reason into the keeping of such a master. Wingina's
circumstances
were becoming desperate, and she sought very naturally the
council of the only one in all the world acqaainted with her secret.
Her brother, the proud and haughty young chief of the Shawnese, she knew
would put her to death upon the instant he learned her shame; and shall we
reveal the whole weakness of that poor, frail, half-civilized creature?she
dreaded still more his vengeance against the repentant perpetrator of her
wrongs. Most willingly would she have planged headlong into the
neighboring
river on either side of the city, but would this surely relieve her
partner
in the transgression? This was one of the questions she wished to solve
by the interview. She had wrought up her mind to the necessary point of
daring and desperation for the deed, but she doubted the stability of that
calmness
and stoicism with which young Spotswood might look upon it afterwards;
and she feared, instead of healing all difficulties, her death would only plunge
those whom she tenderly loved more irretrievably into ruin.
John had more than once generously offered to dare all consequences, and
reveal the true state of the case to her brother and his father, but her fears
would not suffer her to listen to this plan; besides, it promised nothing by
way of relief for their instant difficulties.
Our readers must recollect the aristocratic notions of that day in Virginia,
to realize how utterly impracticable was the marriage of the parties, as a
remedy. Could the son of the chivalrous Governor of Virginia, take such a
wife to the proud home of his father?could he make her an equal, and an
associate
,
with his innocent and accomplished sisters?especially after the
revelations
which a few months would add to his present difficulties. He saw that
it was next to impossible; yet, to do him justice, he thought it more feasible
than his innocent victim. She scarcely dared imagine such a thing; so far
did he appear elevated above her in social rank. The idea of clandestinely
making her his wife and then secluding her upon the frontiers, occurred to
him, but then the difficulties with which such a step would embarrass his
father's preparations for the great campaign, drove it from his thoughts. He
knew that the Governor mainly depended upon her brother, as a guide for the
expedition.
What was to be done under such distressing circumstances? This was the
question which racked the young man's brain, as he walked the floor. Oh,
how the stings of fruitless remorse writhed themselves into his innermost
heart. There sat the poor heart-stricken little stranger; a pensioner upon
the bounty of his family, the holiday pet of his own sisters; ruined, past all
help, and by him, who ought and would have perilled life and limb for her
safety. Her head hung drooping upon her bosom, and her hands locked
immovably
upon her lap, while the burning tears fell in a plentiful shower from
her eyes. Her plaited hair, curiously interwoven with beads and porcupine
feathers, hung on each side of her neck; and all together she presented a
moving
picture of hopelessness and utter abandonment, even to an indifferent
observer
,
but to John the very sight of her was agony.
Every now and then he extended his walk to a small table in one corner of
the room, upon which stood a decanter of wine, and poured out and gulphed
down a measure of the liquid. This was the best remedy he knew of, for
that utter despondence which overwhelmed him; he resolved to adjourn the
wretchedness of to-day, for the accumulated sufferings of to-morrow; never
thinking, that while he thus drowned his sorrow, he also drowned his reason,
and thereby incapacitated himself from seeing clearly his position, and
devising
the best means of escape.
Whichever way he turned his eyes, they were met by a picture, that might
have moved one less sensitive; the helplessly blind mother, and the scarcely
less helpless daughter. It is true, the old woman understood not his language,
and was therefore in blissful ignorance; but that circumstance rather added
to than lessened his remorse. He saw that in the day of full revelation before
the world, that ruined family of strangers, from a strange land, would create
a tale of wrong and outrage which would overwhelm him. He thought of
what would have been his own feelings of indignation against the perpetrator
of such a deed, and his own hand was almost ready to be raised against himself.
Fool that I was, muttered he, as wildly striding through that low
narrow
apartment, thus, for a momentary gratification, to peril all the brilliant
hopes and high aspirations of my life. Another might have committed such
a
faux pas
, and nothing have come of it, except, perhaps, a street brawl with
a young savage; but here am I, the man of all the world, in the position to
render the affair not only perilous to myself, but falling exceedingly heavy
upon my father. He is the great patron of these Indians; he has taken
them as hostages; they are therefore under trust to him, and to all connected
with him or under him. If this one false step could be retrieved, what a
millstone would be taken from about my neck? What a cruel fate was that,
which precipitated me into this cursed business?a life blighted forever by
one false step; and that step so trifling when taken by others, so
overwhelming
to me. It does seem as if a cruel and unrelenting destiny was mocking
at me! Are there not thousands of totally debased and profligate men, who
pursue long careers of wickedness and folly, without being thus overtaken?
Oh, it is hard to be borne! Great God! why was I reserved for a miserable
and degrading position like this? Was it because I can feel it? That little
bigotted twattler Ellen Evelyn, predicted that my sun would set in darkness.
Did she foresee the catastrophe? or was it a conclusion from general
premises
?
What is there in my life, my thoughts, my heart, from which any one
could predict such ruin? I love all mankind, and would any time rather do
an act of kindness than otherwise. I have wronged no one. YesI have
wronged this poor creature, but it was not a premediated wrong. Could she
draw the conclusion from my scepticism?what has the ruin of this Indian
girl to do with my religious faith?methinks these questions would puzzle
the old moralist at the College. What a mist we live in; how hard to draw
clear perceptions of moral obligation, from general providences? If sin were
always followed in this world by sharp and sure punishment, we might see the
hand of an all-wise and overruling power, but it is your generous-hearted
and unwary youths that are entrapped; your old lecher escapes scot free,
while the perpetrator of a single wrong is plunged to ruin. A man who
murders a single individual, is most sure to swing for it; while your
wholesale
butcher is glorified as a hero. This life is but a mockery surely; a
bitter
jest; we are but laughing stocks for the universe. And yet some people
manage to make a beautiful illusion of it! Dr. Blair for instanceDr.
Evylin
my
father and my sistersmy pure and innocent sistersthe dream of
life is really beautiful as illustrated by them. Why has the dark destiny
fallen to my lot alone?can it be, as Ellen Evylin says, that it is our
religious
faith that shapes our destiny, and that there is indeed an overruling
providence which superintends not only the general movement of worlds,
but the most minute details, even to the falling of a hair, as the Bible hath it.
Can it be possible that it is I who labor under the delusion, and that they are
right after all?absurd! It is nevertheless a pleasing dream; and I would
that my stern philosophy would sleep a while and let me become a Goody Two
Shoes, to be tied to my lady-mother's apron string, and dole out charities on a
pony, by the side of my sisters, and the two old twattlers now at the Farm.
Ha, ha, ha, what a ridiculous idea, and where the devil could it have come from
in such a scene as this, with ruin and despair staring me in the face. There
sits that Indian girl, a picture of wo; she, too, was being reared to join the
happy few, who believe in the protective and conservative power of religion;
and I, like a man fool, must pull down what they were so carefully rearing.
Curse my ill-starred destiny, that I should be reserved for such a hang-dog
fate. What a mystery is it, this fitful dream of life; but, thank fortune, it has
one speedy solution within the reach of the feeblest hand. Here within this
vest, I carry a small steel talisman which may unriddle the secrets beyond the
grave before their time. Saying which, he drew a small glittering dagger,
and held it up admiringly to the light, which Wingina no sooner saw, than she
rushed towards him, throwing her arms around his neck, and burying her head
in his bosom, cryingOh, Captain Spotswood, let me be the victim, I alone
am to blame!
Poh, poh, said the young man, moving her away with his left hand, and
holding her at arm's length, I mediated nothing just now, I but talked to this
little silent friend of mine; but tell me, Wingina, have you really no fear of
death?you look desperate enough, indeed, to dare it. Can such a frail, feeble
thing brave the king of terrors? Do you yet retain enough of the heroism
of your ancestors, to lay down this life when it is a burthen to you?
All that I know, Captain Spotswood, of suicide, I have learned from you
and your race. The warriors from which I sprung, consider that an act of
cowardice, which you have called heroism.
Aye, aye, here is another school of philosophy; one of nature's
teaching
;
let us learn of it also! It seems I am destined always to be schooled of
a petticoat, why not this poor Indian girl, as well as her superiors? Perhaps
she has drawn some wholesome truths from the Great Book, whose edges are
bound by the sea, and gilt by the sun. Tell me, girl, whence come the notions
of your race against self-destruction?
An Indian thinks outside, and a white man inside.
Ah, I see, I seetheir whole thoughts are occupied externally, and the
reflective faculties are not cultivated; then their opposition to suicide, is only
after all, because they never reflect sufficiently to become desperate.
Sir!'
Your race never commits self-murder, because they never feel wretched
enough to loathe this lifethat is only a result of our boasted civilization.
Captain Spotswood, it is I only that should make these complaints of your
raceyou have taught me to suffer, and God knows I have learned little else.
Poor Wingina, my teaching has been sad indeed.
Oh, sir, pity me not; it makes me all a woman again; just now I could
have rendered up my life, if only to convince you that a poor Indian girl
could die as heroically as one of your own proud race. I could dare it yet,
but from another motive which you have never understood, I fear.
And what is that Wingina?
Laying her hand gently upon his arm, which had now fallen by his side,
and looking up winningly and beseechingly in his face, she said softly, I
could die for you.
You could die for me? poor girl!
Aye, and will too; only assure me that my death would remove all these
troubles of which you complain so grievously, and the summer flower is not
gone more rapidly.
The desperate young man looked long and searchingly in her face, and
then suddenly grasped her by the arm, as he said, And do you indeed love
me still Wingina, after all that has passed?
Better than the Great Spiritmore than I love that poor blind old mother,
and a brother that became a captive for my sake. I would this instant forsake
all, if you will follow me to the wigwam of the Indian, and become a great
chief among my people.
But what, if I loved you not in return?
The poor girl staggered from his side and reeled into her former seat, and
there sat with her head drooping as before, and her hands locked in the
attitude
of despair.
Spotswood saw that the unpremediated blow had struck homethat despair
was in every expression of her eye and countenance, and his own turbulent
passions grew fiercer from the contagion. He strode up to where she was
sitting, and drew a chair and seated himself so as to bring his lips almost
touching her ear, and said in a tremulous whisper, Wingina, though I love
you not well enough to brave the scoffs and jeers of my race, I do love you
well enough; at least, I am struck with admiration enough for you to dare
death in your company, what say you?
Her hand was instantly clasped in his, with emotion, as of one who desires
to close a bargain only held to her option for the moment, exclaiming at the
same time, Oh how cheerfully.
Enough! said he, rising to depart, when all things are readywhen
the storm which is now rising in black clouds round the horizon, shall have
closed over head, and all is dark whichever way we look, and just ready
to burst, then I will come to you to redeem my promise. Consider my faith
as pledged to it; farewell, poor wronged, betrayed Wingina; we will seal the
solemn covenant of our marriage, by a ceremony that if the world approves
not, it cannot laugh at. Our races were never formed to amalgamate in this:
world, let us then adjourn our cases to that immortal tribunal, so much talked
of. Surely, said he, as he left the door, and walked musingly toward the
street; surely that great many headed monster will be satisfied with the
sacrifice I propose to offer upon its unholy altar; the perpetual fires of which
are lighted by the devil himself.
The sun was by this time sinking behind the horizon, and the shadows of
night stealing over the silent and sombre scene, chiming too well with the
darker shadows fast gathering over the hopes and fortunes of that once
bright youth. As was too often of late the case, he bent his footsteps to the
principal tavern of the place, and there met at the threshold Bernard Moore,
just from Temple Farm. Oh Moore! said John, by heavens I am glad to
see you; it is a long time since we have had a night together; now we will
indeed revive the memory of those good old times, to which you alluded
so often on that damned dull morning after I had been moped to death
all day and night, between old Dr. Blair on one side, and Dr. Evylin
on the other. How come on the old twattlers, and how is my father and the
family?
All well, John, but I fear I cannot join in your revelry to-nightI come
upon pressing business of the Governor's.
What's in the wind now?
A proclamation calling upon the young gentry of the Colony, to come
out in favor of the tramontaine expedition, and to such of them as have
succeeded
in enlisting fifty followers, to march to the capital forthwith. It is a
fine chance for you now, John, to distinguish yourself, and to grow rich besides.
O curse the tramontaine expedition; I have breakfasted, dined, and
supped
on nothing else for the last three hundred and sixty-five days, until I really
believe that I have got a young mountain growing up in my stomach, and
made of lime too, for it is eternally parched up with thirst; but tell me how I
may grow rich by this eternal crossing of the mountains? that's a new maggot
in my good dad's knowledge box.
It is a project of his new private secretary, Mr. Hallit is to give
magnificent
donations of land to all who will comply with the proposed terms.
And who the devil is Mr. Hall? I never heard of him before.
A very extraordinary young man, I assure you. He arrived at York with
the Scotch emigrants, and applied for a tutor's place over master Bob. He
has completely captivated the Governor.
Oh, aye, any body could do that who would affect strongly the mountain
frenzy; tell me now, was that not the way the thing was done?
I believe you are partly right, but he exhibited some very curious tricks
of fence with the small sword too, which finished what the other left undone.
Some rascally impostor I'll warrant; but he will not impose on me with
his mountain enthusiasm, nor his second hand tricks with the small sword
either.
I tell you, John, he is a match for the Governor himself, and toasted me
like a roasted goose with the spit run through him. Your father tried him
also at mathematics, and the Commissary at the classics, and in all he was
their equal.
And yet you say he is a poor adventurer. How does he dress and behave?
His dress is rather seedy, to tell you the truth, but he has the manners of
a gentleman.
It is all very strange, but let me see the proclamation; that too is his
handy work, I suppose?
Yeshere it is. Handing him a copy of the paper, which John glanced
over hastily and contemptuously, and then handed it back and took Moore's
arm as he said, Enough, Bernard, enoughthe very thoughts of the
mountain
expedition has made me as thirsty as a lime kilnwhat shall I order up?
port, sherry, madeira, or claretor will you go with me to the palace? I am
all alone there, and we can send out and have as fine a set of fellows in half an
hour as ever sung a song or told a story; and, by heavens, we will begin upon
the oysters to-night.
No, John, noI cannot join you at either place to-night, I am on
business
of importance, and must hurry back in the morning. I have to send an
express to some of the remote counties before I start; of course I shall be
engaged until late at night, in giving instructions to these messengers, part of
whom are already in the house.
No matter about that, we will make them all gloriously drunk, and then
pack them off at cross purposes; ten to one but they all bring up at Temple
Farm in the morning, and get put in the stocks for their pains; a capital
place, I'm told, to get sober. It keeps the blood upon a dead spirit level, so
you see it prevents determination to the head.
Why, John, I think you must have dined out alreadyyou seem disposed
to make merry of everything, from the Governor down.
Egad you are rightI have been out and have supped upon horrorsthe
very recollection of which smacks of brimstone, and that's the reason I'm so
thirsty now. Come, you shall not escape me, I swear, if I have to sit and
hear your instructions to every one of these express riders. I will have you
still. Come down to the palace, order these fellows down there, where we
can have the whole house to ourselves. I am determined to make a night of it.
Moore seeing that he must either comply or quarrel with his old friend,
determined upon the former for many reasons, and therefore set to work in
earnest with his business, determined to despatch that before he should be
engaged with one so likely to pledge him in deep cups. He was not more
than half inclined to join him at allnot that he did not enjoy a carouse to some
extent, like other youths, but there was a wildness, a desperation about John,
which pained as well as alarmed him.
They were soon seated over their wine in one of the most luxurious rooms
of the Governor's palace, each with a pipe in his mouth and servants
standing ready to obey the slightest command. It was an evening to
enjoy
luxuriously a glass of wine, a cheerful fire, and the soothing repose
induced by the glorious Virginia weed, and Moore seemed disposed to
make the best of his capture and enjoy these good things like a rational
creature, using the wine and tobacco rather as mental than physical
stimulants
,
and plying them lazily and luxuriously along as the conversation
flagged. Not so with his friendhe was disposed for desperate and deep
potations, he was restless and uneasy, and all the luxury in the world could
not have produced in him a sensation of caimness and repose. He scarcely
seemed fitted for conversationhe wanted roistering companions, and noisy
sport, and practical jokesand nothing prevented him from having them
but the declaration of Moore, that he would only spend a social evening
with him in the present way and no other. The only thing therefore for
John, was to make up in the depth and frequency of his libations for
want of more jovial company, with the faint hope at the same time that
Moore would soon be brought to that point of excitement, when he, too,
would be led to seek stirring adventure.
Still he sat and sipped his wine, or puffed his pipe, his feet cased in
slippers, and his legs over the seat of a chair, while his head was thrown
back in the attitude of luxurious repose.
Come Moore, said John, let's drink a bumper to the success of
that expedition which the Governor seems to have innoculated you with,
like all others who come within the reach of his influence.
With all my heart, John, I will drink to its success, but no more bumpers
for me. I do not want to look in the morning as if the devil had sent me a
case knife to cut my own throat.
Lord, Moore, you have sung psalms and hymns with old Dr. Blair and
Dr. Evylin, until you are becoming, I fear, one of those nice, moral young
men, praised by the old ladies, and held up as patterns by our dads, for
imitation
.
You are becoming evangelical, is that not the word?
Pshaw, John, you are suffering yourself to fall off too far to the other
extreme, you know very well that I am no stickler for propriety and decorum,
farther than they are necessary as the barriers between the various orders of
society?
Oh, damn the barriers of social order. If I had my way, I would cement
the whole of them with the hot fumes of wine into one great social circle of
democracywith our joy in common, our property in common; in short, I
would revolutionize your social structure: I would wipe out old things, and
begin all anew again.
Why, John, you are a madman!
Egad, I have thought that myself sometimes, but that is always in my
dark hour.
10
He moved his chair round near to Moore, and waved his hand to the
servants
to vanish, and then seeing that they were alone, by a stealthy glance
round the room, he whispered in his ear,
I am pursued by a demon!
Good God! John, you should consult adviceyour spectre or demon is
altogether in your disordered vision. Let me send now for the Doctor, and
see if he does not say that you should loose blood on the spot?
John langhed before he replied, Tush, man, there is nothing the matter
with me now, any more than there is with you, but sleep in my room to-night,
(and here his voice fell to a whisper,) and I will show you whether it is a
mind diseased or not. Call in that old negro, and ask him if I do not have
one of these nocturnal visitors every night?
No, no, there is no need, I will sleep in the same room with you myself,
and see this strange visitor of yours; but does he follow you wherever you go?
Yes, wherever I am, I see these strange sightswhether I am asleep or
or awake, I know not, but the visitor, as you call him, is not always of the
same identity.
John soon after began to grow boisterousthen to sing, and then to hiccup,
and finally was carried off neck and heels to bed by two of the servants.
Moore occupied a bed in the same room, in which he ordered a light to be
left burning, that he might see the dreaded apparition.
About three o'clock in the morning, he was roused from a deep sleep by a
strange unnatural noise in the room, and remembering the conversation with
John, instantly sprang out of bed and stood beside him. There lay his friend
crouched into a knot, the pillow wound tight round his head, just leaving
room for his fiery eye balls to gleam through.
There, Moore, said he in a whisper of mortal terror, there he stands;
don't you see him? Oh! what a hedious monster; his eye balls are like red
hot coals of fire, and his tongue forked like that of a serpent; see, see, he
moves. Protect me from him, for God's sake. Look, now he goeshe
goeswatch himHa, ha, hahe is gone.
Why, John, this is the very madness of the moon. You should consult
advice at once, for Heaven's sake let me send an express for Dr. Evylin.
No, no, still in a strained, painful and husky whisper, here they come
again, a legion of them, with fiery serpents in their handsmy God, see how
they fling them about.
He had now screwed himself up into the smallest possible compass in the
further corner of the bed, his eye balls still glaring from beneath the pillow,
and every instant schreeching in the most hedious manner, and now darting
from one side of the other, declaring that it was full of these
terrible
reptiles. Presently he was hard at work tossing them out of the bed,
imitating the exact action of a man grasping suddenly at some dangerous
reptile, and then tossing it wildly towards the floor. The cold dewy
perspiration
was standing over his blue cadaverous face, until here and there it was
gathering into little streams and trickling from his nose and chin. His
breathing was excessively labored, and his eye balls had now become fiery,
and rolled in their sockets without the least volition. His teeth were sunk
into his lips until the blood gushed from his mouth, while his hands were
alternately clutching the reptiles from sinking their fangs into his person, and
tossing them aloft in desperation. He leaped and screamed like a wild man.
With astonishing agility, and the strength of a lion, he tossed the servants
about, who now stood round and attempted to hold him.
Once or twice, by the persuasion of Moore, he was calmed for awhile, and
laid down as if to sleep, and the servants were seated and mutely attentive.
The stillness of death pervaded the room, nothing but whispers, and they
scarcely breathed, were heard. The eyes of the young man were closed, as
if by a powerful effort; and his breathing deep and convulsive. His attendants
all thought him asleep; but with the velocity of lightning he sprang from
the bed and alighted in the middle of the floor, uttering at the same moment
a long shrill scream. He was instantly seized by three or four stout servants,
and Moore himself assisting, but all together they could not hold him. He
doubled and twisted himself into a thousand strange contortions, and dashed
one servant to the wall with his foot, and levelled another on the floor with his
arm. At last when exhausted, and about to be overpowered by their numbers,
and the steady determination of Moore, he lay in a delirious ageny of fear.
One frightful monster after another raised his hideous form to his astonished
and bewildered gaze. No sooner had one been exercised, than a more hideous
spectre occupied its place.
Bernard Moore determined at once to send an express for Dr. Evylin. He
had inquired of the servants and learned that this was far the most alarming
attack which he had had. Leaving the unfortunate youth in their charge for
a few moments, he despatched such a note to the old Doctor, as he knew
would bring him, at the same time leaving it to his own discretion, whether
to alarm the femily or not. Having seen the boy depart on a fleet horse, he
resumed his melancholy position by the bedside of his friend.
CHAPTER XVIII.
THE LOVE OF FLOWERSCHARACTERISTIC OF THE SEXES.
About
ten o'clock next morning, Moore was startled from his position at
the bedside, by the rustling sound of a lady's dress in the entry below. He
slipped out and ran down, just in time to meet Kate at the foot of the stairs.
He took her hand, and led her into a room, where he seated her.
Oh, Mr. Moore, exclaimed she, almost breathless; do tell me what all
this meanswhat is the matter with John?
Tell me first how you knew any thing about it?
Oh it matters not, for Heaven's sake do not keep me in suspense, but tell
me when was he taken? how is he affected? is he dangerous? and oh, above
all, will he recover?
My dear Catharine calm yourself, your brother is ill, I will not deceive you
about it, but I hope there is nothing dangerous in his disease.
Well lead me to him at once, let me see and judge for myself, you know
that I am not one to faint at the sight of a sick chamber.
Stop, stop, not yetI must prepare you before you go, for your brother's
state of mind. He is quite delerious, and sometimes frantic.
She waited to hear no more, but threw open the door and ran up stairs
herself
,
and entered the room so silently, that a sleeping infant would scarcely
have been disturbed; but there was an ear listening to that soft tread upon the
carpet, that would have caught the vibration of a thread, so magnified was its
sense of hearing. John had roused himself upon one elbow in spite of three
powerful arms, the instant he heard the first foot fall, and was waiting with
distended eyes, for the approach of the dread visitor, which his imagination
had conjured up. As Kate passed the threshold, he shaded his eyes with his
hands, and glared at her with that vacant stare, which betokens a wandering
mind. She approached slowly, so as to give him time to recognize her, and
hoping every moment to hear him call her name, perhaps coupled with some
endearing epithet, but it was all in vain. His eyes distended wider and wider
as she came nearer, until the iris looked almost like a ring of fire, as she gently
laid her hand upon his arm, and uttered the words, My brother! he started
as if stung by a scorpionpushing back and back, until he had planted
himself
firmly against the wall, and drawn the bed clothes over his head; trembling
and quivering, she repeated, My dear brother, speak to me.
Kate threw herself into a chair, and buried her face in the bed, and wept
long and bitterly. During the while, the poor patient several times raised his
head from beneath the bed clothes, and listened to her sobs, as the startled
stag listens to the approaching huntsman, bending, his head forward, and
turning one ear foremost in the attitude of one who listens intensely. The
sounds seemed at last to soothe him into a gentler mood, and he stretched
forth his hand and smoothed down her glossy blond hair, as one who
commiserates
the object caressed. Kate raised her face towards his, all streaming
with tears, gratified in the midst of them that he had at least ceased to dread
her presence; but still he did not recognize her; go home now, said he,
go home to your poor blind motherthat's a good girl, and weep not for me.
Dr. Evylin and Governor Spotswood soon after entered; the latter was
terribly shocked, and even the venerable old physician found the case worse
than he had expected. He immediately ordered the room darkened, and cleared
of all but the necessary attendants, and then poured out a dose of some liquid
medicine, and handed it to Moore, there, give him that, said he, enough
to kill any two of us! After which, Kate was led out by Mr. Moore to
another room.
Oh Mr. Moore, said she, this is very dreadful! can you form any idea
of the cause of his derangement?
It is not ordinary madness, Catharine, (how affliction levels conventional
forms, like the grave,) it is not ordinary madness, but from what I have
heard and seen, it is the mania induced by intemperate drinking.
Is it possible?and is my brother indeed that degraded thing, a drunkard?
Distress not yourself, the case is no worse now, perhaps, than it has been for
some time; indeed this very attack may wean him from the wretched thraldom.
Half an hour afterwards, the old Doctor came in, a bright smile breaking
upon his features, his pipe in his mouth, and assured Kate that her brother
slepta thing, said he, which I will venture to say he has not done for
hours before. He assured her also, that if this sleep continued for some
time, he would awake better, and probably in his sound mind.
Kate insisted that she would watch by his bedside, and that the servants
might stand at the door within call; and sure enough, there she posted herself,
and remained six long hours. She watched in that dark room, until her eyes
at length became accustomed to it; and she could see her brother's
countenance
,
the corrugated brow, the quivering eyelid, the alternately distended
and collapsed nostril, and the compressed lips, the latter sometimes muttering
the delerious wanderings of the mind.
Was it any thing wonderful, that Moore's attention, as he occasionally
stole to the door and peeped in, was not wholly absorbed by the condition of
his friend? Was he not excusable if a stray glance wandered over that fair
neck and arm, as they rested upon the table, while their owner gazed upon
the unfortunate sufferer? In fact he caught all the changes upon John's
distorted
features, reflected with beautiful fidelity upon that of his sisters.
About five o'clock in the afternoon her brother waked up to a stupid sort
of consciousness, took a little broth, and fell off again into a deep sleep, the
first of the kind that he had enjoyed for many, many weeks. After Kate saw
her brother thus comfortably disposed, she took a few turns through the
garden
to see how her flowers had been attended to in her long absence. This
garden presented some of the rarest exotics ever then seen in America, and
was furnished with conservatories and hot houses upon a large scale.
*
*
The remains of these were still visible at the author's last visit to Williamsburg.
The gardener was now preparing to re-convey many of the tenderest of his
silent family to their winter quarters. Kate walked through the box hedges,
inquiring into the condition of each old acquaintance, deploring the
sickening
condition of some, and praising the luxuriance of others, here clipping off
a decayed leaf, and there propping up a rickety stem.
Moore was as excessively fond of flowers, as he had been remarkably
devont
,
when Kate read the responses; he went into raptures over the faded
beauties of some little foreign stranger, and was really pathetic over the
disasters
which absence and want of delicate culture had produced upon her
favorites. Oh, what a hypocrite! he did not care a fig for the most delicate
pink that ever blushed through its green foliage, any more than he did for a
red cabbage, i. e. he had none of the true ferver. He loved the flowers,
because
he was in love with every thing that she loved; but he did not love
them for themselves.
This is the way that men generally love flowers, they like to see the ladies
of their love fall into raptures over their silent and beautiful little friends, but
few of them have that sort of
affection
for flowers, genuine affection, which
ladies have.
Kate not only loved her flowers, but there was a sort of secret communion
between them. Moore was of a philosophic turn, even in his love, and he
desired to penetrate deeper into this connexion.
Will you tell me, said he, what this passionate admiration of flowers
is like, in your sex?
Adoration, would have been the better word, Mr. Moore, replied she,
not that we commit idolatry in our enthusiasm, but we approach the Deity
through them, as the Catholic approaches him through the saints.
Ah, that is a new idea to me altogether; with us it is different, we do not
ascend so high in our purest poetical feelings concerning them. We have
I mean the least grovelling of us, have very sweet associations with the
memory, as well as the presence of flowers.
Is that all? said Kate, looking up from a pale, delicate autumnal flower;
is that all? why, what poor creatures you are! we mix up our love for these
gentle, silent things with our higher sentiments. I am sure I never look at
one of them without silent adoration to that Great Being, who could so
extend
his broad cast benevolence, as to create them that they might minister
to our pleasures. Did you ever reflect that they were created for a wise
purpose? Nothing was ever created in vain, neither were these. Look at
this frail and beautiful thing, it has no medicinal properties whatever, and of
course must have been created to minister to our pleasures alone. God must
delight in these innocent enjoyments of his creatures, or else he never would
have strewed them so plentifully along our paths through this world.
The passion is all very well in your sexvery lovely, very beautiful; but
would it not be a little effeminate in ours?
Kate rose up, and looked him steadily in the face, before she replied.
Effeminate
!
effeminate, Mr. Moore, take back that word, I pray you.
Remember
what our Saviour said, `Consider the lilies of the field, how they grow;
they toil not, neither do they spin; and yet I say unto you, that even Solomon
in all his glory was not arrayed like one of these.' Ponder upon those
beautiful
words. All the poets that ever sung, never uttered in such a compass a
sentiment so full of innocence, purity, and beauty. Oh, it is almost sublime
in its perfect sublimation. Think of that word arrayedhe speaks of these,
my little dumb friends, as if the very angels had been employed at their
toilet. What an eye of for pure and perfect beauty he must have had! The
morning robes of the lily surpassed the glory of the most sumptuously clad
monarch in the history of the world, in his eyes. What a contrast that was,
in the comparatively rude age in which it was uttered! Who, at that day, had
ever before comprehended the whole and perfect beauty of that pale and
unobtrusive
flower? And yet you are afraid of being thought effeminate, if you
indulge
in enthusiasm like ours.
No, no, not afraid. I asked if it would not look so to you.
Well, then, I answer nocertainly not; but tell me truly, is it so, that your
sex does not feel these things which I have been describing, as we feel them?
To tell you honestly, Miss Catharine, we do not. I see that it will lower
us in your estimation, but I have been reflecting upon it, and I'll tell you what I
think is the reason, and perhaps that may set us all right again in your favor.
We are not pure enough; we mix too much with the business and the
anxieties
of the world. The Saviour, though in the garb of humanity, was pure
and spotless; does not his very capacity for the highest enjoyment of these,
old mother mature's pets, seem to favor my idea?
There is force in your remark, but I must say at the expense of your sex;
I had no idea that it was so debased; but it cannot be true of all menthere
must be some exception, some pure enough to relish flowers. I will
henceforth
,
I believe, go through the world looking for one who loves flowers for
their own sake.
He stands before you; do not leave me just yet, your brother sleeps, and
do you listen into what a rhapsody I will fall over this little yellow flower.
Kate laughed at him heartily over her shoulder as she entered the house,
and replied, that the one he had selected was the poorest thing in the garden,
but that it would do very well to begin with, and by the time he had mounted
to a potato blossom, she would be ready to listen to him.
CHAPTER XIX.
THE TUTOR'S NARRATIVE.
During
Kate's absence, Ellen Evylin wandered over the house like one in a
dreamDorothea tried her rural system upon her one morning, by dragging
her to see the dairy-maids perform their manual exercise, but it was all labor
in vain. Ellen told her that it required high health and spirits for these things.
There you are wrong, said Dorothea, for it is these that bring health
and spiritsdid you ever see me low-spirited?
No, indeed, my dear Dorothea, I never did, but remember you are just
fifteen
;
the next five years to you may contain the sorrows of twenty.
The little girl laughed and replied, not unless all the cows take the hollow
horn. Do you think I will? to young Dandridge, looking on.
No, I am sure if you ever have the blues, replied he, it will sour all the
milk in the dairy.
Ellen sauntered off alone, leaving the healthful and merry young pair to their
fun and frolic. She had not wandered long on the banks of the little brook at
the foot of the garden, before she discovered Mr. Hall standing opposite to
that gloomy structure, before designated as the scene of the night funeral.
He was standing with his hands locked behind him and his hat drawn with
the corner down over his eyes, and his head bent upon his breast, every now
and then raising it, to look at the tomb or vault, and then sinking it as before.
Ellen walked within a few feet of him, but he heeded her not. She was
determined
not to be baffled this time, however, and accordingly took her stand
at a few yards distance, to wait the termination of his colloquy with the dead,
for she could hear him talking in an under tone, and once or twice he raised
his right arm and let it fall listlessly again by his right side. She heard him
say, his last words to me were, we shall meet again! but who could have
thought that it would be thus?
Ellen coughed, so as to arrest his attention, and preclude the suspicion of
stealing upon him unawares. He turned round quickly and colored to his
ears, but approached her, removing his hat.
He was aware that she sought his presence, and was not a little surprised at
it, and approached her with an inquiring anxious look, as he saidCan I
render any possible service to Miss Evylin?
She seemed puzzled how to communicate her errand, but after a
considerable
pause repliedMr. Hall, it would be useless to attempt to conceal that
I have been for some time seeking this interview.
Is it possible!
His surprise startled her, and she was on the point of retreating at last,
without accomplishing her end, but she mustered up her courage and came
to the charge again. Yes, I acknowledge that I have sought for it, with a
particular object in view, but before I make it known, permit me to state that
I was in the room last Sunday, when you approached the picture of General
Elliot and apostrophised it, as you were just now doing his tomb.
Hall started, in still greater surprise, and look confused and rather
displeased
he
waited anxiously for her to go on. She continued:
It was purely accidental, my being in the room, and but for my surprise
and fright, I would have informed you of it. I do not now state these things
to obtain any sort of claim upon your confidence, but purely to explain why I
suppose you capable of throwing some light upon a dark portion of the history
ofhere she stopped short, she did not know how to finish the sentence
but presently added, of another.
She looked upthe change was indeed surprisingevery muscle of his
mouth quivered with excitement, as he struggled for an answer, and his eye
told of the most intense interest. They were rivetted upon her face as if he
would search her very soul.
Of whom? at length he asked.
Of Frank Lee.
He started as if a bullet had pierced his heart.
Of Frank Lee! exclaimed he.
Aye, did you know him? said she tremblingly anxious for his reply.
Know himknow him! he drawled out, too well, too well. Still
gazing with a dreamy eye and absent manner upon that beautiful, agitated,
downcast face.
Instantly her countenance rose, and she sprung forward with her hands
clasped together beseechingly, as she asked, Oh, tell me, does he live?
Livelivedoes he live? I cannot say.
Oh, why do you hesitate?
This question seemed to rouse him to his full consciousness, and he
answered: The truth is, Miss Evylin, your inquiries have been so sudden and
unexpected, and let me add, so embarrassing, that I scarcely know what I say.
Why are they embarrassing?
Because I cannot tell you all I know of him for whom you inquire,
without
exposing myself. I have not always been what I now seem.
Oh, you need have no fears of mesecrets in which he was involved,
would be sacred with me at least, and youcould you suppose that
I
would
betray you, if there was anything to betray?
No, I hope not, but there is another embarrassing point, which I know
not how to approach without offending you.
There need be no offence between two straight forward honest people.
Here, then, is a seat in this arbor; you look fatigued and exhausted, let
me fetch you a glass of water from the fountain.
No, nono water; I will take the seat, but I could listen forever while
you talk of him.
You must know that I was more intimate with him than with any living
being.
Oh, tell me all then quickly, and end my suspense.
I knew your story when I first entered yonder mansion, as well as I do
now, but poor Frank labored under a grievous mistake as to your feelings
towards him, unless they have lately changed back again into their old
channel.
Changed back again! old channel! what can you mean? the course of
that stream has not been half so steady and constant as the current of my
very heart's blood, in his favor.
Before God, I believe you, but there was some gross deception practised
upon him some where. Not an hour before he made the desperate and suicidal
attempt to rescue the brave officer who lies buried there, he expressed the
desperate determination to throw his life away. All this, produced by a letter
from this country.
From whom? exclaimed she with vehemence, from whom I pray you?
From his own brother.
From Harry Lee! is it possible! And what could he say to produce so
desperate a resolve in Frank?
I saw the letter and can speak very positively to that point. He said that
he expected to marry you before his brother's return, that he had already
obtained her father's consent, and only waited to break down the obstacles
which young maidens love to gather round themselves; that they were already
giving way, and would soon totally disappear before the warmth of his suit.
Those were almost his very words.
Oh, the base ingratethere was scarcely a word of truth in the wholeit
is true he asked my Father's consent to pay his addresses to me, but
he
only
referred him to me for a decision, telling him at the same time that he would
never interfere with my inclinations, so long as the object of my choice was
respectable and intelligent; and as to the obstacle, I was really endeavoring
to teach myself to look upn him in the light of a brother, until finding my
motives entirely misunderstood, I had to put him upon the stately footing
which you have seen, and which much better suits him. Now all being
explained, tell me what became of Frank after the attempted rescue?
There was still another thing which made him believe Harry's letter, your
own had ceased for some time, which gave his statements a remarkable
coloring of truth.
Of the cause of that I know nothing, except his frequent change of place
after leaving London. I wrote to him regularly.
I believe you, most sincerely, and now. I will tell you what little I know
of him. When he first came over, he spent sometime in travelling, and then
entered the University at Edinburgh, as was his first intention, and made great
progress with his studies, and would really have been distinguished as a
scholar, but for an unfortunate circumstance which happened. You will
recollect that Gen. Elliot, the half brother of Gov. Spotswood, came to
Edinburgh
about the time alluded to, and his brow being adorned with the laurels
obtained in battle, he was of course a subject of curiosity to all the ardent
youths about the city, and especially to those with any aspirations after
military
honors. Frank sought him out, and their mutual relations to Gov.
Spotswood
,
soon produced an intimacy. Frank was burning with impatience to
join the army, but his guardian's instructions were so positive about the
necessity
of finishing his collegiate course, that he resisted his impulses for the
time. The intimacy with the General, however, still continued. The affairs
of this country furnished a never failing theme of mutual interest between
them, and it was the intention of the General at some future day to emigrate
hither. Alas! he little supposed that his removal would be after death. I
was in College at the same time, and knew every turn of Frank's mind as
well as if he had been my brother. I was actuated by the same motives, and
longed for the same chance of distinguishing myself.
Gen. Elliot at length left the city, but we did not return to our studies with
the same ardor after his departure. Our hearts were in the army, and of
course the books were soon thrown aside for the foil, and the broadsword, and
if we read at all, it was works connected with military science.
The General was absent some months, and when he returned he was a
changed man.
His fine blithesome and sportive humor had left him, for a settled and
perplexed air. He walked about like one in a dream, and we were not long
in discovering that the character of his associates had entirely changed.
You know that both himself and the Governor were Scotchmen by birth, and
in that country there was a strong predilection for the hereditary claimant of
the crown, running through all ranks of society, more or less. Even with
those who held office and had fought for the existing order of things, their
affections were with the young Chevalier. Besides, it was thought that the
Queen could not live long, and there was little hope entertained even then, of
a direct hereditary descent of the crown. I believe that if the question could
have been impartially put to the Scotch people, without fear or favor
weighing
in either scale, whether the young Stewart or a foreigner should reign,
that the former would have obtained seventy-five in every hundred votes.
Gen. Elliot in his then recent excursion into one of the counties of England,
had (most unfortunately, as it turned out.) encountered the young Pretender
himself. He became at once charmed with the youth, and enamored of his
cause. This result was brought about, not a little by the disgust which filled
his breast against the ministry for their treatment of his patron and
commander
,
the Duke of Marlborough, who was just then beginning to reap that bitter
harvest of ingratitude with which his sovereign repaid his noble achievements.
Gen: Elliot on his second visit to Edinburgh, had come expressly on
business
connected with another contemplated attempt of the Chevalier, and
hence his perplexed air and new associates. His time was now almost wholly
taken up with these men, and a very extensive correspondence. We were
not long in discovering that something very unusual was in progress, and it
was therefore, I suppose, that the General determined to take us into his fatal
confidence. It was with no desire to involve us in difficulties, for his own
sanguine nature scarcely contemplated defeat; but if he had any misgivings
he was not to blame, for he was in some measure compelled to take us into
his confidence, owing to Frank's intimacy with himbrought about by his
position with regard to this country, and Frank and I, you know, were
relations
,
and very intimate of course. So that we were almost without
premeditation
,
linked in the treasonable affair. Not that we designed to commit
treason
,
or contemplated our acts as such; we had been led to believe that we
were espousing the cause of the rightful heir to the crown, and that it was
our opponents who were the traitors. It is success you know that re-baptizes
these things with new namesrebellion is patriotism when successful; and
treason, when defeated.
The better to blind suspicion, we were still nominally attending our
Collegiate
routine, but in reality hatching a most formidable plot against the
occupant
of the crown. Gen. Elliot was not a man to go tamely to work in
any thing that he undertook; his whole heart and soul were in the enterprise,
and we were not less heartily engaged.
He had now taken a house, the better to have complete control over all
those around him, and for the purpose of receiving such young gentlemen as
11
were anxious to join our cause. Such neophytes were generally sounded
first by my cousin or myself, and if found of the right materials, were then
introduced at head-quarters, which the General's house literally was. Over
his household, a young lady presided, who I must say was one of the most
arch little traitors that ever ran away with the hearts of a set of young
gentlemen
.
My cousin was greatly attracted by her society, as well as myself.
Poor Ellen, she looked aghast at this, which the young man seeing, he
quickly added, But-Frank's attentions to this most charming lady, were
dictated
by the purest brotherly regard, in which you would have joined him,
heart and hand, had you been there. Her name is Engenia Elliot, a relation
of the General's. She came to this country in the same vessel with me.
To this country! exclaimed Ellen in surprise, Where is she?
Not long ago, she was in that very house.
Is it possible? I never heard this before.
Did you hear nothing of the three masks?
Ah, then you were one of the three, and this young lady was another,
and who was the third?
Her father, Humphrey Elliot, Esq., another of those unfortunate
gentlemen
like my cousin and myself, who were ruined in fortune and reputation.
And where are they now?
Gone to a place called Germana, a frontier settlement, I believe. They
have doubtless changed their names ere this, and are happily settled, I hope,
in as peaceful and as happy seclusion as their circumstances will permit.
And why have you kept these things from Governor Spotswood, when you
know that he has been making such anxious inquiries for them?
Because I pledged myself to Mr. Elliot that I would do so, and I now
only reveal them to you to make my story complete, and under the same
injunction
of secrecy.
It shall be observed faithfully, but go on with your narrative.
While our preparations were in such fine train, as we supposed, for the
intended
enterprise, and just on the eve of accomplishment, the city was one
morning astounded with the news that General Elliot had been arrested in his
own house, and conveyed to prison. We had scarcely heard the news before
my cousin and myself were arrested, and our papers submitted to the most rigid
scrutiny. Fortunately there was nothing in them which could in the least
compromise us, and we were after a short examination liberated. I need not
dwell upon the melancholy particulars of the General's trial, you have
doubtless
read them in the English newspapers; suffice it to say, that he was
convicted
of high treason, and sentenced to be beheaded. Before that fatal day
came, all of us who had been implicated in fact, but not in law, resolved to
make one daring and desperate effort for his rescue. You know, also, the
result
of the mad attempt. It was led by Frankhe was cut down by the
soldiers
on duty, and rode over by a troop of dragoons. No one supposed it
possible
that he could survive. He was carried off by a party of Collegians, who
witnessed
the affray and recognised him. To the world he has been dead eversince.
To the world, exclaimed Ellen, seizing his hand entreatingly, then he
yet lives to his friends.
I will not, cannot say positively; but I will say, that I saw him after he
was reported to be dead.
Oh God, I thank thee! exclaimed his auditor, and would have fallen
from her seat had he not supported her.
When she had somewhat recovered, he continued: while he was yet in a
state quivering between life and death, he dictated a long letter to you.
I have never received a line from him since that fatal day, and indeed
for some time before.
I have that letter in my possession.
Oh then give it to me at oncekeep me not in suspense.
It is in my trunkif you feel able now to walk to the house, I will hand it
to you as soon as we arrive there.
On the instant, I am as strong as ever I was in my life; I could walk to
the capital, if that were necessary.
Toward the house they moved; the invalid, who but a few hours before
dragged her steps along, now almost pulled the tutor, so impatient was she,
and so buoyant and elastic her step.
When she had received the precious document, she rushed out of the door
leading to her apartment never stopping to thank the donor, or make any
salutation
whatever. There he stood in the middle of the floor, his hands still
extended, and his moist eye resting on the place where she last stood.
Whether he envied the unfortunate youth all his misfortunes, who was the
subject of such an undisguised attachment, we cannot undertake to say. His
interest in that pale young creature seemed to have been deeply aroused, but
whose would not, under such circumstances.
She never afterwards recollected how she arrived at her room, but the door
was locked all the balance of that day. Occasionally she was heard walking
about, no one could account for it, except Mr. Hall, and he said nothing. Such
things were so common for her, however, that her prolonged absence was
passed over. Her father, the Governor, and Kate, were all at Williamsburg.
The letter ran as follows:
Dear Ellen
:
I still call you so, in spite of all that is passed. Before you receive this
letter, I shall be in my grave; what a termination is this to all those bright
and hopeful dreams of youth, which mutually inspired our hearts at our last
meeting: but I do not regret itindeed I have sought an honorable death, as
a relief from the deep, deep disappointment of those hopes. Oh, Ellen, you
recollectyou must recollect that blessed evening, when our young hearts
were suddenly and unexpectedly laid bare to each other. Why could not
those blissful moments continue forever? Does the curse which has gone
forth against our race, interdict the continuance of such happiness as was
then ours? It seems so; our betrothal has but terminated as ail other
youthful
engagements have done before it; but I did hope other and better things
of her who was so entwined round my heart, that to tear away her image,
would be to unseat my very soul itself; and so it yet appears to me. I can
die, and leave my possessions to my brother; and above all of them, I can
resign you to himfor I considered you as much mine as the pupil of my
eye; but I cannot live and see these things. I would scarcely trust myself
with the sight of you as another's wife, even if that other were my brother.
I could not have believed that it could come to this; and would not now
believe
it, if I had not received it from Harry's own hand, and no one who
bears the name of Lee can lie? It was corroborated also by your own
mysterious
silence. But think not, still ever dear Ellen, that I have propped up my
feeble frame on the bed of death to utter reproaches against you, far from it
far, very, far from it. I thought it might relieve your burthened memory in
after time, if I would, before I died, voluntarily release you with my own hand
from all engagemants to me. I know that you were very young at the time
of our rash promises to each other, and I know that our affections are not
always
within our own control. Lt not the memory, then, of our youthful
loves poison those of your maturer years.
May you and Harry glide gently down the vale of life, undisturbed by
the trials which have wrecked my peace! May the gentlest dews of heaven
moisten your green paths; and hand in hand may you support each other
through whatever afflictions may be thrown in your wayand at last, may we
all meet hereafter in a higher and nobler sphere of action.
These wishes are sincere and honest, for they are the products of the bitter
and honest hour of death. I could not write them sooner, and it were not safe
to defer it longer, for already I feel the damp dews of death gathering upon my
brow, and the shadowy visions of the dark valley falling over my eyesthey are
covered with mist. Farewell! farewell!
Frank Lee
.
It would be impossible to depict the various and conflicting emotions which
agitated her heart while perusing this letter. She read it over and over
again, and walked the room with it in her hand, occasionally referring to it,
to note some passages whose meaning she was attempting to understand
more clearly. Night came and still she pondered over that single page of
writing, though she had learned every word of it by heart. The very
punctuation
became a matter of moment. A single note of interrogation after the
word lie, though placed there in the hurry of agitated composition, or by
mistake
,
seemed to her excited fancy as if poor Frank had intended to ask the
question, whether Harry could have falsified her or not. Who is there in
this world of trouble, who has not thus dwelt upon a letter containing bad
news, vainly endeavoring to draw consolation from some chance word by
which the disastrous news might be softened, and torturing the words of the
writer into meanings never meant to be conveyed? Though that long day
and night were spent in grief and suffering, it was merely over a new aspect
given to the old sorrow by the letter. On the whole, her heart was relieved
by a review of the story of the Tutor, and she now, with something like
reason, nursed the hope on her heart, that she would one day yet meet her
long lost lover. In this happy conviction she fell into a deep sleep before
morning, from which she was not roused until the sun was high up in his
daily rounds.
CHAPTER XX.
VIRGINIA COURTSHIPS.
In
the course of a few days John Spotswood was able to sit up in his
chair, and receive the visits and congratulations of his friends. He seemed
to have lost all relish for the disgusting poison which had thus carried him to
the very brink of the grave, but the same settled despondence still brooded
over his young hopes. Kate was ever at his side, not only anticipating every
desire, but exerting her powers to the uttermost to entertain and enliven her
dejected brother. She read to him, she sang to him, she culled flowers to
amuse his solitary hours, and even affected a gaiety which she felt not, to
cheer him from his settled melancholy; but all to no purposeto the books
he listened not, to her charming voice he turned a deaf ear, and her flowers he
would take in his hand and perhaps snuff their fragrance, and then let them
fall listlessly upon the carpet beside him. No subject, no book, no person
seemed to possess the least attraction for him, he hardly tolerated the society
of his own sister, delightful as that society was. His whole comfort now
consisted in his tobacco, which the old Doctor allowed him to whiff
occasionally
.
He would sit for hours with his pale emaciated face thrown up, his
head resting upon the back of his couch, and his eyes fastened upon the
ceiling, or following the rich volumes of smoke which issued from the
fragrant
weed, and never utter a syllable.
Kate would steal away into another room and weep and sob as if her heart
would break, and then after removing all traces of her distress, glide back
again to her position at his side. Many times she was compelled to rush out
of the room to hide her emotion, at some remark of her brother's, showing
his utter hopelessness and deep despondence; she was not always alone in
her duties at her brother's sick couch. Bernard Moore spent a great portion
of his time there, and by his lively conversation and playful humor, assisted
Kate in her endeavors to pluck the rooted sorrow from John's heart; but it is
very questionable, whether he was not much more successful in planting the
seeds of it in his own. It is a very dangerous thing for a young gentleman
to see a beautiful girl daily and hourly performing those hundred little offices
which minister to the wayward fancies of an invalid, especially if those sweet
charities are offered with a cheerful spirit and a temper always yielding, even
to the impositions of the unreasonable patient. It is not that man in his
selfishness
is looking forward to the days of his own imbecility, when he may
perhaps need a nurse himselfit is not that or any thing like it, that so lays
open his heart on such occasions; there is very little in reference to self
passing
through his mind; 'tis purely because it presents woman in her true
sphere; it is because it presents her in the attitude of a ministering angel.
How noiselessly she moves through the roomwith what gentle and steady
hands she presents the cup to the parched suffererhow nicely she balances
the pillow supporting the throbbing temples, and then lays it down again so
softly, that the slumbers of an infant would scarcely be disturbed. There is
no impatienceno drowsinessno yawningnot even talking, when out of
placethey endure all things, suffer all things.
Kate was wholly absorbed with her brother's condition; she seemed entirely
unconscious that a very assiduous beau was as constant in his attentions to
her slightest wants, as she was to those of her brother. Not that she slighted
Moore in any degree, nor on the other hand, did she manifest that alarming
politeness
,
which to the discerning lover is the prelude to a dismissal. The most
keen-sighted and sagacious observer of the sex would have been sorely
puzzled
to say, in what estimation she held the youth. The Virginia system, or
custom, has always required a long probation of the lover, and during all the
while, how admirable is the self-possession of the sly and demure damsel! Not
a look, or gesture, or word, or pressure of the fingers betrays the state of the
aflections. How this admirable result is brought about, we know not; we
speak of the performance of the ladies' part, as matter of history. The object is
sometimes effected by a playful railery, and affectation of indifference, in other
regions; but it is not so in the Old Dominion. The lady preserves a charming
degree of naturalness in the midst of the most interesting passages of life.
That nature is wholly suppressed, and that there are no little straws floating
upon the still stream, by which the current may be detected, we do not mean
to say. We only speak of the general habits and manners of the people.
Moore (as all other Virginia lovers do even at this day) doubtless weighed
these things, and certainly took encouragement from the examination, as his
perseverance evinced, but Carter did the same, and both could not be right.
Thus holding two admirers exactly equipoised, will our readers accuse her of
coquetry? There was not a particle of that feline propensity in her
composition
,
which plays with a victim and then destroys him. Nature has placed the
female sex in the defensive in this matter; they cannot woo, but must wait to
be woed; and man in his thousand intricacies of character, and seeming
inconsistencies
,
retreats as she advances; it is therefore the true philosophy of
the sex to be utterly non-committal, until the all-important hour arrives, when
these conventional barriers are broken down by the other. Then how
charmingly
the frost work of that long probation melts before the assiduities of the
ardent and persevering lover! Before that day arrives, there are a thousand
little playful courtships on the part of the gentleman; he often assumes quite
a quixotic devotion, and hesitates not to profess his admiration, at which the
lady looks on quite smilingly and demurely, but these are the mere skirmishes
of the outposts which precede the pitched battle. It was partly on this
account
that Moore's position was so dangerous; all this skirmishing and
quixotic
devotion to the sex was in a great measure dropped in the sick room,
and he flattered himself that he had caught sundry little nameless confiding
pieces of forgetfulness in Kate. He saw that she looked up to and relied
even upon his presence as a comfort in her present position. In other words,
the sick room breaks down a small portion of these conventional barriers.
They consulted quite confidentially about the varying state of the invalid's
health, and the state of his mind. Was he so selfish as to wish John's
sickness
prolonged; we hope not; we know not; it would have been no
inconsistent
phase of human nature if he had; but he was constant in his
attentions
,
and ever instant with his services. Those whispering conversations
which they held in the recess of the palace window, while the patient slept,
were exceedingly comfortable things to the doubting youth. How he drank
in the words that fell from her now all serious and confiding face, and how he
loved to see her eye rest upon him for consolation, after a prolonged gaze
upon her sleeping brother.
On the evening in question, as they thus sat, after a little playful bantering
of Moore's, and several ineffectual attempts to reinstate her in her usual
cheerfulness, she thus spoke to him:
Will you be frank and sincere with me now, and say, if you know the
cause of this sad change in my brother?
Thus appealed to, most assuredly I will Kate; but it is a fruitless
frankness
in this instance, for I am as ignorant as yourself. The day that you
sent me in your place to accompany him on the road, I endeavored to draw it
out, but he baffled me.
You know more of human nature, at all events, more of young men's
nature, than I do, what do you imagine could cause this dreadful despondence?
Place yourself in his situation as near as you can, what would depress you thus?
I know not, unless being crossed in love. Kate turned her head slightly
from the speaker, and a warm and just perceptible color flashed over her
cheeks for an instant, leaving her face rather pale, and her ears very red. He
continued: But I do not know that any such thing has happened to John?
No, replied shethere was a slight effort made by their friends to
induce
my brother and Ellen to fancy each other, but they very soon discovered
that these are feelings which, in their origin at least, must be spontaneous.
Neither of them, I believe, were heart-broken by the effort; I can speak with
certainty of the lady.
And I, of the gentlemanof course, that cannot be the cause. Have
you never heard of any other attachment of his?
Kate made no reply, but seemed busied with some mortifying recollection,
and then darted off to perform some little nameless duty about her brother's
sick couch. When she returned, she did not seem to think the question still
required an answer, and the subject was dropped.
That same night Moore was seated in his room at the Hotel, wrapped in
his dressing gown, his feet cased in slippers and thrown over a chair, while
volumes of smoke rose up in pyramids over his head, and broke in fanciful
festoons for many yards around. A large volume, with plates, was open
before him, and his table was strewed with flowers. He did not seem to be
studying very attentively, for every now and then he threw his eyes to the
ceiling, and was lost in a pleasing reverie. Presently a rap or two was heard
at the door, when who should enter but Carter, just from Temple Farm,
Moore sprang up and grasped his hand cordially, as he said:
Oh, Carter, where the treasure is, there will the heart be also.
True, my fine fellow, how is Kate?
Well, I thank you, but I had supposed you would ask first about her
brother.
You thank me! and who the devil gave you any right to thank me?
You speak as if you were already one of the family. Come, come, Moore,
fair play; there must be no stealing a march upon me. We are pledged to
a fair race, and that it shall not be terminated until we have crossed the
mountains.
Ha, ha, ha, shouted Moore, Gad, that would be a long track, sure
enough; the Governor to hold the stakes, I suppose?
Moore, what a fellow you are, for turning every thing into a joke.
Aye, Carter, true; but where my tongue
tickles
, your's
stings
.
But what do you mean by having these flowers upon your table, and that
huge book on medicine; are you going to study the art?
This is a book on botany, and these are specimens. Kate is giving me
lessons.
Ha, ha, ha, said Carter, love makes fools of us all. You know that
you have no more of the genuine passion than a savage. If she were to
order you upon a pilgrimage to Jerusalem, don't you think you would
undertake
it?
By Heavens, Carter, we are both going on one little short of it; and if the
honest truth were told, it is more the daughter's influence than the father's
arguments that leds us over those mountains, as studiously as you may pore
over the old veteran's maps. Is it not so?
Right, Moore, right.
Well, what is the difference now between my courting the daughter with
botany, and your courting the old gentleman with geography?
None, except that I fear you have taken the shortest and pleasantest road;
but talking of mountains, I understand our expedition is to be no child's play
after all; there is terrible work with the Indians along our southern borders.
The North Carolinians have had quite a brush with them, and the infection is
extending even to some of our tributaries, and to the whole of the South
Western Indians. I do not like the idea of that fellow, Chunoluskee, being
our guide.
Nor Idid you ever hear such stuff as that which he palmed off upon
those three old gentlemen that morning. He is an arrant hypocrite.
As ever lived, and yet the Governor will not believe it; he will peril the
success of his expedition, if not the whole of our lives, if his eyes be not opened
before we set out.
It must be our business to see to that, but tell me, have you heard from
any more of the counties? Will the young men join us?
Yes; I saw the Governor to-night and he is in fine spirits. He says they
are pouring into the capital from every quarter.
What, the gentry, or their recruits?
Both; some have brought their men, and mules, and horses, and are now
actually ready; while others have been brought here by the proclamation, to
see and learn for themselves. I left at least twenty of the latter down stairs
as I came through; they are smoking and drinking over the discussion of the
subject, even now.
How talk theyfor us or against us?
For usI think most of them seem to have caught at that new idea of the
Tutors, about the immense rewards in lands. Gad, Moore, that's an
extraordinary
fellow, a clever rogue; but the Governor says he's a soldier, every
inch of him.
Yes, you can see that in his very step; he never turns his head, but he
seems as if it were on a pivot.
But I forgot to tell you the news about him, since you left the Farm; he
is desperately smitten with the old Doctor's little nun.
Is it possible?he is presumptuous.
Yes, it is a fact, and what is still more remarkable, the little prude is quite
pleased with his attentions; she seems at last to have found one of our sex
whom she can tolerate, and a pretty selection she has made of it. Only to
think of her rejecting John Spotswood, and then accepting this desperate
adventurer with the seedy garments.
As to fortune, Carter, I grant you it would be rather a
mesalliance
, but in
every other respect he is a match for any man's daughter. I am very much
mistaken if he has not always moved in circles of the highest rank. But tell
me what induces you to think that there is any thing in the story?
Well, I'll tell you; since you left the Farm they have been inseparable.
The morning that Kate came away, they spent about half the day together,
over that strange vault at the foot of the garden, about which there is so much
gossip just now; after which she locked herself up for the remainder of the
day and night. Next morning she came out bright as a new guinea, and
again they wandered off together, along the bay shore, he talking poetry, and
she discoursing of heaven, no doubt. Well, they came into dinner, and there
she sat laughing and talking as loud as Dorothea herself. I asked the little
dairy maid
in an under tone, if she did not think her friend was hysterical,
for which she slapped me in the face with her fan. It, however, proved to be
no hysterics after all, for she has been quite cheerful ever since, and sits out
the evening in the parlor, and has taken Kate's place at the organ every
evening
.
There is a great change in her, from some cause or otherothers have
noticed it, and her bloom is already returning. If I had not engaged in this
everlasting race with you over the mountains for the prize of Kate's hand,
and if Ellen was not such an intolerable little blue-stocking, I could find it in my
heart to fall in love with her myself; she is a bewitching little fairy after all.
Well, how does the representative of all the Lees bear being choused by
a poor Tutor?
Oh, there's the sportDorothea, I fear, will die with the effort to suppress
her delight; she encourages the mutual attraction of the two quiet ones,
while Lee struts like a peacock.
But, Carter, how was it he played the magnanimous to the Tutor, about
the property left him, has he taken all that back?
Oh, he was in a patronizing mood then, and cannot very well retract, for
the Governor actually drew some of the proceeds of the estate out of him
before this business commenced. The adventurer carries it off boldly, I assure
you, for he treats Harry as if he were the debtor and Hall the creditor.
Such is the fact, Carter, if his story be true.
Poh, poh, Moore, will you never learn the world better; I tell you he is
some broken down gambler, or attorney, or perhaps a cashiered officer.
How could he have known all that family history which he detailed to Lee?
Learned it for the purpose of swindling, no doubt.
I cannot believe it; if Hall is an impostor, I'll never trust mankind again.
Well, we shall see, for depend upon it if he goes on putting his spoon into
Lee's dish, as he is doing now, that gentleman will soon bring him to the
proofs of his identity. Indeed, I heard him swear before I left the Farm, that
he had suffered himself to be imposed upon, and he wrote a long letter by me
to Attorney General Clayton, upon this very subject. You will be sure to
see a fox chase before the matter is ended. Clayton read the letter in my
presence, and questioned me very closely about the young man, He evidently
thinks with me, that he is an impostor. He says the question can be placed
beyond doubt, in a short time; that there is a man now living in the Colony
who came from the neighborhood of these Hall's in Scotland, and who knows
the young man Henry Hall to whom the estate was left. He is, moreover,
one of the witnesses to this very will, and was consulted, it seems, by the old
lady, about his character and habits, and all that; and her selection of him
from the rest of his family, was mainly through his instrumentality. His name
is McDonald, and Clayton has written to him to be at the capital by the time
the Governor's family remove thither for the season. So you see we are
likely to have some sport.
Should this business terminate as you so confidently predict, it will be
another terrible blow to that little sensitive plant of the Doctor's; that is, if
she is really pleased with his attentions, as you say.
Tut, tut, Moore, if she can be inveigled from her seclusion by one man,
she can by another. She is no man-hater, take my word for it. It is only
your broken backed girls and old maids seared with the smallpox, that truly
hate the men, and then it is only because they discover the aversion in us
first. I never saw one of your man-haters who was a pretty girl, in my life. I
confess that Miss Evylin came near shaking my faith for a while, but since I
have observed her closely, as she conversed with this man Hall, I have become
more confirmed than ever in my belief. If ever I saw a girl's soul in
her eyes, it was in her's while conversing with that man.
You astonish me, Carter. Miss Evylin is the last person in the world
whom I would have supposed would be accessible to a stranger at all, but
that the affair has progressed to the length you describe, really astounds
me. As much as I confess myself taken with Mr. Hall, I would have
preferred a longer probation in the case of a lady.
Kate leads us a different sort of a dance, aye Moore? I rather
suspect
you would not object to any precipitancy in that quarter.
No, Carter, no; you are a generous rival I must confess, and bear off
our mutual sufferings with a happy grace, but will you excuse me, if I
say that I do not think you are very deeply touched.
The devil you don't! wherefore do you think so? Is it because I can
still crack my jokes and be merry over my wine and tobacco?
Your jokes, Carter, as I said before, sometimes sting more than they
tickle.
Ha, ha, ha, they do, do they? I thought I had wrung your withers.
Forgive me, Moore, I have no right to rejoice over your greater
sufferings
,
but being a fellow sufferer, I have some right to laugh.
At this time a slight knock was heard upon the door, with sundry
scrapings
of the feet. Moore smiled as soon as heard them, and cried come
in. In glided old June, wringing his tarnished cocked hat with both hands,
as if he designed rending it in twainbowing his head at every step as
he approached, and scraping back his right foot with a grating noise upon
the floor.
Well June, said Moore, what brings you to the capital?
I come wid Moss Carter, to fetch back letter for Miss.
Ah, and you are going back to the Farm to-night. Well, what's your
will with me, June?
Glass rum for poor niggerplease God.
Moore ordered the servant to bring it, which June having prefaced with
a long speech, by way of toast, drank off at a single breath, and then
smacked his mouth and wiped his lips, and stood as before, still rolling
or twisting his hat with his hands.
Well, June, now you have got the rum, what next? Your tongue is
loosened; now for the news on the Farm. Have you seen any more ghosts,
since the night of the thunder storm?
No massa, ant seen spirit since, but June dreame last night.
Oh! well let us have your dream, what was it? About your Miss
Catherine and her beaux again?
No, Massa, not dis time. I dreame say, I bin der der trable, trable, trable,
ta-a-ah! clean wha neber been befo. De keep on trable, trable, so tay! at
las, I see high fencelook jis like big wallhe white, jis like chork, ony he
12
bery shine. When I see dat, I walk all about, der try find who lib dere. I
walk, I walktay I see big gate dey tan wide open. I gin peep disway, and peep
dat waylas, I skin he eye open tight, and I see plenty ob people. Some dey
walk aboutsome dey lay downsome dey eatsome dey drinksome dey
sleep, ugh! dey look so happy. Tay, I look gin, and see some of my fellow
sarbents dey, aint hab noting 'tall for do. One call mesay, `broder June,
come in, come in, glad for see you, him de look for you long timeme too
glad for see you.' I gone in, ugh! de place pirty, for trueI'h! de corn
de tatoeebery ting growin dey. All my fellow sarbents dey walk bout in
de sunshine. No hab no close 'tallebery ting comfortno spade, no hoe,
no ploughnottin 'tall do, but eat and drink, and sleep in de warm sunshine.
I walk 'bout, and I eat and drink, and feel too happy. My Lor', feel too happy
last nighthappy for trueso tay, I gwine haben to look hine de do, ugh!
wha you tink I see, mass Moorewha you tink I see dey?Lor', massa, see
big red cowskin hang up dey! Kerry, when June see dat, he trable, trable
back gin, till he bark shin ginst skillet, and wake up and find he no nigger
hebben arter all.
The youngsters burst into a loud laugh, in the midst of which the banjo
player, with many quaint bows, departed, as he had done from his negro
heaven, and was soon riding at the rate of eight miles an hour in the
direction
of Temple Farm; thereby verifying the old adage, that a spur in the
head is worth two in the heel.
CHAPTER XXI.
HARD WORDS.
While
a portion of those in whom we hope our readers take an interest
still linger at the capital, let us again revisit the charming shores of the
Chesapeakethat choice region, which is daily deserted by its natives for an
unknown land of frogs, and vapors, and swamps.
Before another halt century rolls round, the borders of this most magnificent
of all inland seas will be sought for by travellers in their summer rounds, from
both sides of the Atlantic, and its now decaying mansions will be rebuilt, with
far more than their former splendor. The little old squat farm houses, with
their dormar windows, will be supplanted by elegant villas, and neat cottages
and stately castles, and the hundreds and thousands of monuments erected in
memory of the dead of a former generation, and now slanting to the horizon,
and many of them dilapidated and disjointed, will be eagerly sought out by
some old Mortality, and their nearly obliterated insignia restored and redeemed
from oblivion. Perhaps the descendants of these very restless emigrants, now
miring in the swamps of Mississippi, may return, and hunt out the faded and
perishing memorials of their forefathers, and cast their tents beside them, and
say, here will we and our posterity dwell forever, in the land given to our
fathers. Well would it have been for thousands and tens of thousands had
they been content to dwell in this most favored land, endowed by nature as it
is with all that should cheer the heart and content the mind of man. We
say, that in less than half a century, the tide of emigration will roll backward,
and the desolate shores of the Chesapeake yet blossom as the rose. Oh may
that day soon come, when Virginians will learn to venerate more and more
the land where the bones of their sires lie; that land consecrated as the
burial place of a whole generation of high-hearted patriots, and where yet
breathes the purest spirit of enlightened freedom that ever refreshed and pu
rified the earth; that land in which was exhibited that rarest combination of
social arstocracy and public equalitywhere virtue, and talents, and worth
alone were consecrated to reverence, through hereditary lines of descent.
Many an hour did we toil to replace the fallen cap of some old tomb-stone, of
a sire, perhaps, whose descendants were every one gone to a strange land.
We were accompanied in our labor of love sometimes by one,
*
*
The late Senator Page of Williamsburgthe sole lineal descendant, we believe, of
Governor
Page. He had the true antiquarian zeal. His was a pure and bright spirit. Peace to his
ashes.
who even then
bore about his person the too sure evidence that he, too, would soon sleep
with the consecrated dead, whose memories and monuments he loved so well
to cherish.
We could not pass through Old York on our way to Temple Farm, without
one more glimpse at that melancholy and utterly ruinous grave yard; where
the traveller beholds the faded efforts of heraldry, like a cross-bones and
death's head, gaping from every tomb-stone. There the stones themselves,
erected to perpetuate earthly honors, are fast sinking to the grave, staring and
gaping as they fall, and holding aloft their effigied arms, as if in supplication
to the passer by to save them from the threatened desecration. That old
grave yard is turned out like their old fields, to rejuvenate upon the very
carrion
which is left from the ceaseless battle that time wages with all things.
Oh Virginians! ye noble few who still cling to the hearth-stones of your
forefathers
,
rouse up, and preserve these old time-honored monumentsthese old
tomb stones, that have withstood the storms of the Chesapeake for a hundred
and fifty years. When those old grave stones are replaced, and flowers once
more bloom over their green and dark forms, then will the regeneration of the
Old Dominion commence, and not till then.
Our readers have caught a glimpse of the position of some of the parties
at Temple Farm, from the conversation of Kit Carter and Bernard Moore;
but there were others at the farm, to whom they were not so amusing. Harry
Lee could scarcely believe his own eyes, when he saw the young lady at
whose feet he had been casting his princely fortune, and not less princely
self, daily wandering along the shores of the bay, and through the garden
and the shady groves, and along the banks of the little brook, with one whom
he considered as only occupying his present social position by sufferance.
He was struck with the fact, that the more Ellen and Hall were together, the
more the hatred of the latter was manifested to him. He determined
therefore
to seek an early opportunity for explanation from both. In the meantime,
it seemed to him as if the stay of the old Doctor would be prolonged forever,
so impatient was he for his return. He inquired for him at every meal.
On one of these occasions, Dorothea, with a sly smile upon her face,
proposed
to despatch a messenger for the Doctor, if Mr. Lee was getting much
worse, as she said her brother was better, and the Doctor could no doubt be
spared in case of emergency.
I thank you, said Lee, I am not myself the patient who most needs
his valuable services, glancing scornfully at the Tutor.
I did not know, innocently replied the little girl, but it might be gout
in the stomach, or a disease of the heart, and these things, you know, mama,
are so frightful and so insidious; they never have any external signs, I believe.
Ellen on these occasions would look beseechingly at her little friend, while
her Ladyship would carry off the conversation upon some other topic, as if
Dorothea had not spoken. On one of these mornings, Lee walked into the
library, at that hour when he knew the Secretary was at work and alone.
He bowed stiffiy to Hall. The latter rose hastily, handed him a chair, and
at the same time stuck the pen behind his ear, after which he took his own
seat, and waited for Mr. Lee to open the conversation, which he did as follows:
Mr. Hall, in the absence of Governor Spotswood and Dr. Evylin, I have
taken upon myself a very unpleasing duty, and one which I fear in its
performance
may inflict pain upon you.
I am utterly at a loss to comprehend you.
You shall not long remain so, sirI am not one to shrink from the
performance
of what I consider due to the worthy and honorable gentlemen,
whose representative I consider myself, in some measure, in their absence.
IndeedI had rather thought that I had been charged by his Excellency
with representing him in his absence.
I thought, sir, that you must be laboring under some strange delusion as
to your position here.
I am still in the dark, sir.
So I perceive, and it is my intention to enlighten you.
I will listen with the greatest attention, and all the respect to which
your remarks may be entitled.
Lee bit his lip, and elevated his person still more than usual, if possible, as
he proceeded:
You must know, sir, that it is not usual in this country, for one who holds
thethe subordinate office of Tutor or Private Secretary, to assume an equal
station with gentlemen of birth and fortune.
I am at a loss to know, Mr. Lee, in what I have transcended the
indulgence
extended to me by Gov. Spotswood himself. I even abstained from
presenting
myself at his table, until expressly commanded to do so by himself.
In that matter he had doubtless a right to do as he pleased; but you
must know that the Governor is a very eccentric man, and somewhat
whimsical
he
may command you to set at his table to-day, and refuse you to morrow.
But, sir, he expressly stated it to me as his desire, that I would set at his
table, as one of his family. Am I to understand Mr. Lee, as expressing a
contrary desire?
By no meansI only alluded to your appearance at table as an example,
and because you first alluded to it yourself; my design was to touch upon
other mattersyour intimate association with the female inmates of his family.
`Ah! you allude to my late rambles with Miss Evylin.
I do, sir, and it is somewhat remarkable that they should have
commenced
the moment the Governor and the Doctor disappeared.
With regard to the point of time, I had nothing in the world to do. The
interview was sought by the lady. I state this in justification of myself, and
only under such circumstances as the present, would I say this much.
Further I will not utter a single syllable, unless you can show by what
authority
you question me in this matter at all.
I have already said, that I consider myself, in some measure, as the
representative
of those two gentlemen.
Yes, sir, but you are the self-elected representative, and have not yet
exhibited
to me any other authority.
Then, sir, I have another title to question you in this matter. I have the
authority of the lady's father for occupying a very delicate relation towards her.
And the lady's, also?
About that, sir, you have no right to question, and I consider it rather
presumptuous
in one in your position to presume as far as you have.
By this time both had risen. Hall repliedand I consider it equally
presumptuous
in you, sir, to question me.
Lee looked astounded. Very well, sir, said he, I have at least brought
this matter to an issue, and I will state the case to the ladies of the family, and
they can act as they choose, until the gentlemen return.
And I, sir, will relate the whole of this conversation, word for word, to
Miss Evylin, so that she at least may know how far each of us have presumed.
Beware, sir, how you mention my name in that quarter. I will hold
your person responsible
.
I don't know what you mean by holding my person responsible. If it be
that you imagine that you can hold me to any sort of responsibility, in which
you will not be equally so held, you have mistaken me, far more than I can
have mistaken my position.
We shall seewe shall seeit will depend upon your success in
establishing
your claims to bear the name which now you wear. In the event of this
unpleasant business proceeding to hostilities between us, you will not find me
unwilling to yield you far more, in such a case, than I think you have any right
to claim now, in a social position.
That is, am I to understand that Mr. Lee is willing to grant me to be a
gentleman in war, but not in love.
Beware, sir, how you trifle with me in this matter. It is no proof of either
your courage or breeding to taunt me, while your hands are tied.
There, sir, you spoke the truth, and I honor even an enemy for that. It is
indeed too true, my hands are tied, and that I was too precipitatethus far, I
retract
,
but the main issue between us must continue, until I establish my claims
to be your equal. Soon after which Lee left the room, with a rather more polite
and respectful air than he had entered it. He nevertheless went straightway
to the parlor, and despatched a servant for Miss Evylin. While he was
kicking
his heels in the parlor, we will glance into the Governor's library again,
where we left the Tutor. There was no more drawing of military maps that
morninghe threw himself into a chair and buried his face in his hands, and
if he did not weep, his frame was convulsed mightily like it. This was a poor
preparation for a hostile meeting of any sort, but the bitter things of the heart
will have vent, when alone, however much we brave them away in the midst of
a personal altercation. How many men would see the error of their ways, if
they would thus honestly meditate upon all that they have just said and done
after such an affair; not that Hall regretted, in the main, any thing he had said.
He threw on his hat and walked abroad into the fields to cool his feverish
brow and excited feelings, and to reflect upon what it was best to do, under the
accumulating embarrassments of his situation. He had hoped that the
tramontaine
expedition would set out before his own private affairs might come
to a crisis, but that he now foresaw was impossible, and this reflection made
him miserable; for he had entered into all the Governor's plans with spirit and
enthusiasm, and besides had other private motives, above the ordinary youthful
desire for notorietyto distinguish himself. He was waiting, too, anxiously for
news from Europealas, he little knew how disastrous would be the first
aspect of that news to himhe little imagined that at that very moment a
vessel was ploughing her way into the bay, bringing information almost the
reverse of what he expected. Without this last drop to his already brimming
cup, he found the weight of his troubles sufficient for all his fortitude and
patience.
The main subject of his present reflections was the impending personal
difficulty with Mr. Lee. He foresaw that a crisis in that affair was
inevitable
,
and that it was surrounded with difficulties which would ruin him, if he
seized upon either horn of the dilemma. He could neither fight Lee, nor
refuse to fight with honor, according to the prevailing notions of the country
and the times, and yet he gathered from some expressions dropped by that
young gentleman in their late altercation, that he would force it to such an
issue in the last resort. We will leave him, however, to struggle with his
own difficulties, while we return to Mr. Lee, who waited a considerable
time for Ellen to make her appearance. She dreaded the interview, because
she supposed it was like so many that had gone before it, but she resolved
that it should be the last. As she descended the stairs, she was pondering
the best manner of communicating to the gentleman, not only her utter
aversion
to him, but also how she might make him comprehend, with his
arrogance
and great self-esteem, that his persevering suit amounted to
persecution
.
It may be readily conceived that such a train of reflections were not
well calculated to prepare her to receive in a very amiable mood the harangue
which was to follow.
She saw as she entered the room, that she had mistaken his object for
once, and seating herself, kept her eye upon his countenance, with an anxious
inquiring look for his object.
Miss Evylin, he began, I have sent for you, to have some conversation
upon a subject which I fear will be painful, but I felt it to be my duty to do so,
in the absence of Governor Spotswood and your father.
You startle me, sir, she suddenly exclaimed, will you be so good as to
mention the subject, without farther circumlocution?
I am not one given to much circumlocution, Miss Evylin, but on
occasions
such as the present, when very delicate matters are involved, it is right
to prepare the mind for the reception of disagreeable news.
News! cried she, of whommy father?has any thing happened to
him? and she ran up and grasped his arm.
He is well as you might have divined, from my mentioning his absence as
the cause of my having imposed the present disagreeable duty upon myself.
True, she said, and threw herself into a chair in a listless mood, as if
she cared not what else he might say. She was however mistaken there, for
she was roused again in an instant, as he proceeded:
Miss EvylinMr. Hall has used your name in a way, which I have
every reason to believe was entirely unauthorized by you, and one, too, which
I must say it becomes you to authorize me to contradict at once.
Mr. Hall, use my name! authorize you to contradict! why what could
Mr. Hall say of me?
Oh, I see that it was all made up for the occasion; I thought it would
turn out so. Why, thus it was. When I took him to task for his
presumption
in associating so intimately with the ladies of the Governor's family in
his absence, and more especially with yourself, he with quite an air boasted
that his society had been sought by you, and not yours by him.
Ellen rose to her feet, and walked straight up to Lee, and looked into his
face, as she inquired in a slow, almost whispered voice, so deep was her
emotion
,
Did Mr. Hall use such language of me, and with such a motive, and
with such an air?
He didand I cannot of course speak as to the exact words, but such was
precisely the impression left upon my mind.
Mr. Lee, refresh your memory againI would have perilled my life upon
the truth and honor of that gentlemanhave not your own feelings colored
his expressions?
I have already stated how the conversation happened, and given you the
result as near as I am capable ofthere can be no mistake, for it happened
not half an hour ago, in the Governor's Library.
She threw herself back into a seat, as one who gives up, and said: Then
I have indeed been grossly deceived.
You have truly, and by as arrant an impostor as ever lived, and as bold
a one. This comes of the Governor receiving men into his family, without
credentials of any sort; but I need not say any thing of his Excellency, for
this man imposed as bold a piece of clumsy swindling upon me as any one,
and is actually now in possession of monies belonging to my aunt's estate.
Ellen rose to take her leave, from which Mr. Lee endeavored to persuade
her, saying that he had far more important matters to discuss with her, than
the clumsy tricks of an every day impostor; but she pleaded her deep
mortification
,
and the confused state of her mind, from the perplexing doubts which
still crowded upon her, and that she needed repose and that calm reflection
which solitude alone could give. As she slowly mounted the staire, she
thought of the letter which Hall had brought her, and from whom, and was
on the point of rushing back into the room, and telling Lee that she would
rather doubt him than Hall; but such was his high standing for a man of honor
and veracity, that she did not dare thus to brave the pet of public opinion. She
resumed her way, the same train of reflections still forcing themselves upon
her mindhow could he (Hall) know all the delicate and intricate matters
which he had related to her, if he was the gross and vulgar impostor, that
Mr. Lee represented him to be. Her reason was almost bewildered by these
conflicting viewsbetween the internal evidence of truth in Hall's narrative
to her, and Lee's positive testimony as to his gross and ungentlemanly
statement
with regard to herself. In whatever manner he might have possessed
the information alluded to, if Lee's statement was true, he was undoubtedly
some low creature.
Any sagacious observer of human nature will readily divine on which side
the victory lay. Ellen was all a woman, and of course the heart won the
day against the judgment. Nevertheless her indignation every now and then
burst out, whenever she thought of the manner in which he had perverted her
acts and spoken of them. Whatever might be her heart's leaning to the
accused, she resolved that nothing of it should appear in her conduct; that
she would show him that she knew and scorned his assumptions. Such was
about the confused and doubtful result arrived at, when her maid entered to
prepare her for dinner.
In the mean time Lee had not been idlehe next sent for Lady Spotswood,
and to her and Dorothea he related a somewhat similar story, suppressing
particulars in Ellen's case, barely referring them to her for proof of base
ingratitude, as well as falsehood. He found all the ladies prepossessed in the
Tutor's favor, and Dorothea remained so, in spite of all he could say to the
contrary. Of course she did not presume to controvert her mother's decision
in a grave matter like that, in the absence of her father too, but she left the
room tossing her head, and declaring that there was a mistake somewhere.
Lady Spotswood held a long consultation with the accuser with regard to
what was to be done until his Excellency returned, and whether it was best
to send after him; and they came to the conclusion to let the business stand
just as it was; only that all intercourse between the ladies of the family and
the Tutor was to be cut off, except, of course, at table; and ladies generally
understand full well how to keep improper persons at a distance.
Reader, did'st ever see some poor wight who had fallen under the
displeasure
of a party in the country, sitting apart? If you have, you can form some
idea of the situation of Hall that day at Temple Farm.
Dorothea encountered young Dandridge as she made her exit from the
family council, and to him she related the story of the Tutor's reputed perfidy.
Little Bob, too, formed one of the youthful council, and the three came to the
unanimous conclusion that he was innocent. How slow is the young heart
to believe in the guilt of those for whom they have taken a liking; and with
all of us, even of maturer age, how easy to believe what we wish to believe.
Bob took his hat straightway and followed his Tutor to the fields where he
had lately seen him. The young man seemed to understand the warmth of
heart which had brought his pupil upon his errand of love, and he silently
folded the lad in his arms, while scalding tears trickled from his scarred face.
The child was dumb at this sight, his own heart was overflowing, and had
any more been wanting, the finishing stroke was added to his convictions.
He took the hand of the Tutor and silently and slowly accompanied him to
the house.
Dinner was soon after announced and Hall took his seat as usual, entirely
unaware of the extent of the prejudices which had been excited against him.
His own countenance exhibited traces of excitement which would have
claimed the sympathy of any company not previously set against him.
There was inexpressible sadness, almost despair, marked upon every feature;
but he had yet to experience a far greater degree of suffering. In that pale
and beautiful face in which he hoped to find sympathy and comfort, he
encountered
nothing but scorn and indignation. Not a word was vouchsafed to him
of any sort, and when her eyes met his, it was the cold glance of a distant
acquaintance. He turned an inquiring look towards her Ladyship, and there
he met the same cold displeasure. The conversation was carried on between
her Ladyship, Lee, and Ellen, as if the poor Tutor had been still in Scotland.
Not so, however, the youthful threeDandridge, Dorothea, and Bob, vied with
each other in helping their favorite to the choice dishes, but he ate nothing.
Altogether it was a very unpleasant meeting. Most of the guests had
departed, except those specially named, and among the others the Indian
Chief, so that there was no relief to be found in numbers.
The meal concluded, Ellen hurried to her room and burst into tears; she
was soon followed by Dorothea, who exclaimed when she saw her weeping,
I'm glad of it, I'm right down glad of it, so I am, you ought to cry your eyes
out, so you ought, for treating poor Mr. Hall so naughtily.
But Dorothea, said Ellen 'midst her sobs, how could I help it?
Why, slapped Mr. Lee's face and told him to go home about his business.
Didn't he make all this mischief here. Harry Lee will take the house,
plantation
and all, if papa don't soon come home.
Fie, fie, Dorothea, Mr. Lee is not to blame for Mr. Hall's faults.
I tell you, Ellen, it's Mr. Lee who has the beam in his own eye, and he
has swallowed one too for what I know, he's so stiff.
The little girl flirted out of the room in the pouts, little imagining that she
left behind her, in the heart of the other, a warmer advocate even than herself
in favor of the Tutor.
CHAPTER XXII.
WORDS COMING TO BLOWS.
The
same afternoon Hall encountered Ellen as she was passing through
the apartment. He followed and begged her to grant him but a few moment's
conversation. She stopped and looking at him with an expression which said
as plain as words might speak it, it is more in sorrow than in anger that I
avoid you.
Will Miss Evylin deign, he said, to inform so humble an individual as
myself, how he has fallen not only under her displeasure, but also that of the
family?
She replied, Mr. Hall, you have so grossly misinterpreted what I have
already said and done, that it is hazardous to hold any communication with
you.
I have misinterpreted what you have said! never! I have never for one
moment of my life harbored any but the kindest and gentlest thoughts towards
Miss Evylin, much less spoken disrespectfully of her.
Then you have been shamefully slandered.
I thought as much, and it was therefore that I sought this opportunity for
an explanation. Will Miss Evylin be so good as to inform me what I was
reported to have said of her? I need not ask by whom.
You are reported, sir, to have boasted that so far from your having sought
my favor, that I had sought yours.
Miss Evylin, this is one of those ingenious falsehoods, which none but a
perverse head or a false heart could have coined out of what I did say.
Then you acknowledge that there was some foundation for it.
As stated by you, it is wholly false in coloring, and nearly so in fact; but
the world is governed by such falsehoods as these; what is called public
opinion, is made up of these many little streams combined into one great
torrent
why
should I endeavor to arrest the mighty current with my puny arm?
You can at all events set yourself right in my esteem, by a plain
statement
of factsdo you consider it worthy of the effort?
Hereafter I can only hope to enjoy the good opinion of the choice few,
among whom I would gladly rank Miss Evylin, I will state how the offence
was given, if offence it be. Mr. Lee undertook to take me to task for
pushing
myself, a poor Tutor, forward into society, where my presence was not
wanted. He went so far as to intimate that I presumed in sitting at the table
with the rest of the family, and when I told him I had done so at the express
command of his Excellency, be then changed his ground and claimed to
catechise
me with regard to my attentions to you. I challenged his right to do so,
and he then stated that he was an avowed suitor, with your father's
approbation
.
Under these circumstances I thought myself justified in stating the
fact, that
the first interview
was sought by you. I stated neither more nor less,
without coloring of any sort, and simply to justify myself from his charge of
presumption. This is the whole of my offence.
She offered him her hand, as she said, Mr. Hall, forgive me, but I am not
to blame. I was led astray; I trusted too implicitly to his honor, for though
he did not, it seems, tell what the world calls a falsehood, it answered all the
purposes of one, and was so ingeniously designed as to mislead me and baffle
detection.
Aye, his conduct in this affair was not unlike another in which you were
concerned, Miss Evylin; I should have thought that would teach you to
guard your too confiding nature against him; but enough for the present, if I
am wholly reinstated in your good opinion, I am satisfied.
You are, and I take shame to myself that even this explanation was
necessary.
Having then judged hastily this time, promise that in future, when
circumstances
appear to be against me, you will hear my vindication before you
decide.
Most assuredly I will.
I ask it, Miss Evylin, because I foresee that I may soon be placed in a
position from which it may seem impossible to extricate myself. I will not
deny to you, that I am surrounded by difficulties, the causes of some of which
you know more than any other person. I make it, then, my last solemn
request to you, to hear before you judge. Good day.
He had seen Lee passing in front of the verandah, and followed him down
the garden, where he soon overtook and addressed him, thus: You came to
me this morning, sir, professing yourself under the painful necessity of
communicating
something disagreeable, I now address you under precisely similar
circumstances.
I am ready with all patience, sir, to hear you.
Few words will suffice to convey my meaning, and therefore your patience
will not be heavily taxed. You prevaricated, sir, in relating our conversation
to Miss Evylin.
Prevaricated, sir, and this to me!
Aye, prevaricated is the word, sir.
Very well, sir! very well! you shall hear from me shortly. And with
13
this he strode off, but presently returned, and said, Hark you, Sir Tutor,
you must establish your claims to be treated as a gentleman, and that
right speedily, or I will not only chastise you in a way you will not fancy,
but I will take such steps as to guard the community from your becoming
heir to any more stray legacies.
Hall's lips curled in disdain as he replied, choose, your own manner and
time of redress for the insult which now adheres to you. I shall be ready to
repel in whatever way you advance. Lee was again retreating, as Hall
continued, And hark you, in your turn, Sir, beware how you report any more
of our conversations. I will not trust your memory. This was said in a
bitter sarcastic tone. Lee strode rapidly up to him in a threatening attitude,
with his hand upon his sword, his face but a few inches from that of his
adversary
,
and replied, Do you mean to provoke me to forget that we are the only
grown white males upon the place, and that the ladies are under our, or rather
my protection?
You should under such circumstances remember the truth, it is peculiarly
incumbent on you to do so.
Lee drew his rapier and flashed it in the face of the Tutor, as he exclaimed,
by heavens another such taunt and I will let out your base churl's blood here
upon the walk, in spite of all the restraints upon me. Human nature can
stand no more.
Hall wore no sword, but he carried a small rattan in his hand, which he
elevated, touching the point almost in his adversary's face, as one who puts
himself in the attitude to guard, exclaiming, Come on, sir, I am more than
a match for you, even thus.
Lee scorned his scientific posture and rushed upon him as if he would
despatch
him at single lunge, but the next moment found his sword twirling in the
air, and Hall leaning upon his cane laughing at the foaming and now
fruitless
anger of his adversary. A few yards distant, among the shrubbery, he
saw little Bob's face peeping out in the same mirthful delight, but truth to
say, it was blanched white with fear, and the color had not yet returned.
Lee clutched his sword and hurried from the garden, swearing vengeance
against the impostor. He rushed to the house, and after a hasty word or two
with Lady Spotswood, ordered his horses and rode post haste to the capital.
Not, however, before he had scratched a few words on a slip of paper, and sent
them to the young man in the garden. They read as follows: The first
moment, Sir, after you have established your pretended claims to gentle birth
and breeding, you shall hear from me. A reasonable time elapsing and this
not done, I will chastise you at sight.
Hall's countenance loured as he read this note, and then tore it into
fragments
and gave them to the wind, but instantly relapsed into the merry mood
as Bob ran at him with a stick, exactly imitating Lee's murderous thrust.
He did not see you twist the foil out of Mr. Moore's hand that night, or he
would not have ventured his sword even against your rattan, said the boy.
No, Bob, I am glad he did not, and then we should have met differently,
which I assure you I am rejoiced to avoid, more than you can imagine.
Well, now I must run and tell Nat and Dorothea, they will laugh till their
sides ache; let me see how it was, thus you twitched him that double
demisimiquaver
.
I would give my pony if I could just catch that trick.
All in good time, Robert, but come here; you must not mention this unless
Mr. Lee communicates it first; now remember, you will injure instead of
befriend me, if you do.
Well, to be sure, it's a great privation not to be allowed to tell of this.
But you will not object if I make them promise not to tell.
Yes, Bob, I do object; I have particular reasons for keeping it quiet for
the present, and I am sure you would do nothing to injure me willingly.
No, no, answered the boy, I would not injure you for any thing, and if
telling it would do so, I will keep it though I burst in trying.
Still he kept on playing with his stick, every now and then bursting into a
loud laugh, as the Tutor would humor him by twitching it out of his hand.
CHAPTER XXIII.
THE FALL OF THE LEAVES.
Twilight
, that witching time between day and night, came; always a
pleasant hour of the twenty-four, but in Virginia particularly so. Here the
climate, at the season upon which we have arrived, renders it very delightful,
the sun just leaves enough of heat lingering with his departing rays, to temper
the cool breeze of the evening. It is not to be denied, however, that there is
something melancholy in these early autumnal twilights. The leaves of the
green trees which have so long delighted and protected us, begin now to put
on their variegated dress. First the deep green fades to a lighter shade, and
then is tinged with a pale margin of yellow, and finally puts on the russet
dress of winter. Here and there, also, those that have clung to the parent
stem by a frail tenure, loose their vitality, and are seen floating about in the
lazy atmosphere, as if reluctant to mingle with the parent dust.
The fall of the leaves, said Ellen to Hall, as they wandered along the
banks of the little stream which wound through the grounds, the fall of the
leaves in autumn, reminds us too forcibly of the death of a human generation.
These pale heralds of the coming death to all their class, are like the sickly,
and the feeble, and the old, of our race; do they not produce that impression
upon you?
Sometimes, but not always. It depends much upon our circumstances at
the time. If the country has always been our home, and we have drawn our
chief delight from rural pleasures, then the impression is pretty sure to be a
melancholy one: but to the city dame, it is the dawn of the gay season, of
routs, and parties, and ballshere I mean in our capital. In London the
season of pleasure is much later. To the literary man they produce a mixed
sensation; a pleasing melancholy, tinged with the philosophy you have
described
,
and also a cheerful looking forward to long winter nights, and bright
blazing fires, and sweet communion with delightful books.
That indeed, gives a cheerful and warm glow to the wintry picture, which
my melancholy imagination scarcely fetches. Your remark has brought to
mind a similar one, with which poor Frank rejoiced my heart one night. Oh
what a bright and cheerful spirit he was blessed with! We were sitting
listening to the dismal howlings of the wind as it rattled our windows and
whistled through the key holes, and the rain and sleet alternately vied for
conquest, when I remarked that it was a dismal night and affected my spirits
sadly. He took my hand and looked up in my face, (we were alone,) and
said cheerfully`it is from within that the brightest illumination is to be
drawn. There, if the heart, and mind, and affections be all rightis an
everlasting
sunshine of the soulso bright that no night or storm ever comes over
it.' Well, Frank, said I, unlock that magic lanthorn of yours, and try its
bright rays on the contending storm and darkness, struggling for entrance at
all these windows. Look how the contending demons scowl at us from
without
,
now do drive them away, that's a good boy. Straightway his eye dilated,
and he commenced a description of a domestic fireside scene of comfort, which
really heightened its colors of beauty from the contrast of the darker shadows
without. I imperceptibly caught the bright glow, from his more daring
imagination.
Poor Frank, said Hall, musingly, some of his brightest fancies have
been extinguished, I fearlike my own: added he hastily, as he saw Ellen's
eye reading his thoughts.
No, they are not extinguished, at length replied Ellen, with a sudden
flash of enthusiasm, for if alive, those bright illuminations of genius, like
the light of the diamond, but shine the brighter when all that is earthly
around is obscured. There is but one thing on this earth that can extinguish
that glorious light from withinIT IS CRIME! Let the couscience be clear,
and the light of the soul illumines our dreary pathsheds the ray of hope
through the valley of death, and is rekindled again at the parent fountain of
the ever-living God.
In this world, man is impelled forward to action amidst the stirring
adventures
which are gathered around him like the meshes of a plot, until it
becomes with his doubtful and doubting reason hard to separate the
narrow boundaries which divide crime from errors of judgment. Nay, even
when the actions are past, the ever busy monitor you have named, conscience,
hangs suspended over the deeds, at a loss whether to strike or be silent.
For a little while only, replied Ellen quietly, when time has sobered the
tumult of the passions which drove him forward, conscience, though scared
away for a while, will come back in the calmer moments of our lives. This
very witching hour of twilight is a favorite time for such visits. In the
bright and pure morning, our spirits are elastic and cheerful, and few heinous
crimes are committed then; in the noon-tide, the storm of human passions
rage, and if the intent is deadly and malignant, it is prolonged into the silent
watches of the night; but with a large majority of our race, darkness brings
repentance for the crimes of the day. What a beneficent provision of the
Creator it was, rolling our little planet but one side at a time next the sun,
that while one half the world fretted, and stormed, and sinned, the other half
might repent and sleep.
You seem to have observed mankind!
Nay, I am only sporting in borrowed feathers, at all events, only a part of
them are my own. These very subjects were discussed by poor Frank and
myself many a time, before he sailed upon that fatal voyage. So much had we
learned to think in common, that it is hard now for me to separate my own
ideas from his. Doubtless my constant association with him gave a masculine
cast to many of my thoughts, the observation of which no doubt elicited
your remark.
No, no, I cannot say that they are masculine; at all events, they are not
unfeminine. Whatever relates to our higher sentiments and our spiritual
natures, certainly belongs in common to the sexes, and if man has usurped the
whole claim to discuss them, he assuredly has no right to do so. Indeed,
your sex is so much purer than ours, that any thing of heavenly philosophy
seems to fall with peculiar propriety from their lips. Poor Frank! indeed he
little knew how the germs of his young mature philosophy have been
treasured
in his absence, and into what good ground they had fallen, and to what
a rich truition they are even now springing up. Do you know that every
boyish dreamer sketches, for his own futurity, the very circumstances which
have fallen as a rich inheritance to my friend in his absence?
I cannot say that I understand you fully.
Every youth, in the hey-day of his imagination, sketches out some
charming
little beau-ideal of a partner for life, and into this beautiful creation of
his own he almost performs the part of creator, for he breathes into her
such feelings, sentiments, and opinions as he desires she should possess;
now here is poor Frank, with the ideal creature reduced to reality; but like
all the bright glimpses vouchsafed to our race, no sooner is it perfected ready
for him to grasp, than it either eludes his pursuit, or he is himself engulphed
in that remorseless and relentless vortex, whither have been hurried so many
bright spirits before him.
I certainly feel flattered, Mr. Hall, that you should consider me worthy
to represent Frank's ideal creations, but I fear the drapery with which your
own imagination has clothed me would speedily vanish, amidst the stern
realities of such a homely world as ours. I am conscious of the fact,
however
,
so far as the mind is concerned; for there is not a day of my life, and
scarcely an hour, as you have seen, that I do not detect myself uttering
some of his sentiments at second hand; His mental superiority must have
been greater than even I gave him credit for, as I can see the impress of his
association even upon your own thoughts, as unconscious as you may be of it.
I grant you that his influence over me was very great, not less than that
which was swayed so powerfully over your own days of childhood.
Nearly every girl that arrives at womanhood has passed through the
same schooling of the affections. True, in our cases, there was a constant
similarity in training, association, and circumstances, which merged down
the dissimilarities of mental character, but in every other case, the experience
is the same, even without these. The heart of every girl clings to some
image or other, real or imaginary, and they cling to it through life, whether
married or single. If married, the idol of the imagination is set up in secret,
as one of the household Gods, and this is one reason there is so much
matrimonial
unhappiness. It was the early observation of these very things
which led me so pertinaciously to cling to that prize which I had drawn in
the lottery of life; and I shall continue to cling to it, even if it is but shadow,
far preferring that to all the real pomps and honors which this world affords.
The experience of our race seems to be every where the same. Not
only was it cursed and condemned to earn its bread by the sweat of the
brow, but the sentence extends much farther. All that beautiful poetry of the
fresh and pure young hearts' sentiments, which promises such a heavenly
harvest of future flowers, before those sentiments become tained with
grosser passions, seem never destined to fruition in this world. We are just
allowed to peep into the garden of Eden, and then banished forever amidst
the dark by-ways and crowded thoroughfares of busy life. True, we cling
fondly to the memory of this poetic dream of youth, and doubtless these
bright morning glories continue to throw a mellow but saddened light over all
the future. This constitutes the sum and substance of our ideal paradise in
this world, the poetry of real life.
And do you really think there is no exception to the sweeping
denunciation
?
Are there none who ever realize the romantic dreams of youth?
Oh, very few indeed. Look into your own experience, Miss Evylin. You
are one of the very few who have struggled hereically against this sweeping
flood of the busy world, which overwhelms nearly all who oppose it. Where
there is one who thus stands out against the decree, hundreds have fallen
victims around; some to ambitionsome to avarice, and a much larger
portion to the mixed motives which interested parents know so well how to
ply the young heart with. And even you, are you not daily beset to listen to
the voice of the temper? Comes he not to you, with splendid estates, and
gaudy establishments, and tinselied honors, which your sex loves so well?
True, truebut I would not give up that one dear, dear dream of my
young life, for all the honors of the world.
And do you know the fate of the pious and noble few of your sex, who
thus devote their lives to the perpetuation of life's young dream?
No, I have never counted the cost.
It is a life of single blessedness. Pardon me, Miss Evylin, but you are
a candidate for admission into that abused sisterhood yeleped old maidsthat
slandered and traduced classnearly every one of which are living
monuments
of the infidelity of manthat noble sisterhood, which lives forever
upon the memory of the pastkeeping up perpetual fires upon the pure and
vestal altars, before whose shrines were offered their first, best, and dearest
affections.
Welcome, thrice welcome the lot! said Ellen, a pure light beaming from
her eyes, as she locked her hands with energy, in the earnestness of her
invocation
.
It has no terrors for me. As you say, I can turn back upon the
past, and what is much better, I can even look to the future with hope.
Thanks to that divine personification of hope, charity, and mercy, I can
look beyond the narrow confiaes of this world. Believe me, Sir, these
disappointments
of the young heart's freshest aspirations, are not ordered in vain.
If we could here enjoy an uninterrupted paradise, this world would no more
be one of probation and trial; and though I for one am determined never to
be merged with the interested throng you have described, I do not therefore
repine at, and rebel against, an inevitable destiny. My own course is one of
difficulty and self-denial, and perhaps of reproach and odium, and therefore
we, old maids I mean, work out our salvation, if successful, by one road,
while our more ambitious sisters travel another.
Oh, I do not mean to class you just yet with the class alluded toI only
pointed out what would be the result, unless you listened to some of these
splendid proposals so often laid at your feet.
I am willing now to take the veil of the sisterhood, and shoulder all the
odium and reproach.
What! and surrender up the hope of Frank's being alive, and one day
returning.
No, no, not exactly thatI would only take refuge among them, until this
short, and fitful, and feverish state of suspense be over.
And should he even yet return, the fountain of your joys has already
been poisoned.
How? I pray you.
Why, he has been carried by the tide of this world far past those
beautiful eddies in the stream, overhung with green leaves, and redolent
of summer flowers. He has been tossed upon some of life's stormiest
billows, and if not actually wrecked and lost, he may be so weather-beaten
and pelted by the contending elements, as to be, when he comes, like an ancient
mariner, a better subject for repose and repentance, than for a fresh voyage.
I know he was fashioned somewhat like other youthsimpetuous and
rash, and perhaps ambitious, but no storms of the world, such as you describe,
can ever leave indelible stains or sears upon him. He may be weather-beaten
and worn, but he will be my own Frank for all that, and whatever he may
beshould even his tender conscience have suffered with the wear and tear
almost inevitable in the dreadful conflicts of the thronged, and busy and
turbulent
worldstill let him be welcome; for better, for worse, come weal,
come woe, joy or sorrow, our destinies are linked foreverthroughout this
life, and I trust a longer and a better hereafter.
Hall's eye fully expressed his unmeasured admiration of the little devoted
creature, as she poured out almost her whole heart. Our readers will readily
perceive that he had been purposely tampering with the purest and brightest
sentiments of her nature, whether in wanton sport or with higher motives,
will be developed as our narrative proceeds. He continued:
Ah, Miss Evylin, the experience of your pure and charming sex is very
different from ours. Your views of the world, and your estimate of human
nature, are taken through a very clear medium; and pardon me, I do not
wish to flatter, but I must say that Miss Evylin is even exalted above that of
her sox.
No, I am sure it is notmy experience of the world has been short, it is
true, computing it in more years, but it has been long in sorrow, and bitter
in disappointment. You yourself have furnished me with some of the
evidence
upon which my views are based. What can I think of Henry Lee,
after his conduct to his brother?and in what way can I interpret his late
disingenuousness conduct to you, unless very unfavorably to himself and to his
kind. I have endeavored to think that the whole proceeded from his blinding
passions, and consequent obliquity of moral vision, but I find it hard to make
excuses for him.
And you will find it harder, Miss Evylin, as his character is more fully
developed; but I do not wish to speak touching himanother very unpleasant
altercation has since occurred between us, and he has gone off very much
enraged.
I am very sorry for what you state, but I am glad that he is gone.
By this time they had entered the house.
CHAPTER XXIV.
A JOURNEYTHE END UNFORESEEN.
John Spotswood
was soon well enough to ride out with his sister in the
carriage, and after several experiments of his strength, and continued
improvement
from day to day, it was at length determined to remove him for a
short time to Temple Farm. His spirits had now become placid if not
cheerful
,
and every one remarked that he began to look, and speak, and act more
like his former self, than he had done for many months before. It was a mere
farewell family reunion which was proposed to take place, preparatory to the
removal of the whole establishment to the capital. That removal could not
now longer be delayed, for the House of Burgesses was soon to assemble,
besides a general meeting of all those favorable to the great tramontaine
expedition. Accordingly, the same principal parties were soon re-established
in the country who were there when we first introduced them to the reader,
with such additions as had been made from time to time. Henry Lee did not
return with the Governor.
It was impossible for his Excellency not to observe that Lady Spotswood
was highly offended with the Tutor from some cause or other, and he very
soon took occasion to inquire into the matter.
He first heard his lady's reasons for the difficulty, and then summoned Hall
to the library to hear his.
Well, Mr. Hall, said his Excellency as the Tutor entered, sit down
here, and tell me all about this difficulty with Harry Lee and the ladies of my
family. For once they seem to have sided with him, and of course are against
you.
Not all of them your ExcellencyI have satisfactorily explained the
matter
to the only one who has afforded me an opportunity, and the one, too,
about whom the unpleasant alteraction occurred.
I am very glad to hear it. That is Miss Evylin, I presume.
Yes, sir, and I am very sure she will be kind enough to set me right with
her Ladyship, which she can do so much better than I can.
Hall here related the whole of the conversation with Lee, word for word,
as near as he could recollect it. While he progressed, the old veteran's
brow at first loured, but presently cleared away again, and by the time Hall,
bad finished, he was laughing quite heartily. When this humor had
somewhat
spent itself, he wiped the tears from his eyes, and extended his land to
Hall, sayingNever mind
him;
if I had been here, the affair would not
have occurred; and if you had known him as well as I do, you would have
given the whole thing the go-by, more especially as it was no more your
interest
to quarrel with him than it is mine. In your case, there is an estate
pending, in which his good opinion is worth cultivating, and in mine, there is
a vote in the House of Burgesses; but I suppose it is too late to mend the
matter between you now.
It is, your Excellency. He did not tell him of the rencounter in the
gardenhe did not think it necessary.
But tell me Mr. Hall, is this true that I hear, that you are likely to carry
off the Doctor's charming daughter after all, against all these rich and high
born rivals?you need not blush man, I meant no insinuation against your
own parentage. Was Lee's rumpus nothing but a freak of jealousy?
Nothing else, sir, I solemnly believe, not that there was the least
foundation
for it. I have put in no claim to the lady.
Aye, claims refers to rights, and these are rights something like squatting
upon lands or our corn laws, which you have heard talked of no doubt. Is it
so, and have you been squatting upon Lee's lands? Come man, out with it.
`No your Excellencymy temporary association with Miss Evylin grew
entirely out of her solicitude for another. I have no right to bring those
matters farther into discussion between us; but assure you, sir, that our
frequent
meetings had very little to do with me personally, any more than the
reader of an interesting history has to do with the historian.
Well, well, it is best, perhaps, as it is. Here comes JohnI will leave you
with him, for I want you to get well acquainted. You will find that he has
an ardent thirst for military adventure; in the meantime, be sure I will set
all things straight in the other end of the house.
John came hobbling upon his stick on one side, and leaning on Kate's arm
on the other, looking very pale and care worn. His face, which was before
full and unnaturally fleshy about its lower features, was now thinclean cut
and intellectual, with perhaps a dash of reckless determination about the thin
closely compressed lips. He had evidently taken a prejudice against the
Tutor
,
and notwithstanding Kate's warm encomiums, he received him coldly and
rather cavalierly. Hall's late experience had well prepared him for this, and
he bore it with patience and even humility. He waited for John to lead the
subjects of conversation, and dropped in so gently, and yet threw so much
light upon whatever he touched, that John was compelled to respect him, at
least. Kate had left them together.
After John had conversed with the Tutor for an hour or two, his prejudices
vanished, and he then communicated to him a proposition of his father's,
and which he frankly confessed he was unwilling to do, until he had seen a
little more of him. It was that Hall should proceed to the capital, taking
with him the Scotch Irish recruits from York, and there take the command of
the garrison in John's stead, until his health should be entirely restored.
Hall professed the utmost readiness to do soindeed, he said he would
prefer active employment in the present state of his mind, even to teaching
master Bob, for whom, he said, he had taken a great liking.
Well, continued John, I must prepare you before hand for a motley
array which you will find at the garrison. There are ten companies of the
rangers, a little over two hundred menthey are old campaigners, and well
enough, perhaps; but if the volunteer militia, who have come in with their
homespun clothes, and with the burrs yet in their horses' tails and manes, can
be drilled into decent looking dragoons before we set out, I will call you a
soldier
indeed.
Never fear, never fear, said Hall, rising at once to make his preparations
for the march. Some of Marlborough's bravest soldiers were doubtless
once as raw as your homespun militia.
Oh the materials are good enough, replied John, these Virginia
yeomanry
would fight the devil, or thrice their number of Indians; it is their
appearance which I fear will discourage you, but we are getting them equipped
as fast as possible. You will find ten Lieutenants of Rangers, these we are
distributing among the raw recruits, so that soon we hope to present quite an
imposing little army to the good citizens of Williamsburg. The arms and
accoutrements you will find in the tower, and at your disposal.
After receiving further instructions from the Governor, Hall was ready to
set out for York. When he went to take leave of the ladies, he found Lady
Spotswood somewhat mollified but still rather stately. Bob shed tears and
begged to be permitted to march over the mountains with Mr. Hall. Dorothes
and Kate were warm and unreserved in their good wishes, and old Dr. Blair
bid him God speed. Ellen Evylin said little, but seemed to feel keenly that
she was about to lose the society of one who had contributed not a little to that
renovation of health and bloom spoken of in admiration by all the party just
returned.
Hall cantered off, attended by old June, with a portmanteau bearing his
baggage strapped behind his saddle. The former had, already exchanged his
seedy garments for those more becoming the society in which he had been
moving, and every time he glanced at his external renovation, it rankled in his
heart to think that the money with which they had been purchased, was
obtained
from Henry Lee, not that it long interrupted his reflections as he
cantered
down the avenue on his departure from a place where he had enjoyed so
many hours of calm and delightful intercourse with its inmates. His thoughts
were soon running upon far different matters than cocked hats, and silk hose,
and velvet waistcoats. He had sought the Governor's country establishment
as a quiet retreat, where he might for the present shun the observation
of men, and though he was at first thrown into the company of some of
the very persons whom he would have avoided, yet they were now gone, and
he could have remained there for the short time still intervening before the
departure of the family, without danger of exposure. He was ordered off just
at this opportune moment, and into the most conspicuous part of the capital.
Little did he imagine how speedily he would be removed from that position
and in what manner! But we anticipate. There were other and gentler
thoughts which forced themselves upon his attention. Could the image of that
fair little blue eyed girl, be so soon obliterated from the memory even of an
indifferent observer. But to him who stood sponser, as it were, for her long
lost lover, and with a skilful and gentle hand had led her back over memory's
brightest and darkest pages, could he forget her? Was there no impression
left upon his heart by an association so dangerous? Let those of our fair
readers answer who have poured the tale of their unhappy loves into the
willing ear of some very benevolent and sympathizing youth; for our part we
question the stoicism of these youthful philosophers, as much as we question
the possibility of platonic attachments between opposite sexes. Especially do
we question the stoicism of the gentleman, where (as in the present case)
the lady is young, lovely, and intelligent. We do not know that Ellen Evylin
had a sly design upon the heart of the poor Tutor, but this we know, that he
did not leave Temple Farm unscathed. But there were other difficulties
gathering over his head, far more formidable than all the wounds of the heart.
CHAPTER XXV.
REFLECTIONS IN PRISON.
When Hall alighted at the Tavern in Williamsburg, after installing the York
recruits at the Garrison, and delivering his credentials to the officer in
command
he
14
was met immediately by a man who was a stranger to him, but
whom Hall soon discovered to have something sinister in the expression of his
countenance. The stranger approached with one of those official bows;
or, Have I the pleasure of addressing Mr. Hall? said he.
You have, Sir, replied the gentleman.
Mr. Henry Hall, late Tutor at Temple Farm?
The same, Sir.
Will you be so good, Sir, as to cast your eye over that paper and tell me
whether it is your signature?
Hall took the paper and colored slightly as he read it, and then turned pale
as he answered, It is, Sir.
I am authorized by the gentleman in whose favor it is drawn, to request
the payment.
To request the payment! exclaimed Hall, why, Sir, the debt is not due
to him, except nominallythe money was advanced to me voluntarily by him,
as part of the proceeds of an estate which he himself informed me that I had
fallen heir to, and he told me when that paper was given that it was intended
as a more voucher on the final settlement of the estate, and now he demands
payment almost before the warmth of his hands is off the money.
I am sorry, Sir, but I must do my duty.
And I am, I suppose, more sincerely sorryfirst that I took the money at
allsecondly, that I spent it, after it was takenand, thirdly, that I accepted
an obligation at all from such a man.
Then I am to understand that you cannot pay it.
Not to-day, Sirnot until I can write to Gov. Spotswood.
I am sorry again, Sir, but if you will read that paper, you will see that I
am required to demand bail.
What?
Yes Sir, I am compelled to perform a disagreeable duty.
And suppose I cannot give bail?
Then you must go to jail, I am sorry to say, Sir; but you certainly have
some friend who will go bail for your appearance.
No one in the worldat least none herelet me see, is Dr. Evylin at
home?
I cannot say, but I will walk there with you, with pleasure.
Away they walked to the old Doctor's house.
How Hall's heart thumped as the Deputy Sheriff knocked at the door. It
seemed to him as if every jolt upon the pannel was re-echoed by his ribs.
The servant came, but informed them that the Doctor was out of town. Hall
turned away, rather relieved than otherwise, so mortified was he, at the bare
thoughts of asking the old gentleman to bail him from jail, the very first hour
of his appearance in the capital of Virginia.
There was something inexpressibly sad in his voice and countenance, as he
turned to the Sheriff and said: I am ready now, Sir, to accompany you to jail,
lead the way. I have no other acquaintance in the capital.
In half an hour he was sitting at the iron grated windows of the prison
situated in one of the lowest and most disagreeable spots of Williamsburg; but
the locality affected him little. Time and place were to him matters of
indifference
.
He turned away from the window and paced his solitary cell. His thoughts
became calmer by the exercise, and once his observation withdrawn from
without
,
they naturally turned within. There all was calm, pure, and bright. He
felt that thus far in the drama of life, he had most signally failed in his part,
but he was conscious at the same time that he deserved to succeed. Like all
the sons of Adam, he knew that he had erred, and of those errors he
repented
sincerelybut on the whole, his conscience bore good testimony upon the
cross examination to which he now subjected it. He rapidly passed the main
incidents of his life in review before him, and if he did not
gr
ow better from
tracing out the causes ofhis present misfortunes, he certainly became wiser.
What a crisis that is in the life of every man, when he thus pauses and
contemplates
the first failures of his youth. It is then that the arch enemy of
mankind is busiest with his infernal sophistry. He even suggests doubts of
the beneficence of the Creator, and questions whether we are not, after all,
made in mockery and derisionwhether our globe is not one grand theatre;
mankind the performers; and the universe sitting round in the immensity of
space, the audience.
These satanic suggestions find too ready a response in many young hearts,
upon the first experience of disappointment. To a sufferer, farce and tragedy,
and melo-drama, seem indeed strangely and inextricably mixed up in this life
tragedy treading so closely on the heels of farce, that it is hard to draw the
true moral solution of the wonderful mystery of human life.
One of the wisest and wittiest of mankind has boldly called the world a
stage, and all the men and women actors; but if it be so, it is the stage
reversed
for
in real life, the actors lead off in broad farce, and as invariably
end in dire tragedy. Oh! if this life is indeed but a frolic for the amusement
of the Gods, it is a bitter jest at which angels might weep. If such alone
were the aim and object of our existence, it was a cruel mockery to add
sensibility
to pain, to our capacity for pleasure. Hall had arrived just at that
critical period of life where the buffoonery ends. He had for the better part
of his days been playing in genteel comedy, and of late had taken a few turns
in the tragedy. It was time then to pause and examine the contract, to see
whether he was to play as a mountebank or a hero. It is a solemn and
important
question in the life of every individual, upon its answer depends his
weal or wo, throughout his after existence. Oh, happy is that youth, who
comes out of the conflict resolved to pursue the cause of right, and justice,
and virtue, and religion, leaving the consequences wholly with that great
and Almighty Being, who is the author and manager of the mystery which
we cannot solve.
That man's heart never was in the right place, or rather it never was
enlightened
with a spark from the true divinity, who suffers the wrongs of the
world to lead and persuade him to desperation.
Not for one moment did Hall's heart waver under the solemn jugglery of
the great author of evil, though his meshes were around him everywhere.
He felt himself a prisoner. He was resolved to adjourn his case to the
keeping
of Providence. Oh! what a great and triumphant court that is, even in
this world. The retributive court of equity! Let the triumphant victor in
the court below carry off his perishing honors; there is a silent witness in the
busy throng of evil-doers who comes to the stand at last, and rights the
injured
and the oppressed, by the very hands of the oppressors. When some
striking event of retributive providence happens to be revealed to the gaze of
men, how they gape and wonder at the moral miracle, as if God who worketh
in secret were not always overruling the rulers of this world. Let the
inmates
of penitentiaries, and the confessions of criminals under the gallows,
speak to the point. Trace out the small and almost invisible links of
circumstances
by which their guilt is at last revealed, and the finger of the
Almighty
is at the end of it. The gaping crowd of their fellow-sinners calls
the immediate cause of the development an accident; but these things, call
them what you will, have lost or won the greatest battles ever fought upon
earth. The whole machinery of the world, both moral and physical, is
managed by the same Almighty invisible hand, which strikes sparks from
these electric chains. None but the good are truly wisesuch are the men
who surrender up the mysterious management of the universe into the hands
to which it truly belongssuch are the men who are content to pursue
simple
and unostentatious virtue, leaving consequences, which must be so left at
last by every one, to the only living and true Godsuch are the men who
become as little children, and are willing to follow where they know that no
mortal may lead. Hall felt that he could not extricate himself from the
accumulating
difficulties which surrounded him, but his heart had been bruised,
and torn, and subdued, until he now calmly surrendered the guidance of his
destiny into wiser and better hands; he fully trusted and believed in an all-wise
and overruling providencehe clearly and unequivocally acknowledged it.
He had weighed
the great
argument of all the wicked of the earththe
arch tempter had already turned his eyes to the apparent triumph of villainy,
thrift and fawning, throughout all the walks of life, and consequent
depression
of honesty and humble virtue, and he deliberately chose the latter as his
portion.
When the rain falls and the floods descend, the gathering torrent rushes
down the accustomed channels in a noisy turbid stream. To the
inexperienced
,
it looks as if it never would or could become clear again; but
presently
the pure and limpid mountain stream begins to work its bright way
through the centre of the angry currentfor a while it is lost and swallowed
up in the surrounding filth, but slowly and silently the work of purification
goes on, the muddy and turbulent waves are hurried toward the ocean, and
their places are supplied by the purified waters from above. So it is with the
current of human life; wave after wave of the busy and noisy throng of the
corrupt and the vicious are hurried on to the great ocean of eternity, while
their places are slowly but surely filling up with brighter and purer races of
men. The world is as certainly growing wiser and better, as that its
destinies
are ruled over by an all-wise and beneficent spirit. The pure and
limpid
stream of christian truth is forever working its slow and silent courso
among the turbid waves of sin and pollution, until the whole ocean of
humanity
shall be purified.
Hall was by no means a perfect man, but he now had the sincere desire to
purge his own heart from all those turbulent passions which had thus far
brought nothing but misery and wretchedness in their train. He did not, it
is true, elongate his visage and whine psalms through his nose, and proclaim
to all the world that he was a changed man, but his misfortunes were working
their proper office upon his mind and heart. He was truly humbled in
spirithe felt that there was a mightier hand at work with all the intricacies
in which he had been successively involved, than the proud and envious
young man who was the immediate instrument of his sufferings.
When the sufferer is able to draw this very definition between the
correction
from on high, and the poor instrument in whose hands it is placed, it is
one of the first great lessons in the heart's purification, because he at once
learns to look more in sorrow than in anger upon the immediate author of
his woes, while he bows in humble humility before that power, against which
it is impossible to feel personal malevolence. Happy is that prisoner who
first frees his soul from the bondage of death!
We would not present the imprisoned youth as one who had made large
strides in the upward and difficult journey which leads by a narrow path and
a straight gate, but as one who had learned that the great thoroughfare of
mankind leads to death. He was a mere neophyte, and the best evidence
that he had a true and sincere desire to turn from his evil ways, was that he
felt as a mere childhe surrendered himself wholly to the guidance of that
unseen power which had already so wonderfully delivered him. Alas, his
trials were not near ended. In the very hour that many such thoughts as we
have condensed were passing through his mind, there was one sojourning in
the same town busy entangling the weh more inextricably around him. In
the very hour that Hall sat down to write a short note to Gov. Spotswood,
another individual was penning a very different epistle for the same eye, to
be conveyed by the same messenger, old June.
CHAPTER XXVI.
THE LETTERS CONTRASTED.
It was at night, the candles burned brightly, and the fire blazed cheerfully,
while the Governor's family and guests were seated in the same room in
which we first presented them. A more than usual cheerfulness pervaded
the family circle, not only on account of the Governor's brightening prospects,
with regard to the great enterprise of his life, but likewise on account of
John's returning health. They all thought the mystery now cleared up, and
that henceforth his bright career would go on brightening as in days of yore.
Essex had already announced June's arrival from the capital, having just
learned the fact from a little negro who conveyed the important tidings from
the kitchen. He went out to bring in any letters or messages which June
might have brought, and soon returned with the two epistles alluded to in the
last chapter.
The consternation of the circle may be imagined, when the following
letter
was read from Hall. They had all before perceived that something therein
contained, had moved the Governor greatly. It ran as follows:
James City Jail, Williamsburg
.
To His Excellency, Sir Alexander Spotswood.
Dear Sir
.You will no doubt be surprised that I date this letter from
the county jail, instead of the barracks, but, Sir, so it isdeeply mortifying
as it is to me to state the fact. I had scarcely alighted in the capital, after
marching the soldiers to the garrison, before I was waited upon by the
Deputy
Sheriff of the county, with a bail writ, (or whatever that process is called
by which the law seizes a man's person,) at the suit of Henry Lee, Esq.,
and for the very money which your Excellency was mainly instrumental in
procuring at his hands for me. You will recollect, no doubt,
that as a mere
matter of form
, (so the gentleman expressed it,) I gave him a note of hand
for the amount. Unfortunately I paid away part of the sum for my passage
money, and the remainder to recruit my dilapidated wardrobe, so that instant
payment was out of the question. None of my new and kind friends were
in the city. I had, indeed, hoped to find the good Doctor at home, but
unfortunately
for me he was absent in the country.
I had no other friend upon whom I dared callindeed, to confess the
truth to your Excellency, I have not a friend left in the whole world, now
living, upon whom I have any right to make a demand for such help as my
circumstances require. This, my honored Sir, is but a passage in the
chapter
of accidents which have fallen to my lot in the last few years, and until
the storm has spent its fury, it would seem useless to attempt to assist me.
I will honestly confess to you, that I came to this country at this time to
avoid those very difficulties (or kindred ones) which have assailed me here.
A superstitious man might be inclined under such circumstances to imagine
himself pursued by some invisible agency, but I have no such idle fears.
I
know my persecutors well
, and I can afford, even in my humble lodgings, to
pity them. I am very sure that I am a happier man this evening, than he at
whose suit I am thus deprived of my liberty.
I have accidentally heard that he utters very bitter and unwarrantable
things against me, and even threatens a prosecution for swindling. My ears
tingle as I write the word, but I may as well write that which I may soon be
compelled to endure the odium of in a more tangible shape. All that I can
say to your Excellency, and to those who have hitherto espoused my humble
cause, is, that I rest for the present in the calm and perfect security of an
injured
and innocent man, trusting that that God who has permitted the snares
of the wicked thus to gather round me, will clear them away in his own good
time. This, you may think and say, is poor evidence with which to furnish
you, against one so rich and powerful as my adversary; but, Sir, it is even
soit is all I have to give at present. Under such circumstances, I shall not
be the least surprised to find that you have turned me over to the tender
mercies
of my creditor. I cannot hope that my unsustained protestations of
innocence
of the charges that I hear he brings against me, will be sustained.
So let it be. I am willing to sojourn even in this dreary prison for a while,
well assured that the time will come, when my name will once again be
redeemed
from reproachuntil then, I must be content to subscribe myself
your Excellency's obliged humble servant.
Harry Hall
.
A profound silence prevailed while the Governor (spectacles on nose) read
over this letter. The letter remained in his hand, and his hand on his knee,
while with the other he raised the spectacles upon his forehead, in a
thoughtful
abstracted mood. The young ladies waited in respectful silence for a
few moments, expecting every instant that he would burst out into some
vehement
exclamationthey could not long suppress their own indignation.
Ellen
Evylin was the first to give utterance to her excited feelings, which she
did in no measured terms. Kate took the same view of the subjectwhile
Lady Spotswood remained entirely silent, watching the changes of her
husband's
countenance with not a little interest, heightened no doubt by the late
circumstances which had happened under her own eye.
Dorothea wanted to know how the Sheriff could take Mr. Hall for
borrowing
his own money from Mr. Lee.
A very pertinent question, said her father, with a nod of approbation.
Carter declared the
denouement
was what he had been looking for for some
time, and appealed to Moore, whether he had not predicted it when they
were last at the capital.
Moore confirmed the fact of the statement, but demurred to the truth of the
charges, alleging his still undiminished confidence in Hall, whatever might
be the apparent suspicious circumstances against him. Suppose your
Excellency
would read Lee's version of the affairI see his seal upon the letter
before you, said he.
True, true, I had overlooked it, in the first excitement produced by Hall's
letterlet us hear the other side. Saying which he broke the seal, and read
as follows:
Williamsburg
.
To his Excellency, Sir Alexander Spotswood, Lieutenant Governor of
Virginia
,
and Commander of Her Majesty's forces.
Dear Sir
: I owe you an apology for the very abrupt manner in which I
left your house, where I had been tacitly, as it were, left in charge of the
ladies; but the fact is, Sir, that I found the young person whom you had
hastily
employed as Tutor, presumptuous and impertinent, and that I must either
degrade myself by a personal encounter with him, or leave the premises. I
chose the latter, and had hoped to have paid my respects to your Excellency
before you left the capital, but was detained by unavoidable legal business until
you had unfortunately left the city. It is useless now to enter into
particulars
as to his conduct in your absence; for the evidence is now before
me, that he is such a gross impostor and swindler, that it is scarcely worth
while to inquire into minor particulars of conduct. While I was in the very
act of consulting Attorney General Clayton, (who is also my own legal
adviser
,)
about the steps necessary to be taken in order to repossess the funds
out of which I weakly suffer myself to be cheated, I received a ship letter by
way of York. Whom does your Excellency suppose that letter was from?
Why, sir, from Mr. Henry Hall, my cousin, the real gentleman, whose name
and character this base impostor had assumed for the lowest purposes. You
will recollect that I had written to the young man before this person
appeared
at your house, informing him of my aunt's will. This letter which I
have received is in answer to that one, and states among other things that
the writer would sail in the very first vessel for this country after the one
which would bring the letter, so that by the time that this pseudo Mr. Hall
manages to release himself from prison, where I have snugly stowed him,
the real personage, whose name he has assumed, will be here to confront
him. I am delighted that I am thus able to relieve your Excellency from
the disagreeable duty of unmasking the impostor; for if your Excellency
will permit me to say so, your kindly nature had so far led you astray with
regard to this man, that you might have found it rather unpleasant to deal
with him. Leave all that to me, SirI will give him his deserts, be well
assured
;
and if he escapes with whole ears and a sound skin, he may thank
the clemency of the law, and not mine.
I have the honor to be your Excellency's most obedient, humble servant,
Henry Lee
, of Westmoreland,
The party was truly astonished by these two letters, both conveying such
surprising news. The Governor took a few turns hastily through the room,
pained and excited. He was very loth to give up one for whom he had
taken such a liking, and for whom he intended such an important share in
the great enterprise; but the evidence was too plain and palpable to be
resisted
,
and he resolved to let the law take its course. As he came to this
conclusion, he threw himself into a chair and exclaimed, By heavens I
would have believed nothing less! And I do not believe this, said Ellen
vehemently, her eye bright with excitement, and her frame quivering with
the thoughts which oppressed her.
The Governer was reclining in his arm chair in an attitude almost of
hopelessness
,
but when Ellen uttered her bold challenge of the truth of Lee's
statement, he sat bolt upright, as if his mind would seize upon the slightest
pretext to reinstate his favorite. Why, what reason have you to doubt
Harry Lee's veracity, Miss Evylin? said he.
The best evidence in the world, Governor Spotswood. He has committed
as great mistakes as this before.
Indeed, do you mean to say that the young gentleman has ever knowingly
swerved from the truth.
I cannot say whether it was knowingly or whether it is his remarkable
obliquity of moral vision, but I assert the fact, that he has before wronged
others, as much as I believe he now wrongs this unfortunate young gentleman.
You surprise me exceedinglydo tell me, I pray you, who the person was?
Well, Sir, I have no objection to saying that it was myself.
All the gentlemen exclaimed at once, What, a lady!
Further than that, continued Ellen, I do not say at present.
The Governor seemed very much perplexed to know what to dohe strode
rapidly about the roomhis lips compressed, and his shaggy brows louring
over his eyes, and muttering violent expressions through his clenched teeth.
While he was thus swayed by contending emotions, Moore rose hastily, took
his hat, and left the room. In a few minntes he was followed by Ellen
Evylin
,
and soon afterwards by Kate. The latter found Ellen in a most earnest
conversation with the former in the verandah. She had never seen her
friend under such excitement. She was pressing upon Mr. Moore a purse
of gold which she held in her extended hand, and which she plead with him
to take.
No, no, no, said Moore, I will attend to all thatguilty or innocent,
he shall have the benefit of the bare doubt. To-morrow morning's sun shall
see him a free man. Will that not content you?
No, indeed, Mr. Mooreit will notI claim to have rights in this
matter
which you have not. I beg of you not to deny me.
But my dear young lady, if I take your gold and offer it to him, it will
be the very way to make him refuse the assistance; many a sensitive man
will accept aid from his own sex, when he would peremptorily refuse it from
one of your's.
Well, take it and give it, without letting him know from whom it comes.
I ask it as a particular favor.
Do, Mr. Moore, said Kate pleadingly, and with a look which was
irresistible
.
By all that's lovely, said Moore gaily, as he pocketed the gold, and
threw on his cloak for the night's ride, I think I will coutrive some way to
get into jail myself, if it is only to excite the tears of sympathy in so many
lovely eyes. Suppose I find myself in the young man's position before
morning
,
do you think I should have a couple of as fair damsels contriving my
release?
Indeed you shall, said Kate.
Good night, said Moore, kissing his hand gallantly, and striking his
spurs into his horse at the same moment.
The girls returned to their own apartment, and there Ellen informed Kate
of all that had transpired in her absence, but still there were many things
wanting, even to them, to unravel the mystery of the two Halls.
A very keen encounter of tongues was going on below meanwhile,
between
Dorothea and Carter. The latter contended that Hall was a bold
bungling impostor, and that he had seen through him at a glance, and that he
had no pretensions to gentility whatever.
How comes it, then, Mr. Carter, asked Dorothea, that he overmastered
so many of you at accomplishments considered quite refined? How was it at
the small sword?
Oh, any French dancing-master may and often does possess such tricks.
Aye, but French dancing-masters do not often read the classics very
elegantly
,
if at all; and here is Dr. Blair, who says that Mr. Hall is an elegant
scholar.
Doubtless a schoolmaster, then, some broken down pedagogue.
But papa says, he is an accomplished and scientific soldier.
Learned no doubt, while acting as drummer or fifer to some marching
regimentsaid you not a while ago that he played upon the flute?
Yes, said Dorothea, he is a musician.
I'll tell you what it is, Carter, interposed the Governor, if Hall is a
hypocrite and impostor, he is one of the most accomplished swindlers that
ever I have met with. It is a rare thing in my experience of human nature
and it has not been confined in its rangeto see a man descending in villainy,
and elevating himself at the same time in all the elegant courtesies of life.
Neither is it common to see men of that stamp cultivating their minds highly.
Oh I grant you, said Carter, that he is no common vagabondhe is a
very accomplished rogue, if you will, but still a sly rogue for all that.
I am not so sure about that, replied the Governor. There may be some
mistake, or Harry Lee may have been imposed upon, or his own feelings may
have colored the matter too highly.
What! your Excellency? When he has actually received a lettera
foreign letter toowith the European post mark, from his real cousincould
his imagination make facts, stubborn facts, like these? No, noeither Hall
is a consummate swindler and impostor, or Harry Lee is an outrageous liar
one or other horn of the dilemma you must take.
It has an ugly aspect to be sure, said the Governor musingly, and
dropping
off into a brown study, while Carter turned once more to the playful and
amusing combat with his little lady antagonist. But we must follow the
main thread of our narrative; while they are thus agreeably employed.
CHAPTER XXVII.
THE WANDERER.
It
was a bright moonlight night, and Moore rode merrily on his way,
notwithstanding
the melancholy nature of his errand. His fancy was busy with the
sweet pleading Katehe remembered only that her eyes had rested upon him,
with confidence that her appeal would not be in vain. So busy was his memory
with the most delicate shadows of his mistress' countenance, that he was
entirely
unconscious that he was riding the fine animal which he bestrode at a
murderous rate, until his servant made an appeal in behalf of the horse.
His train of reflections were now turning to the other end of the road. He
had a disagreeable duty before him, not in liberating Hall, for that was
pleasant
to his feelings, but he would be constrained to show that his confidence
had been a little shaken, far more than he had been willing to acknowledge to
the friends whom he had just left.
This business of the two Halls bore an ugly aspect, and he dreaded the
laceration of feeling he would suffer in seeing a man of gentlemanly feelings
floundering between inextricable tergiversations. Unless Hall came down
frankly and explained the difficulty, he was resolved to make short work of
his liberation and be done with him. He began to see, moreover, that he was
about to interfere in a more delicate affair than he at first imagined. Not that
he was a man to shrink from a task he had undertaken because of any
displeasure
of Harry Lee, on his own account; he was anxious to make fair
weather with him because of the Governor's interests.
He rode immediately to the house of the Sheriff whom he well knew, and
roused him up. The whole city was buried in slumber, and Hall himself no
doubt slept soundly after the wholesome and honest self-examination through
which he had put himself. The jailor was next aroused, and together they
proceeded to the apartment of the prisoner. He was, indeed, very
unromantically
sleeping soundly, wrapped up in his old military cloak, and stretched at
full length upon a hard straw mattrass. Moore stood and gazed at him for a
few moments, and then remarked to the Sheriff, that man's face in the
honest
expression of sleep
, looks as little like that of a swindler, as any man's I
have ever seen. It is impossible to look at him thus without being interested
in his fate.
Fact, Sir, said the Sheriff, he has a taking away with him, he has the
whole establishment here, jailors, family and all, interested for him already,
but it is generally the way with your gentlemanly rogues. I have seen some
of them, capital company.
You think him a swindler then? asked Moore sadly.
Certain I do sir. What else can he be when he takes another man's
name in order to swindle honest people with it.
Moore paid the money without further words, and had, influenced by the
homely common sense of the hard official, determined to slip away without
15
being seen; but just as he was escaping, Hall sprang to his feet, very much
startled and surprised by the lights and the persons he saw in the room,
rubbing
his eyes in perplexity and bewilderment. Mr. Moore, he at length
exclaimed, I ought to say I am glad to see you, but I cannot do so honestly,
under present circumstances.
Not when I inform you that I come as a friend, inquired Moore.
It will be a friend indeed who will adhere to me, under present
circumstances
,
said Hall sadly.
Moore made a sign to the officials to withdraw, when they had done so, he
drew one of the miserable stools which the place afforded, seated himself, and
motioned for Hall to do likewise, which he did upon the edge of his rude couch.
How far I may adhere to you, said he, depends upon yourself. I have
come to release you from confinement in any event.
My mere liberation from this place, is a matter of little moment to me at
present, not that I would in the smallest degree lessen the obligation which I
am under to you for the generous intention, but that I consider my
confinement
here as a small portion of my embarrassments.
Explain then to me, the mystery of the other Hall, you have doubtless
heard that Mr. Lee has received an answer to his letter addressed to Mr. Hall,
which he says, is the real one.
I have indeed heard such a rumor, but I cannot do more at present than
beg those who are disposed to befriend me, to suspend their opinions until the
other Mr. Hall arrives. Let us be confronted, and then the mystery may be
explained, and not until then.
But why cannot you explain it all now, and authorize me to satisfy your
anxious friends at Temple Farm? Surely this would seem to be the proper
course for you to pursue.
No one, Mr. Moore can judge of my circumstances but myself. No one
could be more anxious than I am, to stand fair once more with the dear friends
to whom you allude, but I must be content for the present to be suspected. I
cannot
expect them to take my character upon trust, under such adverse
circumstances
,
and therefore, I do not ask it; all I do request is, for them to suspend
their opinions of me if they can. I promise you that the time will come, when
they will no longer blush to own me; but if they cannot even do that, and they
must condemn me, I will not blame them. They shall not be troubled with
my presence again until such time as I may be enabled to vindicate myself
fully before the world.
Well, said Moore rising and evidently chagrined and disappointed, be it
so. I cannot force your confidence; until the time you have mentionedand
for your own sake I hope it may come speedilyI must wait patiently; I at
least will suspend my judgment. I am more than half willing to take you
upon trust now, but I could not promise to reinstate you in the good opinion of
all your friends so easily. You have therefore, I think, decided wisely to
seclude
yourself until such time as you are ready to clear your name and fame
from all aspersions. You are free to go hence when you please, and I would
advise it to be as speedily as possible, both from hence and from the capital.
Your creditor will find other means to seize upon your person; indeed I have
heard that he meditated a criminal prosecution. Excuse me, Sir, but I must
be plain with you.
No apology is necessary to one in my situation, and more especially for an
act of kindness. My desperate fortunes have arrived at that pass when it
will not do for me to shrink at the bare mention of those things which I may
be compelled to experience in the next twenty-four hours.
Seeing Moore about to depart, he followed him to the door, and extended
his hand, as he continued, Farewell, Sir. I shall never forget that you have
rode eight miles and perilled a considerable sum of money to befriend one against
whom the world is
almost
unanimous in its condemnation.
No, no, not unanimous, Mr. Hall, there are gentle hearts at `the Farm'
whom any man would feel flattered to have interested as you havethere is
a warm interest in your favor there, at least. You don't know how much you
are indebted to them for my exertions, which you are so willing to attribute
to my generosity alone. You may find out some day that I am not so
disinterested
after all. Farewell, farewell. I hope we may soon meet under
happier
auspices.
Saying which he left the prison, leaving Hall standing at the door, wrapt
in profound reflection. Recovering from his abstraction, he bundled up what
few things he should call his own, tied them up in a pocket handkerchief, and
sallied out into the dark wide world, not to seek his fortune, but repose from
the turmoil of life, and its fierce passions and bitter enmities, and heartless
friendships. His rapid strides soon threw the capital far in his rear.
Solitary
and disheartened he passed along the dreary road, cut through the tall pines
those most melancholy of trees. It was a silent and solemn walk in the
moonlight, with no other company, but the grand and gloomy old forest, which
had stood there before the soil was ever pressed by the foot of the white man.
It is a cheerless occupation to walk alone at night, at all times, but when one
sets out, a wanderer from the haunts of men, fleeing from unknown evil, and
seeking repose in total seclusion, he is a philosopher or a christian if he does
not repine at hislot. Hall had one cheering star of hope still glimmering in
his dark horizon, bright eyes and warm hearts still glistened and pulsated in
his behalf, as Moore informed him. Oh woman! exclaimed he, as he trudged
on his otherwise painful journey, Oh woman! blessed angel of love, and
mercy, and charitythis earth were indeed a gloomy and dreary waste without
theemay my lot be indeed what it now promises, if ever I again doubt thee.
Oh, blessed one above all her sex, pure and bright and constant as you polar
star, may an omnipotent and overruling Providence guard thee, as it has
hitherto done, from the snares of the wicked, untill I may once more resume
my proper station in societyand then!
THE KNIGHTS
OF THE
HORSE-SHOE;
A TRADITIONARY TALE
OF THE
COCKED HAT GENTRY
IN THE
OLD DOMINION.
VOLUME II.
CHAPTER 1.
THE GOVERNOR'S LEVEE.
Williamsburg
, one of the ancient capitals of Virginia, was first laid out
in the shape of the letter W, in honor of the Prince after whom it was
named, and through whose munificence its principal ornament was first
endowed
.
This strange and even enigmatical plot of the town was, however,
soon abandoned for one more consonant with the natural features of its
admirable
position.
The houses of the gentry were principally built upon one great
thoroughfare
,
and this was then called the Duke of Gloucester streetfor shortness,
Gloucester street. At one end, and immediately at right angles to it, stood,
and yet stands, William and Mary College; and at the other, about
three-quarters
of a mile distant, the capital.
These two edifices at once gave a character and dignity to the place; and
the traveller even now turns his head naturally, first to the one and then to
the other, as he enters the ancient city. We have entered the modern Babel
of our country, and, like all other neophytes, have been deeply impressed with
the tumultuous and thronging ideas and sensations which they produced, but
never have we been so deeply impressed as while entering for the first time
the scene where those old ruinous walls were once vocal with the eloquence
of Patrick Henry, on the one hand, and the academic shades on the other,
where Jefferson and Madison wandered in the days of their boyhood, and
where was concocted the first germ of that rebellion which eventuated in the
most glorious structure of civil liberty which the eye of man has ever yet
looked upon.
Strange, that the thousands who live under its benign influenceand
Virginians
especiallyhave no curiosity to visit this ancient cradle of our
liberties
.
It lies gradually mouldering to decay, and only saved from utter
demolition
,
by the noble literary institution, which has survived alike the royal and
republican capital. Long may it rear its noble head above the ruins which
surround it, the great conservator, of all that remains of Virginia's ancient
metropolis, as well as the stern republican principles which first had their
growth beneath its portals.
About the centre of Gloucester-street, two parallel avenues of noble trees
led through a green lawn, near two hundred yards, to the front of the Palace.
A little to the left of this opening, as you faced the Palace, stood the
Episcopal
Church, then recently built. On the opposite side of the street, its line
was again broken a little nearer to the Capitol, by a public square, in which
were contained the Market-House and the military round tower, already
alluded to as having been erected by Governor Spotswood. Facing this public
square, was a small Theatre,
*
*
We have undoubted authorityboth traditional and historicalfor the assertion, that a
Theatre existed at the time stated, though overlooked, if not denied, by dualap.
and nearly opposite to all these again, on the
other side of the street, was the hotel frequented by the gentry and Burgesses,
when the assembly was in session.
The Palace was a large brick building, flanked on the right and left by two
smaller ones, nearly adjoining it, one of which contained, the dormitories and
offices connected with the culinary department, and appropriated exclusively by
the servantsthe other contained the Governor's library, official departments,
&c., &c., so the whole of the main building was appropriated to the elegant
and extensive hospitalities, at all times considered as appertaining to the
Gubernatorial
mansion in Virginia.
It was a few days after Hall's departure from prison, upon his melancholy
pilgrimage, that the well known sound of a trumpet startled the denizens of
the citymany of them from their early dinners. It proceeded from the
Governor's
body guard, not yet visible in the city, but the enlivening blast of the
bugle could be heard, from time to time, as they wound along the turnings of
the roadthe breeze sometimes wafting its mellow sounds to the ear, and, at
others, suffering them to fall faintly in the distance, as it lulled with the breeze.
It was always a glad day to the citizens when the Governor and his family
returned from his summer residence. Joy was visible upon the countenances
of the portly dames and merry urchins, as they crowded round their
respective
doors, to welcome back the loved inmates of the Palace. Near the gate
of the mansion, among the trees of the double avenue, stood a long line of little
girls all dressed in white, with flowers in their hands, waiting to strew the
path of the ladies from the carriage to the house. They were pupils of a
female school, of which Lady Spotswood was chief patron.
First came a company of Rangers, which had been detailed to escort the
Governor, followed by the veteran body guard, all in full regimentals. Then
his Excellency, with his staff, and male guests, on horsebacknext, the state
coach with the Governor's immediate family, and Dr. Evylin's carriage
containing
his daughter, alone; the rear of the cavalcade brought up by the family
servants, in carriages and on horseback, old Essex riding at their head, like a
field-marshal, and June bringing up the extreme rear, awfully carricaturing the
Major's stately equestrianism.
The troops on duty at the capital, consisting mostly of Rangersunder the
command of Duke Holloway, second to John Spotswoodwere drawn up on
the green in front of the Palace, and presented arms as the Governor
approached
:
the military escort filing to the right and left as they entered the
avenues.
Dr. Evylin's carriage drove on to his private residence, which stood a little
back from Gloucester street, between the Church and the College, embowered in
trees and vines, and presenting to the eye one of the sweetest retreats it was
possible to imagine, in the midst of the capital. Every thing about the premises
gave evidence of the ministering hand of that gentle and tasteful spirit,
which, since the death of the Doctor's lady, had conducted all his household
affairs. The good old physician stood at the wicket gate, almost as impatient as
a lover, to throw his arms round the neck of his cherished idol. Even before
entering the house, they walked hand in hand among the fast fading shrubs and
flowers, the old man giving an account of his stewardship, during his daughter's
absence, and having a little history ready for each favorite plant. How these
gentle and humanising, affections, throw a mellow hue over such trifles as these,
and how the heart loves to toy with them on the surface, while its depths, like a
deep and silent stream, are tossed all the more for the serene calm above. The
servants too, loved their young mistress, and came flocking round, dropping
their rude curtsies and awkward bows, and asking about her health as if she
had crossed the Atlantic. Each one expressed delight at the renovated bloom
of their favorite, and the old Doctor himself, seemed so happy at the change,
that he became almost as puerile as any of them. Once more seated in their
quiet parlor, Ellen's arm thrown affectionately round her father's neck, we
will leave her to detail all the transactions of the Governor's country
establishment
,
while we return to the Palace, where the bustle and excitement of
the important arrivals still continued.
The city was thronged with visitors, brought together by the proclamations
of the Governor inviting them thither; and also by the arrival of many of
the Burgesses, who came in obedience to the call of his Excellency for the
assembling of their body, somewhat in anticipation of their usual time of
meeting.
In the evening, a levee was held, where all the gentry, without distinction
of party, were expected to call and pay their respects.
The Governor was very much gratified to find that his proclamation,
containing
the scheme for new conquests of lands, had fired either the cupidity
or ambition of most of the young men of the colony; but while he listened,
with sparkling eye and gratified feelings, to the plans of his young friends, he
could not resist the feelings of regret which the subject brought with it, for
the young Secretary who had originated the scheme. His eve turned
anxiously
to the door at each successive arrival of guests, but Hall made not his
appearance. He had been greatly prepossessed in favor of this young man,
and notwithstanding the powerful array of circumstances against him, he
was loth to give him up entirely. He still hoped that something would turn
up, to prove at least that he was not criminal. In these hopes, he was
seconded
by most of the females of the family. Kate and Dorothea at all times
expressed their most decided convictions, that he would yet turn out to be a
gentleman of untarnished name; and Ellen, before her departure from the
country seat, could brook no suspicions of his integrity or honor. She
maintained
openly, that there were no charges against him, except those brought
by Harry Lee, and that she was ready at any time to lay as great ones at his
own door, if necessary, and, consequently, that he was not an unimpeached
witness.
It was expected by the young ladies that something would turn up during
the evening, by which Mr. Lee might understand, that Hall's case was
espoused by them, and that they intended to carry the war home to him if he
continued his persecutions against their favorite. Only one thing prevented
an open rupture between the parties. Lee was a member of the House of
Burgesses, as before stated, and the Governor wanted his vote. He had
consequently
warned them against a premature move in the matter. Those
however
who are experienced with the world, will understand how difficult it was
for him to make the ladies of his establishment understand any thing of
political
expediency.
Lee was among the earliest arrivals, and it may be well imagined that his
movements did not pass unnoticed by any of the parties just mentioned. His
first demonstration however was in quite an unexpected quarter, on
encountering
Bernard Moore, soon after paying his respects to the Governor and his
Lady, he treated him with the utmost hauteur and disdain. Not a hand was
extended by either party. Moore was quite taken by surprise, but, in a moment
recollected his late interference in Lee's schemes of revenge. He passed on,
after a cold and distant bow, a smile of derision playing about his mouth.
Could he have seen Kate's eyes flashing fire and indignation, as she witnessed
the interview, he would have been truly flattered and pleased and, perhaps
might have sought a renewal of the experiment, but he did not; he passed on,
and joined himself with more congenial spirits than Harry Lee, and soon
forgot
that young gentleman, amidst the animated discussion going on relative to
the tramontane expedition. Not so with Kate, she followed with her eyes,
the haughty young aristocrat's movements wherever he went. She was
moved by strong impulses, which brooked no control from cold political
expediency
.
She was all a woman in her feelings; and like a woman would
she have acted, had the opportunity offered. Fortunately for her father's
interests
,
no occasion was presented for the execution of the plans of the
female
trio, those developements were destined to fulfilment in another quarter.
Ellen Evylin was not present at the Levee, seeing which, Mr. Lee soon
absented
himself from the party, and bent his steps toward the Doctor's house.
He rejoiced in his own mind, that it was so; for he now imagined, that he had
placed the man who had interfered with his movements in such a light, that
Ellen must feel nothing but gratitude towards him for his efforts in the cause.
Such were his anticipations as he lifted the knocker of the Doctor's doorhe
was admitted. What occurred at the interview will be related in the next
chapter.
CHAPTER II.
PROPOSALS OF MARRIAGE.
How delightfully fell the impress of all he saw upon the cold nature of
Harry Lee? How his intense selfishness warmed itself by the cosy fire
blazing
in the hearth? The pictures that hung round the walls, too, delighted
him, because they were many of them painted by a hand that he hoped to
call his own. He stood before them in succession, and pleased himself to
think, how the same gentle hand would sketch the glorious landscapes
presented
,
in many aspects upon his own thousand acres. The sweet flowers,
too, snugly stowed away from the rude September blasts, in a little glass
conservatory
,
separated from the room in which he was, but by a single step.
He walked out into the green artificial summer, the lights of the parlor
windows
threw their bright rays over and around, revealing a little aviary, high
up among the green shrubbery. Henry Lee knew every nook and corner
about the charming little dove's nest which he intended to rob. He was like
a boy climbing a tree in search of such an objecthis head grew dizzy, as the
prospect of clutching the prize seemed just within his grasp. He walked
backthe nest was still warm, but he had frightened the pretty songster away
A score of music was lying open upon the table, which she had evidently just
left, in her precipitate retreat, for some of her female parapharnalia was lying
beside it. He walked up and read the title of the songit was in his brother's
own hand writing. Hurriedly he closed the book, and wheeled upon his heel
to another part of the room. He picked up a book, lying open in a rocking
chair, the face turned down, as if it had likewise received a share of the lady's
recent attention. He picked it up, and seated himself; the leaves fell over
of themselves, as even they acquire habits sometime, and there again was his
brother's name as the donor. It seemed as if his ghost was haunting him at
every turn. He threw down the book hastily, and strode through the room
with his head down, determined to see nothing more which might recall
painful
memories. At this moment, the old Doctor entered, cloaked up to the
neck, a shawl tied over his cocked hat and under his chin, and his thin legs
cased in warm cloth spatterdashes, buttoned up close to his knee buckles.
Ah, good Doctor! said Lee, advancing to meet him, still administering
to the sufferings of the sick and the afflicted? What a noble calling is yours?
Yes, said the Doctor, rather gruffly, as he took the proffered hand, before
he seated himself over the blazing pine knots in the hearth. Yes, it is
indeed
a noble profession, and all those should earn the crown of martyrdom
who practise it.
You surprise me, sirI thought, if there was a man in the world satisfied
with the lot which had fallen to him, it was Dr. Evylin!
And so I am; but that makes the remark I made none the less true. I
am content to be a martyr. It is true, that I am sometimes a little chafed,
that men look upon our paths as if they were strewed with flowers.
Well, Doctor, I confess that I am one who looked upon your profession
as affording the highest gratification to its followers. You are always
relieving
the pains and sufferings of others.
No, not always; we stand by a dying patient powerless, and feeling as
nothing before the great Ruler, who holds the destinies of man in his hands.
But that is not all; we are forever shouldering the troubles of other people
always looking upon the black shadows of the picture of human lifeit is
impossible for one of my profession to be uniformly cheerful. Then, its
dreadful
responsibilities weigh down all those who have any sensibility, and only
such are fit to enter a family when the hearts of all its members are laid bare;
when the lacerated affections require to be ministered to as well as the
physical
suffering. One advantage we have over other men: we see less of the
hypocrisy of our race than they do; suffering stamps a solemn sincerity upon
every countenance around a sick couch. I was called, the other night, to
visit one of the comedians of our little Theatrehe was very sick, and his
bedside surrounded by his brethren of the sock and buskin in the same dresses
which they had just worn upon the stage. Farce and Comedy sunk
abashed before the Tragedy of real life. The sufferer himself, though the
principal comedian, was one of the most captious and fretful men I ever
attended
.
The scene impressed me powerfullyyet, somewhat of the same
thing is presented to me daily. The sick couch disrobes every man of his
masquerading dress.
Yes, said Lee, musing, you have fine opportunities to study human
nature
.
You see it in its undress.
Aye, replied the Physician, we do see it in a state of nudity truly, and
the disrobing adds nothing to the beauty and symmetry. One half of our race,
at least, is presented in entirely different aspects from what it appears to other
men. The male portion appear in new and untried lights on the sick couch.
Ah! is there then so much difference in the sexes?
Aye, trulywomen, in civilized countries, are constant inhabitants of the
house, and often even of a single room, and sickness makes no such great
change in this respect to them, but there are characteristic differences besides
those produced by habit and occupationand all telling in favor of the weaker
sex. They are much purer in heart than we are, Mr. Lee, much more
elevated
in sentiment, more patient and hopeful in suffering, with a much
livelier
and realizing faith in the power and presence of an overruling Providence.
Seeing these thing, it almost looks wrong, to one of my profession, to see
them excluded from active participation in more than half of all the
concerns
of life. They have not yet, with all our boasted refinement and
civilization
,
their due influence.
That is made up. Sir, by their sway over the hearts of men.
Ah, that may do very well for a very young man to say, at such an age, it
is boasted of and paraded as an excuse for our wrongs, but old men know how
long it lasts, especially old Physiciansit lasts a much shorter time than the
honey money.
Ellen entered at this moment, and returned Lee's salutation with a cold and
formal inclination of the head. Her lips were compressed in a way quite
unnatural
to them, and giving a rather harsh expression to her usually pensive
and mild countenance. Her health seemed still on the mend; she walked
firmly and actively to the seat which her father had just vacated. She threw
a beseeching glance at the older gentleman as he left the room, as much as to
beg him to remain and supper her through the interview; but he seemed to
have a sly suspicion of the subject about to be brought upon the tapis, and he
retireda quizzical, and half humorous smile playing about his mouth as he
shut the door, and gave one glance back at his daughter.
The two, thus left alone, sat for some moments without exchanging a word
the gentleman, for once in his life, very much embarrassed, and the lady
more at her ease. The former, at length, broke the silence. Your father,
Miss Ellen, has just been complimenting your sex in a way, which was quite
new to me; he was giving me, as you entered, his professional testimony in
their behalf.
The best men are the best witnesses in such a cause.
True, but your father was giving me much higher testimony than
ordinary
men could give. He need not go far, Miss Evylin, for his sources of
inspiration on that subject.
No, said Ellen, quite unmoved, only to the bed side of his nearest
patient.
You are invulnerable, Miss Evylin, to those weapons of our sex, usually
considered so potent.
That
, now, I consider a real compliment, while your general staple
article
of the other sort, seems to me to belong to any body that will appropriate
themthey are like the wind, or the atmospheric air we breathe, or the water
we drink.
Mine shall not be so wide of the mark, I assure youthe purpose of my
visit to night was to renew the highest compliment which a gentleman can
pay to a lady. I went to the Governor's country seat for the same purpose,
but my object was there frustrated by some unfortunate occurrences, which
it is nedless now to allude to more particularly. I hope I shall find you more
inclined to listen to me, than I have found you hitherto. Always some
unfortunate
interruption, either designed or accidental, has prevented me from
laying open my whole heart to you. Is this to be the lucky time?
I will not profess to misunderstand you in any particular, Mr. Lee, either
with regard to the object of your late and present visit, or the occurrences at
Temple Farm. I am, indeed, now ready and willing to listen to you.
Lee was immediately on his knees before her, and made an effort to seize
her hand, but she rose up on the instant, and said, But not in that posture,
16
Mr. Lee, it does not become the relations which henceforth we must bear to
each other. I professed myself willing to hear you, and I expect to have
something to say myself; and that you will be equally courteous to me; more
than that we can never be to each other.
You shock me Miss Evylin, inexpressibly, both by the manner and matter
of your discourse. I see now that there is displeasure in your eye, but let me
hope that I shall by a frank and full explanation of every thing be enabled to
remove it. He had again seated himself, as had the lady.
Every thing Mr. Lee! exclaimed she, putting particular emphasis upon
the words.
Yes, Miss Evylin, every thing, why do you question me so pointedly?
Because I doubted, and still doubt, whether you will be explicit upon every
thing which you have said and written concerning this matter.
The very object of my visit is, to have just such an unreserved conversation
with you. I have long seen that it was necessary to rip up those old matters
which at first I avoided out of delicacy to you; I have seen that it was
necessary
,
before we could properly understand each other.
I am all attention, Sir, proceed.
Since my late visit to the Temple Farm, I am more than ever convinced
of it, excuse me therefore, if I touch upon subjects, which I once understood
were forbidden in this house.
If you allude to my engagement to your brother, you are free to speak.
Lee seemed surprised for a moment, at the prompt and unembarrassed
manner in which she spoke of the long forbidden subject, but proceeded: I
will not pretend to conceal from you Miss Evylin, that I rather more than
suspected
the fact, which you have just acknowledged, at the time of its
occurrence
.
I mean your engagement to my brother, and as long as he lived, you
know that I never openly interfered or expressed those feelings which
animated
me as well as him. (Ellen's eye flashed and she could scarcely restrain
an indignant exclamation.) Even had he lived, I cannot even yet see why my
claims would not have been equal to his own, unless indeed I were to
attribute
those mercenary motives to you, from which I know too well, no human
being is more free. My attachment was at least coeval with his own, and
though he possessed greater powers of address, you know enough of human
nature, to be aware that the strongest passions like the deepest rivers, run the
most smoothly and silently. I was always firmly persuaded that his love was
far less deeply rooted than my own, indeed I might have given way altogether,
had I not been so firmly persuaded of the evanescent nature of his. Had you
not some evidence of this even before his death?
Such as I had, or rather have, you shall see, before we conclude this
interview
;
replied Ellen, with compressed lips, and struggling to appear calm
and unmoved.
I am sure that such was the fact, I could exhibit evidence of it myself,
were it necessary, but we will take it for granted for the present. After the
sad affair which deprived me of an only brother, all those impediments which
had so long restrained me, were removed. You cannot deny that up to that
time, I was governed by a scrupulous delicacy towards you both.
Ellen again became restive, she could no longer restrain herself, and she
exclaimed pointedly: Mr. Lee, recollect yourself! before that time, had
you not spoken to my father on the subject?
True, true, I had, replied he somewhat embarrassed, but my offence
proceeded no farther; nor was my suit prosecuted afterwards until I supposed
your lacerated feelings had entirely recovered from the blow. From the time
of my first unsuccessful proposal to you up to the time of my late visit to
Temple Farm, I have lived but with a view to prosecute it. I have studied
nothing but your pleasure. I have devoted myself to you and followed you like
your own shadow; nothwithstanding the oft repeated partial reduffs with which
my devotion has been rewarded, I have still persevered, in hopes that when the
recollection of your first attachment had softened away by time, it would
naturally
glide into that strange store-house of childish things which every memory
contains, and at last give place to the more matured and rational feelings of the
woman.
And your letters to your brother, was there nothing in any of them
inconsistent
,
with what you have just said?
Nothing, so help me heaven, so far as I can recollect.
Mr. Lee, said Ellen with a severe expression of countenance which he
had never before witnessed, I must refresh your memory: I would not
question your veracity, but I cannot suffer you to go farther without convincing
you that I am far better informed on this subject than you suppose me to be.
You may have forgotten what you wrote thenI hope you have, but you will
never forget it again, as long as you live, when you have read that letter.
Here she handed him Frank's last letter, and continued. I hope and pray that
it may soften your heart towards your brother, (she hastily corrected herself)
towards his memory I mean. You will find there that not a few of his troubles
were produced by the very interference, which you have just so emphatically
denied. Read it, and reflect upon it. I am sure it will move every generous
and feeling impulse within you.
He took the letter with a trembling hand, and drawing the light towards him,
commenced its perusal. His eye dilated as he did so, while the cold
perspiration
gathered upon his brow and lip, and his whole frame shook with ill
concealed
excitement. Before he had half finished, he turned it over and
examined
the superscription carefullyhe seemed reassured by it, and became
rather more composed as he finished the remaining portion.
Whence did you obtain this letter, and through what conveyance. I see
it has no post mark.
It matters not, Mr. Lee, how I obtained it, it is sufficient for me, and for
you too, I suppose, that it is genuine. You will not deny that it is poor
Frank's hand writing?
I will not deny that it is admirably imitated, but I must know from whom
you obtained it, before I grant that it is genuine.
Well then, I obtained it from one who had suffered alike with himfrom
one who received it from his own handsfrom one whom you have treated in
a manner very poorly calculated to recompense your brother's last and dearest
friend.
From the arch impostor Hall.
I did receive it from Mr. Hall, but he is no impostor, Mr. Lee.
He is the veriest impostor and swindler that breathes. He has assumed
another man's name, has swindled me, if not others, out of moneyand he
has forged every word of that letter. There is not one word of truth in it, as
I verily believe.
Mr. Lee, I will not quarrel with you; it would neither become my sex
nor inclination to do so; but I as firmly believe in the genuineness of that letter
as in the truth and honor of its bearer, as I believe in my own existence.
Indeed I would rather surrender my life than doubt either.
Very well, Miss Evylin, very well; the time will speedily come when
you will repent this hasty decision. I pledge my word, before many weeks
have elapsed to produce such evidence of the falsity of this man at least, that
none can doubt. I will not only confront him with the real person whose
name he has assumed for the most diabolical purposes, but I will put the
matter beyond all question, by the testimony of a disinterested witness who
knew the real Hall and all his family in Scotland.
It will be time enough for me to believe it, when you do so, in the mean
time, let me at once and forever close the main subject between us. I have
already said that I would no longer profess to misunderstand the motives with
which you pursue me so constantly. Now, let me undeceive you: If you
can establish all that you say, if you can fortify your own honor, so that it
will be entirely free, even from suspicion, if you can make out Mr. Hall the
swindler that you say you believe him to be, it can make no alteration in my
feelings towards yourself. We can never be more towards each other than
we are at this moment!
Time may work wonders, Miss Evylin, as it has done before; are you
willing to allow me the poor contingencies which it may produce.
I am not; because you have already satisfied me that you could not
calmly wait its developements, even if there was a possibility of any such
contingencies as you supposethere is none. I tell you frankly, Mr. Lee,
that I would not marry you, if there was not another man in her Majesty's
Colony. Will you believe, now, that my purpose is fixed?
I am answered,taking his hat, and standing in the doorwayI have
only to bid you now a long farewell. I trust, indeed, that you may
fare well
in the hands into which you seem, by some strange and wayward destiny, to
have fallen. Should you see me, or hear of me prosecuting, virgorously to
punish the man whom you are so unwilling to give up, do me the justice,
at least, to believe that I am actuated by no motives of petty revenge against
yourself. Farewellfarewell! Exit Mr. Lee.
No, no, said Ellen, musingly, but bitterly, as she heard him slam the door,
no one could suspect the gentle, amiable, forgiving Mr. Lee, of harboring
revenge
against any one. Thank God! my father is no way in his power!
The old gentleman entered as his name passed her lips, having exchanged his
spatterdashes for black silk stockings and gold buckles, and all the other
corresponding
articles of dress befitting his presence at the Levee, late as it was.
There was a mischevious smile upon his mouth, as his daughter threw her
arms about his neck, and burst into tears; her bitter and sarcastic mood
already
gone. The father looked down upon her with untold stores of affection
beaming in his eye, but still that playful smile lingered, as he said, So you
have given that proud boy his quietus at last! I am glad of it, my Ellen, glad
of itindeed I am!
How did you know what happened, dear father?
Oh, I knew it from the way he slammed the door, if I had had no other
evidence, but your expression about his power over me, as I entered, would
have been enough without that.
Well then, go, dear father, and leave me to myself, while you pay your
respects to your friend the Governor.
And Ellen, he called out, as she left the room, what report shall I make
to your young friends, they have doubtless missed Mr. Lee, from the saloon
and will know full well his whereabouts.
She came back again, threw her arms round his neck, as she said,
beseechingly
,
Make no report at all dear father, however much you might be amused
at Mr. Lee's pompous absurdities, you cannot exhibit him in a riduculous light
without involving me tooand I would like every thing connected with the
affair which has terminated to night, forgotten forever. Let Harry Lee be to
us, as if he had never been. I do not like to think of him, because I cannot
think well of him; and, for the sake of one, whose memory is dear to me, the
next thing is, not to think of him at all. Do impress this upon the dear,
mischevious
girls at the Palace. I see the smile upon
your
face has already given
place to a tear, but let me kiss it away, and then a long adien to Mr. Harry
Lee. Good night, dear father, good night.
God bless you, my child!God bless you!said the old man, as he drew
down his broad cocked hat over his eyes, and took his long ivory headed cane,
to trudge his way to the Palace.
CHAPTER III.
MEETING OF THE BURGESSES.
The
great day at length arrivedthat day, the events of which were to
fulfil
the highest hopes of the chivalrous and enterprising Governor of Virginia,
or blast them forever. The Burgesses, at the previous session, had refused to
vote the necessary supplies; and should the present representatives be
governed
by the same feelings and opinions, there was forever an end of the
great tramontane expedition. Very different means and exertions had been
used this year, however, from those which preceded the former election.
Though the Governor was not formed by nature so much for a politician as a
soldier, he was compelled to learn by experience. His frank and noble nature
was coerced to adopt those measures of policy and expediency  always
found inseparable from high political station. Governor Spotswood, soon
learned, like all others who have trod the devious ways of politics, that human
nature must be dealt with, by means suited to its grovelling propensities. Not
that we would insinuate, for a moment, that any improper or criminal
influences
had been used to secure the election of his friendsfar from it. Dearly
as he desired the fulfilment of that long thought of, and anxiously studied
enterprise
,
he would have sacrificed his highest hopes and aspirations, before he
would have stooped to any thing mean or unworthy to accomplish it. But he
had taken pains to have the counties actively canvassed; and had, in several
places, suggested the most proper persons to be run by his friends, while no
means were spared to diffuse correct information among the people. After
all those means had been used, however, the Governor was well aware, that
the fate of his darling hobby rested with some half dozen grave old planters
in whose hands was the balance of power. They were friends and followers
of Mr. Bird, the celebrated traveller and journalist, who was, at the time of
which we write, a member of council. The Governor had been closeted with
him half of the previous night, and, up to the meeting of the House of
Burgesses
,
had received no assurances calculated to ally his anxious fears. The
neutrals were known to be under the influence of Mr. Bird; and thus, as it
were, he held the fate of the whole expedition in his hands.
It was known that the Governor was to make a speech to the Assembly,
and, consequently, the town was thronged at an early hour. Even before
daylight, crowds were pouring into the city, insomuch that long before the
first meal, the taverns were full. The back streets and lanes in and around
the city presented the appearance of a great camp-meeting. Horses were
tied to the fences in continuous lines, wherever the eye could reach, while
Gloucester street, the Palace, Capitol, and Market Greens, were filled with a
dense crowd of men. Of course, not a tithe of these could squeeze within
the walls of the Capitol; but it mattered not, it was a great public day, and
the Governor was to make a speech, and it was sufficient that they were on
the ground. As characteristic of the times, let our readers just cast their
eyes over one of these groups collected round the tail of a cart, from which
was sold eatables and drinkables. The old planter, at the right extremity of
the semi-circle, with a pewter mug in his hand, has on a hat which was
perhaps
cocked in London, but it now bears indubitable marks of having passed
through perils of flood and field, it is of a foxy red color, and the loops by
which it was held in shape being all gone, the brim is rolled up on each side,
so as to give it the shovel shape in front and rear. His coat is homespun,
and of a grey color, the flaps falling almost to his heels, and containing pockets
equal to a modern pair of saddle bags. His waistcoat is made of a web
with staring figures, as large as our curtain calico, and the pockets
covering
the hip bones, where it is met by his inexpressibles, made of the same
materials as his coat, and terminating at the knee and fastened by huge
buckles; homespun stockings cover the remainder of his legs, and his shoes
are fastened with the same sort of buckles as those at the knee.
His wife stands next him, waiting for the pewter mug most patiently; on
her head is a fur hat, exactly such as the male sex wears in our day, with
less stiffening. It is kept on her head by a shawl tied over the top and under
her chin. Her dress is made of materials which bears a striking resemblance
to those of her husband's waistcoatthe same straggling large red figures.
The waist terminates just above the hips; and below, on each side, are
pockets to match those in her husband's coat tail. The other parties of the
group were dressed very much after the same general fashion, varying
somewhat
,
perhaps, with the taste of the wearer. At every corner and cross street,
such a group might be seen. It mattered little to those primitive tobacco
planters of the humbler sort, how eloquently the Governor might discourse
at the other end of the citythe tail of a gingerbread cart was their
exchange
,
tavern, and reading-room; there they received all the information
they ever acquired.
The next grade above them were seated round tables in the tavern, covered
with bottles and glasses, and there the same theme occupied their attention.
What strange ideas were then developed of that great country, which now
gives character to our land. They thought the mountains inaccessible, in the
first place; and even if crossed, that the French and the Mississippi were
both immediately beyond. We would like to stand near, with the reader,
and take down a few of their dialogues, but time pressesthe Capitol bell
is ringing, and the crowd is in motion. Carriages filled with elegantly
dressed ladies are sweeping up the Capitol green in one direction, and, after
depositing their inmates, pouring out at the other in a continuous line. The
young bloods, on fine prancing steeds, are endeavoring to force their way
through the dense throng. The police officers are cracking the crowns of
the obstreperous lads, trying to force their way in; while the white teeth of a
grinning cuffee or two might be seen shining from every tree in the
neighborhood
,
staring with all their eyes, to see they knew not what.
At length the booming sound of a cannon announces that the Governor has
set out from the palace. Immediately the crowd breaks away to the right and
left, and soon a troop of cavalry passes through, and file to the right and left
on each side of the avenue; next, the body guard, and then the state coach,
with the Governor in full dress, attended by two of the council. There was
an expression of anxiety on his countenance as he entered the Capitol, which
he could but illy conceal; he was evidently laboring under apprehensions for
the fate of his cherished enterprise; at the same time, no doubt, reflecting
upon what he should say, in order to fire the enthusiasm of his auditors.
The members rose respectfully upon his entrance, and were gracefully
saluted by him in turn. He took the seat appropriated to him for a few
moments, a profound silence obtaining the while. He rested his head upon
his hand, as if he would still its tumultuous throbbing.
The house was packed as tight as it was possible, and at least one half the
member's seats given up to the ladies, their gay feathers and brilliant colors
contrasting strangely with the grave faces and dresses of the members.
The Governor rose and stepped forward a pace or two, and commenced
slowly and under some embarrassment. He related the history of the
inception
of the undertakingsaid that while carrying out the benevolent views
of Mr. Boyle, with regard to the Indian scholars in the college, he had been
induced to make the effort to accomplish a double purpose,
i.e.
he had taken
the Indian prisoners of the proper age to school, instead of to prisonthat
some of them had been taken by the tributaries from beyond the mountains,
and it was from them that he had obtained his first information of that
glorious country. He said that he saw some of those then in the crowd, who
were willing and ready to testify, if the Burgesses desired to hear them. The
old veteran began to warm as he described the glories of the conquest, and
the beauty of that Eldorado, which his imagination constantly presented to
his mental vision. Most eloquently did he also present it to the minds of his
hearers. He gave a faithful and graphic detail of the then known geography
of the continentpassing rapidly from the Northern lakes to the Gulf of
Mexico. He declared that nearly every other colony had hitherto done more
toward the advancement of the great interests of civilization than Virginia,
and that it was peculiarly incumbent on her, the representative in America
of the intelligence, the religion, and the liberty of her father-land, to
prosecute
what Smith and Raleigh had so nobly begun. When he arrived at the
military aspect of his subject, the old war horse was roused up, as if he
smelled the battle afar off. He fired up the ardor and enthusiasm of the most
lethargic by his historical and classic allusions, and wound up his address by
describing Virginia as holding in her hands the very key to all that rendered
the discoveries of Columbus available.
If we are tamely to fold our hands, said he, and suffer this mighty
inheritance to pass from us, we may as well return at once to Old England.
If we are to be content with a sparse settlement along the seacoast, and
never make an effort to enlarge our boundaries, I have no hesitation in
pronouncing
the whole scheme of British colonization in America nothing but a
splendid failure. France has already seized upon both ends of the cornucopia,
while we are penned up within the horntoo feeble or too inert to strike a
blow for our extrication. Shall it be said in after times, that the descendants
of the noble cavaliers and gentlemen who conquered and reclaimed this
country had become so degenerate as to suffer this great inheritance to pass
from us? Oh, never let it be said. Gird on your armor, Virginians, and follow
me at least to the mountain's brow. Take one glance over those hitherto
impregnable barriers, the great Apalachee, and I will show you a finer country
than that promised land which Moses beheld, but never reached. It may be
as my enemies predict, that I too must fall by the way side, but if it must be,
I trust that God will grant to me as to his servant of old, to view before I
depart, that land which my waking and sleeping fancies have so long held
before my, I trust, prophetic vision. I ardently desire to see before I die, the
western half of this great, glorious and gigantic picture. In the language of
our eloquent red brethren, I long to travel towards the setting sun, and behold
his golden rays as they reveal the beautiful savannas, and boundless prairies
and forest-crowned hills upon which the foot of an European has never yet
trod. Is there nothing in this idea to fire the ardor of my young friends
whom I see around me? Have they no desire to experience the sensations of
Columbus, when first he planted his foot upon the maiden soil? Follow me,
all ye who are desirous of new sensationsall ye who would live hereafter
in the pages of history, along side of Columbus and Americusall ye who
would grow rich as well as famousall ye who would carve out that which is
greater and better than a deathless namethe future scene of the grandest
enterprises yet in the womb of time and destiny. No military or scientific
eye can rest for one moment upon the map of Virginia which I hold in my
hand, without being struck with the fact, that such an achievement is
immediately
within our grasp. Look at these noble rivers, forever pouring their
rich tributes into the bosom of our loved Chesapeake! shall it be said by our
children that their fathers were afraid to seize upon the fountainsthe streams
and lands of which they already possessed? Does any planter purchase land,
the fountain-head of whose springs lies within his neighbors farm?and shall
we, as a people, be less wise than any one of us would be individually? Shake
off the lethargy which oppresses you, and go with me to this great, this
boundless
countrythis future seat of empires. Cast your eyes forward into a
probable futurity, and behold the rich resources which your discoveries and
conquests may pour into the lap of our loved colony. Behold the rich
meadows, and meat farm houses, and the gilded spires as they point towards
heaven. Think of the thousands and millious of happy emigrants and their
descendants from the crowded marts of the old world for whom you will
have carved out homes.
But there are broader and more profound bearings to this subject than even
these, grateful as they are to the philanthropist and christian. We have arrived
at a crisis, not only in the affairs of the colony, but of the world. No
statesman
,
no man of enlarged views can cast his eyes over the boundless field
which Providence has opened up to the irrepressible energies of our race,
without being impressed with the critical position in which we are placed.
It is needless to disguise that, from this time forward, there is to be a
contest for supremacy on this continent, between the French and the English,
between the Protestant and Catholic religions. Thus far, the race has been
equal, or nearly so; now, however, Virginia holds in her hands the pass, the
key, the gates of the mightiest empire ever conceived of by the most
towering
ambition. Is she to close this entrance of the world to the far West
to suppress the energies of our raceto stifle the great onward enterprises,
upon the threshold of which we have barely entered. Rouse ye up,
Virginians
,
and sleep no longer at the portals of the world. It is not merely to
explore a few insignificant water-courses, and thread an unknown mountain
pass, that I would urge you, but it is to enter upon that grand inheritance
which Providence opens to our acceptance. Beyond the mountains,
spreads out the most wonderful country ever dreamed of by the most daring
imagination. I base this opinion, not alone upon the evidence of the
Indian hostages, but upon other and irrefragable testimony within our reach.
Compare the distance from the lakes to the Gulf of Mexicoexamine the
mouths of the vast rivers pouring into that sea. Whence come they? Is it
consistent with the known geography of the world, and the philosophy of its
construction, to suppose that they burst suddenly from the ground? No, my
fellow-subjects, there is a vast unexplored region between us and the mouth
of the Mississippi, which it almost beggars the imagination to conceive of
So far from the poor hostages having exaggerated its wonders, I believe that
the half has not, and cannot be toldat least by them. Their poor bewildered
intellects become numbed and paralyzed, in the vain effort to grasp the
outlines
.
It requires the far-reaching eye of an intelligent and cultivated
mind, of a philosopher, a statesman, a philanthropist, a christianin the
largest aceptation of the termto comprehend these things. I trust there
are many such in this enlightened assembly. Certainly the interests of our
sovereign and country never required their presence more. Trusting that
your deliberations will redound to the honor and interests of both, as well as
to your own lasting reputation, I leave the subject with you, to make such
response as to you may seem wise and proper. The needful documents will
be furnished you in due time.
After the Governor had retired, there was a considerable murmur of applause
and some stamping of feet and clapping of hands; more among the
spectators
,
however, than the Burgesses. With the common people, as
distinguished
from the gentry, as we have before remarked, the proposed expedition was
extensively popular, but with the latter, especially with the elders among
them, it was not so much so.
The discussion of the response necessary to be made to the Governor's
appeal
,
and which was also a test of the fate of the bill for subsidies, which would
follow of course, was long and animated, and enchained the attention of the
crowded hall until a late hour of the night.
In this debate, Bernard Moore took a leading and distinguished part. Kate
slightly hung her head, and drew down her veil when she saw him rise, and
color to his ears and clear his throat, through the awkward exordium of his
maiden speech, but it was not a long while before her veil was thrown to one
side, and her ringlets parted from her face, which now responded to her lover's
eloquence, in the brightest glow of her enthusiastic and ardent temperament.
We know not if the young Burgess caught back any of his own fire, so
beautifully
reflected; but he might have done so, and probably did. Certainly it
was a fair mirror in which to view the effects of his first effort. Her fine
eye sparkled most brilliantly, while the young orator descanted upon the
glorious
achievement before them, and when he turned round and addressed
himself
to the younger members, in particular, with a power and eloquence which
was natural to him; Kate's eye roamed over the face of each one thus
appealed
to, with an anxious, enquiring solicitude for the fate of her father's
darling project.
Moore felt and spoke as if his own fate hung upon the success of the
measure
before them. He had somehow or other, brought himself to consider his
own suit as connected with the expedition. He had so long, jestingly with
Carter, put it upon this footing, that he really began to think that there was
some sort of mysterious link between the two dissimilar affairs. No one
would have laughed more heartily at this than the Governor, could he have
divined the secret thoughts of the young Burgess, but they were confined
entirely
to his own breast. And Kate, could she have penetrated those secret
thoughts, and felt that Bernard, while he appealed so feelingly to his fellow
representatives, was, at the same time, pleading his suit to her; what would
have been her feelings on the already exciting subject. But she was far too
disinterested for that, and too entirely absorbed in her father's interest in the
great scheme. She believed that his assistance was none the less effective on
that account. When he had concluded, there was a breathless silence for
many minutesthere was a counting of nosesand the Governor's friends
trembled for the result. The opposition, it is true, had already spent its force,
and no one seemed disposed again to take the floor in answer to Moore! But
then there was one member absent, who had been calculated upon certainly
to vote for, if not advocate the measurenamely, Henry Leehe was most
unaccountably absent. The Governor's friends, as soon as it was discovered,
had sent messenger after messenger for him, but no where was he to be found.
The Governor was sitting in the General Court-room, surrounded by some
of his old friends, and members of his Council, and most anxiously
canvassing
the probable state of the vote, when Moore hastily entered, and whispered
to him the disappearance of Lee. Damn him, said the old veteran, striking
his hand upon the table and speaking in an under tone, through his clenched
teeth, If I had supposed that he could have deserted me at such a moment
as this, I might have saved a deal of expensive politeness. Send for him again
Moore!
General Clayton, who was sitting near, and hearing Lee's name pronounced,
and suspecting the cause of the Governor's excitement, came up to the
latter
and told him, that Lee had left town some time before, he believed, in
pursuit
of some young man who had swindled him. The Governor and Moore
exchanged glances of mutual understanding and indignation; and the former,
exclaimed, rising, and with some vehemence, as he strode about the room,
Go back, Bernard, and let the issue be triedif it is destined to be disastrous
as at former trials, by Heaven, I will march without them and their aid; keep
up your spirits, my lad, I will as surely lead you over the mountains as the
sun shines, and that before the world is a month older.
Moore did go back to his place, very much disheartened however, by the
untimely desertion of Lee, for he knew that the vote would be a very close
17
one, and a single
aye
might be of immense importance. Some stupid proser
was concluding as he returned. He walked round among his friends and
communicated the disheartening news. Several of the young men had
determined
to speak against time, until Lee could be found; but the plan was now
useless, and they suffered the question to be taken. Respiration almost seemed
suspended during the short and exciting period. The audience rose to their feet,
and crowded round the Clerk's table so much, that the officers had to be called
in to preserve order. The votes were at length counted, and the Speaker
announced that there was a tie. So that had Lee been at his post, the victory
would have been gained by one vote. His absence was, however, not long
a subject of regret, for the speaker gave the casting vote in favor of the
measure. There was an instantaneous rush from all parts of the house for
the green in front of the Capitol; and when the eager throng without caught
the bright glow upon the faces of those who rushed out, and, even before the
result could be embodied in wordsa loud and deafening shout of applause
made the welkin ring againthe boys and the soldiers about town, and all the
other idlers took up the peal and echoed it again with interest. All that day,
nothing but songs of the mountains were heard, and every popular ballad that
could be at all tortured into any thing having the slightest allusion to the
subject
was sung. It was a great day, also, at the Barracks and the Taverns.
Such victories, from time immemorial, require to be moistened with plentiful
libations, as if Bacchus alone presided over the contest. Partizans of the same
school drink in congratulation; the victors offer the wine cup to the vanquished,
at once as a pledge of still enduring good will, at the same time, as a fitting
opportunity to meet again on the middle ground of the social board.
There was one, in that thronged assembly, however, who, though feeling as
deep an interest as any one in the vote just taken, quietly stole away, without
manifest exultation and really feeling the heart's heaviest oppression in the
midst of her friends' rejoicing.
Ellen Evylin sought her father's carriage alone, while every one else of
the Governor's party mingled in the scene of mutual congratulation. She
threw herself back in the carriage, and thought how Frank Lee would have
rejoiced to be present. These regrets were far from being selfish; she knew
that he would have pressed forward with the young chivalry of Virginia,
towards the high prize which was then firing the imaginations of all the youth
of the colony. She knew that it was an enterprise exactly suited to his
temperament and impetuous impulses; and she could not but regret that his
already disastrously spent energies had not been reserved for an occasion so
well calculated to develope them with advantage to himself and benefit to his
fellow creatures. She had so long interwoven every thought and feeling of her
own with his, that it was impossible for her to mingle in any such exciting
scenes as she had passed through, without placing him in her imagination
as one of the actors. This total absorption of the mind and affections towards
one beloved object for any great length of time, bears a striking resemblance,
and has not a little affinity to that one featured mania, so much better
understood
since that time.
CHAPTER IV.
THE LAST MEETING.
The
doors of the Palace, the next day, were thrown open to all the gentry
in the city of whatever party, and the Governor received the congratulations of
his friends with beaming eyes and outstretched hands. He was now indeed
the frank, hearty, joyous old soldier which he had been in former days. The
doubts and difficulties which had so long weighed down his spirits, no longer
clouded his brow, and his broad jokes and merry laughter were once more
heard within the Gubernatorial mansion. Indeed the horizon in every direction
seemed brightening to his vision. The ministry no longer interfered with his
operationsthe faction in the council was silencedpublic opinion gathered
strength and power from the victory in the house of Burgesses, and above all,
his son and heir, seemed now entirely relieved from the dominion of the monster
passion, which, as he supposed, had so long thrown that air of mystery and
reckless dejection about him.
John entered fully into his father's views, and was eager to plunge into the
bustle and business of preparation. There was, it is true, an impetus given
to his movements towards the opposite extreme, from his late sudden legarthy
and gloomy misanthropy, which an acute observer well versed in the human
heart would have distrusted, but his father was too much pleased with his
renovated spirits and new born energy, to criticise it closely.
This was the last day which he was to spend in the capital. It had been
determined, that he was to proceed at once to the fort at Germana, and there
take command of several companies of Rangers, which the Governor had
ordered to concentrate at that point, and from thence, he was to join his father
on the march.
As he walked out of the Palace gate, and up the avenue toward Gloucester
street, he had not proceeded many rods before his steps were arrested by an
object directly in his path, It was star light, and he could not see distinctly
who it was, and made an effort to pass to the right or left, but still he found
the same object in his way. He brought his face close up to the person thus
way-laying him, and now discovered that it was Wingina wrapped up in her
brother's cloak.
What, Wingina! exclaimed he, in a suppressed voice, but hoarse, from
excitement, Do you dog my footsteps? Do you watch me to my father's
home. Am I secure from your persecutions nowhere?
Oh, Capt. Spotswood! you are very unjust, very cruel. I heard you were
going to set out to-night to my own country, and I come to beg you, for God's
sake to take me along. I cannot much longer conceal my dreadful secret.
Before you get back, it will be not only discovered but I shall be killed; my
brother strongly suspects it now.
But, Wingina, Chunoluskee goes with my father as his guide, and, before
he returns, in all probability, your troubles will be over.
Alas! they will indeed be over; but my life will pass away with them.
What an inconsistent creature you are, Wingina; but lately, you
professed
to be willing to court death, and now you whine over its possible
occurrence
,
like some sick child!
It is a very different thing to court it, when the resolution is worked up to
it, and to be in continual dread of it from an angry brother of whom one has
lived in constant dread, and always under his constant authority. You know
how arbitrary it is among our race; the male over the female.
Why, he always appears mild and gentle to me, Wingina?
Aye, and so does the fiercest warrior of our tribe when mingling with
your race, but in the wigwam it is different. An Indian girl should never be
enlightened at all, unless she is to be permanently removed from the tyranny
of the wigwam. It was a thorough knowledge of this, which made me fall
so easy a prey toI will not say to you, but my love for you; and she laid
her hand gently upon his arm, and looked up in his face, as if she would fain
discover by the doubtful light, whether his mood towards her was softe ned.
Hush, Wingina; saw you not a tall shadow pass from behind the trees
towards Gloucester street?
The Indian girl wheeled her head suddenly in that direction, at the same
time clinging with both hands to the young officer's arm, as she exclaimed: It
is! it is my brother! Oh, John, I am now lost indeed, unless you save me.
I will never return in life to my brother's house.
Spotswood took her arm and hurried her along through the shadows of the
trees and across the common, until he arrived at the brick wall of the grave
yard, and following thisstill keeping close within its protecting shadow, they
were soon within its enclosure, and seated upon a low tomb stone.
Now tell me Winginaand think and speak quick, for I have not a
moment
to lose, whether you can ride on horseback?
Oh yes, indeed.
And if I procure you a suit of boy's clothes, will you wear them and pass
for my servant if I take you with me, until I can find some of your people.
At first she hung her head, as if pressed down with hopeless dejection.
Spotswood mistook her feelings and supposed that maidenly delicacy
prevented
her from at once acceding to the plan, but her thoughts were running upon
a very different point of the discussion as her next question will show. And
should we happen to meet some of our people, will you go with me and be a
great chief among them,as your father is here?
Poh, poh, Wingina, I thought you had given up all that nonsense long
ago. How can I go with you, when I am to lead part of this army over the
mountains? Come decide quick about my plan, I am to set out for Germana
to night, and if you agree to my plan, I will take you at once to an
acquaintance
of mine in the suburbs, to wait while I procure the dress and order
round the horses.
I have no choice left, Capt. Spotswood, I am compelled to go with you, I
dare not present myself before my brother again.
They were soon hurrying through the cross streets of the capital until they,
came to a small shanty occupied by an old negro woman. There they entered
and John taking the crone to one side, made her understand that she was to
observe
secrecy about what they were goining to do, and that she was to cut
off the girl's hair and assist her to put on the clothes which he would bring, so
as to have her ready by the time he came with the horses.
In about half an hour he returned and handed in a bundle to the old woman
at the door, and again hurried off.
The negro assisted, as she had been ordered, at the strange toilet of Wingina,
the first step of which was to cut off her long black hair. When it was
completed
,
it would have been difficult to find in the colony a neater and trimmer
little page than she presented. John scarcely knew her himself, when he
alighted to see that all was ready, so complete had been the metamorphosis.
Still he fould her dress not complete, for she had resisted all the old negro's
entreaties
to exchange her moccasins for a pair of boots. John soon convinced
her that, all the other changes were useless, unless she completed it by the
change proposed; that her Indian moccasins were the most dangerous mark
she could wear about her. At length she complied, but with great reluctance,
for she had been partly ruined by flattery addressed to her diminutive foot,
and her prettily ornamented moccasins. John understood well what was
passing
in her mind, and he could not avoid cursing himself, that he had undone
such a mere child of nature. The fact was, all his reflections and
observations
upon her character and peculiarities came too late. A lustful
imagination
had blinded him to every thing but her personal attractions. These
attractions
were still the same, yet how powerless now.
We must leave them to pursue their midnight journey, while we turn our
attention to the main thread of our narrative.
CHAPTER V.
A FRONTIER SETTLEMENT.
Some
three day's journey from Williamsburg, there stood a settlement
which would puzzle an European traveller of our day to tell what it was.
It was neither house, barn, stable nor fortbut a compound of the whole, or
rather of many of them. It was called in the language of the country, a
block house. There was a strong picket fence running round an open
area, and round the inside of these, built in with the fort, were various houses
or shanteessome one story and some two; the latter having loop holes to
shoot through, and commanding the approach to that side of the pallisade.
Out side again, were some twenty straggling huts or cabins, which were all
occupied in day time, but closed at night, for the owners slept within the fort.
This was not the great frontier station, Germana, to which more than one
of our characters are now wending their way, but had originally been a
trading station for similar purposes. It was now a sort of half way house, a
convenient protection for travellers as well as the small planters and traders
around.
It was about dusk several days after the one alluded to in the last chapter,
when a traveller on foot with a bundle of clothes tied up in a handkerchief
and thrown over a stick which he carried upon his shoulder, arrived at the
settlement. He was weary and wayworn and his shoes covered with the
dust of the road. About his face there was a settled dejection, at the same
time a winning grace which would have commanded the sympathy of any
one not hardened by constantly rubbing against a cold and unfeeling world.
The women and children around the block house were driving in their cows
and sheep and poultry, for at night the open area was a sort of stock pen.
Hall, for it was none other than the late Tutor, took his bundle in his hand
and rested upon his cane, watching listlessly the while, the proceedings of
the women and children in their rural occupations.
You need'nt wait for an invitation, said one of the womenthe block
house is free to all travellersthe only thing is to get something to eat when
you are in there.
And will you not furnish me, my good woman, either for love or money?
Faith and with that bonny face of yours you may well ask, but I doubt you
have been a wild blade in your day, from that same cut across your cheek.
That, my good woman, was got in no private brawl.
It matters not to me if it was, you shall have your supper all the same.
Hall was soon seated near one corner of a log fire, with his plate of
smoking viands on one end of a rude bench and himself on the other. From
the rapidity of his operations he was neither dainty nor fastidious in his
appetite
,
and what was still less romantic, he was very soon after leaning with his
head against the logs, and snoring away at a great rate. He had not long
been thus occupied, before a loud noise at the entrance announced other
arrivals, bearing which, he rose and lifted the rude seat upon which he had
been reclining to the farthest and darkest corner of the room, and again
seated himself, wrapped up in his cloak, that he might examine unobserved
the new comers. The same woman soon after entered, ushering in Capt.
Spotswood and the young Indian, followed by his servant bearing his
portmanteau
.
Every one about the place was soon afoot when it was ascertained that
the son of the Governor was within the block, and he consequently found no
difficulty in obtaining such accommodations as the place afforded. He walked
round the enclosure and examined into the condition of the place. He found
the lowest state of discipline prevailing, and since the erection of the fort at
Germana, and the general peace with the Indians, that all precautionary
measures had been abandoned, and the place literally turned into a fold for
cattle, rather than a military post. One of the primary Indian schools was
also kept at this place, and this also he found in the most languishing
condition
.
For an hour he was engaged examining the orderly who had charge of
the establishment, and the master who had charge of the school, together
with such Rangers as were left, their horses, equipments, &c., in order to
ascertain if he could press any of them into the service of the expedition.
The horses he found to consist of some dozen wretched skeletons, which he
declared the ravens were only prevented from carrying off by their poverty.
The arms were very little better; the holsters of one soldier carried a single
pistol without a flintanother presented his sword rusty and without scabbard
or belt, and so on. John swore, that Falstaff's company were veteran soldiers
compared to this remnant of the Rangers of the district. While he was
laughing alternately over the ridiculous figure which they cut, and cursing
the orderly by whose neglect such a state of things had been brought about,
a gentleman and his servant rode into the enclosure, without let or hindrance.
Ah, Lee, said John as he recognized that young gentleman, as he came
full under the reflection of the pine torches which one of the wiry haired
urchins of the forest borejust from the capital?
No Captain Spotswood, I left the city several days ago, and come now
from another direction, but what have you here, is it possible your are marching
toward the frontier with such a troop as this!
Oh, no, not so bad as that eitherand he laughed immoderately at the
ideaI was only inspecting the condition of the garrison, to see how many
troops I could muster into my father's tramontane army. You see he has litle
dependence in this quarterten equestrian skeletonstwelve Rangers, with
ragged uniformsone stupid orderly, (or disorderly,)five rusty sabresthree
pistol barrelsand saddles which it would puzzle a philosopher to tell which
would win the victorythey, by cutting the horses in two, or the horses by
cutting them in two. If the enemies of the expedition could only have
paraded this troop upon the Capitol green, while the subject was under
discussion, they would have turned the whole thing into ridicule. Here
both the young gentlemen and even the soldiers and servants went off into a
merry fit of laughter, in the midst of which the torch light review was
adjourned, and the two young gentlemen retired to the same room into which
we have already introduced previous arrivals. John cast a hasty glance round
the apartment, in order to whisper a few words into the ear of his page, but
it was entirely empty, with the exception of Lee and himself. He saw that
the sleeping traveller had vanished as well as the person whom he sought,
but the circumstance made no impression, and he remarked not upon it
apparently satisfied that his young protegee had discretion enough to keep out
of sight of those by whom they were known.
Hall had quietly withdrawn, upon perceiving through the logs of the hut,
the new additions to the party. He remained in the shadow of one of the
buildings, until he saw the two young men fairly seated at their rude supper,
and then without any guide or conductor, entered what appeared to be one of
the most remote and retired buildings of the establishment, and threw himself
down upon some straw already spread upon the floor, and worn out with
fatigue and exhaustion of mind and body, fell into one of those profound
slumbers
which only those know who inure their bodies to labor and fatigue.
Rude as his couch was, he had accidentally stumbled into the best chamber in
the establishment, and that one appropriated as the sleeping apartment of the
stranger and wayfarer. One by one the other travellers found their way into
the same apartment. Each one as he entered rolled his cloak about him and
threw himself upon the straw without inquiry as to his bedfellows. Few even
of the gentry at the time of which we write, but had roughed it, after a
similar fashion, whenever business or pleasure led them toward the frontier,
and though this was by no means on the extreme borders of civilization, yet
the settlements were becoming few and far between, and even these were
mostly upon the low lands of the rivers. Upon nearly every public road,
there was to he found at convenient distances, these military posts, and the
traveller through the wilderness did not inquire in the morning before setting
out, how many miles to such a tavern, but if it is possible to arrive at such
and such a block house before night. His provisions for the noon meal, and
often for the day and night, he carried with him.
After all the male portion of our travellers were snugly stowed away upon
their straw pallets, and more than one of them giving loud evidence of the
sincerity with which they worshipped at the shrine of the drowsy God
Wingina, with the stealthy tread of a cat, entered the same apartment.
Spotswood had secretly sought a few words with her ere he retired to rest, and
positively ordered the arrangements differently, and the poor, care-worn creature
had indeed endeavored to find repose elsewhere, but an undefinable dread of
coming evil, which her superstitious nature could neither withstand nor resist,
prevented her from sleeping so far away from the only protector which she
had in this world, and she surreptitiously entered as we have seen. She
paused at the threshold, to listen to the deep breathing and loud snoring of the
sleepers to assure herself that they all slept ere she laid herself down to follow
their example. A blanket nailed across the entrance, supplied the place of a
a door, and neither sentry nor guard was stationed there, or at the great
entrance of the block-house, though she had heard Capt. Spotswood positively
order the sergeant, that a corporal's guard should do alternate duty at the
gate. She had gone the rounds herself, and if any sentry pretended to guard
the great entrance, he slept too soundly to be disturbed by her light tread.
She walked among the sleepers and stooped to examine their countenances
by the star light, until she could find the one she sought.
The first one she examined was Hall, and she gazed upon his face and
hastily withdrew to the one who slept nextit was the one she sought. Long
and earnestly she gazed upon the sleeping countenance of him she loved, by
the doubtful light afforded. She crouched down beside him, and watched
over his slumbers for some time, occasionally, however, her eye roaming over
the other sleepers. Becoming accustomed to the darkness of the place, she
soon discovered the various positions of the parties. Lee slept on the other
side of Spotswood, from that occupied by Hall, but at a greater distance; and
further still, towards the door, lay the two servants. Folding a cloak about her
person, which Spotswood had furnished her for the purpose, she laid herself
down immediately across the door way so that should she even fall asleep, she
might be the first aroused by any one moving, and thus escape before it was
clearly daylight. She, too, was worn out by the fatigues of the long and
weary days' journey and though for a while wakeful with her foreboding
fancies
,
nature, or rather matter, obtained the mastery over mind, and she slept as
sound as the rest.
CHAPTER VI.
A DARK DEED.
An
hour before day-light next morning, Hall rose from his straw couch and
bundling up his small stock of clothes, and taking his staff in hand, carefully
stole out of the room which he now, to his surprise, discovered, was occupied
by other sleepers. It was yet very dark, and a drizzling rain was falling as
he walked abroad into the wild dark forest. He took the road toward
Germana
,
and travelled along with cheerfulness and alacrity, rejoiced to think
how fortunate he had been to escape the observation of his pursuer, for he
doubted not, that Henry Lee was seeking him for some purpose or other.
The circumstances of a young man must be unfortunate indeed, and the
weather far more unpropitious than that described, if exercise in the early
morning does not produce a bright rebound of the spirits. Hall experienced
bright and glowing sensations, as he trudged along the muddy road; having
left his enemies far behind, as he supposed, and anticipating great pleasure in
once more beholding his friends of the voyage and the masking adventure, and,
above all, he pictured to himself, that calm and delightful repose which he
thought must surely be found in a settlement so far removed from the scenes
of trade, and politics, and intrigue, which he was so rapidly casting behind
him. There, said he, I will live, in the profound solitudes of nature,
where the turbulent passions of men come not to disturb mewhere I may
hope to escape from the storm which has so long tossed me about at its
pleasure
.
There the consequences of the one great error of my life cannot pursue
methere nature in her primitive simplicity and purity reigns forever; beneath
my humble log cabin I may sit and smoke my pipe in peace, until these
lowering
clouds have passed away. But while we leave him to pursue his
onward way through the forest, as well as the train of reflections upon which
he struck, we will glance at the block-house once more, which he had just left.
About day-light a shrill scream was heard from the sleeping room alluded
to, which roused every inmate within the stockade, even to the drowsy
sontinel
at the gate.
It was a prolonged and agonized scream, such as is never heard except
on occasions of mortal extremity. How quickly the ear detects these heralds
of death or disaster. Instantly the shantees and cabins were seen to pour
out their tenants as if roused by one simultaneous impulse, all rushing toward
the place from whence the sound issued.
Some fifteen or twenty persons in all, were assembled, crowding thickly round
some object which lay upon the floor. Among the others stood Harry Lee,
gesticulating wildly, and his eye dilated with horror and astonishment.
Immediately in the centre of the group lay the body of John Spotswood,
wrapped up in the same cloak which he had borrowed from Lee the night
before (having lent his own to Wingina) and perfectly dead. He had been
killed by a single blow of a dagger driven through his heart, and sent with
such force that the long formidable weapon (worn in those days by Indian
fighters,) had actually penetrated the floor and pinioned him to the puncheons
beneath. As if the attrocity of the deed was not sufficient, an attempt had been
made to mutilate his person by a circular incision upon his crown.
*
*
The attrocious circumstances of young Spotswood's murder, have not been at all
exaggerated
by us.
Lee immediately ordered a guard posted at the entrance of the fort, and that,
no one should be permitted to escape until he had investigated the matter,
about which he immediately set to work. He found that the room had been
occupied by two sleepers who had already escaped, and the woman had
proceeded
no farther in her description of the one who had lain next to the
deceased
,
than the whiskers and the big scar, before Lee called to the orderly and
commanded him to divide his corps into two bodies, and pursue the fugitive
until he should find him, and bring him back, dead or alive.
The other absentee was described as a small Indian boy, and as having come
with the deceased officer himself. Lee was sorely puzzled to imagine who
this could be, and Spotswood's servant could give him no information, except
that he had been picked up in the capital, just before they had set out, and that
he had ridden with his master more as a companion than a servant. The
woman who had received the travellers on the previous evening, and from whose
throat the scream had issued, stated that the boy had slept in another apartment,
by Capt. Spotswood's own orders, while one of the servants declared that he
had seen him lying across the door-way of that very room, during the night.
The instrument with which the deed had been committed, was a silver
mounted
two edged dagger, highly ornamented, which several recollected, and Lee
himself knew to have been worn by the deceased himself.
From this circumstance, some of those present were disposed to believe
that the deceased had committed the rash act upon his own person, but this
surmise was put entirely at rest, by the gash upon the head, as well as
several
distinct finger marks upon the throat, showing that whoever had
perpetrated
it; had held his victim by a powerful grasp, to prevent noise while the
blow was inflicted.
Hall had deviated from the great military road to take a near cut by an
Indian path, and thus his pursuers passed him. About ten o'clock in the
morning he again emerged into the great thoroughfare, (if two wagon ruts
through a pine forest could be called such) and was seated, with his bundle
open before him, and helping himself to some cold provisions with which he
was provided. He ate with great relish and a fine appetite, and seemed to be
disturbed by naught under the sun. The drizzling clouds had blown away,
and he looked forward to a cheerful and happy day, amidst the almost
unexplored
beauties of nature; in one of her wildest and grandest phases. His
spirit was buoyant with the idea that at last he had cast off the cares of
civilized life and above all, that he had broken loose from those entangling
meshes, either of designing men, or fortuitous circumstances, under which
he had so long suffered. There was a shade of sadness over his face it is
true, it could hardly be otherwise with one who had so lately and so severely
sufferedhe was more cheerful, however, than at any former period when
presented to the reader. He rejoiced in the anticipation of soon enjoying the
society of two persons who were now situated so much like himselfMr.
Elliot and his charming daughter. He recollected well the wiser determination
of the old gentleman, when they last parted, to abandon at once the crowded
thoroughfares of life, and the arguments they had held upon the subject, and
he now freely confessed, that the elder was the wiser man of the two. But
he had objects to accomplish in daring the frowns of that society, which he
had offended, and many of those objects he had more than accomplished,
while on the other hand his adventure had resulted more disastrously, in some
respects, than he could have anticipated. One subject gave him poignant
regret; it was the difficulty of his now accompanying the tramontane
expedition
.
His heart had been fixed upon the Governor's grand scheme, and he
had forseen that it would be an admirable offset, could he distinguish himself
in that enterprise, for the real offence which he had committed against society.
Alas, he little imagined that he was soon about to be brought to the bar of
justice, for the commission of a crime far more heinous than any with which
he had yet been charged. With all his previous sufferings, he was not fully
aware of those strange and mysterious links which observing men have
discovered
in the chain of successive misfortunes, insomuch that no adage is
of more common use than that misfortunes never come single-handed. It
is a most inexplicable law of Providence. There is such a crisis of greater
or less magnitude in the life of every man. Doubtless, to brave and noble
spirits, these storms are tempered with more severity than those decreed to
the shorn lamb. One thing is certain, that no one ever attains to
preeminence
in this world, without having passed through this terrible gauntlet.
Tamer spirits shrink from them, or succumb at once, while the more daring
18
and heroic natures bare their hearts to the storm, and manfully buffet them to
the last.
Hall was still seated at his rude and homely breakfast, when he heard the
distant tramp of horses. His eye was first directed down the road towards the
stockade which he had left in the morning, seeing nothing in that direction
but the long and monotonous road, he turned his eyes to the other end, and
soon perceived five or six horsemen galloping towards him. His mind was
relieved at once on perceiving that they belonged to his own race, for he had
been for a few moments painfully reflecting how defenceless was his
condition
,
should the new comers prove to be Indians with any hostile intent.
The whole guard immediately dismounted and proceeded deliberately to
tie their horses to each other, while the sergeant walked up and tapping him
upon the shoulder, pronounced him his prisoner. When informed of the death
of Capt. Spotswood, and that he was charged with the murder, he was
awestruck
.
A clap of thunder and a bolt falling at his feet from a cloudless sky,
could not have more truly astonished him; but when informed farther, by the
sergeant, that his face was even then sprinkled with the blood of his victim,
his whole frame trembled like an aspen, under a superstitious dread of that
unseen power which seemed so relentlessly to pursue him.
CHAPTER VII.
RETURN TO THE CAPITAL.
Hall
was mounted upon one of the trooper's horses, and conveyed back to
the stockade. When brought into the room where the diabolical deed had
been perpetrated, no one could express more horror and astonishment than
the prisoner. Up to that moment a sort of stupefaction had seized upon his
facultieshe scarcely seemed to believe that the murder had actually been
committed, or if he did, could not fully realize the fact in all its dreadful
particulars
,
until he saw them with his own eyes; much less could he realize the
position in which he stood, and those circumstances tending to induce the
belief that he had done it. When he heard the evidence detailed, he was
scarcely surprised that others suspected him, for he would have suspected
another under similar circumstances. It made him almost superstitious, when
his faculties were sufficiently relieved from the astounding blow to
contemplate
it, that any one could be placed in such a situation. If he had been
disposed to fatalism, here was ample materials to fortify his philosophy, but we
have seen already how he scouted the tempter under circumstances much less
urgent. So overpowering was the first weight of the blow, that the fact of
Henry Lee, his chief enemy, appearing as his accuser, witness, and judge,
for the time being, scarcely attracted his attention. All these minor affairs
were swallowed up in the astounding fact, that he must appear to the world as
a murderer. Then there came over him the recollection of all the late
disasters from which he had just escaped, but which now, when once brought
back before they were cleared up, would appear as so many corroborating
circumstances. When asked by Lee to explain the position in which he
found himself, he sank into a seat and covered his face with his hands. He
was bewildered and confounded. To the spectators, this looked exactly as
they supposed he might; it had a very natural appearance for a murderer,
who, if not detected in the very act, was apprehended with the blood of his
victim still upon his hands. At length, however, he rallied, and made an effort
to tell all that had happened within his knowledge during the previous night.
He stated that he had sought the room in which he slept for the purpose of
privacy, and that so far from seeking to have any thing to do with the other
travellers, that he had particularly designed to avoid them by going there
that he was entirely unaware that the room was occupied at a later period of
the night by others, until he awakened about an hour before the break of day
that as soon as he discovered it, he stepped lightly over the sleepers as he
supposed them to be, and pursued his journey straightway. He professed to
know nothing of the other traveller who was missingthe young Indian
that he had neither seen him during the night, nor in the morning. He heard
no noise in the night, and was, he said, entirely unconscious how the blood
came upon his facethat he was as much shocked and surprised to find it
there as any one, and was wholly unable to explain it. He called the
attention
of those around him, however, to the fact, that his cloak, in which he
slept, was also stained with blood, which he had discovered since his arrest
that it was impossible for him to have committed the murder, wrapped up as
ho wasthat the stains upon the garment corresponded exactly with the
position
which he had described as the one in which he sleptand that his hands
and not his face would have been stainedhis other garments, and not his
cloak, had he been the murderer. He stated, also, that there was no ill will
between him and Capt. Spotswoodthat the last interview between them had
been of a friendly nature, and that he had actually left Temple Farm on the
Captain's business.
The whole of this statement, and much more which we have omitted, was
written down at the time by Henry Lee, and signed by the prisoner; after
which, he was secured on horsebackthe corpse put into a cart, and with a
guard of half dozen troopers, set out upon their return to the capital.
It is much easier to conceive than describe the sensations of Hall, as he thus
began to realize the fact that he was a prisoner once more, and for an
ignominious
offence.
At first, his whole nature shrunk from the disgrace and exposure, and he
thought that he never could or would survive its publicity. He could not help
contrasting his present situationriding between two troopers and tied upon his
horse, like a petty larceny thiefwith his youthful days, when he had travelled
surrounded by those willing and anxious to minister to his slightest wish.
He thought, too, of his late bold promises to himself, while in jail, and how
brave then he thought his spirit. But merciful heaven, who could have
conceived that I should ever be brought to this! and with this inward
exclamation
,
he wrung his manacled hands, and the scalding tears ran down his
manly cheeks. But this melting mood did not last longthe mind under the
heaviest depression rebounds exactly in proportion to that depression, just as
the spring of a piece of machinery when bent with great force in one
direction
flies back in the opposite direction with a corresponding force. For a
while his heart sunk down and down, until there was a blackness over all
the landscapethe sun itself seemed to shine unnaturallythough it had
cleared off beautifully since the morning. The ribald jests of the vulgar men
at his side sounded ill-timed. It seemed to him as if the world itself was
coming to an end, and talking of the things of to-morrow, the greatest
absurdity
imaginable. There are few people in this world of sorrow and trouble,
who have not experienced more or less of this feeling, just as they happen to
be endowed with much or little sensibility, and to be tried with heavy or light
afflictions.
Black and dreary would be the colors of the landscape in such a case, did
not the tender and gentle emotions of the heart glide in to soften it. Hall
was speedily approaching a point of recklessness and desperation, which
would but poorly have prepared him to fulfil the high and heroic resolves of
his prison chamber, until his memory began to wander back along the bright
and glowing path of his youthful days. Then it was that the tears burst
forthand they were succeeded by a calm repose and a high settled purpose
of endurance and perseverance to the end. He thought that the wheel of
fortuneto speak in the language of the worldwas now down to its nadir,
and must needs soon commence its revolution towards the zenith.
He had ample time to summon up his courage and his energies, for they
were nearly three days in making their way back to the capitalvery little
faster than Hall had walked the same distance.
It is impossible to describe the consternation produced in the city by the
news that Hall had murdered the son of the Governor. How it got there no
one knew, but such news always seems to be borne ahead by some winged
messenger. We have known
rumors
of such facts outstrip any possible
carthly conveyance.
The cart conveying the corpse was surrounded by hundreds before it
entered even the suburbs of the city, and Hall found himself a spectacle for
idle boys and negroes to gaze at, even before he had entered the scene where
he had expected it. For this abject humiliation, he was wholly unprepared.
He could have raet the scorn of gentlemen with scorn, but against the jeers
and ribaldry of the mob he had nothing to opposehe was wholly defenceless.
Public opinion was fast gathering head against himeager gossips picked
up the horrid details from the soldiers and negroes who accompanied the
corpse, as the more respectable persons drawn thither by the crowd caught a
few brief words and an ominous shake of the head or two from Harry Lee.
While the cart containing the body rested in the public square, Lee rode on
to the Palace, to communicate the heart-rending news. The scene which
there preseuted itself beggars descriptionthe news had preceded him, and
the ladies of the mansion were already frantic with grief. His ears were
saluted with the wild shrieks of despair, and the Governor was locked up in
his room and would not see even him. He sent him a message to take the
prisoner before a magistrate, and have him examined.
This was done accordingly, and the same evidence detailed which we have
already condensed. Not the slightest hesitation was manifested by the
magistrate in making out Hall's commitment, for there appeared no redeeming
circumstances whatever, save those thrown into his former statement, which
of course passed for nothing, at the present stage of the proceedings.
The unfortunate, or the guilty young man, as the case might be, was loaded
with irons, and deposited in the same prison which he had left but a few days
before. Very few persons ventured to question his guiltindeed, the general
opinion settled down at once, that Hall had killed young Spotswood, in mistake
for Harry Lee; there was very little room for surmise in the matterthere
was no one else to suspectno one else upon whom suspicion could fasten.
There were some mysterious and unexplained circumstances attending the
dreadful deed, as there generally is attending all murders, such as the presence
of the Indian boy. Public ingenuity was at fault in fastening upon any one
whom the description would suit, and that feature of the tragedy was soon
overlooked or forgotten in the absorbing horror of the plain, straight forward
matters of fact. The previous circumstances connected with the history of
the prisonersuch as his reputed change of nameobtaining money under
false pretences, with a hundred other things which he had never donesoon
accumulated into such a torrent of public indignation, that his personal safety
might have been endangered in a large and more populous city. In a few days,
however, this all settled down into the undoubted conviction, that John
Spotswood
,
the son of the Governor of Virginia, had been murdered by a young
man named Hall, who had found his way into the Governor's family as private
tutor.
CHAPTER VIII.
VISIT TO THE PRISONER.
There
was one strange circumstance almost contemporary with the murder,
which ingenious minds endeavored to connect in some way with that
mysterious affair. Three nights before the deed was perpetrated, every
Indian pupil in the college absconded, and had not since been heard of. The
interpreter, his mother and sister, were also missing. If the desertion from
the College had taken place a few days earlier, so that any of them could
have arrived at the
half way
station, then the presence of the mysterious boy
might have been accounted for, but all the testimony tended to prove that
Spotswood himself had conveyed the boy there, and it was clearly impoesible
that any one of Mr. Boyle's disciples, (as they were called,) could have
reached there on the very night of leaving the city. As the public mind
became calmer, all these things were discussed, without however elucidating
the dark deed much more than the first investigation had done.
Same few persons maintained Hall's innocence, even under present adverse
circumstances, and notwithstanding the cloud of witnesses who were ready
to appear against him. Among the most staunch and active of these, was
old Doctor Evylin, who busied himself in his behalf, by setting about a private
investigation into the mysterious circumstances attending the murderthose
that as yet had no light thrown upon them from the first moment of the
occurrence. Such as the affair of the Indian boyand the disappearance of
the pupils from the College. The sagacious old man knew that if these two
circumstances could be unravelled in all their bearings, that much light
would be thrown upon the dark transaction, but all his inquiries were fruitless,
Spotswood had taken such precautions, when he left the city, that it was
impossible to trace the place from whence he had procured the boy, and all
the preparations of the Indian pupils had been conducted with such secrecy,
that not a trace of them could be obtained, nor could any cause be imagined
for their sudden departure. There had been no very recent outbreak between
the two races in College, indeed there had been for the few days preceding
their departure, uncommon quiet and peace.
The Doctor had paid one visit to the prisoner in jail, in order to learn
something from which he might persue his investigations more
understandingly
,
but except the plain tale which he had already told he could say nothing.
The Doctor found him in rather a strange state of mind, for one of his
intelligence
,he
seemed to think, that as he had been placed in his present
unfortunate
position by the unforeseen concurrence of providential circumstances,
that his deliverance would come from the same quarter, and by means equally
startling and mysterious. The Doctor endeavored to reason him out of this
superstitious looking for of miracles, and to convince him, that the exertions
of himself and friends must be in proportion to the strength of the testimony
which would be brought against him; but it was to very little purpose, for up
to the termination of the interview, the prisoner maintained a state alternating
between mental stupor, and that wild dreamy hopefulness already described.
The old man left the prison, much affected and deeply pained for the condition
in which he found him, he in fact feared mental alineation. Nevertheless, he
went to work as industriously as ever, but with the same results as before.
He at length determined to try what a visit from his daughter would do in the
way of bringing the prisoner to a plain common sense view of his situation.
She had already been struggling in the same unpromising cause, but she was
now precluded from her usual resource, of consulting with Kate, as the family
at the mansion, were wrapt up in profound grief, and of course could not be
expected to take any part in the endeavor to exculpate the supposed anthor
of their afflictions. No one knew what their opinions were, as to his guilt or
innocenceindeed, as is usually the case, under such circumstances, they
thought very little about the perpetrator of the deed; their thoughts were
wholly absorbed by the death of one so near and dear to them, and it mattered
little how the sad event had been brought about. The funeral was just over,
and they were not visible to any body, except Ellenshe was like one of the
family, but of course Hall's name was now one of those dread talismanic
words which brought all the horrid tragedy to view in revivified colors, not
because of any revengeful feelings towards him
profound grief is incapable
of revenge
but that the associations of his name alone were painful. Ellen
was thus, so far as female council was concerned, thrown upon her own
resources, and she naturally turned to her father, that dear confidential friend
from whom she concealed no secrets. She found him already actively engaged
in the business, and forthwith they united their councils. She was not so
ready to adopt the old gentleman's suggestion of a visit to the jail, as he had
expected, but when he described the alternate lethargic and wild moods into
which the prisoner was plunged, she consented at once.
It was after dark, and they found him sitting upon his wretched three legged
stool, and a small taper burning on the table, within reach of the chains which
hung down from his hands. His feet were free, and he could walk round a
semicircle of four or five feet. On the table was a bible open, and upon it his
eyes rested as they entered.
Oh, said the old Doctor, I am glad to see you so much more profitably
employed than at my last visit; but see here I have brought you a visitor to
cheer a solitary hour.
Ellen was leaning heavily upon her father's arm, her veil still drawn close
over her face. Hall made an inclination of the head, and rose and stepped
forward as if to seize her hand, but was jerked suddenly back by his chains, his
head fell immediately upon his chest, and the scalding tears stole down his
cheeks.
All reserve was gone from Ellen at this sight, and she threw back her veil
and her ringlets, and advanced and offered him both her hands. He seized
and held them for some time; when he raised his face again, it was almost
convulsed, so fearful was the working of his spirit, brought to a full
consciousness
of his position by the presence of one who had once before, as it were,
brought him back to life and hope. At length he spokeYour presence
here, Miss Evylin, is an assurance to me, that at least, there is one of your
sex, who believes me innocent of the horrid crime laid to my charge.
Oh, Mr Hall, we have never for one moment supposed you capable of
crime, much less such an one as this.
Miss Evylin, I have tried to think, but I cannot. My faculties are
benumbed
by the appalling severity of the blow. I have tried in vain to rally my
scattered thoughts, and reflect over my past life, to try and ascertain what I
have really done to deserve the affictions which have fallen in such quick
succession upon me.
The judgments of the Almighty are not always proportioned exactly to
our past offences, they have also reference to the future.
Ah, Miss Evylin, when the poor faculties of the mind are paralyzed as
mine have been, it is very difficult to discern nicely, the designs of the great
and mysterious power, which rules us. If my sufferings are indeed but the
chastening rod, administered in mercy and not in anger, it seems to me that the
punishment has been meeted out rather beyond my capacity.
It is only your sex, replied Ellen quickly, that runs into these nice
hairsplitting
questions, ours seize upon the broad lines before uswe see, and see
quickly, that this is a world of suffering and not of pleasureof probation and
not of enjoyment. Yours only finds that out in old age, but the heaviest
denunciations of the curse falling upon us, we are endowed with quicker
perceptions of the uses of this world.
If it is wholly a world of trial and not of enjoyment, as you say, it appears
to me as if there were studied deception about it.
You astonish me.
I say it in no irreverent spirit, I merely speak the honest impressiona of
my mindyour views are somewhat new to me, and I frankly present the
difficulties in the way.
I am impatient to hear them.
Look at the beauty of the natural world around usthe clear blue sky
the pure airthe solemn and magnificent oceanthe towering mountains
the majestic riversthe beautiful meadowsthe sweet landscapes, and then
dot them over with flocks and herds, and scatter here and there a few of man's
handy worksa ruinous tower, an old vine clad castle, around which the
memorles of the past may gather, and tell me if this beautiful, beautiful globe,
looks as if it had been made for the grand penitentiary of our race.
I do not perceive the point at which you aim.
It is the inconsistency between God's natural and moral governments.
If this is indeed but one great prison house for the purification of our race
from sin, why is it not clothed in the habiliments of the penitentiary?
Why, Mr Hall! would you have the heavens hung eternally in black,
our mountains dark precipices and beetling cragsour rivers driving torrents;
our beautiful landscapes nothing but dreary wilds, inhabited by howling
monsters? Why this would lead the thoughts down to hell, and not up to
heaven. Think of the first glories of the natural world upon your own heart,
give scope to your imagination and reinvest the pictures which you have just
drawn, and see and feel if they do not point to heaven and tell of God! All
the poetry of this lifethe real poetryis nothing more than the
overpowering
aspirations after still brighter regions and sunnier skies, elicited by the
faint sketches which we catch here and there from these beauties which are
scattered around us for this very purpose. Poetry is the true language of
heaven, and not a breath of inspiration ever fed to man, but was drawn, if
not from God, at least from his glorious works.
Hall forgot for the time his sorrows and his chains. He replied, You
overpower my benumbed faculties with your delightful enthusiasm, but still
my reason is not wholly convinced. We know that deception is the result
of all the beauties of nature of which we have been speaking. Men bow
down before these bountiful works of God and forget the maker in that which
he has made. Does it not seem to our poor mortal vision, that it would have
been better, had the scene of our probation been less seductive?
Why what difference does it make whether the sufferings with which we
are surrounded are of a spiritual or a physical nature. Surely there is mercy
as well as wisdom in the present arrangement. If we are in a penitentiary,
as you call it, it is certainly mercy to us that our prison house is so beautiful,
and filled and surrounded with so many comforts. God does not wish to
punish but to purify us. Moreover, when our trials are mostly of a spiritnal
nature, it enables the great ruler of our destinies to measure out the
chastisement
to the capacity of the creature. If all nature had been shrouded in
gloom and our physical necessities constantly kept on the stretch as the meana
of purifying us for a better state of existence, then all men must have been
afflicted alike, and the poor grovelling unintellectual creatures of our race
have suffered unnecessarily. As it is, only those who are highly endowed,
ever suffer the afflictions which surround you. You never saw a mere
animal
man schooled and purified in this manner. There is no truer precept in
that holy book, than the one which says, `whom the Lord loveth he
chasteneth
.
Rest assnred, Sir, that you are reserved for some great purpose yet,
even in this world. I have suffered in the same school, and therefore I have
presumed to lecture you.
May God always send me such a teacher!
The old physician meanwhile, slowly walked the narrow cell, and
occasionally
as some remark of one or other of the speakers arrested his attention, he
leaned his hands upon his cane and his chin upon his hands, raising up his
benevolent visage between the speakers, with a beaming smile lightening up
the parchment like wrinkles. He was delighted to see how Ellen, with all a
woman's tact, succeeded in her errand, so much better than he had done.
You see, Mr. Hall, said the old man, that we do not even entertain the
question of your guilt or innocence, we take it for granted that you are
unfortunate
and not criminal, but, my dear Sir, you know enough of the world to
be aware that the public is not so easily satisfied, where appearances are
against a man. You must now look about you, and take the necessary steps
to make your innocence apparent; and, if possible, ferret out the real criminal.
Have you no suspicions of any one?
None in the world. I am as ignorant of the person who murdered
Spotswood
the
manner of its accomplishmentand nearly all the attendant
circumstances
,
as your innocent daughter. I was so shocked and benumbed on the
morning of my arrest, that I scarcely noted the wretched details taken down
by Henry Lee; and since then I have had less opportunity than others to
learn anything of them.
Have you any suspicion that Lee himself did the deed? and the old man
stopped and looked searchingly into his face, as he waited for his answer.
Hall mused a moment, and then replied, No, nohe could not be guilty
of such a crime, he had no earthly motive. Had it been me, now, that was
killed, I am not so sure that he would not be liable to suspicionhastily
checking himself, he said, but no, it is too bad, I must do even him the justice
to say, that he could not commit murder upon his enemy.
Ellen's beaming eye rewarded him for his magnanimous admission, as she
said, you are right, Mr. Lee, with all his faults, is no murderer; but think
you he will be as generous towards you on the day of trial?
I know not, nor does it matter muchluckily, neither my condemnation
nor deliverance will come from him. My reliance is upon the discovery of
the real criminal.
Well, Mr. Hall, continued the Doctor, if you can throw no light upon
the murder, at least you can relieve yourself from your doubtful position
before that time. I understand from your counsel whom I sent to you, that
all suspicious circumstances anterior to the date of the murder become now
of immense importance, and
Hall waved his hand impatientlyNo more! no more! my dear Sir. Had
this thing not happened, then indeed it might have become me to clear my
good name from reproach, and to tell you the truth. I only waited to hear from
the other side of the water to do so, but now I must begin the work of
purification
at the bottom. If I am destined to die the death of a felon, it will
make very little difference in what light I stood previously. If, on the other
hand, it is the will of Providence to point out the real criminal, so that I may
stand forth before all men, free even from a shade of suspicion, then I will
indeed resume my station in society.
He was much agitated while touching upon these delicate matters, and
walked the length of his chains like a chafed lien in his cage, and when he had
concluded, threw himself upon his rude seat, and buried his face in his hands.
The father and daughter seeing his deep distress, approached to take their
leave. He rose up, and taking both of Ellen's hands within his, shook them
with great feeling, and evidently struggling to maintain his composure, and
then wrung the old man's hand, without uttering a word.
As the two left the prison, the former said, Did you ever see such a man
as that, in like circumstances beforesuch an one charged with a crime so
wholly foreign to his whole nature.
Ah, my Ellen, if you will look through the State Trials of our father-land,
you will find gentlemen and noblemen, whose whole lives gave the lie to the
charges brought against them, and guilty, too, and for which they suffered.
It is not that upon which I found my confidence of his innocence, it is the
absence of all motive.
But they say, he supposed it was Harry Lee, because poor John was
wrapped up in his cloak.
Aye, but did you hear him just now say, that he could not suspect Lee
of the deed, and would a man murder another of whose character he was thus
tender. No, no, my child, he neither committed it intentionally nor by mistake.
Thus they discussed the subject until a late hourbetween them devising
the best means they could to assist the prisoner on the morrow, when he was
to be brought out for examination before the Grand Inquest of the County, or
rather of the Colony, for the General Court had jurisdiction to its utmost
limits.
CHAPTER IX.
TRIAL FOR LIFE.
It
is sufficient to say, that a true bill was found against the prisoner for the
murder of John Spotswood, and as the evidence was pretty much the same
as detailed at both trials, we will not fatigue the reader with the long
preliminaries
of the law's proverbial delay, but convey him at once to the
court-room
,
where Hall was put upon his final trial for life. Some time had
intervened
since he was last presented to the readerin that time a good deal of
alteration had taken place in his personal appearance. He was very well
dressed, but looked thin and pale. Never at any time robust, care,
confinement
,
and excessive wear and tear of mind and body, had reduced him
to great attenuationhis large whiskers, and the scar across his face,
made him look cadaverous, as he stood up to plead guilty or not guilty to
the chargethe latter of which he did in a deep, clear, manly voice, which
rung through the court-room with something of the assurance of innocence to
those who were interested in his fate. It was impossible for disinterested
strangers, or those who were no way pledged against him, to look upon that
intellectual foreheadclear sparkling eyefine chiselled, and new wax-like
featureswithout being interested in his fate. Nevertheless, there was
something
unnatural about his appearancehis eye was wild and bright, and his
mouth was compressed with a solemn compactness, such as often produces a
painful impression when looking at fine statuary. Those best acquainted
with him were struck with his appearance; and Moore, in the benevolence of
his heart, and shaken in his faith by the reputed unanswerable testimony
against him, moved round to where he saw old Dr. Evylin sitting, and asked
him if he did not think that there was a maniacal look about the prisoner's
eyes, which might account for the deed of guilt. The old man gazed long
and steadily at him, and then shook his head, and turning to Moore, whispered
to him, that Hall was as innocent of the death of John Spotswood as he was,
who was more than a hundred miles distant.
Over this court the Governor usually presided in person, but on the present
occasion, the chair was occupied by the venerable Commissary, the senior
counsellor, surrounded by his associates. No difficulty was made by Hall
19
whatever to empannelling the jury, notwithstanding the earnest remonstrances
of his counsel and the old Doctor, who came across the court-room and seated
himself near them.
The room was crowded to suffocation, and not a few of those present, ladies
of the first families of the Colony. Ellen Evylin was not there, she could
not trust herself, or rather her father would not trust her, but she had
delegated
her zeal and interest in the issue of the cause to the keeping of her
venerable parent. She followed him to the gate issuing into the street, as he
was leaving home to come to the court-house, and hung upon his arm, and
charged and enjoined upon the old gentleman to leave nothing updone to make
Hall's innocence manifest. Recollect father, said she calling after him,
that it is not enough merely to pronounce such a man not guilty, but he
must be raised above suspicion; and remember, too, that if it becomes
necessary
to show Harry Lee in his true character, I must be summoned. Be sure
I will not shrink from the trial in such an extremity.
All eyes were turned towards the prisoner, when he rose as before descrided
to respond to the challengeseldom, or never before, had such a prisoner
stood within that bar. There had, it is true, been interesting trials; for the
old Roman at the head of the Colony had just hung in chains six pirates, who
had infested the coast during the previous years of his administration, and
who had been pursued and caught through his energy alone, but never had
there stood such a man charged with such an offence within that bar before.
There was a death-like stillness pervading the room, (after the crowd had
become once settled down,) showing the absorbing interest of the trial even
to the multitude. This multitude, however, was of a higher grade than usually
made up the throng of the court-house, for the tramontane army was to set
out as soon as the Governor was sufficiently resfored to himself to conduct it;
and most of the youthful chivalry of the Colony were presentthe very men
who were soon to march across the great Apalachee.
Hall seemed to feel that far more than life was upon the issue of that trial.
It might have been seen in his countenance, that charaeter and standing in
society once gone, he would not value mere animal life at a pin's fee.
The Attorney General rose and stated the case of the crown plainly and
succinctly. He lamented that he was called upon by imperative duty to lend
his professional efforts to unfold a career of crime almost unexampled on this
side of the water, especially among that class which he had understood the
prisoner was so well calculated to adorn. He said he had heard of his elegant
accomplishments and brilliant abilities, and however much these were
calculated
to add to our regrets that such a man should so demean himself, and
however much they might seize upon our sympathies, those in whose hands
was placed the administration of justice, were more bound than usual to
prosecute
to the utmost extent of the law. He said that no one within the walls of
that court-room would rejoice more sincerely that he would, if it should turn
out differently from what he supposed; but he expected to prove that the
prisoner had landed at Yorktown, with some Scoteh Irish emigrants sometimes
before; that immediately upon his arrival, he had, with other accomplices, taken
the usual means of burglars to spy out the condition of the wealthiest houses
in the neighborhood; that in the night time, and during a thunder-storm, he
had found his way into the Governor's country house, with his features secured
behind a mask, as well as his two associates, one a male and the other a female.
He was not, he said, absolutely certain that he could prove this link in the
chain of testimony by admissible evidence, because the reconnoitre had been
undertaken when all the white family were from home. However, from this
point, he said the chain of testimony was unbrokenthat he had soon after
the mask adventure presented himself to the Governor, as a young man
anxious for employmentthat His Excellency had him then examined by the
Reverend Gentleman then presiding over the court, and finding him competent,
had out of the abundance of his benevolence and kind-heartedness, for which
he was well known by all present, given him the employmentthat he had
most shamefully abused the trust reposed in him by his patronfirst, in
presenting
himself under a false name; and, secondly, in using that name to
obtain moneys to which he had no earthly claim, and for which he would have
been indicted as a swindler, had not the minor offence been swallowed up in
the monstrous one with he now stood charged. That he had gone on from
step to step, until he had wound up his career of guilt, by murdering the son of
his benefactor and patron, if, indeed, the prisoner himself knew who it really
was that he had slain. He thought it would appear in evidence, that he
harbored
deadly malignity against one of the most honorable and respectable
young men in the colony, who slept in the same room on the night of the
murder, and who was at that very time in pursuit of the prisoner. That the
young gentleman in question, Henry Lee, Esq., had lent the deceased his
cloak, and that in the dark he had been murdered, in mistake for Mr. Lee;
that the prisoner had fled as soon as the dark deed had been perpetrated, and
when apprehended, was making his way with the utmost expedition towards
the frontier, and had actually left the military road and taken to the woods,
until he supposed himself out of the reach of pursuit; that upon his arrest,
he had manifested unequivocal symptoms of guilt, and, moreover, that the
blood of his victim was still reeking from his clothes and person.
He concluded by assuring the court and jury, that in all his professional
experience, he had never been able to present to that court or any other, such
an unbroken chain of circumstantial evidence. That though he was not
seen in the actual moment of committing the offence, that he would be able to
trace him in a career of crime, from the first moment of landing to that of
his arrest. That the motive was apparentthe usual steps of criminal
graduation were also present, so that the enlightened jury, would feel at no
loss to trace in their own minds the whole criminal process, by which this
most gifted but criminal individual had reduced himself to his present state of
degradation.
The first witness called on the part of the crown was Kit Carter. He was
proceeding to relate the adventure of the mask, as he had heard it on his
return
to Temple Farm on the night of the adventure, but he was stopped by
the counsel for the prisoner, and told that he must relate no hearsay evidence.
Hall exclaimed in a loud clear voice, Let him go on. I was one of those
masked visitors! His counsel assured him that he would throw up the case,
unless he entrusted the whole management to him.
Carter then went on to relate what is already well known to the reader,
about Hall's introduction as Tutorhis conduct while acting as such, and his
general deportment so far as he had observed it. His evidence upon the
whole was rather unfavorable to the prisoner.
Moore was next called to the stand, and he related pretty much the same
story with the exception of his conduct in prison, and their private intercourse,
which had made a rather more favorable impression than the prisoner's
conduct
had done upon the previous witness. The facts were mostly the same
the general impressions more favorable.
Henry Lee was then called on to give his testimony. There was a
general
restlessness in the crowd, and a disposition to get nearer and hear better, as
this witness was called. It was known that he would bear hard upon the
prisoner, and would give nearly the whole of Hall's history since he landed
in the country. Nor was this anxiety to hear him, confined to the rude and
the vulgarthe mutual acquaintances of the parties, were also curious to
hear him relate all the circumstances of their quarrel, for it was generally
reported that they had quarrelled. Moore suspected that the quarrel had
proceeded
to blows, and he knew that there was a deadly enmity on the part of
Lee, at least.
The witness stated that on a recent visit to Temple Farm, he found the
prisoner
acting as Tutor to the Governor's youngest son, and occasionally as his
draftsman and private secretary. That he was surprised to find that he was
of the same name with a young relation of his in Scotland, to whom he had
but recently writtenpreceding his visit, that one morning he had expressed
this surprise to the prisoner, when he immediately stated that he was the
very man himself; that he stated to the prisoner that he had written
such letters, but he the prisoner, said he had never received them, which
seemed reasonable, as there was scarcely time for those letters to have
arrived out before the prisoner at the bar must have set sail: that he,
(Lee,) was taken by surprise by the prisoner's statement, but backed as he
was by Governor Spotswood, had yielded to his ready assent; that he had
stated to the prisoner the fact, that he had fallen heir to a snug little property
here, and that he, (Lee,) had surrendered into his hands part of the available
funds of said estate, without any other voucher or guarantee than the
prisoner's
note of handthat money however, had since been repaid by Mr.
Bernard Moore. He stated farther, that he had very soon after forming an
acquaintance with the prisoner, and after having admitted his claims to
relationship
,
began to suspect himhe did not exactly know why, unless it had
been the impression made by his general deportment; that they had several
unpleasant altercations before the witness left Temple Farm; that the
prisoner
had never taken any steps to prove his identitythat he could show no
letters from any one, either credentials of character or letters of creditand
moreover could show no letters from his venerable relation deceased, although
there were several found among her papers from Henry Hallthe individual
whom the prisoner pretended to be. The prisoner evaded this by saying that
he would be able to show them when the remainder of his baggage arrived,
but so far as he knew, to this day no such letters had ever arrived. He stated
that he had lately received answers to those very letters which he had written
to Mr. Henry Hall, in Scotland, purporting to be written by Mr. Hall, then in
Scotland, so that there were two Henry Halls, if the prisoner at the bar
established
his claims to the name.
As to the murder, he stated that he had pursued the prisoner, after he had
been liberated by Mr. Moore, and must by some accident or other, have
passed
him on the road, as he was on his return to the capital, when he stopped for
the night at the stockade where the deed was committed. He said he had
not seen the prisoner on the night of the murder at all, and was entirely
unconscious that they had slept in the same room, until the investigation of
the next morning had convinced him of the fact. He said he had lent Capt.
Spotswood a cloak usually worn by himself, at the request of the Captain,
who stated that he had lent his own to a boy who accompanied him, and who
had none. Who that boy was, and whence he had come and whither gone,
he could form no idea. All search for him had proved fruitless, although
troopers had been despatched along both ends of the road at day-light.
He described the position in which the body lay when found at
daylight
,
as well as that occupied by the prisoner during the nightand stated
that the prisoner had escaped before any one was stirringthat there were
distinct foot-prints in blood on the puncheous of the floor, and on the ground
leading to the gate of the stockadeand that these when measured,
corresponded
exactly with the size and shape of the prisoner's shoesand,
moreover
,
that when the shoes were taken off to be compared with the foot-prints,
blood was still distinctly visible, having deeply stained the leather beneath the
mud; that his face and person were also stained with blood, and that he had
offered no explanation whatever of all these suspicious circumstances when
arrested, except that he had left the block-house about an hour before day
light. When asked why he had stolen off without seeing any one, and without
even thanking the woman who had furnished him with his supper, he
acknowledged
that he had done so to avoid observation. The prisoner, he said, wore
no weapons about him when arrested. The dagger with which the deed was
done belonged to the deceased, and was so driven in when the fatal wound
was inflicted, as could only have been conveniently done from the side on
which the prisoner lay. Such was about the sum and substance of Lee's
testimony, elicited by the questions of the Attorney General. He was then
turned over to the prisoner's counsel, who proceeded to cross-question him
very minutely, not, however, by any prompting from Hall, who now sat with
a solemn serenity upon his features, and scarcely taking an ordinary interest
in the details of the evidence. Occasionally he would start as some answer
of the witness seemed to surprise him, but speedily relapsed again into his
former mood. He declined prompting his counsel altogether in his
cross-examination
of Lee, and that gentleman was compelled to call Dr. Evylia
and Moore, each side of him, in order to learn more accurately the various
relations of the parties touched upon by the witness. Moore very soon
discovered
that this was a conjunction by no means propitious to the objects in
view by the Attorney, and he wrote as much on a slip of paper; soon after
which, he whispered to the old Doctor, who retired for a while. When he was
gone, the cross-examination commenced.
Question
. Did you form a bad opinion of the prisoner upon your first
acquaintance
?
Answer
. I cannot say that I formed any very definite opinion of him. He
occupied at that time very little of my thoughts. I thought him rather out
of place in the society in which I found him.
Question
. Did you, Mr. Lee, see anything wrong in the prisoner, until
you discovered him to be your rival for the favor of a very estimable young
lady, to whom it is generally understood you were paying your address?
[Lee curled his lips with high disdain, and at first seemed to think of
declining
a reply, but the counsel insisted upon an answer.]
Answer
. However presumptuous I might have thought the prisoner, I
scarcely esteemed him a very formidable rival, if one at all.
Question
. Will you tell the court and jury in what way he was
presumptuous
?
Answer
. By intruding himself into society where he had no claims
whatever
.
It is not usual, I believe, for tutors to associate on terms of equality
with the female members of his employer's family, and more especially when
that employer occupies the exalted station of Governor of the Colony.
Question
. Was it, Mr. Lee, so much the prisoner's forcing himself into
the society of the ladies of the Governor's immediate family, which gave you
offence, as into that of the young lady before alluded to?
[The witness refused to answer, until ordered to do so by the court.]
Answer
. It was not.
Question
. Did his presence seem offensive to that lady?
Answer
. Not until after I had informed her of the ungrateful return
which the prisoner made of her kindness, by representing her as having
sought him.
Question
. Was there not a quarrel between the prisoner and yourself
which grew out of that very representation which you made to the lady?
Answer
. He was rather insolent to me, Sir, and I threatened to chastiso
him, and perhaps in the heat of anger, I made a pass at him with my sword.
Question
. What did the prisoner do thendid he tamely submit?
Answer
. By an accidental and fortunate use of his walking cane he
disarmed
me for the moment.
Question
. For the moment, Mr. Lee! Were you not completely at his
mercy, and did he not act with the greatest magnanimity towards you?
Answer
. I was perhaps somewhat in his power; but the matter was
adjourned
,
not concluded.
Question
. Well, Sir, the prisoner seems to have been victorious in war
who triumphed in love?
The witness appealed to the court for protection against the trifling and
impertinence of counsel.
The counsel hereupon stated that he considered it a very important
question
that
he wished to show by it, that the witness had every earthly reason
for cherishing deadly hostility against the prisoner, having been triumphed over
by him in two most tender points.
The court ruled, that if within the witness's knowledge, he must answer
the question.
Answer
. I know nothing as to the result of the prisoner's love affairs, if
he had any.
Question
. Has not your own terminated disastrously, since the prisoner's
acquaintance with the lady?
Answer
. It has, Sir.
Here there was a general titter throughout the courtroom.
Many other questions were put to this witness and answered, but mostly
touching points already made known to the reader, we shall therefore intermit
them and pass on to the next, who was Mr. McDonald, a man originally from
Scotland, and who now lived in the neighborhood of the deceased lady who
had willed her property to Henry Hall. He was asked if he knew the
individual
to whom that property was intended to be given? He said, he had
known him almost from his infancy! He was then asked to look upon the
prisoner, and say whether he was the individual named Henry Hall?
There was an intense interest manifested to hear the old man's reply, as
he turned his head and gazed long and searchingly at the prisoner. Once or
twice he turned his head away as if satisfied, and then turned his eyes upon
him again, evidently baffled and perplexed.
The Attorney-General put the queston to him again: Is this manthe
prisoner at the barthe Mr. Henry Hall you knew in Scotland?
For his life, he said, he said he could not tell, at times when he looked at
him, he thought it was, and then again when he moved his head, he thought
it was not. He is certainly very much like, if it is not the man himself.
He said further, that he had not seen him for some years, and in a young man,
doubtless great changes might have taken place.
Lee was confoundedhe now sat near the Attorney-General, and consulted
with him anxiously,he had supposed that McDonald would not hesitate, and
that Hall would stand forth before all men, not only a convicted murderer, but
one who had run a long career of deception and guilt. He had no doubt of
McDonald's honesty, from the Attorney-General's character of him, and he
was utterly at a loss to account for his hesitation.
General Clayton next asked the witness, if Mr. Hall, when he knew him
had that large scar across his face.
No; he had not.
Was the color of the hair and eyes the same?
Yes; precisely.
Did Mr. Hall, when you knew him, wear whiskers?
No; he did not.
Did the height of the two correspond exactly?
No; the prisoner was taller by several inches, but then he might have
grown that much.
Were they about the same weight?
No; this gentleman is broader in his shoulders, and a larger frame.
Then, except the hair and eyes, they were totally dissimilar?
He could not say what it was about this man that reminded him of the one
he had known, but there was somethingwhether it was in the features, or
the expression, he could not tell, but still he would not swear that this was not
Mr. Hall.
There was a grim smile of some sort of gratification playing about the
corners of the prisoner's mouth during the whole of this examination. He
looked straight at the witness, and his eye never quailed for an instant. It was
the only time during the whole trial that he conferred with his lawyer, and
seemed to take an interest in what was going on.
The witness being now turned over to the prisoner's counsel, several
questions were asked which evidently came from the prisoner himself.
Did you not know of Henry Hall's having met with an accidenta fall
from his horseby which one of his arms was dislocated?
Yes; I remember it well.
Is not the mansion house of the Hall's, one of peculiar structure, one that
a man would not easily learn from mere description?
It is very peculiar, and it would be almost impossible for one to learn its
localities from paper.
Was there not a picture of a celebrated battle hung just between the
windows of the gallery facing to the east?
There was.
Had not the frame of that picture been penetrated by a ball from a pistol
discharged by accident from the hands of this young man himself?
I must believe it to be so, for no one could well know those things but
himself.
The witness sat down. His testimony had evidently a little shaken that
fickle thing, popular opinion, and in a much greater degree re-assured the old
Doctor and Moore, and such other friends of the unfortunate prisoner at the
bar, as dared to adhere to him
The witnesses of the stockade were now called inthe woman who had
waited upon the prisonerthe soldier who had seen him on the fatal night as
well as those who arrested him. By these pretty much the same testimony
was given as had been already given by Lee, or else made known to the reader
at previous investigations. Very few were called in on the part of the
prisoner
,
few indeed knew him, except those who had already testified against him,
Old Doctor Evylin, was the chief one relied upon.
He stated, that he had known the prisoner almost from the moment of his
landing in the countrythat he had felt great interest in him from the very
firstpartly, he supposed, from the circumstances of his being an elegant
scholar, and a polished gentleman in every respect, and from his friendless
condition when he had made his acquaintance. He saw from the first, that
he was in a false positionthat his circumstances at some period of his life
must have been far higher. He drew this opinion, from certain habits of
thought as well as actions, from deep and inherent tastes, not as he believed,
the growth ever of one generation. He expressed the opinion unhesitatingly,
when questionedthat the prisoner himself, was not only a gentleman of the
highest toned feelings and instincts, but that his fathers before him had been,
and that he was utterly incapable of a mean or dishonorable action, much
more of a cold blooded and deliberate murder. There was a general smile
throughout the court-house, at the old Doctor's warmth of feeling, more than
at his thorough and inbred aristocratic notions. The evidence having been
all gone through on both sides, and it now being quite dark, the court was
adjourned until the next day at 10 o'clock, and the jury handed over to the
care of the Sheriff. The remainder of the proceedings, will be treated of in
the next chapter.
CHAPTER X.
THE DEFENCE.
Punctual
to the hour, the court assembled, and along with it, even a
greater crewd of anxious spectators than had attended on the previous day.
This was partly occasioned by the previous appointment of this very day,
for the meeting of the young gentry at the capital in order to make
arrangements
for the immediate marching of the tramontane expedition. But even
the great enterprise itself, was forgotten in the intense interest manifested by
all classes in the trial going on.
The prisoner was again placed at the bar. The court in their judical
wigs and robes, and the jury in the box. Old Dr. Evylin and Bernard
Moore sat together in melancholy silencethe excitement produced by their
exertions in behalf of the prisoner as long as it could avail anything, served to
stimulate them, but now it had died away and left them sad and dispirited,
and with a gloomy foreboding as to the fate of the unfortunate young man.
Except these, there was a very general feeling of indignation against him.
Amidst all these discouraging circumstances, the counsel for the prisoner
rose and commenced a most labored and ingenious defence. He argued that
there was not one particle of positive testimony against the prisoner, and
none that would not equally lie against the very witnesses who had most
strongly testified against him. Indeed, he said there was more impelling
motives urging Mr. Lee himself to the deed than him, not that be would
insinuate
so foul a charge against that gentlemanhe only pointed the minds of
the jury to the possibilities of the caseaye, and to the probabilitiesin order
to show that the matter was still shrouded in the profoundest mysterythat
one of the persons in that room was as liable to have done it as anotherthat
no more probable motives for the diabolical deed had been traced to the
prisoner
than to any of the others.
Indeed, that a motive might be imagined on the part of one of the witnesses,
but none in the world on that of the prisoner. As to the miserable story
about his mistaking young Spotswood for Lee, it was not worth one moment's
consideration. Could the prisoner, who was in the habit of daily association
with the two gentlemen, mistake the arms of a Ranger, constantly worn by
John Spotswood, and with which the deed was doneas well as mistake his
gold laced uniform? It was in evidence that the deceased had been throttled
by a powerful adversarycould the prisoner have approached him in such an
attitude, without discovering who it really was, if he had been laboring under
a mistakeand above all, could that feeble and almost consumptive figure
grapple in the death struggle with such a man as Spotswood was known to
benearly, if not entirely restored to health?it was absurd and ridiculous.
I say then, again, continued he, that there is just as much evidence
that Lee committed the murder as that Hall committed it. If it is a groundless
assumption in the one case, it was in the other also. I see the Attorney
General smile; but, sir, let me suppose a case which I think quite as probable
as the one he has made out. It is known that there was a deadly enmity
existing between the prisoner and Mr. Leethey were rivalsthe former,
whatever he was in reality, supposed to be the successful one. They meet
in a dark room at a frontier settlement, the latter finds an opportunity of
throwing the odium of the blackest offence known to our laws upon his rival.
Circumstances so turn out that the prisoner from his position in that room
must be suspected, let who may have committed the deed. Now, is this
hypothetical
case more improbable than that made out by the Attorney General?
I merely make itnot to cast suspicion upon the young gentleman who has
been the principal witness in this case, but to show that the matter is still
so much involved in obscurity, that it is capable of being laid at this, and that
man's skirts. This it could not be, if the evidence was sufficient to warrant
conviction. He went into a long legal discussion to show that the law
compelled the jury to acquit the prisoner, when there were grounds of
reasonable
doubt, and that there was ground in this case, and they were
therefore
bound to give the prisoner the benefit of those doubts; and finally wound
up by a manly and thrilling appeal to the feelings of the jury.
Several times during the delivery of this speech, of which we have merely
given a rude synopsisthe prisoner caught his counsel by the coat tail and
tugged at it, as if he would have him desist; at which the legal gentleman
would turn round, almost in a passion, and beg in a whispered voice not to
be interrupted. So troublesome did his client become at last, that he was
compelled
to request Mr. Moore to set by him, and prevent the unreasonable
interruption
.
The Attorney General then summed up in behalf of the crown. He linked
together most ably all the circumstances which we have already detailed to
the reader, from the landing of the prisoner to the night of the murder, not
forgetting the prisoner's admission as to the mask scene at Temple Farm.
He did not for a moment contend that he had murdered young Spotswood
knowingly, but that he had perpetrated a cold-blooded and deliberate murder,
and it made no difference in the eye of the law, that the object or the party
had been changed in the meantime or mistaken. He laid down the law and
called upon the court to bear him out in it, that the crime was precisely the
same. He even went farther, and contended that if the blow had been
felonionsly
aimed at his victim's dog or his horse, and had killed him instead, the
law still held him guilty, not only of the homicide, but of the malice
prepense
.
He lamented that he was called upon to perform so irksome a task as the
prosecution of one, who, from the testimony, was so well calculated to adorn
the highest circles in the land; but at the same time contended that exactly in
proportion as he was pre-eminent for abilities, or distinguished for
accomplishments
,
were the court and the jury bound to protect their fellow-subjects from
such dangerous weapons in such unprincipled hands. He knew, said he, the
ingenuity and the eloquence of his legal adversary, and that he would attempt
to excite the sympathies of the jury in behalf of the friendless and
accomplished
stranger; but he advised them to turn their sympathies into another
channelto look at the cold corpse of his noble and gifted victim, cut off in
the first bloom of youth, without a moment's preparation, with all his sins
upon his head; and then to turn their eyes to the distinguished family, and
listen there to the wailing and weeping which ascended constantly to heaven
from that bereaved house. He concluded by a judicious and high wrought
invocation in behalf of the injured laws of the country, and called upon the
jury to pronounce that verdict of condemnation which he could see public
opinion had already awarded to him, and which he solemnly believed he so well
merited.
This speech had considerable effect in rather confirming, than changing the
opinions of the court and jury, and indeed of the public generally, for there
were scarcely two opinions in the court-house, as to his guilt or innocence.
The lawyers having concluded on both sides, that awful moment of
suspense
arrived, when the court paused, previous to summing up the evidence
and charging the jury.
It fell to the lot of the Reverend Commissary to perform this unpleasant
duty from which, however, whatever might have been his feelings, he did not
shrink. He summed up the testimony in the most lucid manner, and charged
the jury to suffer no ingenuity of the prisoner's counsel, nor affecting appeals
to their sympathies, to swerve them from the strong and irrefutable
circumstances
20
of the case, and from performing their duty to the crown and the
country, however disagreeable.
The jury brought in a verdict of guilty of wilful murder, without leaving
the box; and as was usual in Virginia, the prisoner was immediately arraigned
to receive sentence. A death-like silence reigned throughout the crowded
court-room, when he was asked if he had aught to say, why sentence should
not be pronounced against him. He clapped his hand to his forehead for a
moment, ere he arose to his feet. He stood at length in the full dignity of his
height, and in one moment had thrown all agitation to the winds. There
was something attractive about the man, even to that indignant court and
audiencethe deathly paleness of his visagehis bright, but serene eye,
and that solemn voice, when it first thrilled high over the heads of the people
altogether, had no ordinary fascination in them.
Every eye was bent upon the prisoner, and every car strained, as he
exclaimed, Have I anything to say, why sentence of death should not be
pronounced upon me? I have nottoo much has been said already; but I
call the court and these good people to witness that it was not with my consent
or approbation. God is my witness, that I crave not the poor boon of mere
animal life, when it has been stripped of all that distinguishes it from
grovelling
natures. By the strangest concurrence of circumstances that, I solemnly
believe, ever befel an individual before, I have been stripped, one by one, of the
ties which bound me to lifethe sweet charitiesthe domestic affections
the warm friendshipsthe noble aimsthe bright aspirationsthe daring
enterpriseshave all been struck down. Every fibre of my heart has been
rudely torn asunder, and trampled upon by this cruel array of circumstances.
Why should I desire to live longer, when in living thus long I have met
nothing but disaster. I shudder with superstitious dread when I look back to
the days of my young and bright hopes, and see how they have been fulfilled.
Oh! those gorgeous dreams of youth are but too bitter delusions? Who could
have foreseen then that the brilliant promise of such a sunrise, would so soon
set in utter darkness. 'Tis not that I fear death; on the contrary, I court it, in
an honorable fieldbut my whole mental organization shrinks from the
reproach and the odium which has already been, and will still more be cast
upon my memory. Great God! the wildest fears of my diseased
imagination
during the delirium of fever, never dared approach the gibbetneither
sleeping or waking have I thought such a thing within the range of
possibility
.
But to live, after what has passed, is even worse than a disgraceful
death. One is a short and sudden pang, and the fitful and feverish dream of
life is o'erits painful illusions, its hollow friendships, and its fleeting and
deceitful pleasures; but the other is a living and breathing deatha walking
target for the shafts of slander and calumny. What man is there within this
vast throng, reared at the feet of a sweet and angel mother, to all the softest
and tenderest sympathies of a gentle nature, (here he dashed a tear hastily
from his eyes, and proceeded,) and all the instincts of the gentlemanwho
could have the stamp of Cain officially branded upon his forehead, and then
walk the earth, as God created it, with his face towards Heaven. Oh, it is
too much! This seat of the passions and affections which throbs so
tumultuously
within me, will surely burst the barriers of its prison, before the final
seal is put to this legal wrong. Not that I would insinuate aught against
the purity or impartiality of court or jury, both have done every thing that
the poor means within their reach permitted. The offended majesty of the
laws,
according to ils forms
, demand my death, and most willingly is life
offered up to those bald and barren forms.
But be assured that the death of the victim will only keep up the cruel
mistake for a brief while; the time will surely come, when the real murderer
of the Governor's son will stand revealed to the world. For a while, the
unfortunate train of circumstances which compassed me about on that fatal
night, must appear stronger than the poor, tame truth. No one who has
lived long in this world of cheating and deception, but must have discovered
that truth generally lies far beneath the surface in the ordinary current of its
affairs. I shall not undertake the now useless task of showing where the
really wonderful body of circumstantial evidence brought to bear against me
fails, and where a single link of the real truth would point the whole in
another direction, because, as I have already intimated, the truth would appear
almost ridiculous, when brought into comparison with the splendid logical
conclusions of the Attorney General. Sufficient for me here, in the presence
of this court and this good people, to call Heaven to witness my entire
innocence
.
I am not only innocent of the special crime laid to my charge, but
may the lightning of Heaven strike me dead where I stand, if such a
conception
as murder ever entered my heart. I cannot realize itI cannot
imagine how any one could commit a murder; and yet I am convicted by
the laws of my country, after a patient and laborious investigation, of that
crimeof the foullest crime known to those laws. It all seems to me, even
now, like some fearful dream! That I, whose whole soul has been fired
almost from infancy with longing aspirations after some legitimate means to
benefit my fellow-menthat I, who have aimed at and struggled after
unattainable
perfection, whose ambition soared to none but lofty eminences, and
to whom, for a long time, the honest and every day occupations of men appeared
poor, and tame, and meanshould at last fall to such a degradationso low
as this. Oh! 'tis overwhelming. It is hard to die a violent death at all
times, doubtless; but it is doubly hard to fall thus, with the unjust execrations
of all men ringing in my ears. But surveying the whole ground as
impartially
and as calmly as I can, I can see no false step of mine since I arrived in
the Colony, by which I could have avoided my present position. I have done
and suffered every thing which a mere human agent could do, and I leave the
result in the hands of that righteous Judge to whose decrees I bow with
resignation
.
Now, with my hopes blastedmy aspirations crushedall the sweet
charities of life trampled upon and outragedmy affections blightedno,
thank God, they are enshrined beyond the reach of evil.
At this point, there was great confusion near the door, and the officers in
vain endeavored to keep silence. At first, some supposed a rescue was to
be attempted; and the court directed the sheriff to the prisoner, who had
sat down and was calmly waiting with others to see what had produced the
disturbance. Presently a servant of Dr. Evylin was seen foreing his way
among the crowd, holding a letter as a sort of passport for his intrusion.
Some one seeing the superscription plucked it from his hand, and conveyed
it at once to the old man. He tore it open and read it hastilygreat drops
of perspiration still standing upon his brow and lip from the painful
excitement
of the trial; but he had no sooner ran his eye along the lines, than
his eyes brightened, and the whole man was instantly transformed. He
sprang upon one of the benches with the activity of a boy, and leaning his
chin upon the bannister surrounding the platform on which the court sat,
motioned to the judge that he had something to communicate. That
venerable
functionary moved his chair, so as to bring his ear near enough to hear,
alone, what the old Doctor had to say. The first words whispered by the
latter startled him, and they were instantly engaged in the most earnest
conversation
a
few moments after which, he took the letter handed by the
Doctor, and read it himself. He consulted a few moments with his
colleagues
,
and then rosestanding, however, many minutes, before the
confusion
incident to so unusual an interruption could be subdued. He stated to
the lawyers, on both sides, that a most providential revelation had come to
lightthat he held in his hand a note from a lady, who could have no motive
in deceiving them, stating that a most important witness had that moment
arrived in the capitalone who was present at the murder, and had seen the
very act committed. Of course, said the old man, no mere forms of law,
to whatever lengths we may have gone, can prevent us from retracing our
steps, if we have unknowingly done injustice. The note does not state who
the witness is who saw the murder committedbut I presume from the
eagerness with which the writer demands that her witness may be heard,
that some other person must have committed it than the prisoner at the bar.
God grant that it may be sofor though still a human being has done the
foul deed, it would be difficult to find within the Colony one to whom it would
attach with the same moral turpitude as the prisoner; and let me add, as a
necessary consequence, that my joy at the prospect of his deliverance is
proportionably
great. I would not willingly have condemned such a man to a
felon's death.
The eager crowd was now busy with the startling news. Groups were
gathering here and there, wondering who the witness could be, and the
prisoner was heard to exclaim, My God, I thank thee.
Bernard Moore grasped his hand cordially, and congratulated him upon his
prospect of deliverance. Hall motioned for him to be seated beside him, and
then said in a low tone, Moore, should I live a hundred years, I will never
forget that you dared befriend a stranger, when the whole current of public
opinion was setting strong against him. Any man may have mere physical
courage, but
that
is what I call true moral courage; and the good old Doctor
stood by me manfully to the last, and he would have followed me to the
gibbet, if all the world hooted at him. Such are the materials, Moore, of
which true friendships are formed. A man passes through the trials of life,
and they all drop off but one or twothose that are left are the ones to cling
to. In a few days, perhaps, should I ride through those streets in my carriage,
how vastly enthusiastic this now indignant mob will be. They would shout
long life to Harry Hall! But listenthey already shout something; what
is it?
Moore pushed his way to the door and looked down Gloucester street, and
saw the Governor's carriage approaching the Capitol, surrounded by the mob,
endeavoring to see some one inside, but apparently without success, for the
old guard rode in front and rear, and kept them at a respectful distance.
Arriving at the Capitol green, the Governor first descended, clad in deep
mourning, and much bowed down with grief since we last presented him to
the readerthen came Ellen Evylinand lastly an Indian girl, whom the
reader has already devined to be Wingina. She had doffed her male
garments
and now appeared uncommonly well dressed, for she had been
furnished
from Ellen's own wardrobe, and dressed out by her own hands for the
occasion.
The Governor did not take his seat upon the bench, or rather with the
court, but sat apart with the two females. Hall's lawyer now approached and
conversed earnestly with them for a few moments in an under tone. He was
apparently remonstrating with Ellen about something and did not prevail
until her father joined them. She then gave way, and placing her hand in
her father's, walked with him to the witness stand.
After being sworn, she stated that during the morning a strange looking
Indian, very much wearied and worn, rode into her father's grounds and
demanded instant speech of him, and upon being informed that he was gone
to the court-house and could not be disturbed on any account, he wrung his
hands and appeared greatly distressed. Supposing that some one was very
ill and that my father's professional services were required, I begged him to
make his wants known to me. I was very much surprised at his calling me
by name and demanding that we must be alonefor the servants were
standing
aroundbefore he could communicate his errand. At first I refused
this, as there is more or less suspicion attaches to the race, but I was then
informed that the business was urgent and connected with the trial then
going on at the court house.
I hesitated no longer, but led the witness into the house. The head was
then uncovered, and she announced herself to me as Wingina, the sister of
the Interpreterthat she was present at the murder and had stolen away
from her brother and his friends, and been on horseback almost constantly
for three days and good part of the nights. I immediately despatched a note
to my father, and sat about preparing her to appear here. The rest, she can
tell, herself, better than I can.
Such was about the amount of her testimony, condensed into a small
compass
.
During the whole of its delivery she never once cast her eyes towards
the prisoner. Not so with him, howeverhis eye was rivetted upon her face.
He leaned forward with the most intense interest, as if he would gladly hear
his name, and fame vindicated by such lips. He had not manifested such an
interest in any part of the trial, and seemed disappointed when she moved
away and was led out to the carriage by her father.
Wingina was now called to the witness stand and closely questioned as to
her belief in a future state of rewards and punishments, and her knowledge
as to the nature of an oath. The court were satisfied on both points, and
ordered her to be sworn, The first part of her testimony related to the
interview
with John Spotswood, on the night he left the city under the trees of
the avenue in front of the Palace, and their having been watched by some one.
She then went on to detail circumstances sufficiently well known to the
reader
;
many of which, however, were drawn from her with great reluctance
on her part. It was almost impossible to understand her testimony, or why
Chunoluskie should watch her and young Spotswood; and why she should
fly with him, unless she told all, and that all, neither age nor sex ever deters
lawyers from obtaining; and they succeded on the present occasion in
worming
from the witness the whole story of her shame and ruin. Woman
like, however, she took the whole blame upon herself, and almost wholly
exonerated her deceased lover; for whose memory she wept bitterly many
times during the delivery of her evidence. Having revealed all this part of
her sad tale, she arrived in her narrative to the fatal night at the stockade.
She confirmed what had already been stated by one of the witnesses, that
she had not slept in the place assigned to her by Capt. Spotswood, but had
risen in the night and laid herself down across the door of the apartment
where the young gentleman and their servants slept. That sometime after
midnight as she supposed, she was awakened by the grasp of a powerful hand
upon her throat and another over her mouththat she was held in this
posture
by a young Indian whom she named, (and who was well known as one of
Mr. Boyle's disciples, and who had for a long time been paying unsuccessful
court to Wingina,) that while she was thus held her brother repeatedly
flourished
a drawn dagger over her, plainly imitating that if she raised her voice or
her hands, he would strike her deadthat the young Indian mentioned held
her firmly, while Chunoluskie examined the sleepers. She stated that he
was at first baffled by Spotswood's having slept in Lee's cloak, but that he
was not long in ascertaining the one he sought; which he had no sooner
done, than he seized him by the throat and stabbed him at the same moment;
that he had also attempted to scalp him, but the convulsive efforts of his victim
hurried them off. She stated that the area of the stockade was filled with young
Indians, many of whom she had seen about the College and knew. After the
murder was completed, she said some one of them were for setting fire to the
premises, but her brother, who appeared to be in command, would not
permit
it, as he said it would put the Governer too soon upon his trail, and
before he had done other work which was before them. She said she was
placed on a horse before her brother, and the whole of them set off at full
speed for Germana, where they arrived the next night, only pausing once to
refresh themselves and their horses.
She said the military discipline of the stockade at the latter place, though
superior
to that of the first mentioned, was by no means active and vigilantthat
the Indians dismounted in the forest, when they came in sight, and approached
stealthily on foot, that her brother sprang upon the sentinel on duty and
dispatched
him, (as he had previously done Captain Spotswood,) without the
slightest alarm being communicated to the garrison; that the whole band,
except, the one who held her, then rushed in and slaughtered the sleeping
soldiers and inmates, with the exeception of a single persona young lady,
whom they carried off, as they said, to supply her place, as a wife, to the young
chief for whom her brother had intended her. This was about the amount
of her testimony, except that she had made her escape while they caroused
on a certain night, and that she had left the young lady still their prisoner.
When asked why did she not assist her to escape, she said she looked so
delicate, she knew it would be impossible for her to escape their pursuers, that
she had taken one of their horses, and rode for life and death to communicate
the tidingsthinking that the surest way to afford her relief. That she had
heard, when she approached the city, of the trial going on, and for some time
her whole attention had been absorbed by the act of injustice which she
feared would be perpetrated. The Governor and the prisoner were much
affected by the appalling news just detailed. The trial itself, and all interest
attached to it, seemed swallowed up by the startling account of the massacre.
The court consulted together for a few moments, and after calling the
Attorney
General into their councils, ordered the prisoner set at liberty. His
appearance on the green seemed to revive the public interest in him for a
while, and the mob set up a shout of triumph. Poor Hall had almost
forgotten
already that he was lately all but a convicted murderer, so greatly was he
suffering for the death of his friend, Humphrey Elliot, and the captivity of his
daughter.
CHAPTER XI.
PREPARATIONS FOR THE MEETING OF THE TRAMONTANE
ORDER.
No sooner was Wingina released from the witness' stand, than she went
straightway to Dr. Evylin's, as she had promised his daughter.
Now, Wingina, said Ellen, as the former re-entered her room, now we
have succeeded in releasing Mr. Hall, for one of the servants tells me he is
already at liberty, you can tell me of the captive lady, and the message she
sent by you to this strange and unaccountable Mr. Hall.
You must know, Miss Ellen, that we were closely watched, and that it
was only as chance occasions offered, that I could hold even five minutes
conversation with her, and therefore I may not have caught her meaning
exactly.
Well, well, tell me what you did learn from her, and perhaps I may
understand
it better than you can.
As I was about to tell you, on one of those stolen interviews of a
moment, she asked me if a young man, by the name of Hall, had arrived in
the Colony? I told her yesthat I had seen such a young gentleman I
believed, and had heard a great deal more about himthat he had been living
with the Governor's family, and, I believed, teaching his youngest son. She
said it must be the same; but she could not see why he should undertake the
business of teachingbut she told me, if I succeeded in escaping, to go
straight to this Mr. Hall, as soon as I arrived at the capital, and tell him that
Eugenia Elliot is a captive in the hands of the Indians, and her father
murdered
,
and if he indeed loves me, to save me from a fate worse than death!
Did she say that? exclaimed Ellen, pacing the room.
As near her words as I can recollect, and that was the reason that I
discovered
the situation of Mr. Hall as soon as I did. The first person I met, as
I approached the city, I asked if he knew whether Mr. Hall was in the
capital`yes,' said he, `snug enough, they're trying him for his life.' From
the next, I received almost the same answer, and then I knew there was
something
wrong, and thinking over the position in which he slept at the stockade,
and how little any one here could know of the real circumstances of the murder,
I hurried on to you. Now, that we have succeeded, must I still seek him out,
and deliver the captive lady's message?
By all means, Wingina, and hark you, be sure and tell him that you have
told all she said to me, and haste back here, and tell me what he says, when
you have done.
Wingina went immediately in pursuit of Hall, and after hunting over most
of the town, found him again at his old quarters, the Governor's, who had
insisted
on taking him to the Palace at once.
Oh my little deliverer, said Hall, as he saw her approaching him, I wonld
have sought you out, had I known where to find you, not only to return you
my sincere thanks for your heroic exertions in my behalffor I understand
you have traversed a wild wilderness to save mebut to make farther
inquiries
,
concerning the fate of some dear friends whom you mentioned in your
testimony.
That, is the very business which induced me to disturb you now.
Oh! Miss Elliot! tell how I can best undertake to deliver her from her
cruel captors.
We were fellow prisoners and almost the last words she uttered to me,
was a charge to find you out, and tell of her sad state; she told me moreover,
of the near and dear ties which bound you together, and said she trusted her
whole hopes of deliverance upon you.
She told you this! poor girl, her misfortunes have surely touched her
brain, nevertheless I will exert myself to the uttermost to restore her to her
friends.
Poor young lady, she said she had no friends in the world except yourself.
She has many, the Governor himself among the number, and when I
received your message we were even then discussing the question whether an
expedition to set out immediately, would be of any avail; but here he comes
to speak for himself. I was just mentioning the subject of our conversation,
your Excellency, to my little deliverer here, and asking her about the
prospect
of success?
The Governor appeared greatly moved at the sight of Wingina, and took
her hand and turned his head away to hide a tear, but quickly dashed it away
and joined in the conversation.
You can, indeed, tell us Wingina, whether an expedition to set out this
night, would have any prospect of overtaking your brother and his mad
companions.
That depends entirely upon the question, whether they have returned in
pursuit of me, or have pursued their way to the mountains. I think they have
gone on to the mountains, at least the main body of them, because they
intend to oppose your passage over the Apalachee, and as they knew nothing
of the causes of the delay of the expedition here, they would be expecting you
to have set out by this time. My brother, may indeed be even now on the look
out for me round the city, but if it is even so, the young lady has gone on
with his friends.
What! exclaimed the Governor, do they hope to oppose my passage
with a handful of raw pupils from Collegetut, tut, I will cut them to pieces
with my old guard.
Oh no, Sir, they hope no such thingthey intend to rouse up every Indian
on the frontier. I heard them discussing the matter, and each one is to visit
his own peoplefor you know they are all of different tribesstir up their
wrath against your Excellency, and meet you hand to hand at the mountain
pass.
They will meet me at Philippi, will they, damn their impudence, if it were
not for the poor girl in the case, I would wish no better sport than teaching
my little army how to flesh their maiden swords! and here the old veteran
strode about at a magnificent rate, almost forgetting the urgency of the case
he came to consult about, in the fire of his military ardor, he had even began
to hum a martial air, but checked himself suddenly, and was again seated
near the other two.
Well, Hall, said he, what think you, will you take the troop I offer, and
and a trusty guide, and precede us to the scene of massacre, or will you wait
for the rest of the expedition?
I leave the case entirely with your Excellency, if you think I would stand
the slightest chance of overtaking the crafty marderers by preceding you, I
will set out this very afternoon.
I do not think you would, said the Governor promptly, nor do I think I
ought to let you goyou have no experience with these red men, they would,
even if you should overtake them, lead you into an ambush, and perhaps scalp
you all before we could come to the rescuenay, nay, no impatience, my lad,
it is no impeachment of either your soldiership or discretion. Moreover, you
know that there is to be a meeting of the young gentry in the Capitol to night,
at which I am particularly anxious you should be present. Here the
Governor
placed his finger upon his lip, and then called a servant to whom he
consigned
Wingina, telling him to lead her to his daughters. When she was
out of hearing, he resumed. I am particularly anxious that you should be
there, for I understand that Harry Lee intends to object to your name being
enrolled among the young chivalry of the Colony.
Ah! upon what new tack is he now?
He says, I hear, that you have only cleared your name from one of the
charges with which it is blackened, and that he for one will not be of the
expedition
,
if you are permitted to be. He says that the other Hall has arrived
and he has sent an express to York for him.
Hall appeared a good deal agitated at this news and walked the floor with
some perturbationthe Governor eyeing him the while in any thing but a
satisfactory manner, he would rather have heard him speak out promptly and
manfully to the challeuge of his enemy. At length Hall discerned what was
passing in the frank old veteran's mind, and he approached him and said,
Governor Spotswood, I have too long taxed the patience and credulity of you
and your friends. I acknowledge that there has been a mystery about my
movements, but not one played off in any idle prank, nor yet for sinister
purposes
.
I have merely acted hitherto, from the necessity of case. I must
ask you to forbear with me only until to-night. I must indeed attend this
meeting, and if I do not then and there put the blush of shame and deep
mortification
upon my enemies, then you are fully at liberty to set me down for all
they would represent me to be.
Well, my man, no one can, after what has happened to-day, shake my
confidence in you, but yourself. I grant you that I was a little shaken just
now by your hesitation, but that is all over, and I will wait patiently, and in
full faith until the time you name; and by the by, when you and Harry come
to hard words, don't forget to throw into his teeth his shameful desertion
from the House of Burgesses, when, for all he knew to the contrary, the whole
enterprise hung upon his vote.
Never fear, Sir, never fear, I will give him something harder to swallow
than that; but before this meeting takes place, I have a great favor to ask of
you, it is that you will furnish me with a fleet horse and a trusty messenger,
for a couple of hours.
Certainlycertainly! but for what object?
I must contrive some means, to slip a note into the hand of this new Mr.
Hall, before they produce him at the capital to confront me.
The Governor was taken all aback again, and did not pretend to
disguise
his doubts and gathering indignation. His eye rested upon the
young man as if he would penetrate his very soul, but he quailed not beneath
the prolonged examination. The old veteran lowered his grey shaggy
eyebrows
,
into an awfulfrown of gathering wrath, and every instant Hall expected
to see the storm burst, but he had lately been through various ordeals, well
calculated
to steady his nerves, and he stood up under the gathering storm in a way
at once so meek, and yet so dignified, that the old soldier was partially satisfied,
and characteristically exclaimed, Damn me, if there is another man in the
Colony, who would have dared to ask me to be a party to such a scheme, and
yet you brave it out, as if there was nothing in it.
Nor is there any thing in it, your Excelleny, except a little innocent
counterplotting
,
an ambuscade perhapsnothing more, I assure you.
Is it so indeed, and no more of these infernal mysteries after all. Forgive
me, my boy, here is my hand upon it, you shall have my assistance, but the fact
is, you have been so long wrapt up in the clouds that I did not know but this
was some new freak of yours to mystify us all again.
And so it is, your Excellency, but only for a few hours, you shall yourself
be witness to the explanation, and I think, you will say it was well done.
Well, well, there is my hand upon it, I will trust to your honor and discretion,
you have come out so well thus far, that you must be knave as well as fool, to
sacrifice all now to a silly manuvre.
Trust me, General Spotswood, that I am the last man in the Colony (to use
your own words in part,) who would ask you to be a party in the smallest degree
to any scheme which would sully those laurels which you have so nobly won
and so nobly wear.
Tut, tut, man, I am ambitious of no laurels except those which grow upon
the highest peaks of the great Apalachee, I would rather wear a sprig of that
in my cocked hat, legitimately earned, than wear the honors of Marlborough
himself. By the by, did you ever see this scar which I wear here to match
that one of your own, (bareing his breast, and exhibiting a wound which
must indeed have put his life in imminent peril) that was received as I led
a charge at the battle of Hockstadt,
*
*
Usually spelled Hochstet, and by the English, called the battle of Blenheim, from the
village of that name three miles off.
right under the glorious old veteran's
eye. He had me carried from the field himself, and actually shed a tear over
my bier, as he supposed it to be. No one thought I could survive for
twenty-four
hours. This is a mere scratch to many others which, you see, has
marked me with a premature old age; but it is only the outside, my boy
the fire burns as brightly within as if these old locks were not decked out in
their frosty garb, and I will yet show an ungrateful ministry, that I am a
better
servant to our royal mistress, than they are, with there old wives' factions.
21
But we have no time to lose, you must prepare for the meeting, and so must
Iremember, now, that you are pledged to clear up all this mysteryyou will
have a glorious opportunityfor your enemies, and they are numerous and
powerful, will make a combined attack upon you, and I have even received
an intimation that it will be extended to me, and that I may yet peril the
expedition
,
unless I throw you overboard.
I trust, your Excellency, that I may be enabled to right myself in the
eyes of all men; at all events you shall not suffer by me, nor shall any of my
short comings attach their odium to your enterprise. Either I enter upon it
as a gentleman of untarnished name and lineage, or I enter it not at all.
Such, I understand, indeed are the pre-requisitions to enter your chivalrous
band. I will not say, that my past life has not been fruitful of errors, but
there is no personal stain in all the sad retrospect, at least none that I think
your Excellency will consider as such; but I will not anticipate the work of
the evening, by recounting to you the only thing which could be tortured
into matter for my exclusion. I will make a clean breast of it, when we
meetit may produce a stormy meeting and that far, I regret the necessity
on your Excellency's account.
Pooh, pooh. I have heard thunder too long to be frightened at a fow pop
guns let off by some run-mad boys in the Capitol. I was once as mad as any
of them, and I have not forgotten it, nor do I mean ever to forget it. I love
the wild spirit of the untamed colt, provided it is only the impetuous impulses
of young life, and nothing vicious in it. I shall keep my eye upon one
youngster, who will doubtless figure largely there to-night, however. I have
hitherto found it impossible to decide, whether he was of the true metal or
not, and only spoiled in the training, or whether he has innate deviltry so
deeply
imbedded in the texture of his composition, that the ups and downs, even of
a campaign, will not wear it out.
I think I know to whom your Excellency alludes, and without
presumption
I think I know him better than you do. You allude to Mr. Henry Lee!
Be under no apprehension for the harmony of your expedition, at least for
any disturbance that he may create on my account; for I predict now most
confidently that one or the other of us will withdraw entirely from the
enterprise
.
It is next to impossible that we can unite in any undertaking of the
sort, after what must necessarily come to light at the meeting. He has
hitherto had the whole game in his own hands and I have suffered him full
swing, but the time has now arrived for me to assert my just rights in this
community, so that you may possibly see a double unmasking.
Well, well, only do as well as you talk, my boy, and I assure you there is
no one who will be more gratified than myself. I have seen for some time
that you were in a false position, and that he maintained some unaccountable
power over you, and I thought indeed that you had given him full swing sure
enough. I rejoice to hear you say that it is now about to end. I cannot tell
you how many remonstrances I have had addressed to me on your account.
Some hinted one thing and some another, but all thought it unseemly in me
to countenance you without credentials of any sort. So, you see, it is
full time to unmask, as you say. By the by, did I not hear that you were
one of the masking party at my country house?
No more, your Excellency, no more; have patience only until one telling
of my tale may answer.
Well, good day, and remember what is before you! and with these
words Hall was left alone. There was no need to remind him that he had an
arduous task to performhe well knew it, and felt it keenly. He knew that
he was in a delicate positionthat he was a mark, as well for the shafts of
envy and malice, as for the eager eyes of all men.
He retired to prepare the note for the Governor's trusty messenger, which
he did in a few minutes.
CHAPTER XII.
LAST EVENING AT THE CAPITAL.
Since
we last presented the Governor's daughters to our readers, they had
suffered the first great afiliction of their lives. 'Tis an era in the life of
every one, and by its results may be marked the forming character of either sex.
Kate's life hitherto had been unusually brilliant and happy, not a cloud
obscured her serene horizonevery thing was seen
couleur de rose
, and the
native enthusiasm of her character had burst into full fruition, unchecked by
the frowns of fortune or misadventures of a tenderer sort. If we have
succeeded
in presenting her properly before our readers, they have seen in the
records of her young, and innocent, and happy life, almost a perfect contrast
to the melancholy and heart-stricken experience of her intimate friend.
Happy was she, that such a one was near her, and that she knew what
misfortunes
were, or the blow would have been more dreadful than it really was.
For a brief space, they had almost changed places, and while Ellen's
prospects
brightened, she became the constant comforter of her sanguine and
enthusiastic friend. True, their trials were somewhat differentthe one
bemoaned an absent lover, but not entirely without hope, and the other mourned
a brother. It may be well imagined, then, that the first sight of Wingina,
ushered into Kate's presence without notice or warning, was anything but
soothing to the lacerated feelings of the poor girl. She hid her face and
wept afresh, when she saw herfor she had heard the whole of the sad
story of her shameindeed her appearance began now to put secrecy any
longer out of the question. It was impossible for Kate to allude to the
melancholy
affair, and she could only weep and wring the hand of the poor forlorn
creature. Kate looked and expressed in pantomine a thousand promises of
sympathy
and protection, but she could do no more. Dorothea left the room,she could
not look upon the sister of her brother's murderer with the same Christian
forbearance as her sister. She expressed no feelings of hatred or indignation,
but obeyed her youthful impulses, and left the room upon the instant. Poor
Wingina could not fully understand all thisshe could not appreciate the
feelings of either sister; for though brought up in many of the outward and
conventional forms of civilized life, her education had been very defective in
all that touches the heart, either through the ministrations of religion, or even
the refinement which
may
be acquired without them. There was no
sentimentality
about her. It is true, indeed, that a rude and savage heart may be
touched by an influence from above, which softens and humanizes the
character
,
but even then, there is something still wanting in the point we have
alluded to. We have never seen an Indian, converted or not, possessing
this delicacy of feeling. But Wingina could not comprehend the full measure
of her disgrace. Her previous distraction was made up of fear of her
brother, and dread of being separated from the one she loved, and but for her
subdued and meek natural deportment, might have been considered
brazenfaced
and shameless. She could not comprehend her fallen position in the
eyes of those around her; she felt bereaved, but much in the way she would
have done had she lost a husband, after the aboriginal manners and customs.
All through the house she met the silent tear and the averted face, and
perhaps
the patronising air of pity and commiseration. Lady Spotswood could
not see her at all. This was all very different from her former reception in
the same place and from the same people, and she was about to make a speedy
retreat; but Kate seeing the nature of the case, begged her to wait a few
moments, and she sat down and wrote a note by her to Ellen. As this note
was somewhat characteristic, and at the same time expressed better than we
can do the state of feeling we have attempted to describe, we shall transcribe
it. It ran as follows:
Dear Ellen: Such a friendship as ours can bear the imposition with which
I am about to tax you. You know the sad tale of this poor Indian girl, and
how it lacerates all our hearts afresh, even to look upon her; and knowing
this, you will do all those little kindnesses for her that we cannot, and which
her situation requires. She sees that we
cannot
look upon her with
complacency
,
and
now
she misinterprets it. God knows we wish to wreak no
vengeance
upon her for my poor brother's death. Do make her sensible of all
this. You, my dear Ellen, that know so well how to compass these delicate
offices so much better than any one elsedo give her all the comfort the case
admits of, and administer such consolation as her peculiar nature requires.
Explain to her our feelings, and that they are the farthest in the world
removed from unkindness Oh, Ellen, you know what a shock we have
sustained
,
and will, I know, acquit us of any mawkish sensibility in the case.
I trust her entirely to your kindness and discretion. My father has just
stepped in, and anticipating my object, begged to see this note; and he now
begs me to say to you, that Wingina must be closely watched, else her brother
will contrive some subtle scheme to whisk her off again.
Dear Ellen, I love to turn to you in my distress, as you have often turned
to me in like circumstances. May we ever lean upon each other with a
confiding faith that knows no doubt.
Sincerely, your friend,
Kate
.
This note was sealed and handed to Wingina, who was nothing loth to
departin fact, she was more than half offended, and arrived at the Doctor's
in rather a sullen mood. She found Ellen herself not in the most amiable
state of calmness and repose. She, too, was beginning to be offended in
another quarter. She had expected a visit from Hall, and was disappointed
that he did not come. Her father made many excuses for himmentioned
the meeting at the capital among others, but they were not satisfactory. She
had reasons of her own for wishing to see him previous to that very meeting,
and he had reasons of his own why he wished to avoid it, until that meeting
was over. Our readers will soon perceive that his were substantial ones. He
was engaged during the remainder of the afternoon in one of the upper rooms
of the Palace, before a large table entirely covered with printed and
manuscript
papers, from which, from time to time, he took notes, while others he
tied up in a bundle, and marked for use. Occasionally he rose from his
engrossing occupation and strode through the room under an excitement of
feeling, which he strove in vain to calm. He was, in fact, laboring under
the most painful suspense as to the result of his message to York. Could
he have been assured that all was right in that quarter, he might have
prepared
himself for the coming contest more calmly. He knew that the crisis
of his fate had arrived, and under his present want of recent information
from Europe, he knew not what evidence might be brought against him for
the share he had taken in the affair of Gen. Elliot. He knew not but his
enemies might prove him an attainted rebel, and thus baffle one of the greatest
desires of his life, (to bear an active part in the tramontane expedition,) as
well as throw him out once more from the association of that circle which he
loved so well.
His reasons for not presenting himself at the Doctor's house, were the
farthest possibly removed from ingratitude. He thought of the
interpretation
which Miss Evylin and the Doctor might put upon his conduct, but he
resolved to risk their present displeasure for their future approval. Such,
indeed, was the whole constitution and character of his mindhe had ever
sought future good by present sacrifices, and denied himself that others might
be gratified.
It will be readily gathered from what has been said, and from what is
already known of his past history, that he was in a poor state of preparation
for a defence of all that was dear in life to him. He was about to throw off
a masquerading dress, which had been adopted at first from the sternest
necessity, and perhaps place himself thereby in defiance of the laws of his
countrythose laws for which he had now come to feel an uncommon
reverence
.
Now, he knew what it was to attempt in the roisterous and
thoughtless
days of youth to revolutionize the whole current of society, according
to the immature views of that periodhe knew that it was better to suffer
partial evils, in an otherwise wholesome and benign government, for the general
good, rather than that every mad youth should set himself up for lawgiver
and judge. In short, his futile aims at unattainable perfections were put to
flight by the most profound consideration of the utter debasement of human
nature. This is a point of knowledge not often attained in young life, without
bitter personal experience; and he that comes into active life without this
experience, and after sailing always upon summer seas, is very apt to become
an amiable (but nevertheless) fool.
But, however much his spirit was grieved, and the immature notions of his
sanguine youth ground down, he had yet to suffer for the follies which they
had engendered. Repentance, alone, will not always answer in this world
there must be restitution, and retribution, as far as possible. Hall's business
now was with the present, and not with the past. He was now to chalk out
a new career for himself, but he had first to overcome the one great error of
his youth, and to which he could now distinctly trace all his subsequent
misfortunes
.
He reviewed hastily his past careerthought over the successive
difficulties in which he had been involved, and from the most important of
which he had just been delivered by a manifest interference of Providence.
This conviction nerved his heart for the contest, and all his late despondency
and want of confiding trust in a benign and overruling power vanished. He
rose up from his papers re-invigorated, and thrusting his bundle into his pocket,
walked down stairs. He had not been there long before he was called out
by a servanthe was met at the door by the messenger who had been
despatched
to York, who placed in his hands a large paper package,
covered
with tape and sealing wax, and a note of apparently more recent date. He
tore open the latter, and read it by the light of the lamp, (for it was growing
dark.) The old Governor had followed him, and was anxiously waiting to
hear the result of his message. Hall did not appear to be aware of his
presence
,
or if he was, forgot in the exultation of the moment. He jumped
straight up from the floor, whirled himself roundkissed the letter, and then
ran out upon the green, where he walked rapidly among the trees for ten or
fifteen minutes talking away and gesticulating to himself in the strangest
manner
and performing anties, which not a little surprised if they did not amuse
the old veteran who was still eyeing him. At length he became conscious of
the ridiculous figure which he was cutting, and walked back to the Palace and
met the Governor at the portico, and seizing his hand, wrung it warmly with
the simple exclamation, It is all right, Sir,all rightnow, indeed, I am a
free man.
I am none the less rejoiced, said his Excellency, that I know not the
cause of your wild exultation, but I trust it bears upon the point we talked of
during the day.
It doesit doesand right to the pointstrikes the nail right upon the
head.
The Capitol bell was now pouring a merry peal over the tewn, and
announcing
to the young chivalry of the Colony, that the time appointed for their
meeting had arrived. The carriage soon alter drove up to the door, and not
many minutes had elapsed before Dr. Evylin's also drove up, to accompany
the party from the Palace. Hall walked to the window, the blinds of which
had been let down, and shook hands with the Doctor, but Ellen did not extend
hers, contenting herself with a slight inclination of the head. The cause of
this we will explain at another time, but our readers should not attach
inconsistency
to our favorite, from which, indeed, none of her sex was more free.
The party from the Palace was soon made up, and as the carriages turned
from the avenue into Gloucester street, they encountered many more pursuing
the same route.
Seldom, since the foundation of the Colony, had there been a meeting
which attracted so large a share of public attention. It was the last meeting
of those who were to set out on the morrow for the mountains, an undertaking
at that day quite as perilous as one in ours to the Rocky Mountains. Indeed
the route was far less known, and had never been traversed at all by that
Anglo-Saxon race which was and is destined to appropriate such a large
portion
of the Globe to themselves, and to disseminate their laws, their language,
and their religion, over such countless millions. Grand and enthusiastic as
were the conceptions of Sir Alexander Spotswood and his young followers, they
had little idea that they were then about to commence a march which would be
renewed from generation to generation, until, in the course of little more than
a single century, it would transcend the Rio del Norte, and which perhaps in
half that time may traverse the utmost boundaries of Mexico. But the sober
old granddads of the Colony thought the Governor visionary enough in his
present views, bounded as they were by the Apalachee and the Mississippi,
and that he had led the youngsters of the Colony sufficiently astray already,
without extending his prophetic vision to Texas and Mexico.
CHAPTER XIII.
MEETING OF THE TRAMONTANE ORDER.
The
Capitol was brilliantly lighted, and already crowded to excess, when
our party arrived. The seats appropriated to the members of the expedition,
were already pre-occupied by ladies, and the galleries were crowded to
suffocation
by many of the rank and file of the little army, who had crowded in to
hear their leaders talk of the campaign. There was a feverish anxiety and
restlessness already visible among the elite on the lower floor, and when Hall
followed the Governor's party into the midst of them, there was a general
cessation
of the buz and hum of eager gossip, and all eyes were turned
enquiringly
towards him. It seemed as it the public mind had been prepared to expect a
renewed encounter between him and his persecutors. Seats had been
preserved
for the Governor's party, just in front of the Speaker's chair, but Hall
after waiting to see them all comfortably provided, did not assume so
conspicuous
a place himselfhe walked to one of the farthest and most obscure
corners
of the room and seated himself, and rested his head upon his hand in a
meek meditative mood, and so as to elude the painful gaze of the multitude.
He had scarcely thus enscounced himself before the purient eyes of the
people
were attracted by the entrance of the well known champion of the
opposite
sideMr. Henry Lee. He walked up the main vestibule, arm in arm with
young Carter, and holding quite ostentatiously a bundle of papers under his
arm. After he was seated near the centre of the room, and exactly in front of
the Governor's party, he cast his haughty eye round the hall in search of his
antagonist, but he was not successful in detecting his whereabouts, and he
doubtless concluded that he had not yet arrivedconsequently he kept his eye
anxiously and eagerly upon the door. The room, however, was now as full
as it could hold, and by general consent they were ready to proceed to
business
.
Dr. Blair rose up and said: As this is a meeting for the purpose of
deciding the best means of advancing the cause of civilization and of
carrying
the cross of our blessed Redeemer into unknown heathen lands, I propose
that it be opened with prayer!
As this was one of those propositions which none in those days thought
unconstitutional, it was adopted
nem. con.
and the old prelate offered an
eloquent appeal to the throne of mercy, that the expedition might be crowned
with success and all its arrangements distinguished by that harmony and good
will to men, which should ever characterize missionary enterprises. After
the prayer was concluded he rose to his feet and addressed a few words to the
young gentry present, and distiuctly characterized them as young
missionaries
about to herald the cross to heathen lands, and begged them to preserve
their characters and conduct pure and above reproachthat they might
consistently
look to Heaven for its approbation upon their undertaking.
This proceding of the old Doctor took the sanguine and impatient youths
all aback. They had been dreaming of naught but military conquest, and
magnificent landed acquisitions, but this suddenly converting them all into
missionaries of the cross, was what they were not exactly prepared for.
Besides it seemed to awe into silence the turbulent passions which they had
expected to see burst into fierce and angry contentionit converted, as it
were, the arena of personal contention at once into a sacred place.
However, some one rose and nominated Governor Spotswood to the Chair.
The question was put and carried unanimously, and two of the young
gentlemen
escorted him to his seat. On assuming the chair, he stated that he
understood the meeting to consist only of the young gentry of the land who
intended to march on the morrow for the mountainsof such as had marched
their retainers or followers voluntarily to his standardand that their object
was to adopt certain regulations and arrange preliminaries, so as best to
accomplish the noble ends of the enterprise, by such means as had been so
well set forth by his Reverend friend who had preceded him. He said he had
understood that it was to be proposed there, that none but those of gentle
blood should be admitted into this exclusive association. He hoped that no
such proposition would be offered. Let the noble objects of our ambition be
open to every gentleman of fair fame, and to all the
officers
of the Rangers.
Here he undertook to prove to them, that it was absolutely necessary for
the purposes of military discipline, that there should be but one order among
his subordinates in command, and therefore that the officers of the Rangers
must come into their association.
He sat down amidst no murmurs of applause; on the contrary, there was
marked disapprobation of his views on more than one countenance. Of this
party, Carter became the spokesman. He said, after the draft of the
constitution
had been read, if the line already drawn by those appointed to that
duty was once broken down, there was no telling where it would stopthat
if they commenced with the officers of the Rangers, the non-commissioned
officers might come in under the same rule. He undertook also to rebut the
Governor's position as to military disciplinesaid that this was entirely a
private association of gentlemen, intended in no way to interfere with the
Governor's proper authority in the field or campthat like all other
chivalrous
asscciations which had gone forth to do battle, either in the cause of
religion, humanity, or the more general purposes of righting the wronged,
they were desirous of purifying themselves; and here he instanced the
prolonged fasts, vigils, and religious ceremonies preceding the outset of other
knightly bodies; and though, said he, we may not yet have received the
acolade, who knows but our sovereign may honor many of these noble
youths here assembled upon our return. Like honors have often been
bestowed for less services.
Here there was a general smile among the ladies, and the speaker himself
had a half serious half comic expression upon his face. He little knew then
what those services and hardships were to be. His speech was well received
by all the exclusives, those who were for confining the honors entirely among
the young gentry of the Colony. There was a large party, however, of
opposite
views, and of these, Bernard Moore became the spokesman. He said,
that this discussion was what might be called, in military language, firing
from a masked battery. That the gentlemen on the other side had certain
objects to attain by all this machinerycertain persons to exclude. Now he
could not see that they could attain more by one plan than the other. The
Governor's rule would exclude every improper person from the Tramontane
Order, and the other could do no more, while the latter was burdened with
odious featuresit put every gentleman upon his pedigreea matter not at
all times and places fit for public discussion and investigation. He called upon
the opposite side to come out manfully and show their handsto say at what
they were aiming. He would not ask them to point out who it was they aimed
at, but their objects, if praise-worthy and legitimate, could be attained by
general
regulations such as he before alluded to. He concluded by an earnest
appeal to their patriotism, and called upon all the real friends of the enterprise
and its distinguished author, to mark these initiatory proceedings by harmony;
assuring them, that should they commence with heart-burning and discord,
much of the pleasure which they all anticipated would be destroyed.
These remarks called up Henry Lee. He said that for his part be had
nothing to conceal; that he wished to make the badge of the Tramontane
Order not only a distinction to be sought after, but to elevate the requisitions
for membership, so as to ensure its future honors. If these rules and
regulations
be adopted, said he, I predict that our order will be one that will live
in the future history of the Colony, and to have been a member of it, will
confer honors worthy of being transmitted to our descendants. The
gentleman
who has just taken his seat calls upon our side of the house to come out
manfully, and show our hands. We are ready and willing to do so, as far as
the nature of the case will admit. It has been currently reported that a certain
individual who has now become quite notorious in the Colony will attempt to
force himself upon us, and I acknowledge frankly, for one, that my design is
to exclude him. I had hoped to have seen him present before I took the
floor.
Here Hall rosehe said not for the purpose of interrupting the
gentleman
,
but to show him that he was present and ready to meet him.
Lee exclaimed, when Hall resumed his seat, ah! I am g'ad of it, then we
have not been misinformed. The issue is now made up, and there can be no
more complaints of masked batteries. I leave the question with the meeting.
Moore made the attempt to take the floor, as well as several others on the
same side, and the chairman became very restless, as if he too desired to take
a hand in the game, but all gave way to Hall, as soon as they saw that he
desired to speak. He said he had but few words to saythat he would not
have intruded at all at this stage of the proceedings, if he had not been so
pointedly alluded to, that he could not misunderstand it. He called upon his
friends to cease their opposition and suffer the regulations to be adopted, that
he was ready and willing to abide by them.
We have not given these regulations in detail, because we did not wish to
fatigue or readers with the whole constitution of a society, in much of which
they could feel no interest. The scope and object of it may be abundantly
gathered by what has been and will be said. There seemed now no longer
any neccessity for opposition, though the friends of the last speaker could
not tell what he was aiming at. They thought that by his easy acquiescence,
he was voluntarily entering into a snare, set for him by his enemies, but they
could not very well hold out when he had yielded. The articles of
association
were now read
seriatim
, and adopted
nem. con.
The first of these, of
any interest to our readers, required the unauimous election of six out of the
whole number of names handed in as candidates for admission, This was a
very difficult thing to accomplish, and consumed considerable time. The
whole six were ballotted for at once, after having been put in nomination by
their friends. It will be perceived that this plan required that each candidate
should receive every vote. Bernard Moore obtained this distinction at the
first ballot. Carter at the second, and so on, until the board was complete.
Harry Lee, after running the gauntlet of every trial, was excluded by two
votes only, much to his chagrin and disappointment. It had nearly upset
the whole scheme which he had so ingeniously concocted.
The candidates for admission were now to advance singly to the clerk's
table and record their names, provided there was no dissenting voice of the six
censors. If there should bethen the case was postponed to the last, when
it was to be decided by a vote of the whole associationtwo-thirds being
required to effect an admission.
The Tramontane order was now rapidly filling up its ranks, and nought
further had occured to disturb the harmony of the meeting, until Hall rose
from his secluded corner, and walked to the table of the Secretary, took up
the pen to record his name. Carter immediately rose and objected, and the
candidate fell back to bide his time. The proceedings went on smoothly
enough again, until Henry Lee approached to record his name, which he
had half accomplished before he could fully comprehend that there was
objection
made. It was by Hall, of course, so that they stood as the challengers
of each other, in fact, for all understood who Carter's prompter was, and
were fairly pitted for the contest.
It was now incumbent on Lee to state his objections first, and make them
good. He rose, and stated to the meeting that he had objected, through his
friend, to the candidate, first, because of the general circumstances of
mystery
and suspicion which attached to him, and now pretty generally known
throughout the Colony. This, he presumed, would be sufficient of itself, but
he would not leave the matter even doubtful and, therefore, he would state his
second objection to be, that he stood before the meeting under an assumed
name, and that name adopted for dishonest and disreputable purposes.
Thirdly
,
that he was an attainted rebel and an outlaw, with a price set upon his
head.
Hall rose up to answer to these grave charges, neither with an exulting nor
a desponding air, but quite calm and dignified. He repelled, indignantly, the
first charge, inasmuch as most of the suspicions which had been engendered
against him in the Colony, had been the coinage of his accuser's own brain
on that very day he had, by an evident interposition of an all-wise and
overruling
Providence, been triumphantly freed from the meshes of one of the most
ingenious plots ever contrived to destroy an innocent man. Such, said he,
are all the gentleman's suspicious circumstances. As for the second and
third counts, he put him upon his proofs. Lee beckoned to some one in the
gallery to come down, and for a few moments the whole assemblage were left
in breathless suspense, for it had somehow been rumored that Lee was to
confront
Mr. Hall with the real personage whose name he had assumed. It was
not long before a young man, of elegant exterior and carriage, entered the
door of the lower floor, and walked up the passage towards the centre of the
room. Hall, so far from shrinking from the encounter, rose up also, and
approached
the table, to which all eyes were now attracted. The stranger was
not quite so tall as Mr. Hall, nor of so large a frame, but the hair and whiskers
were exactly of the same color, and there was, besides, a striking general
resemblance
in the two. Those on the back seats rose up, and those in front
22
were pressed forward, and for an instant there was some confusion in the
general
rush to see the strange encounter. Still they approached each other, and
many supposed they were bent only upon a rude and hostile encounter. But
what was the surprise and astonishment of the people, and of Henry Lee, in
particular, when the two rushed into each other's arms and embraced most
cordially. Both the young men seemed much affected by the meeting, and
each stood gazing upon the other, as if each waited for the other to speak.
Henry Lee, who was standing upon his feet, exclaimed in a hoarse and
agitated
voice:
Mr. President, this jugglery requires explanation!
Hall waved his hand, and appealed by his looks for a moment's patience
and silence in the crowd, that he might be heard. In the mean time many
voices cried out, which is the real Hall? Which is the real Hall?
The President begged the members and the association to be seated, and
suffer the young gentlemen to explain their own mysterythat it was
impossible
to hear amidst the present confusion. When order and silence were
once more restoredHall, or the young gentleman who had assumed that
name, arose and taking the stranger by the hand, led him to the foot of the
table, and said:
Mr. President, and good people all, I take pleasure in introducing to you
the real Henry Hall, whose name I have so long borne. The idea of first
assuming it was suggested by the resemblance in our persons, having often
been mistaken for each other. I took up another name because it had become
dangerous for me to wear my own. My offence, I acknowledge frankly, was
a grave one; but it was wholly political, and I am happy in being able, at the
same time, that I resume my own, to state to this enlightened meeting, that it
no longer rests under the proscription of our sovereign. I hold in my hand
a free pardon, one of the first acts of clemency of our new King, for I am
under the necessity of informing you at the same time, of the death of her
gracious and most excellent Majesty, the late Queen Ann. She died on the
first of last month.
There was a general exclamation of surprise and regret, which was
followed
by the buz and hum of conversationcarried on in an under tone
throughout the room, and during which the speaker temporarily resumed his
seat.
Silence being once more restored, the President reminded the gentleman
last on the floor, that he had not yet completed his explanation. He resumed.
I have but few words more to utter, Mr. President, it only remains for me to
resume a name once honored in this ColonyFrancis Lee! Here a
deafening
shout of applause shook the Capitol to its foundations, in the midst of
which, both the spokesman, together with Harry Lee, were seen wildly
gesticulating, but not a word could be heard for some moments from either.
Frank, (as we shall henceforth call him,) seeing his brother's frantic gestures,
ceased his own and stood back a moment to hear what it was he said. I
protest, Mr. President, against this new phase of this arch impostor's
jugglery
I
disclaim all kindred with him, and I call upon all those present who
remember my brother, boy as he was, whether he had not light hair.
Frank stood forward, with a playful smile upon his countenance, and putting
his hand deliberately to his head, in a single instant denuded it of its dark
flowing locks, revealing at the same time a fine turned head, closely matted
over with short light curls. The transformation was instantaneous, and many
voices testified aloud, it is Frank Lee! it is Frank Lee! Old Dr. Evylin
rushed forward and seized his hand, but at the very same moment Ellen
fell over into the arms of one of her female friends. Frank's eye had hardly
ever for a moment been entirely removed from her eager and agitated
countenance
,
and quick as thought, he flew to where she had fallen, and bore her
out of the crowd in his arms.
CHAPTER XIV.
RETROSPECT.
We
must turn back, only for half a chapter, and we are sure our fair
readers
will forgive us, when they recollect it is the only indulgence of the kind
we have askedthat we have spun the thread of our story straight forward,
without turning to the right or the left. We stated in a former chapter that
Ellen Evylin, when she drove up to the door of the Governor's mansion,
was rather cold and distant to the young gentleman then called Hall, and
for fear our fair readers might think her fickle and capricious, we will
explain
why it was so. It will be recollected that the Indian girl had
expressly
stated, that the young lady then in captivity, had sent a most
urgent appeal to Mr. Hall in her behalf, and such an one as only a lady
betrothed would send to her lover. Now, supposing that Miss Evylin had
had for some time a shrewd suspicion who this Mr. Henry Hall really
wasa sort of half doubting, half confident possession of his secret, how
could she explain satisfactorily his equivocal position between herself and
Miss Eugenia Elliot. She knew from the young gentleman's own
statement
,
that this very young lady accompanied him across the oceanthat
she was a party to the masking adventure; that her father had been
involved
in the same political troubles with himself; and she, moreover,
remembered tha the was under the impression at the time of the voyage,
that she (Miss Evylin) was either affianced or married to another. What
more probable then, than that he should seek consolation from such a
charming source. She most ingeniously tormented herself in imagining
what an embarrassing position he had thus placed himself in, between
two young ladies, and most innocently too, if her surmises were correct.
Thus she accounted for much of the studied mystery and reserve of the
young man; and our readers may readily imagine what was her
resolution
upon the painful subjectit was to surrender up all claims upon the
instant.
So admirably, however, had Frank Lee (for we shall henceforth call
him by his right name) mystified even his oldest and best friends, and so
constantly had he worn his masquerading dress, and pertinaciously had he
continued to carry out the delusion through trials and difficulties, that she
was by no means certain that her suspicions as to his identity were
correct
.
Nothing but this constantly harrassing doubt prevented her from
sending for him at once and releasing him from his early engagement,
which she had tortured herself with supposing, was now so embarrassing
to him.
She was carried from the meeting of the members of the Tramontane
Order by Frank Lee, it will be remembered, and that ardent and emancipated
young gentleman seemed determined to make amends for his past losses, and
let loose his long suppressed affections in a burst of endearments to his half
dead mistress. How ardently he folded his lovely burden in his arms, and
with what glowing animation he pressed his lips to her cold and clammy
cheeks. We know of no restorative like it. The olfactories may be, and no
doubt are, very sensitive, but a ladies sensorium is sooner reached through
those thrilling thermometers of vitality, the lips. So it proved in the present
instance; and by the time Frank had reached the green in front of the
Capitol, Ellen was pleading, at first most eloquently, and at length indignantly,
to be set down and left alone. And what sounded not less strange in his
ears, she called him Mr. Lee. Now, it might have sounded strange to him,
from the fact of his having so long suffered it to fall into disuse himself
that was not the idea here, howeverthere was a chilling and distant tone
and manner in it, which he had never encountered but once, even as the poor
adventurer Hall, and he was consequently taken all abackhe had
anticipated
a very different reception, and was utterly at a loss to account for it. His
failure to present himself after his acquittal, was the only thing which he
could in his rapid review of his conduct surmise as the cause, and he
commenced
his protestations accordingly, but it was all met by a cold wave of
the hand, and an earnest supplication to be conducted to her father's carriage.
Of course such an appeal, or rather demand, was not to be resisted, and he
reluctantly escorted her to the carriage. Most wistfully did he gaze by the
dim light to see if there was no relentingno hint or look implying a desire for
his company in her solitary ride home, but there was none, and his pride coming
to his relief, he closed the door with a hasty good night, and strutted off in
high disdain. He was marching thus, like a grenadier, with his nose in the
wind, and gesticulating with great animation, when Moore walked up, and
touched him on the arm. Frank gazed at him as if he had fallen from the
moon, so completely had he forgotten his whereabouts.
You are unanimously admitted into the Tramontane Order, said Moore,
with a bright smile.
Oh, the plague take the Tramontane Order, responded Frank, still
striding
on and Moore following' down Gloucester street.
Your brother decamped from the meeting instanter.
Well, I hope he may never return.
Why, Frank? exclaimed Moore in surprise, this in the first moment
of your restoration and our mutual recognition? You have not given up the
mysteries yet, I see.
Forgive me, Bernard, said he, suddenly wheeling round, and seizing his
friend's hand. Forgive methe fact is, I have been thrown all out of
sorts by an inexplicable piece of capriciousness in one whom I believed too
far exalted above such little feminine arts.
Hah! a petticoat in the case is there? I'll tell you a secret, my fine
fellowthere's none of them above capricealways except Kate.
Bernard, an hour ago I would have thrown down my glove upon it,
against all comers, that there was not such another model of constancy
ingenuousness
franknessfirmnessmodestygentleness;
in short, my dear
fellow, a very personification of all the female virtues, with many borrowed
from ours. This has been my solace under every trial and difficulty; and
then to turn round in the very moment of my triumph, and descend to the
little arts of her sex, and dash my brimming cup to the ground. Oh, it was
too bad.
Nay, nay, Frankit was certainly a better chosen moment than the
period of your adversity would have beenyou must admit that; but there is
some mistake, you may depend upon itI know her too well to suppose that
she would indulge in any idle caprice at such a moment.
I'll call at the Doctor's upon the spot, and demand an explanation. I
cannot stand this cruel suspense, just upon the eve of what I supposed would
be one of the happiest moments of my lifewhat I supposed would
compensate
me for a life of unexampled misfortunes.
Do so, FrankI am sure there is some misunderstandingperhaps there
is some charge which she has deferrred preferring until you were entirely
clear of all difficultiesi. e. if she really penetrated your disguise, as I am
told many did, now that the
eclaircisement
is made. What wonderful sagacity
the many-headed monster is blessed with! But to returnthe surmise that
I ventured just now is the true solutionit is very much like her, depend
upon it.
No, no, BernardEllen penetrated my mask at least, I am sure, and we
played a sort of mutual masquerade, under which nearly every subject of
personal interest or otherwise was discussed; and oh, Moore, when she first
began to peep behind my mask, and I to reproduce the shadow of her long
lost lover, as his best friend, Henry Hall, what exquisite moments I enjoyed.
Can it be possible that she designs now to revenge herself on me, for thus
surreptitiously plundering her heart of its secrets?
It is not in character, Frank, she has no revenge to accomplishit is
some higher object, real or imaginary, that she has in viewperhaps she
fears a deadly encounter between your brother and yourselfthat's itthat's
it, Frank.
But how could her snubbing me in this fashion prevent Harry and me
from coming to high words, perhaps blows?
Perhaps she caught a glimpse of him eaves-dropping?
No, no, Bernard. With all his malice and uncharitableness, he is not so
mean as that; but I will solve the riddle before I am an hour older. I will
merely call at the Palace to deposit these papers, and then for a trial of my
fate.
Together they proceeded on foot, when just as they entered the avenue
leading to the Palace, they discovered the Doctor's carriage driving away,
and Kate hastily retreating from the door. Now, as this avenue was always
lighted at night, they could see that Ellen still sat alone upon the back seat,
and that she was weeping. She also caught a glimpse of them, and drew
herself up in the corner of the carriage, out of sight. This was all very
strange and inexplicable to the young men, especially on such a night, and
after all that had happened at the Capitol. It was just the reverse of what
Frank had anticipated, but he proceeded on his course, none the less bent on
clearing up the mystery from what he had just seen. He was destined to
some farther experience in the matter, earlier than he expected; for no sooner
had he entered the hall of the Palace, than a servant presented him with a
message from Miss Kateshe desired to speak a few words with him. He
followed and was led into one of the sitting rooms on the lower floor, where
Kate awaited him with a bundle in her hand. She congratuated him upon
his restoration to his proper name and station, and said she was sorry to be
the bearer of unpleasant news at such a time, but her friend Ellen had charged
her with the mission, and she was compelled to perform it. She said that
Ellen had commissioned her to deliver into his hands that package and a
miniature of himself, with a complete discharge from all engagements to her.
Frank was speechless with astonishmenthe seemed as if he would choke, so
parched became his throat, and so vain his attempt at utterance. Kate seeing
his pitiable condition, and that he still gazed at the things she held in her
hand without taking them, and that his face was almost convulsed, so intense
was the working of his troubled spirit, she handed him a chair, and begged
him to be seated. Her efforts at consolation were at first not very
successful
,
for her auditor seemed not to be listening to a word she said. His eyes
were riveted upon the locket, the early memento of his youthful passion.
What overwhelming recollections of days and joys gone by forever poured in
upon his memory, with all their blended associations of sorrow and joy; that
picture, which he had not seen before that day, since he had plighted his
faith, upon the occasion of its being given? How vividly it brought back the
bright morning of his youthful lovethose halcyon days that have but one
dawn, one bright morning, ere they are closed over forever by a long, and
dark, and bitter night. The long years which had intervened, with their sad
and blighting experience and bitter memories, were rolled back, and he stood
before the youthful beauty in his mental vision, as he stood before her with
her hand clasped in his, as when he had presented her with that picture. Was
it any wonder that he spoke not? Such memories have no voice.
Frank Lee had perhaps came as near acting out and preserving the first
freshness of his early romantic love, as is ever permitted to mortal man,
but his self-condemnation, upon the return of that picture, knew no sophistry
or deception. He stood abashed, in recollection of the bright purity and
unwavering constancy of his mistressof these, he had indubitable evidence
he was compelled,therefore, to make a hasty retrospect of his conduct towards
her; and though self-condemned in many respects, as we have said, for his
life he could not divine in what he had offended towards the object of his
early, undivided, and constant attachment, and he at length resolved to
vindicate
himself before his offended mistress. Scarcely was the resolution formed,
ere he seized upon the package and the picture, and rushed from the house.
As he passed out, he had nearly upset the Governor, who, with his party,
were just returned from the Capitol. The hardy old soldier turned round and
looked after his retreating figure, with a dubious and amusing stare of
astonishment
.
Gad, said he, that fellow will die in a mystery, touching his forehead
at the same time with his finger, as much as to express a fear that all was
not right in that quarter.
Frank scarcely knew that he had passed, much less been rude, to any one.
He soon found himself knocking at the Doctor's door. Now, as the old
Doctor
was one of those who accompanied the Governor, the coast was clear
there was nothing to prevent his having the interview and explanation he
sought. Yet he trembled more when ushered into the presence of the little
offended beauty, than when recently on trial for his life. And to say truth,
the young lady herself was not in the most serene mood in the world.
They stood before each other like two culprits. Frank, with the letters
and the trinkets, like stolen goods, still in his hand. He made many
efforts to speak, and nearly choked at the formality of calling her Miss
Evylin, but at length burst through all embarrassments and restraint,
and exclaimed, Ellen, will you, can you, tell me what all this means?
pointing to the things he held in his hand.
She motioned him to be seated, and began, Mr. Lee!
But he held up his hand in a deprecating mood, and begged her, For
God's sake, no more of thatI shall die upon it!
Well, then, Frank, resumed she, I have accidentally learned that
you had most innocently, as I presume, engaged yourself to another and
most excellent and beautiful lady. Nay, be not so impatient, I will
conclude
all I have to say in one moment.
No, said he, hurriedly, and striding impatiently about the room, not
another word will I listen to of the sortit is all an infamous falsehood, and
the coinage of the same prolific brain which has devised so many disasters for
me already.
Indeed, indeed, Frank, you are mistaken, said Ellen, very much softened
in her manner, however.
Well, then, Ellen, go on until I see from whence the story came.
Of that I can inform you in a moment. It came from the lady herself,
Miss Eugenia Elliot, and you know that you gave me such a description of
her, yourself, as none but a lover could give.
Frank was bewildered, he had stopped, and stood facing his partially
appeased
mistress. You astonish me! said he, for I know that Eugenia
Elliot is incapable of falsehood or deception. He was wrapped in a
deep
study
for a moment, and then striking his forehead and capering about the room
like one wild, cried out, I have it! I have it!
Ellen was agitated, and began to think somewhat like the Governor, that his
misfortunes had touched his brain, and she rose up from her seat, as if about
to escape, but Frank caught her in his arms, and after imprinting sundry most
extravagant kisses upon her forehead, cheeks and lips, seated her
nolens volens
.
I have it, my Ellen! I have it! The mistake has originated in the
confusion
of the two Halls. It is the real Henry Hall who is engaged to
Eugenia
Elliot; fool that I was not to think of this, when that little Indian girl
delivered the message, but of this you shall be certain within the half hour;
and he put on his hat and was hurrying out, but Ellen, with a sweet smile of
forgiveness on her face, called him back.
It needs not, Frank, said she, as he returned into the room, you see I
have taken you at your word, and resumed those precious treasures of our
childish days, and she held out her hand at the same time.
It may be readily imagined that Frank was not satisfied with a mere shake
of the hand, or even carrying it to his lips, but over that evening we dare not
venture to intrude the stranger's gaze. Their hearts and their memories
poured forth their long pent up treasures without stint.
Happy, happy are they, who, after whatever trials and afflictions, maintain
their first pure affections uncontaminated by the world. It is a god-send, and
sufficient for most men, that the memory preserves these delicious dreams of
youth, to be called up at pleasure to reinvest with their bright colors the
otherwise
sombre views of the present and the future. A large majority of
mankind
are only thus partially blestit is enough to vibrate a single cord of the
instrument, but with our now happy young couple, their whole hearts throbbed
in perfect unison, not a jar was heard in the beautiful concord of sweet words.
Is it because such delicious hours so intoxicate the senses, that no durable
record has ever been taken of these too fleeting joys; or, is the impression so
evanescent that no durable impression is left? That it is not the latter, the
heart and memory of every one can testify; the impression is more lasting
than life; many a miserable sufferer in this world lives out his dreary
pilgrimage
upon the bare hope of living o'er all these scenes again in another
stage of existence. The wish, the hope, is never perhaps embodied into language,
but they nevertheless exist under grave visages, and quaint garbs and fashions
of the world. The heart of every man, and especially of every woman, is a
store-house of these hidden things, treasured up through every trial and
vicissitude
,
where they lie buried along with the cherished memories of other
youthful dreams, only to be revived once in a long time, by some sudden turn
of circumstances or some unforeseen providential occurrence.
We could multiply instances and illustrations, were we disposed to digress,
and show at the same time that truth is stranger than fiction, but we leave
the matter to be tested by the experience of each reader, and to be admitted
or thrown aside, as to each may seem best.
Though we will not intrude upon that portion of their discourse which
occupied
a large part of the night, during this their delightful reunion, we must
nevertheless touch upon the conclusion of their meeting, because it bears
upon the subject of our narrative.
Frank had several times made an effort to tear himself away; he was at
last conscious that the night was far spent, but then the approaching
departure
on the morrow furnished an admirable excuse. Your father, too, said
he, is still at the Governor's, surely I may stay here as long as he stays there.
I will sit up all night if you choose, Frank, replied Ellen, her hand
clasped in that of her lover, and her eyes looking so bright that one would
suppose that sleep never approached them, much less that they had lately
been dimmed by sickness and suffering.
The fact was, the old Doctor was long ago comfortably stowed in bedhe
had learned from the servant at the door that Mr. Lee was there, and
supposing
how the matter stood, very discreetly retired and left them to
themselves
.
No, no, said Frank, that would never do, it would dim your bright eyes
to-morrow before their time, for you must know, my Ellen, that I flatter myself
that you will not see me again depart upon an indefinite absence without a
tearjust one little pearl.
Oh, Frank, how can you talk lightly upon such a subject, after such an
absence and such a returnbear with me,therefore, if I turn your gay thoughts
for a moment to a serious matter.
No, no, Ellen, no serious subjects to-nightI have resolved to be happy
while I may. For the brief hours, nay, minutes, that are left us, let dull care
be thrown aside.
But, Frank, and she laid her hand imploringly upon his arm, your
brother!
He bounded to his feet in an instant, and strode through the room, and
sawed his arm vehemently in the air, as if he would dispel a disagreeable
spectre which she had conjured up, she following all the while, and her
countenance wholly changed from its late happy, placid expression to one
of anxiety and distress.
Oh Ellen! he at length exclaimed, how could you obtrude that
hated name at such a time?
Hated, Frank?
Aye, hated!
What! hate your own brother, Frank? How different your present
feelings from your noble and magnanimous defence of him while in prison!
No, no, Ellen, hate is too strong a word, or, at all events, I will only
hate his actions, while I commiserate the man.
Ah, Frank! Frank! that is a nice distinction for so young a
moralist
search
your heart, and see how inseparable are the actions and the
actorit is a refinement, which I fear, Frank, is not only beyond your strength,
but beyond human power.
Well, my Ellen, what would you have me do? Must I profess to love
him, and clasp the monster to my heart, while my whole nature revolts at
the hypocrisy?
No! not that either, but forgive him, Frank, and do him justice.
Do him justice! then I should become his executioner; I should dye
my hands in his blood!
Ellen shuddered at the ferocious expression of his countenance, which
she had never seen before; all formed for gentle emotions, as it seemed
to her, and ever ready to melt at a tale of sorrow and distress. She sat
down and covered her face with her hands. Seeing which, he approached
already softened and repentant.
Forgive me, my EllenI have offended you?
No, not offended, Frank, said she, and looking up with a tear
glistening
in her eye, but I confess to you that I am disappointed. I thought
that your trials had wholly changed that ardent and impetuous nature of yours.
Would you have my nature changed, Ellen?
She returned his ardent and steady gaze for some moments, and then
laying her hand affectionately in his, she said steadily and firmly, Yes!
He let her hand drop, as he said, Now, Ellen, I in my turn am
disappointed
.
I thought we knew each other thoroughly, and that in the language
of the marriage ceremony, we had determined `to take each other for better
for worse,' that you loved me for myselfas I am, with all my faults.
And so I do, Frank, and have said alreadyhow often, I am ashamed to say,
that I will be yours `for better for worse' when you return, but
Oh stop there, Ellen, and let me go now, let me depart to-morrow
with those sweet words still ringing in my ears, and he imprinted a kiss
upon her lips, and broke away.
An hour afterwards he returned, and gazed upon the now black and dreary
looking house, wrapped in profound darkness. Well was it that he did so
most providential was the prompting that led him to that spot at such a late
hour of the night, or rather morning; for he had not stood there many
moments ere he saw a light spring up in a wing of the Doctor's house, the
lower part of which was the old physician's office, and the upper scarcely
ever used. He watched it from the time it was no bigger than his hand,
until the whole curtain was in a bright blaze, and he could no longer doubt.
He sounded the alarm of fire, and running to the enclosure, laid his hand
upon it and sprung lightly over. He was very much surprised to hear the
tramp of several horses feet leaving the enclosure as he entered. If it were
the old Doctor just setting out upon one of his nightly pilgrimages, why did
he not return, at the alarm of fire? He repeated the cry still louder than
before, and several voices in the street re-echoed it, and he could hear the
people running in towards the front entrance, but still the flying horsemen
seemed but to increase their speed. He found the back door of the wing,
where he had seen the fire, wide openhe ran up stairs, the first to arrive
there, and found the curtains of the window and those of the bed, from
which some person seemed just to have escaped, all in a blaze. He tore
down the fast consuming combustibles, and with such things as he could
hastily find, thrust out the sashes and the burning fragments after them;
and with the assistance of others, who now arrived on the spot, soon
tumbled
the burning bed-clothes and the curtains out of the window. In a
shorter time than we have taken to relate it, the fire, except the burning
things in the yard below, was entirely extinguished; and in a very few
moments after, the old Doctor in his nightcap, and Ellen in her dishabille,
entered. Their whole concern and anxiety were for Wingina, whom Ellen
said she saw safely in bed herself not an hour before. Frank was as much
surprised to see the old Doctor as
he
was to see Frank, the latter supposing
the old Doctor cantering away upon an errand of life and death, while
the Doctor thought Frank snugly in bed at the Palace. Diligent search
was now made for Wingina. It was supposed, that frightened at the fire,
she had run out into the grounds below, or perhaps into the street. Her
outer garments were still hanging over the chair, where Ellen had seen her
place them when she retired to bed.
While they were yet prosecuting the search in the court below, the
garden and the shrubbery, several reports of fire-arms were heard in quick
succession, which those present most conversant in such matters pronounced
to be by the picket guards beyond the College. Our readers must know
that the little army then encamped in and around the city, was already
assuming that order and discipline for which the old chief in command was
so noted. Notwithstanding this rigid military discipline, it now became
pretty evident to Frank Lee and the Doctor, who were holding together
anxious council on the subject, that those lines had been surreptitiously
entered by the Indians, and Wingina spirited away by her brother. Such
were their hasty surmises, and they were speedily confirmed by the reports
which soon came in from the sentinels. It appeared that the horsemen,
whose retreating figures Frank Lee had really seen, were those of a party
of the dare devils headed by Chunoluskeethat he bore his sister on the
horse before him, and that they had dashed through the line of sentinels
without sustaining any material damage, though repeatedly fired at. It
now became a matter of anxious inquiry, how they had obtained ingress; and
when the business was investigated, it turned out that the footsteps of the
Indians as usual were tracked in blood. A drowsy sentinel had been
stolen upon and tomahawked before any alarm could be given, and thus
they had found their way into the very heart of the city, and borne off the
prizehostage or victim, as the case might prove.
This daring deed, upon the eve of the march of the expedition, opened
23
the eyes of the careless young cavaliers, upon whom mainly rested its fate.
Many of them were carousing in their tents at the very hour when they
had been stolen upon.
The novelty of a camp life, and some difficulty in procuring lodgings,
had induced many of them thus early to spread their canvass upon the
common
,
and some were sleeping, some drinking, and some singing and
telling
stories of adventure, when the report of fire-arms startled them from
their various attitudes. Some forty or fifty of them were speedily mounted,
Frank Lee among the number, taking the road indicated by the
sentinels
,
in pursuit. How well Frank remembered that road! He had but
recently travelled itfirst flying from prison, and then returning to it again
in irons. Dark as it was, he knew every foot of it. How gaily
bounded his steed, and how elastic his spirits now, in comparison with what
they were then. Even a night alarm and a recent murder scarcely threw
a shadow across his bright visions of the future. It must be confessed, too,
that his thoughts were scarcely, as they should have been, devoted solely to
the enterprise in handthey were still lingering in the capital. Yet he rode
first of the band, spurring on his mettled charger. We pity the horse of a
lover, for he is required to keep pace with the thoughts of his rider. Frank
would have ridden, perhaps, till day-light, and never perceived that his
companions
had halted, had they not shouted after him. It was found, after
several miles pursuit, to be a vain effort. The road had been examined
several times, and the trail was already lost. Doubtless the marauders had
taken to the woods, as soon as they left the capital. It was therefore
determined
to return to the city.
CHAPTER XV.
THE DAY OF DEPARTURE.
The
eventful day at length dawned upon the thronged capital of
Virginia
that
day pregnant with so many bright hopesso long looked for,
and so ardently desired, in particular by the chivalrous Governor of the
Colony.
At the first peep of ay, the drums and trumpets were in requisition, and
the young gentry were seen marshalling their little bands of followers in
separate squads, over the common and in the by lanes and streets. Any
one who has ever seen a militia training, or a general muster, in Old
Virginia, may form a pretty accurate idea of these raw troops and their
manuvres.
The Rangers, or regular troops, as they may be called, presented quite a
different aspect. They were paraded in Gloucester street, in full uniform,
well equipped and mounted. They had long been under the supervision of
the old veteran their commander, and presented an array never before seen
in Virginia, for they had never before paraded at the capital in one body.
In addition to this solid column of soldierly looking men, there was drawn
up on the other side of the street a long line of sumpter mules, loaded with
every kind of dried provisions, clothing, cooking utensils, tools and iron.
Many carts and wagons were also in requisition, with the heavier baggage
and provender. These were intended to go no farther than the frontier,
when the tents and baggage would be transferred to the backs of the
mules, and the wagons would return.
Even thus early in the morning, Gen. Spotswood was mounted upon his
horse, and was busily superintending the delivery of arms from the round
tower, to the militia, of whom we have already spoken. The old hero could
scarce preserve his gravity, as he, one after the other, ordered up the militia
in review before him. He had yet to learn, in actual service in the field,
the worth of these hardy tatterdemalions. They were mostly dressed in
hunting shirts and foraging caps, rudely put together, from the fur of
every sort of wild animalmany of them still flourishing the tail which
belonged to the animal. To any but the stern military eye of their
camp drilled commander, their appearance would have been quite
picturesque
.
Such a parade, it may be readily believed, was not without interest to
those who were not to be of the expeditionthe ladies filled every
window
,
balcony or cupola, and gaily fluttered their white handkerchiefs in
the wind, as some well known young cavalier rode by with his troops.
Frank Lee and young Nathaniel Dandridge had been appointed aids to
the Governor, and their occupations on this busy morning were arduous
indeed. They were kept constantly on the gallopbringing up one troop,
and marching off anotherboth, doubtless, though glorying in their
appointments
,
would have far preferred another occupation on this particular
occasion
.
There remained a hundred unsaid things to their lady-loves, which
they now recalled for the first time; but they did not yet despair of saying
at least farewell, once again. Often they caught the beam of a bright eye
upon them, as they rode though the streets. The Governor's two
daughters
already had their horses saddled at the court of the Palace, intending
to accompany the expedition for some miles on the journey.
There was yet one solemn public ceremony which remained to be
performed
,
after the distribution of arms and ammunition was completed. A
platform had been erected in front of the new church, on Gloucester
street, and here, it was understood, the Reverend Commissary would dismiss
the little army, with an exhortation and solemn benediction.
After the morning meal was completed, the troops were set in motion
towards this point. The open space, enclosed for a cemetery, was already
filled with a crowd of spectators, and the troops now closely packed in
front of the church and along the square, in front of the Palace, formed quite
an imposing array. The bell had ceased its summons, and a solemn silence
pervaded the assembly, when the Reverend Commissary, accompanied by the
Rev. Hugh Jones, appeared in front of the church. Instantly every hat was
doffed, and the clear voice of the good old prelate was heard in earnest
exhortation
.
He approved decidedly of the enterprise, and urged them to go
forward
in the great march of civilization, and told them that thousands yet
unborn would bless the hardy pioneers then about to set out upon the
exploration
of a new and unknown country. He told them that it was no idle
military conquest, barren of all useful resultsno pageant, to result in
unmeaning
and fruitless trophies, but emphatically an enterprise in behalf of their
countryof the ageof the world. He trusted, he said, that their conquests
would be bloodless ones, and their message to the benighted inhabitants of
the regions to which they were bound, one of peace, and mercy, and good
willthat the past conduct of his excellent friend, their commander, in
behalf of the aborigines, was a sure guarantee of his future conduct towards
them.
He said that his chief aid in the ministry, the Reverend Gentleman then
present, would accompany them, and he trusted that they would continue to
render homage to that Being, in whose hands was the success or defeat of
their enterprise.
Every knee was then bowed, to supplicate the divine favor for the
undertaking
,
in which they were all about to engage with so much enthusiasm. It
was a solemn sightto behold those gay young cavaliers and their rude
followers
,
and the more disciplined Rangers, all kneeling beside their horses,
and every tongue hushed to a solemn stillness, while the venerable prelate
poured forth his honest and eloquent appeals in their behalf.
Then followed a scene of indescribable confusionthe leave taking.
Wives rushing in among soldiers and horses, to have one more shake of the
hand, or one more parting word. Lassies taking a parting good by of their
lovers, and fathers of their sons. Few old men joined the enterprisethe
Governor himself was, perhaps, the oldest man of the little army. After a
grand flourish of drums, something like order was once more resumed, and
the troops began to deploy into line, preparatory to their final departure.
The old veteran rode along the line, with real pride and a martial glow
mantling his cheeks, which had long lain dormant, for want of proper
occasions
for its display. Like most successful military leaders, he felt as
confident
of success on that day as he did on the day of his return, for he knew
that he possessed the energy and the knowledge to ensure it. To us, at this
distant day, with all the results before us, this does not seem strange or
improbable
;
but it was by no means so then. His grand hobby, as it was called
by the elderly gentry, met with far more ridicule than support and
countenance
.
As we have before said, many over prudent fathers opposed their
sons accompanying him at all; and wiseacres were not wanting in abundance,
who predicted its total failure, and that the final catastrophe would be an
Indian massacre in some mountain defile. This last surmise had gained not
a little ground, since the daring inroad of a band of the Indians during the
night, into the very heart of the capitalgarrisoned as it was by their whole
army. And they reasoned not very unjustly, that if such things could be
done with impunity there, what might not be done among their own mountain
fastnesses, whose intricate defiles were known only to themselves?
A white guide had been provided hastily in Chunoluskee's stead. He was
a hunter, and had penetrated farther towards the mountains than any one
known in the colonies. He was of tried metal, too, for he had fought the
Indians in his day. His name was Jarvisson of the old fisherman, whom
we introduced to the reader, in the early part of our narrative. Joe Jarvis
commonly called Red Jarviswas of a class which is fast gliding from notice
in the older settlements of the States. They were called in that day, and
indeed long afterwards,
scouts
.
The troops were now in motion, and the front lines were already passing
the College square, the long line of sumpter mules and wagons bringing up
the rear. The Governor and his suite had not yet left the city. They waited
for the scout, who had gone on a farewell visit the night before to his father
at Temple Farm. While the Governor and his aids, with many of the young
gentry, sat upon their horses, near the round tower, in the market square, and
while they were beginning to express doubts and misgivings of their second
guide, the very man himself glided into their midst; and such a manso
remarkable, and he performs such an important part in the grand
expedition
,
that we must describe him. He was a tall specimen, in every sense of
the wordsix feet and more in his stockings, (if he ever wore any.) On the
present occasion, his feet and legs were clad in buckskin leggings and
moccasins
fitting close to the members. His breeches were of homespun, and
his hunting shirt of the same material, held together by a broad leather strap,
into which were stuck various utensils of the woodman's craft, with others of
a more warlike character, among which was a knife cased in a leather sheath,
which, in a single-handed encounter, would be a most deadly weapon. His
face expressed any thing but daring and decided character. Its principal
characteristic was fun and frolic, but of a quiet and subdued sort. There
was a constant inclination of the head to one side, with one eye partially
closed at the same time, and a quiet smile about the mouth. His excessive
self-confidence would have given him the appearance of boldness and
presumption
,
had it not been for the sly peculiarities we are attempting to
describe. He had large red whiskers, extending under his throat, the only
protection it had, and these were burnt and faded to a sandy or yellow shade,
at their extremities, by long exposure to sun and rain. Hence his
soubriquet
of Red Jarvis. Upon his shoulder he carried a long gun, much longer
than the pony upon which he was mounted. Thus accoutred, he rode into
the midst of the gentry, who awaited so impatiently his arrival, followed by
a large dog, which was just about as much used to such company as his
master. There was this great difference between them, however, the dog
slunk about the horses legs, quite confounded and abashed; while Joe rode into
their midst, one eye cocked, with as quiet a leer as if he had rode to the
front of his father's cabin. As he glanced around, his eye naturally fell
upon the short carbines slung across the backs of the young gentlemen who
sat on horseback around him and then wandered along the huge thing which
he carried himself. The result of the mental comparison was a sly inward
chuckle, which, however, he subdued into his habitual cock of one eye, as it
rested upon the Governor, who was surveying him, from the coonskin cap on
his head to his feet, which almost touched the ground. The result of the
Governor's examination was pretty much like Joe's survey of the young
men's armaments, a laughhe could not resist Joe's
outre
appearance.
Well, Jarvis, said he, how far do you expect to carry that pony?
Jist as far as he'll carry me, your honor.
Well said, but I fear that will not be far.
Hoses
is like men, Governorit is not always the smoothest coats has
the bravest hearts inside on 'em; and his half closed eye ranged again over
the gandy attire and gold lace around him, which gradually grew into an
unsuppressed chuckle, the cause of which the Governor was induced to
inquire.
Why, I was thinkin', Sir, how all this gold and flummery would look the
day we marched in again.
True, true, Joe, these lads will be glad to have your hunting shirt and
moccasins before they return, and so I have been telling them.
There won't be a whole shirt, Sir, in the army, when we come back; and
for that reason, I left mine behind; and here he gave another quiet laugh, as
he surveyed the magnificent lace ruffles and collars flowing about him.
Some of the young cavaliers had a curiosity to know what substitute
he
had in place of a shirt.
Why here, said Joe, handling the red hair under his throat, as if he was
bearding a lion, is my ruffles; and pulling open his hunting shirt, he
displayed a buckskin, tanned with the hair on, and corresponding so near in
color to the ruffles of which he had just boasted, that it looked like part and
parcel of the same animal. He enjoyed highly the stare of astonishment
with which his garments were examined by the ball room soldiers, as he
called them.
But, Jarvis, said the Governor, how comes it that you are so dilatory
this first morning of the marchwe thought you were the very soul of
punctuality and promptitude.
Joe looked a little confused for a moment, and tugging at his coon skin cap,
so as to place the tail exactly behind, and coughed and hemmed several
times ere he answered:You see, your worship, as I was comin' to town
this mornin' fore day, I heard the news of the
rupture
of the savages last
night, and I jist tuck a turn or two through the woods on my own hook, to
see if I could find the trail.
Here one of the young gentlemen bending over, whispered to the Governor
that Joe had formerly been an admirer of Winginia.
Aye, aye, said the old veteran, I see! well, did you fall upon their
trail?
Yes, Sir, I rather think I did. It would take a cunning Indian, and more
'specially a dozen of 'em, to march through these pines and leave no trail
that I could'nt find. I
blazed
a couple of miles or so, and then turned back
for fear you mought be awaitin' on me.
Blazing was performed in those days by the scouts, or pioneer, taking the
lead in a new or untried route, by striking a chip off one side of a tree. They
may be seen at night, if not very dark. New roads were laid off in the same
primitive manner. Joe carried his tomahawk in his belt, ready for such
service
,
not a little of which he was about to perform; for the army once beyond
the ruins of Germana, every foot of the route had to be marked out by him
after the manner described.
The Governor, after some consultation with his aids and the scout, came
to the conclusion that it was useless to follow the trail marked out by Joe, at
present, as he assured them that they would fall upon it again before night,
at such a distance from the settlement as would render pursuit more likely to
result in success.
The last sumpter mules were now passing the suburbs of the city, and the
little party round the military tower separated to bid a last farewell with those
near and dear to them. The Governor's two daughters were already mounted,
as likewise were little Bob, Dr. Blair, and several servants, intended as their
return escort. The Governor, therefore, only dismounted for a moment,
entered
the Palace, folded his lady in one long embrace, and then mounted and
galloped off, followed by his veteran life-guard, the bugles enlivening the
scene by their martial airs. By the side of Kate, rode Bernard Moore; while
Dorothea was escorted by young Dandridge, now quite proud at his elevation
into the Governor's military family.
Whether Moore's rival knew that the Governor and suite were to be thus
accompanied, or whether his military duties required him elsewhere, we know
not; but certain it is, none of the company regretted his absence. Indeed,
Kate was quite offended with him for the part he had taken against Frank
Lee, and perhaps, knowing this to be the case, he had voluntarily absented
himself.
The lovers rode quite by themselves, and to have seen the earnestness and
eagerness with which they conversed, one would have supposed that the whole
success of the expedition depended upon their sapient conclusions. That
they were looking far into futurity, no one will doubt who knows any thing of
the proverbial impatience and imprudence of lovers. Moore had, despite of
his jocular pledge to his rival, more than once pretty broadly hinted the state
of his heart, and his hopes, and his aspirations, preceding the sad catastrophe
which had so long (as he thought it) shut them up within the walls of the Palace.
He had longed, above all things, for just such an opportunity as now presented
itself, to complete the matter. Yet, when he glanced at the proud and brilliant
beauty cantering at his side, looking still more beautiful and bright from the
contrast of her sable riding habit, his heart almost misgave him. He dreaded
more the bright beams of those eyes, that occasionally encountered his own,
than the glare of an hundred hostile Indians. The precious moments were
fast gliding bynever did time so gallop by a true-hearted lover. The fact
is, that Kate coquetted just a little with him. She had hitherto succeeded in
listening to his protestations without committing herself by any reply. It had
so happened, that she was favored by circumstances in this respect. With
feminine sagacity in these matters, she at once now penetrated the objects of
her lover, and saw plainly his embarrassment and its cause, and instead of
helping him out of his difficulty, or even remaining silent to afford him an
opportunity, she rattled away in the most brilliant style, compelling him to
answer. But such answers! They were mere monosyllablesand more
than half the time he said no, for yes; and yes, for no. Kate was compelled
to laugh, at length, and ask him what was the matter?
To tell you the truth, Kate, I feel sadsad at leaving you; and his voice
became husky.
Kate broke into the midst of this exordiumWhat! so sentimental
Bernard
?
Don't you know that papa ordered us to put on our brightest smiles,
and that he hates a gloomy good-by!
I was going to say, Kate, that your wit is all lost upon me this morning,
because my heart is not in the subject of your merriment. Let me intreat
you to be serious for five minutesmy time is short, and you know that I
have been banished from your presence by the sad accident which we all
deplore so much.
Kate was as solemn as a judge in the twinkling of an eye, and replied, Oh
cruel, cruel Bernard, how could you dash all my bright morning's efforts by
such an allusion!
Forgive me, dearest Kate, but it was accidental, and fell from my lips
without reflection, and now let me banish the dreadful past by holding up a
bright future. Oh, Kate, how bright, my imagination scarcely dares
contemplate
,
if you will only consent to blend your hopes and destinies with mine.
He paused for a reply, but not a word escaped her now sealed lips.
He continued. You have held me in probation a long, long time. You
are sufficiently acquainted with all my habits, even of thought, to know by this
time whether you can consent to place your future happiness in my keeping,
and surely you will not suffer me to depart upon such a long journey without
letting me know my fatea journey, too, Kate, undertaken more through your
influence than your father's. You have driven me into exile, and it is for you
to say whether I shall return.
Oh, Bernard, how can you say so; I never urged you to go by word or
sign of any sortindeed I was opposed There she left the sentence
unfinished.
Go on, Kate, go on, said Moore eagerly. Were you indeed loth to see
me go.
Kate blushed, but finished not the sentence.
Would you have me turn back now? eagerly inquired he.
Oh, not for the world! she exclaimed suddenly, it would be disgrace in
the eyes of my father.
Oh, Kate, Kate, said Moore, after gazing at her thoughtfully for a
moment
,
you may as well confess that you take an interest in my movements,
whether I go or stay. Say, then, should I return victorious with your father
for I hear we shall have some fightingwill you crown my young triumphs
with that hand which I have so long and so devotedly sought?
Kate placed her hand in that of the eager youth, exclaiming suddenly,
there. And there we shall leave them cantering away on the road, having
fallen far behind the cortege of the Governor. How the more youthful pair
settled their
quarrels
, for every one said that Dandridge's and Dorothea's
love-making was more like quarrelling than any thing else, we shall not
venture
to say, but certain it is, that Nat had his face slapped with her fan more
than once during the ride. The Governor was in the habit of calling them
his Catherine and Petruchio. But we must leave them to make the best of
their way, while we turn back and see what has become of Frank Lee and
the scout, both of whom were left in the city and still remained there.
Where they were, or where the principal was, will not be hard to imagine.
Frank was at the Doctor's house, and his new attendant sat astride of his
rugged little pony at the wicket gate, holding Frank's horse, and cracking his
rough jokes upon his acquaintances that passed. It will be readily perceived
from this, that Joe was not entirely disconsolate at the abduction of his
lady-love
that
he was by no means one of the sentimental sort. Whether he was
aware of the ugly stories circulated through the town, to the great discredit of
her good name, we shall not undertake to say, nor to speculate upon his
probable
course, should it appear that he was fully aware of the whole scandal;
sufficient for our purpose to state, that he was fully determined to follow the
bloody varmints to the end of the world. Where that end of the world was,
Joe had very little thought or care. He was ripe for the tramontane
expedition
,
and perhaps of all the number who that day set out in its
accomplishment
,
he was the best informed of its hazards, and the best prepared to endure
its hardships. He had heard of Frank's late perils and adventures, and at
once taken a fancy to him; it was fully reciprocated by his more accomplished
friend, which will account for the present position of the parties. Frank told
him when he jumped off his horse and threw him the reins, that he would be
gone just five minutes. He had already been absent an hour, and Joe having
exhausted his jokes, was becoming rather impatient. He turned round to the
servant, who sat upon his horse at a respectful distance, and exclaimed, I
say, you darkey, are your master's five minutes always like
this
?
Can't say, replied Cuffy, I is just arrived from the plantation.
So we will give our readers a glance-for themselves into that little
parlour, flanked by the aviary and green house, and which so captivated
Henry Lee's heart.
Frank and Ellen were seated side by side, talking as earnestly as if
poor Joe and his pony were over the mountains, while the old Doctor
promenaded the veranda rather impatiently.
Oh, Frank! said Ellen, I cannot bear the thoughts of your leaving
me again, now that the parting moment has come, and yet I would not
have you stay.
No indeed, my Ellen, I know you would not tempt me to desert my
excellent friend, the Governor, just upon the eve of accomplishing one of
the great designs of his life.
And yet, Frank, when I think of our former parting and and all that
followedhow long I mourned you as deadmy woman's heart shrinks
from the trial.
I would not part with the blessed certainty which I derived from
those trials and afflictions, of your devotedness,
for all
the suffering which
they brought. Besides, my Ellen, my name has been somewhat tarnished
as a rebel. I go forth now to redeem my good name.
I care not a fig for worldly honors, Frank, and did hope that you too,
were weaned from such empty vanities.
And so I am from all empty vanities. We are impelled by higher
motives, I assure you.
Ah, Frank, Frank, you are still the same ardent, impetuous, sanguine
fellow
,
that I knew you to be when a boy in my father's house.
And to whom you pledged your young affections, children as we were.
Oh most nobly have you kept that pledge, my Ellen, and I but ask you
to pardon the unworthy truant for another short, short absence, and then
and then. Oh such visions are death to the tramontane expedition.
Farewell
,
Ellenfarewell.
You will write to me, Frank, by every returning courier. I
understand
that the Governor will despatch messengers at stated intervals
informing
us of his progress. Send me a journal of every day, Frank.
I willI will.
Amidst such parting exclamations and sundry other little remembrances
too tedious to mention, he tore himself away, wrung the old Doctor's
handsprung upon his horse, and was soon on his way towards the
mountains. Joe was trotting at a murderous rate to keep by his side,
but all in vain, for the first mile or two; at length, however, he
succeeded
in arresting the attention of his companion; when he addressed
him after the following manner; I say, Squire, is that black leather thing
behind your nigger filled with ruffled shirts, like the rest on 'em
Why, Joe, to tell you the truth, there is some useless finery there, now that
I think of it.
Joe laughed, and continued. And not a pair of shoes or moccasins, not a
flint, nor a powder-horn, nor ere a spoon, nor a fork, nor a screwer, nor a
frying-pan
?
Ha! ha! ha! Now, do tell me, what is in them, besides the ruffles
and the spangles?
Well, Joe, there are a dozen shirts, sundry inexpressibles, an extra coat,
some writing paper, an ink-stand and drawing materials, and lastly, a pair of
small pistols.
Well, all I've got to say, is, that your black mail bag will come back filled
with another sort of plunder, that's all.
CHAPTER XVI.
A GLIMPSE OF THE FUGITIVE.
Frank Lee
did not ride many miles further, before he met the return party
of ladies. Kate was riding on ahead of the now melancholy little cortege,
weeping quite bitterly, and her eyes were so blinded, and her thoughts so
absorbed, that she did not perceive the horsemen approaching, until Frank
reined up right along side of her.
A smile broke over her sunny face, as she perceived Frank shaking his
finger threateningly at her.
I will give a good account of those bright drops, some of these long
nights, around our watch fires, and will guarantee that I find one interested
auditor, at least.
Kate waved her hand in adien, and putting whip to her horse, cantered off on
her way, calling out after him, over her shoulder, Filial tears, filial tears,
Mr. Lee.
And thus the last link was severed between the daughters of the city and
the mountain adventurers.
It must be remembered that the vast territories since claimed for Virginia,
extending almost, if not quite, to the Pacific Ocean, owed their titles to the
very expedition which we have been thus departing from the ancient capital.
But it was quite different in those primitive days; the whole population was
contained in some twenty or thirty counties, and the present sites of some of
our most populous cities were then actually on the frontier, so that our
adventurers
had to march but a short distance before they were beyond the reach of
the thickly settled regions.
Our readers must cast their thoughts back to the days far anterior to
McAdamized
roads, steamboats, and railroads, and imagine to themselves, if they
can, a state of things in the Old Dominion, when sumpter mules and baggage
wagons of a rude sort, performed all the offices now so rapidly accomplished
by these modern inventions. Some idea may be realized of the primitive state
of the country, and how completely the population was shut up within the
tide water region, when we state, upon undoubted authority, that among the
great number of horses employed in the enterprise which we have just seen
under way, not one had ever been shod. Those persons living in the sandy
regions of the United States will readily conceive this, but it will be almost
incredible to those who now dwell in those favored vales, first discovered and
appreciated by this very expedition. Such was the fact, as will be seen
hereafter
,
24
by the remarkable circumstance from which our humble narrative takes
its name.
For the first day, however, no inconvenience was inexperienced. Never
did a happier or more jovial little army set out in search of adventures. The
old military veteran, their commander, was so well pleased himself that his
long desired scheme was really about to be accomplished, that he did not, for
the present, quarrel with the rude gaiety of those around him. Those,
however
,
who knew him well, knew, also, that this state of things would not last
longthat, in a day or two's march, they would enter a country filled with
savages.
With the route of the first few day's journey, the Governor was perfectly
familiar. He had more than once passed over the ground, and had, as we
have before stated, established Indian preparatory schools throughout the
districts
inhabited by the tributary Indians.
He was now quite anxious to see what influence Chunoluskee and his
associates
had been able to exercise over these, and he had it in contemplation
to time the march, so as to arrive at the end of the sacred day at the first of
these schools, lying within his proposed route.
Though we have seen the Governor permit a somewhat lax discipline to
prevail upon emerging from the city, there were already symptoms that this
state of things would not last long. He soon summoned his aids and the
scout to his side, and was busily detailing to them his commands, as to the
conduct of the men during the march and in campand consulting with the
latter as to the route, forage, and subsistence. The latter subject gave him
far more uneasiness than any apprehended danger from the savages; and how
hundreds of men, and as many horses and mules, were to be subsisted in an
entirely new and uncultivated country, an unexplored wilderness in fact, was
a subject of anxious reflection with him. He knew that the supplies contained
in his baggage wagons and haversacks would scarcely last him beyond the
extreme frontier settlements. Though he was a tried soldier from his very
infancy, it must be recollected that his present adventure was as new to him
in practice, as to the youthful aid by his side.
Our readers may think that he consulted strange counsel in the person of
Red Jarvis, but so it was; and of all that army, perhaps, he was the very
man best calculated to give advicein his own way, to be sure. He felt no
doubts and misgivings like his superiorhe felt as confident as he had done
many a time before, when a hundred miles from the settlements, with no other
protection and provision for the morrow except his trusty firelock. And as he
had done, so he advised the whole army to doliterally to turn it into a
great hunting party. The Governor was amused at the conceit, but he
would not hear of the scheme for a moment. Nevertheless, the idea was
serviceable, for it suggested the plan of detailing each day, parties for the
purpose of killing game for the subsistence of the party.
He was pleased to find, as they emerged deeper into the forest, that the
foliage became richer, and the grass more abundant. These were matters
which now became of great moment, insignificant as they appear at the first
glance, the whole success of the expedition in fact depending upon them.
Joe Jarvis was no sooner dismissed from the conference with the Governor,
than he struck out into the woods, ahead of the troops, and began blazing
away at the trees, as already described. He seemed to Frank Lee, who
accompanied him, to know every foot of the ground, and likewise when game
might be looked for, and when not. They had not travelled many miles
through the wild and solitary forest, before Joe dismounted from his
tackey
,
and handing the bundle to Frank, motioned with his hand for him to pause,
and be silent. He moved stealthily through the bushes, examining his
priming
as he went, until he entirely disappeared from sight. In about fifteen
minutes Frank heard the report of his gun, and as it appeared to him, but an
instant after, a fine herd of deer came leaping over the tops of the bushes,
and almost within pistol shot of where he sat upon his horse, his gun being
unfortunately slung to his back. While he made a movement to bring it
around, they all stopped and stared at him for a moment, and then bounded
away like the wind. Joe had been a spectator of this scene, and emerged
from the bushes, wiping his bloody knife, and laughing in his chuckling way,
at Frank's discomfiture and chagrin.
Now, said he, you see the reason why I alway carry my gun in my
hand. You asked me a while ago, and I promised to
show
you.
Frank immediately unstrapped his firelock, and wound up the leather straps
and put them by, as if to show his teacher that he was determined to improve
by his practical lessons.
Well, Jarvis, what did you kill?
As fine a buck as ever you laid your eyes upon; you remember the
Governor's talk, about the subsistence of the army?you see, I'm going to
show him the way we hunters provide for our daily wants.
By this time they had arrived at the head of a small stream, where Joe said
the deer were in the habit of drinking, the water being a little brackish, of
which they are very fond. He slung the fine animal, whose throat he had
just cut, across his pony, and after securing it with thongs, and reloading
his piece, proceeded by the side of Lee, talking all the while. He told him
that more of the ruffle shirt gentry, as he loved to call them, would unsling
their arms, before they had proceeded many days into the wilderness. Frank
observed that Joe's attention was carnestly directed to each side of the path
on which they were travelling, notwithstanding his constant stream of talk,
and stopping every minute to blaze a tree. He saw that Jarvis stooped down
and examined the bushes attentively every now and then, and when they
came to the ford of the little stream upon whose banks they had been some
travelling, Joe laid his hand upon the other's bridle rein, and then stooped
down, and most attentively scanned some tracks of horses' hoofs, left in the
soft mud of the opposite bank, and then carefully counted them. Frank asked
him what was the meaning of all this, and if he had fallen upon the Indian trail?
I rather suspicion I have, said Joe; and more
nor
that, there is some
one with them that would as soon be out of their clutches.
How do you know, Jarvis?
Why, at every place where they have stopped, I find a twig bent down
or broken. I reckon it is that little
coquit
, the interpreter's sister. She
would be glad enough to see me now, I suppose.
How long do you think it is since they forded the little stream, whose
banks you have examined so carefully?
Jist about daylight; and they were riding at a devil of a rate, you may
be surelook here, said the scout, and he placed his foot in one track and
the butt of his gun in the other, to indicate the length of the leaps which
the animal had taken.
A slapping pace, indeed, said Frank, thoughtfully; but tell me, Joe,
how can you compute the time since they passed?
Why jist so; if they had jist now passed, you would see the splashing
of the water around the tracksif a little longer, you would see that all dried
up, and the tracks themselves only moistand longer still, the tracks would
be entirely dry.
Which latter is the case, is it?
Very near, very nearthey
mout
a' passed a little arter daylight, but not
much; we'll hear from 'em to-nightthe red devilsdepend upon it.
Do you think so?
To be sure I doI know the critters better
nor
the Governor and old
parson Blair, with all their schooling and christianizing of the ungrateful
varmints. An Ingin's an Ingin.
What is there so absurd in the idea, Joe?
Did you ever see a wolf tamed?
No, I cannot say that I ever did, but I think it possible.
Yes, I'll warrant; and so the Governor thinks of the red devils; but I
saw a tamed wolf once, and he had a wonderful good
charecter
for a while.
He was better behaved nor any sheep, and he would walk about among the
flock as if he was bound to teach 'em good manners; but
bime by
the lambs
began to be missed, and nearly every dog on the plantation was killed, on
suspicion of being suspected. Still the lambs went, and after a while they
laid a watch, and caught wolfy in the very act.
And what then?
Why they stretched his bloody neck, of course.
And do you think this an analagous case to that of the interpreter and
his associates?
Exactly! no good
kin
come out of an Ingin. I've hearn tell of all the
grand talk about their native gifts, and all that, but if you will listen to my
racket, you may build a college over every son of a gun of 'em, and clap a
church on the tip top o' that, and after all, he will have a turkey buzzard's
heart in him. God never made an Ingin for a human critter.
Pooh, pooh, Joe, you have imbibed all the prejudices of the early hunters
against the race. Do you know that our ancestors on the other side of the
water, many hundred years ago, were quite as savage and barbarous as these
poor red men?
Bless my soulyou don't tell me so. Well, that beats all natur, I never
hearn tell of that afore. I thought they were white, and came down
Christians
,
along side of the Bible, the whole way.
So they were always white, Joe; but what do you mean by coming
down Christians, along side of the Bible?
Why, you know that old Adam was a white manyou'll give that up,
I reckon?
I suppose I must, Joe.
Well, that's what I mean; that we came down straight from old Adam,
and brought the Bible all the way down with us.
You are entirely mistaken, Joe; neither the Old nor the New Testament
was given to our British ancestors. Even when our Saviour appeared upon the
earth, they were as great savages as these very red men, against whom
you are so prejudiced.
Good, gracious Heavens! you don't say so! then we are not Christian
born under the covenant, as my old dad used to say, after all! Well, this
puts a patching over any thing I hearn tell of; but you're making game of
me, with all your book larnin.
No, Joe, I am not; I've told you nothing but the plain truth.
Well, then, how come we to be white, tell me that?
A red skin and a savage nature are not always inseparable; all the
learning and refinement of the world have been transmitted to us through
dark skins.
Oh! you are a bamboozlin' of me, that's plain.
No, I am not; but tell me, Joe, how is it that you are supposed to have
a fancy for one of these red skins yourself.
Oh, Squire, there you have flung me. I give it up now, you've clean got
the upper side of me in the argument.
But explain it, Joehow could you fall in love with the daughter of a
race you so thoroughly despise?
Well, now, it does beat all natur', that's a fact. How it ever came
about, was jist a little touch above my larnin'.
You plead guilty to the charge, however?
It's not worth the while to deny it, seeing every body seems to know it.
Even old dad got wind of it somehow; and he told me if ever I married an
Ingin squaw, he would disinherit me. Poor old man, the only thing he ever
had to leave me, I've got already.
What's that?
Why, his red headand I believe it was this infernal red mop of mine
that got me into the scrape, too.
How was that?
The Ingins, you know, have all sorts of a likin' for red heads, and blast
my hind-sights if I don't think they're more nor half right. Don't every body
fancy red birds and red feathers? Look at the old Governor, when he gets
on that velvet coat of hisen, all bespangled with gold lace. Look at the
ladies, God bless 'emthey're never dressed without some red garment or
other about 'em.
A pretty forcible defence of your head, Joe, but it would be equally
forcible
in favor of red eyes.
This was a poser to Joe, and he scratched the debatable ground
unmercifully
for an answer, but nothing could be got out of it; seeing which,
Frank gently led him back to the point from which he had digressed, his
love for Wingina, or rather his passion.
And so the interpreter's sister fell in love with your red hair first, did
she?
Yes, she axed me for a cut of it one day, and I was mighty proud of it,
till I saw it floatin' in that everlastin' cap of her brother's, along side of the
cock and eagle feathers.
What! did that queer faded tuft of bair grow upon your head? I
thought it had been some proud trophy of his prowess, perhaps the scalp of
an enemy.
By the long hollows, he's got as much of my
sculp
as he'll ever git; and
if he don't take care, I'll take my locks back, with interesta piece of the
hide stickin' to it.
What, Joe, you would not scalp a man?
No, I would'nt sculp a man, but I would sculp an Ingin, howsomever.
And is not an Indian a man, with a soul and body like yourself?
No, no more nor that dog. That stuff, now, you got from old parson Blair.
We never heerd tell of the like in these parts 'till he got to preaching of it
about, and putting the varmints to schoolhe and the Governor. Now, look
what it's all come tothe Governor's got his son killed by the very man he
helped most of 'em all; and the interpreter would a' worn the parson's sculp
at his girdle, if he had cotched him in such a place as he cotched Squire John.
Ay, but Joe, you forget that John Spotswood is said to have deeply
wronged his sister.
Now, are you so green as to believe all them old wives' tales. What the
devil does an Ingin keer for such wrongs as these, even supposing, for the
sake of argument, it mout be so?
Chunoluskee has been taught to feel the shame by associating with us.
But what reason have you to doubt the common rumor on the subject?
The very best in the world; for I tried to sleeve her myself the very day
she begged that tuft of hair of me, and she looked like one of them tragedy
Queens that I saw on the stage down to Williamsburg.
And still you loved her, notwithstanding such a rebuff?
Why, you see, Squire, I thought it was only a grand way she had picked
up from the Governor's darters at second-hand, of sayin' that she was only to
be had for the marryin'.
And why did'nt you marry her, Joe, and thus have saved the Governor
and his family this deep affliction, and the poor girl what was to her more
than life?
Why, in the first place, I never axed her consent; in the second, you
know dad would a' disinherited me; and third and lastly, as Parson Blair
says, this story of Squire Spotswood tuck me so by surprise, that I had'nt
time. Now, you know the whole story. I rather reckon that I'll be at the
truth of the business afore I'm done.
So you have a settled purpose in going to the mountains of your own?
Yes, I've got a leetle speculation on my own hook. Don't you be
surprised
,
Squire, if you see me stay up among them mountains, and hear
afterwards
of my bein' head chief among the Shawnese. I'm told they have a
plague of a fancy for red hair up in them diggins.
And so you calculate after all, upon making amends for the old man's
disinheritance of that wonderful legacy of his, your red hair?
I don't see, Squire, why I should'nt make my fortune by my head as well
as my betters. There's the two parsons, Dr. Blair and Parson Jones, they
lives by their wits; and there's the Governor, the heaviest tool he ever
handles
is a sword; and there's Gen. Clayton and the other lawyers, they lives by
their wits; and there's Dr. Evylin, he lives by his wits; and there's all them long
gown fellers in the College, they lives by their wits; indeed, I don't see but the
most on you here in our mountain company, lives by their wits. But I guess
there'll be more nor head work afore they gets back. Well, as I was a sayin'I
don't see why my head should'nt make my tortune, too. To be sure, mine lies on
the outside, and yours on the inside. It's all head work, any way you can fix it.
It is true enough, Joe, I believe that the Indians have a peculiar
veneration
for a red head, but how are you going to take advantage of it? Suppose
these ruinous stories to the discredit of your mistress should prove trueand
I fear they are but too truewhat will you do then? Will you still take her
for better for worse?
By George, I never knowed what that better for worse in the marriage
doins meant before; that's jist it, no doubt. As to what I will do in sich a
case, why I hav'nt exactly considered of it yit, seein' as how I did'nt believe it.
In sich a case she will be a sort of Ingin-in-law to the Governor, and a great
bite for the likes of me. Could you tell me now, by your head mathew
matticks
,
what kin I would be to the old Gineral?
Frank turned away his head to indulge in a suppressed laugh ere he
answered
.
I suppose you would be step-father to his natural grandchild.
Quite a natural thing, sure enough, but would there be any parquisites?
Oh, if you are in earnest, and really desire to bring about such a thing, I
have no doubt but the Governor would favor your suit and give you some of
the perquisites too, as you call them. It would be an arrangement to be
desired
,
and far more than the girl has a right to expect, or indeed deserves.
But tell me, how is it that you, professing such derogatory opinions of the
Indians, are still willing to take a wife among them?
Oh, Squire, as to my opinions about their skin, that's my rael beliefwell,
my leanin' towards the gal, is rael toonow when a man's head pulls one
way, and his feelin's another, it will be mighty apt to pull the haslets
*
*
Liver and Lights.
out of a
fellow; besides I'm a hunter by trade, and settlements have been crowding on
me for some time, and this here mountain scheme of the Governor'sthough
the old codgers laugh at itis going to make things a heap worse with me.
As how, Joe?
Why it will extend the settlements to the mountains. There's scarce an
elk or a buffalo to be found now this side of the hills, and he's a gwine to drive
them all clean over the ridge.
And so you are determined to emigrate with the game? Your head seems
to be as full of schemes of your own as the Governor's.
Yes, and I reckon that I have counted the costs a leetle better nor most of
'em he's got in his train, and mout be than he has himself. You'll see who's
the best man among us, when we get among the mountains, and when neither
money nor larnin' can do much for a man. Them's the times to try what
men's got in 'em.
They were now several miles ahead of the army, and Joe knew the
privations
of the forest well enough to call a halt at a fine spring, which threw its
sparkling waters across their path. He unslung the deer from his poney's
back, slipped the head stall over his neck, and turned him loose to graze
among the bushesadvising Frank to do the same with his, showing him, at
the same time, how to fix the halter, so as to impede his more impatient
temper.
These arrangements being completed, he carefully examined the priming
of his gun, and set it against a tree, within the reach of his hand, and then
took a wallet, which he had removed from behind his saddle, and spread a
cold collation before Frank; not a tempting one, it is true, to a dainty
appetite
,
but substantial and tempting enough, to one who had been on horseback
from early morning. Out of the same greasy looking receptacle, Joe next
drew a bottle, and after wiping the neck carefully upon the sleeve of his coat,
handed it to Frank. The latter declined the
aquavila
, but turned in manfully
upon the jerked beef and corn dodgers. Joe laughed in his sleeve at Frank's
refusing the bottle, and then took a long and hearty draught himself. Drawing
a long breath and smacking his lips, he said, Every drop of this here liquor
mought be sold for all the gold lace in the Governor's troop, afore we're among
the mountains a week, and you, Squire, will not refuse it, when we come this
near home again.
Perhaps notperhaps not, Joe, but sufficient for the day is the evil thereof.
Yes, you may well say that, Squire, for evils there will be enough on 'em
for every day after the provisions give out. Do you see that dog of mine
hopping so frisky over the bushes yonder?
Yes.
Well, I almost cried, as I looked at him comin' along the road this
morning
,
when he kept jumping upon me and licking my hand.
For what, I pray?
Why, to think that I should see the day when some of your young gentry
would eat a fine dinner off of his carcass.
Pooh! Joe, have done, you take away my appetite. You are only trying
to choke me off from your jerked beef, upon which I have been making such
inroads.
Not I! not a bit of it. I tell you, Squire Lee, as sure as you're a settin'
there, you'll see hard times afore we git back. That dainty Mr. Carter, that
I heer'd a talking about pheasants and woodcocks, will be glad enough to git
a mess of young kittins afore many weeks.
Why, Joe, I cannot eat a morsel more if you talk thus. I did not know
before, that you were such a croaker.
No more am I, but I can't help seeing how out of fix, for a mountain
jaunt, is all them ribbons, and ruffles, and gold lace, and silver and gold spurs,
and swords made for parade. And look at the cattle, too! Every one of
them horses is gwine to give out afore they reaches their journey's eend
and yours among the rest.
Mine, Joe! why he's the best blood in the Colony.
Oh, as to that, my pony's got blood in him too. How could the critter
live without it? But I'm not talking of the blood, I'll show you what I'm
driving atand with that he gave a whistle, and his pony came trotting
through the bushes and ate a piece of corn bread from his hand. Joe then
caught him and held up one of his feet for Frank's inspection. Do you see
them little iron shoeswell I put them on yisterday with my own hands
that's what I call preparation for the mountains. Now, among all the horses
of the Governor's troops, there's not a shoe among them; they've been used
to the sand of this here tide water region. The Governor and you young
gents, seem to think that the mountains are made of sand too. I've seen
enough of the rough hills, far, far this side, to know better nor that. Now,
Squire, which is agoin' to be the best stand by, the blood in your horses'
veins, or the shoes on mine's feet?
I confess, Joe, there's reason in what you sayI never thought of that
part of the preparation before. I will speak to the Governor about it this very
night.
No, don't you! you'll spile sport if you do. Some of these mornings you
will see the funniest army of cripples you ever laid eyes on.
But it may be a fatal error, Joe, and it is my duty to speak out
Not a bit of itnot a bit of it. You can't mend the matter now, and I've
seen already to providin' the materials, when the time comes. I put the
Commissary up to providin' the materials to make shoes ofthough he arn't
in all the plans. He don't know what it's for, and no doubt thinks for trado
with the Ingins.
Thus assured, Frank acquiesced in Joe's scheme to keep quiet until the
emergency occurred. After conversing upon these matters for an hour or
two, Joe caught the horses and slung his buck over the pony, and then
saddled
and readjusted the bridle of Frank's, ready for him to mount. The latter
asked him why he prepared to resume their journey before the troops came up.
Case, said Joe, they're acomin' now, not more nor a mile off.
Frank looked down the long vista of blazed trees as far as his eye could
penetrate, but he could not see even a bush shake, and seemed not a little
surprised
at Joe's confident assertion.
Joe chuckled as usual, and then threw himself on the ground, and beckoned
to his companion to do likewise. Frank did so, and instantly perceived the
tramp of cavalry upon the ground.
You see, said Joe, I'm agoin' to make a scout of you. You're a
pickin'
up my craft smart, I swear. I heard that ere sound when I was lying on
the ground a quarter of an hour ago.
The advanced guard having at length hove in sight, and the bugles now
being distinctly heard, our two adventurers resumed their journey, Joe blazing
the trees as he went, and initiating Frank into the mysteries of a scout's life,
his pony following quietly all the while, and bearing patiently his huge burden.
Occasionally Lee dismounted and walked by his side for a mile or two, which
not a little gratified Joe's pride.
CHAPTER XVII.
A LETTER FROM THE CAMP.
That
night the expedition arrived, (owing to the foresight of Joe) at the
ruins of a deserted Indian village, with water, and a clearing suitable for a
large encampment in the centre, and fine forage, of nature's providing, for the
horses, around.
It was the first night in the forest, and not wanting in wild adventure and
novelty for the amusement of the young gentry.
The white tents stretching out in picturesque lines against the fading green
of the forest; the bright blaze of the camp fires, throwing fantastic shadows
of the wagons and horses, and moving objects around; the merry laugh of
those within; the rude jest; the recounting of the adventures of the day; the
loud song of the old soldiers of the life guard; the measured tramp of the
sentinels
on duty; the neighing of the horses in the forest, the braying of the asses
and mules; the lowing of cows, (for even this luxury had been provided,)
altogether
presented an enchanting scene amid the primeval forests of nature.
About a hundred yards from the Governor's marquee, stood Frank Lee and
Bernard Moore, leaning in the shadow of a tree, while old June sat nodding
over a great log fire, where the Governor's venison was roasting on a rude
spit, and at which old June with a watery mouth cast a wistful glance every
now and then, as he rose and fell in the cadences of his song. Lee had
called the attention of Moore to this effort of the old banjo-player, because he
was evidently the hero of his story. He was celebrating his love for Miss
Kate, and bemoaning the separation.
They had not stood there long amusing themselves with old June, before
Jarvis touched Frank upon the arm, and beckoned him into the forest. As
they passed the last camp fire, Joe seized a large lightwood knot, and
holding it for a few moments in the burning coals, produced a bright light,
with which he guided his companion some hundred yards beyond the
sentinels
.
He stopped at a secluded nock among the bushes, where horses
had evidently been picking around, and where several persons had recently
been seated in the centre; for bones and pieces of bread were scattered
about in all directions. Joe suffered Frank to satisfy himself about them,
and then led him a few yards farther into the bushes, where a white
pocket handkerchief of fine texture, was suspended to the top of a stick
and leaned against a tree. Joe said he had not disturbed it since the
discovery, as he wanted Frank to observe first, the cautious manner in
which it had been placed behind the tree, so as to be out of view of those
who sat around the fire. Frank took it down, and examining it
carefully
,
discovered a name which it thrilled his heart to meet in that strange
wild place. It was Ellen Evylin in full, and in her own handwriting.
They readily imagined that it had been placed there by Winginia, that
very day, and that it was intended to signify to them that she was borne
away against her will. Joe pointed out to the young cavalier, also, several
twigs, which had been snapped off, marking distinctly a pathway from the
spot where the handkerchief had been found, to the spot where they had
mounted their horses. He called his attention again to the slapping pace at
which they rode, as evinced by signs before pointed out.
Well, Joe, said he, what more can we do for her deliverance than we
are doing now; does anything suggest itself to you?
Yes, lotslots. You see, Squire, these cunning varmints will jist play
hide and seek with this great company of the Governor's, which he marches
through the woods with flags a flyin' and trumpets a soundin' every now and
then. He mout as well send me ahead to shout to these red devils, `git out of
the way you yaller varmints, the Governor's acoming!
Well, Joe, how can we help it?
No, it's not well, it's very wrong. The old Gineral, he's used to fighten
grand battles in an open field with white men like himself, but it's a very
different
game he's got to play now, and he ain't found it out yit, but take my
word for it, he will afore long, if he don't take advice from them as has
experience
in Ingin fightin'. Now, if he would give you the command of about
ten men, that I could pick out of them huntin' shirt boys, and let me be among
'em, we could push ahead, and I would jist like to show you, that there's more
nor Ingins can play at the game of hide and seek.
Lee was quite taken with the proposition, and returned with Joe to the
Governor's marquee, and sent in to request an audience. After waiting a
short time, they were admitted. The Governor was sitting upon a camp
stool, and busily pouring over his maps, and at his old employment of sticking
pins along his contemplated route. On the ground near him, young
Dandridge
was seated, and drawing out, according to the Governor's instructions,
from time to time, a diagram of the route they had already traversed. The
25
Governor listened with much interest to the discoveries which Joe had made
and gave a respectful consideration to his scheme for cutting off the
marauders
,
but at length shook his head as much as to say, that it would not do. He
pondered upon it for some time, hastily walking about the marquee, but after
a while seated himself again, and turning to Joe, said it was a good idea, but
could not be adopted on account of its taking him from his present
indispensable
employment; and he told Frank that he would not trust him, as yet, with
any other guide, because the savages would pick them off singly, and destroy
the whole of them finally, without accomplishing any good. Joe did not want
Frank to go unless he could himself be of the party, and therefore he readily
acquiesced in the latter part of the Governor's argument. He went off with
Frank, however, telling him that they would see what this fighting Indians on
a grand parade, would come to.
Having left Joe to pursue his vocation, Frank folded up the handkerchief
which had been discovered, and put it near his heart. The sight of that name
and that handwriting, called up vividly the image of her who had so long
engrossed
his most ardent affections. He thought over all that she had said and
done since his landing at York, and his early attachment drew new strength
from the approbation which his maturer judgment stamped upon his youthful
fancy. He was experienced enough in life to know that this very seldom
happensthat the sweet hearts of beyish days seldom stand the test of
man's matured examination. If all is right as regards the object herself
interest
and ambition find their way like the tempter into Eden, and destroy the
first, and brightest, and purest emanations of the young heart. But Frank Lee
was an independent man in every sense of the word. His fortune was ample,
and his ambition, chastened as it was in the school of adversity, threw no
impediments
in the way. Had he been poor and friendless, it cannot be doubted
that his decision would have been the same. He strolled at length into his
tent, which he found empty, and taking out his writing tackle and spreading
them upon a rude camp seat, sat himself down upon the ground to communo
with his affianced wife after the following manner:
Camp Chick-a-hominy
Dearest Ellen
:
I again resume my sweet correspondence with you, after an interval it
seems to me of an age: computed by what I have (may I not say we have)
suffered. But during all my unexampled difficulties and trials, one constant
soarce of consolation remained to me. It was your steady constancy. It is
true, that for a time, I was laboring under a delusion in regard to it, but even
during that time, you were as unwavering as before. No portion of blame
can attach to you, that I was led astray. You, my Ellen, have been like my
evening and morning starthe last ray of serene comfort at night, and the
brightest dawn of hope in the morning. From day to day, and from year to
year, have you clung to the memory of the youth to whom you plighted your
young affectionsthrough good and through evil reportthrough life and in
death, (as was supposed) you have without wavering or turning aside,
cherished
the first bright morning dream of youthful love. Do you know, my
Ellen, that the world scarcely believes in the reality of such early attachments
enduring to the end. The heartless throng know not, my sweet playmate, of
the little romantic world we possess within ourselves. They have all gone
astray after strange gods, and cannot believe that others will be more true and
devoted than they have been. Especially has the odium of all such failures
been laid to the charge of your sex, but I am sure unjustly. The first slight
or unkindness nearly always proceeds from the other, and this slight or
unkindness
cannot be blazoned to the worldit is hidden within the recesses of
the sufferer's heart, and pride (perhaps proper maidenly pride) prevents it from
ever being known. How happy are we my Ellen, that not a shadow of
distrust
has fallen out between usif indeed I except your momentary
confounding
me with the gentleman whose name I had assumed, and my temporary
mistake about my brother's marriage with you. You see I have brought
myself to write that name. While I am upon the subject of Miss Elliot's
engagement, permit me to explain one thing which I omitted in the hurry of
departure, and the confusion which attended all its exciting scenes. That
young lady though present at the masking scene at the Governor's house, and
knowing of my design to present myself in disguise, among my old associates,
was not made acquainted with the name or occupation which I would assume.
The resolution to adopt that name was seized upon after the departure of that
young lady and her father. Hence her supposition, on hearing that Mr. Hall
had arrived in the Colony, that it was her own Henry. I am led to think of
these things, by seeing, so frequently, this young gentleman, with whom I
was, and am, on the most intimate terms. His distress of mind is truly
pitiable
he
appears like one physically alive and well, and yet dead to all hope.
Not absolutely dead to all hope either, for you should have seen how the
blessed
,
but dormant, faculty flashed up for a moment or two, when I told him, a
little while ago, that there was a prospect of an expedition being sent ahead of
the troops, in pursuit of the assassins and robbers who murdered our old friend
and stole his mistress. Oh, if he could be sent off upon such an expedition,
what a blessed relief the activity and excitement of the pursuit would be to
him. But the Governor, though sympathizing fully with him and me, would
not consent to it, and I must say his reasons were to me, satisfactory; not so,
however, with my poor friend; he is dissatisfied with the Governor on account
of it, and if it were not for my restraining and urgent counsel, he would start
off, single handed, in pursuit. The fact is, his apprehensions for the fate of
the poor girl,
whether dead or alive
, are so desponding, that the madness and
rashness of such an adventure, only add new charms to it, in his eyes, and I
can only seduce him from such wild designs by dwelling upon the known
clemency of the Indians to other females, who have for months and years
remained captives with them. I have exhausted all my recollections of the
kind, and I have put the scout, Jarvis, in possession of his dreadful secret, and
commanded him to detail all his knowledge favorable to my views. At this
very moment he is walking with Joe, among the tall pines, his melancholy
eye wandering among the stars, while Joe is telling a long story of a Mrs.
Thompson, who was taken prisoner by them and carried beyond the
mountains
.
I at first suspected my new forest friend, of romancing in the wildest
vein, and inventing as he went along, for the justifiable purpose, as it seemed
to me, of plucking the rooted sorrow from the heart of my friend, but I am
satisfied now that it is a true narrative, because he recounted several
circumstances
about the route to the mountains, which he had before told me he had
procured from an old lady, who had been a prisoner among the Indians.
Seeing
that he was, for the time, so absorbed with the story of the scout, I have
stolen away, my Ellen, to hold this sweet converse with you. If you had but
known the charming girl, about whom my friend thus mourns, you would
neither be surprised nor jealous that even I feel an anxious interest in her fate.
Think too of her sad history,the loss of her uncle by whom she was adopted,
and upon whom she doted as a father, little less fond than the real one whom
she has now lost, also. Think, too, of the dreadful manner of their two deaths
of her nearest and dearest kinsmen. Then bring before your mind the
highly educated, delicate and sensitive girl herselftorn from the reeking
body of her deceased parent; and borne a captive among a rude and wild
people
,
not one word of whose language she understands. Oh its a dreadful fate
for one like her. She is a most lovely girl in every sense of the word, and as
good as she is beautiful! I feel a double interest in her fate, because her
sad lot is so much like my own. We were first wrecked by the same
disastrous
political stormthrown upon the same shores, and among the same
people for a time.
The Governor, you know, is her distant kinsman, and of course he feels as
5*
lively an interest in the pursuit of her captors as it is possible under the
circumstances
,
but he is a stern old soldier, and will not risk the success of his
expedition for any mere private feelings, however near home they may come.
Poor Hall! we are of the same mess, and of course our tent is to be a
melancholy
place, for he walks about like a troubled spirit. Many a time at
midnight, I will turn to you for companionship, for though distant in body we
are ever present I trust in spirit.
Before I close this scrawl, scratched upon a camp stool, as I sit upon the
ground, I cannot help recurring to the last letter which I wrote to you. It
was penned under circumstances scarcely more favorable to my caligraphy
than this, for I was then propped up in my bed and wrote upon my portfolio.
Little did I imagine then, my Ellen, that that letter would ever be productive of
some of the most delightful moments of my life. It is almost impossible for
you to conceive of the delight with which I surreptitiously stole away the
treasured memories stored up in your heart. You thought then, my Ellen, did
you not, that they were garnered up, never to be again gazed upon by mortal
man upon this earth?but by the talisman of that real letter I produced a key
one, it is true, crusted over with the deepest sorrows known to the human
heart. Nor did you even then have a sly suspicion that your long lost lover
had risen from the dead to be the hearer of his own last dying words. No,
no, my own Ellen, your affliction was too real to have suffered any suspicion
of the bearer to intrudeit was not until I began to unfold those habits of
thought which touched upon old times, those dearest treasures of the heart,
those associations linked in inseparably with the very fibres of our being, that
you began to suspect me. Do you remember the walk we had by the little
romantic brook where we were talking of the falling of the leavesand I
ventured upon the dangerous experiment of reproducing some of
our old
talk.
Methinks I see your stare of astonishment now, and your startling turn of
the head every now and then, as link by link I touched those dear old
associations
;
every word gushing and teeming with meanings only known to
ourselves
?
I expected every moment to hear your startled scream, but if you
penetrated my disguise, your prudence triumphed, and you suffered me to wear
my masquerading dress until such time as my own circumstances should point
out the time of unmasking. I know that you must have been frightfully
mystified
just at that time, and until all doubt vanished. I sympathized fully in
your distress, but I would not make you an accessory, even after the fact, to
my treason. Had I failed in my application to my sovereign, I might have
proposed to you to desert your venerable and excellent father, and your own
dear and delightful home, for other and strange lands, but I had not fully come
to the resolve, and would not have done so, until that application failed. Even
then I could scarcely have had the heart to tear you away from all the
endearments
which now cluster around you. Do you know my own Ellen, that I
love your homeyour flowersyour booksyour musicyour pictures
your chairsevery thing that is yours. This little Testament of our Lord
and Master, with your name written in it, which lies before me, looks like no
other book. The very letters seem to be illuminatedthe book actually has
an appearance about it belonging to no other, and that with which it is
invested
,
is far more vividly impressed upon those household objects which
daily surround you. Could I have torn you away from all these? My
memory
wanders, even now among your books, and music, and flowers, and birds
and everything that goes to make up that dear home, which you have so
inseparably
stamped with your own identity. How vividly the charming
domestic
picture rises up before my fancy! Indeed, it is scarcely ever absent
from my thoughts, sleeping or waking.
Even over these wild scenes into which we are penetrating each hour,
deeper and farther, these blessed visions throw a softened and mellowed light.
What a blessed thing is memory,
to all the virtuous creatures of the earth!
that magic store-house of the heart's treasures. It is surely the divinest of
faculties, it penetrates the farthest back, and will last longest of them all, for
it will constitute the connecting link between this and a higher and purer state
of existence. It is the most distinguishing characteristic of our race, and
above every thing else marks us ont as immortals. Oh, what true wisdom
and beneficence in that provision which confines its wondrous powers to man.
Did you ever reflect what an awful thing, this truly blessed thing to us, would
have been to the lower orders of creation? It would have made the earth to
them a Hell, teeming and multiplying with horrors. That it has been given
to us alone, is at once a testimony and a guarantee of our immortality. Do
you know that I doubt the capacity of any one for enduring attachments,
who doubts the immortality of the soul? The mere hope and belief elevates
us above common sensuality, and refines and purifies our nature.
All good
men desire and believe it
. You may smile at my thus founding, what is
ordinarily
called an effort of the understanding in the heart; but those who have
observed human nature most, will be most ready to believe it.
The pure sentiment of love, though blended with passion, is very near kin
to
the divine
, especially that sublimated phase of it, which, you exhibited for
your dead lover. Your trials of the heart, my Ellen, have been truly great,
and I feel humbled in the comparison with you. Though I cannot approach
your excellence and exaltation of character, I hope to blend my future
existence
so inseparably with yours, that I may catch a portion of its exaltation.
I have often heard you say, that if required, you could lay down your life
with me, and that you would far rather do it than survive me, either married
or unmarried. This is a test of which I solemnly believe many of your sex
capable, but alas for ours, there is not one in ten thousand capable of it.
You were suprised at my shrinking from the question, my love, because you
had not understood, and could not, thoroughly understand the
characteristic
difference of the sex. You were loth to believe that your
lover was so earthly as to desire the earth for its own sake, and when
all that bright halo which sentiment throws around its dreary paths, was
blotted
out; but you reasoned from within and not from without, from your own
experience and not from the world's. Oh when the world is all thus purified
and sublimated, then will the lion lie down with the lamb. Your heart has
been purified by a high faith and a bright hope. God's holy spirit has poured
its benign influence on your heartalready, more than commonly elevated
above its kindand most truly did you say that your affection for me was
blended with all your holiest and highest aspirations; no wonder then that you
could die a martyr in a double sense. I will strive, my own Ellen, to make
myself worthy of an attachment so pure, so far above the dross of this earth.
It might be a wise question for moralists, how such an attachment could hold
to one so confessedly impure as your correspondent; one so weighed down
with the grosser passions of selfishness in its thousand phases, and ambition
with its earthly means. But I do not desire to perplex your sensitive mind
with the question. I am sufficiently happy that my youthful fancy was
fated
to select one so every way worthy of my maturest approbation.
I will write to you daily. You see I have already renewed our old subjects
of conversation. I cannot now exist without communing in the spirit with
you. I cannot ask you to answer my letters, but should a courier be
despatched
after the army, for any purpose, I am sure I shall hear from you.
Yours, most affectionately,
Frank Lee
.
CHAPTER XVIII.
ADVENTURES ON THE ROUTE.
After
a somewhat rainy and stormy night, the morning broke brightly and
beautifully clear. The air was fresh and invigorating, and a long and sound
sleep after the fatigues of the day's march, left the luxurious young cavaliers
with elastic and buoyant spirits. The brilliant songsters of the feathered
tribes were startled from their first essay by the reveille from the martial
instruments. The leaves of the trees were glittering with rain drops, and
the autumnal forest flowers bursting into life and beauty with the heat of the
morning sun. All nature looked calm and bright and beautiful, and mere
existence
seemed a pleasure, but it was a pleasure inviting to repose and
contemplation
.
The officer of the guard had some half hour gone upon his rounds to
march the pickets in, when all at once the repose of the scene was disturbed
by the idlers and followers of the camp running in a particular direction, as if
something unusual had occurred there during the night. Frank Lee, and
Dandridge, and Hall, mounted their horses and galloped to the scene. The
officer of the guard had halted his men and was just about to despatch a
messenger
to the Governor, when his aids were discovered approaching. When
the three young cavaliers rode up, they discovered the sentry who had been
stationed there during the last relief, sitting against a tree, and most cruelly
tomahawked. Joe Jarvis was stooping over him, examining the wound most
critically; he looked up when he saw the officers approaching and laying his
finger upon the wound, said to Frank, Did'nt I tell the Governor that the
varmints were not far off; he's warm yit, its been done since the rain; and
away he started through the woods to examine the trail.
When the three returned to make their report to the old chief, they found
him breakfasting upon some of Joe's venison steaks. He was startled by the
daring atrocity of the act, but pronounced at once that the man must have
slept upon his post. Jarvis was sent for, and soon made his appearance,
scratching his red mop as he entered. He had the same cunning squint of the
eye, and waggish leer as when before presented in the same presence.
Well, Joe, I understand, you say that this thing was done since the rain;
you have, doubtless, then, been able to fall upon the trial, and can tell us how
many of them ventured into the camp, and what they came for.
It is true enough, your honor, I did say so, and I stick to it, but as to the
trail and all that, it would bother an older scout nor me. The critters are a
growin' cunninger Sir, every day of their lives. There's not the print of so
much as a man's hand round the premises, much less of a moccasined foot.
You don't mean to insinuate, scout, that this man has been murdered by
one of our own men?
Not I, Sir, no such thing, he was tomahawked from behind the tree by an
Ingin
.
And yet there are no footsteps in the soft mud behind that tree, and
leading
to it? Why how have they contrived to obliterate them?
That's just it, you've struck the nail right on the head; how did they
contrive it? I'll tell you how they did it. They borrowed the legs of other
varmints.
What! they did not approach on horseback.
No, Sir, but they come whole-hog fashion. If your honor will jist
condescend
to ride down there, I will shew you that there is not the print of a
living
creter's foot 'scept an old sows, any where about.
The Governor and Lee followed Joe to the spot and there, sure
enough, were the distinct prints of a hog's feet, on a straight line to the tree,
leading from a small stream, on the banks of which, many of the horses and
mules were yet tied.
Now, sir, said Joe triumphantly, did you ever see a dumb brute walk a
straight line like that?
True enough, Joe, swine do not gather mast thus, but how in the name
of Heaven did they manage it?
Nothing easier, sir; they jist take a hog's shanks into their hands, and makes
erutches on 'em. You see 'em here, Sir, to the water's edge, and then they
mounted and rode off. But, Sir, this was'nt all for nothin', it was'nt all
unmeaning
deviltry; there's a meaning in it. They're not College-larned for
nothin', depend upon it.
The Governor did not like this thurst, and wheeled his horse and rode away,
first leaving orders to have the man decently interred.
Joe sat about investigating the cause of the strange visit, and he first
observed
that the sentinel's arms had been stolen, next that a sumpter mule had
been led through the water some distance up the stream, for he followed it
upon
his poney until he discovered the place where they had emerged. He then
came back and had the Commissary summoned, and requested him to have
the mules counted; and sure enough one of them was missing. Still Joe
perseveredhe said he was determined to find out what else they had stolen.
At first, it could not be ascertained that any thing more was missing. The
provisions were all safe, and the arms were out of their reach, or rather too near
the grasp of those who were full ready and willing to use them. Joe
continued
to rummage among the wagons and mules, until at length he lit upon the
ammunition, when it was found they had carried off several canisters. Joe
went straightway to the Governor's marquee, and there meeting the
Aids-de-camp
,
he related to them his discovery.
Did you ever see sich cunning brutes? how in the name of old scartch they
found out where the things lay, beats me all to flinders; but this convinces
me, Squire, that what I told you before is true, that these varmints mean to
keep us from the mountains if they kin. Howsomdever, they didn't know
that Red Jarvis was to be of the party. The Interpreter is laughing in his
sleeve now, to think how you're all bamboozled with them hog-tracks, and he
thinks moreover, that the powder will never be missedthat you'll all be so
taken up with the onaccountable death of yon poor fellowand that ain't all,
they mean to try it agin, or they would'ent a taken so much pains to cover up
their deviltry.
Well Joe, said Lee what do you aim at by the pains which you are
taking to ferret out their cunning.
Why, you see Squire, they're not comin' back to-night, but to-morrow
night they'll think we're sound enough asleep. I guess there'll be one wide
enough awake for 'em. Do you jist give the Commissary his orders that I'm
to sleep in that there ammunition wagonthat's all.
The troops were again in motion, and in an hour after their departure, all
traces of the gloom and melancholy of the funeral had disappeared even from
the mess of the buried soldier. Such is miliary life. The soldier seems to
take pride in marching from his comrade's grave to a lively air and with
buoyant
step, and we suppose it will always be so, while men organize themselves
to slay each other.
The route up to this time had been nearly in a straight line to the
mountains
,
for the river along the banks of which they mainly marched, lay
fortunately
in that direction; but it became necessary now to diverge to the east,
in order to take Germana in their way. It was fully a day's march, or more,
out of their route, but such were the Governor's orders, and all obeyed with
alacrity.
This day they began to exchange the monotonous pine barrens for forests
more genial to the eye. The country, although nearly in a state of nature,
was rich in all that pleases the eye, and enlivens the heart. For the first time,
regular parties were detailed to precede the main body of the troops, and
skirt their flanks on each side, for the purpose of hunting. One of them
accompanied
the scout immediately in front, and it was the Governor's orders
that each, in succession, should be under the direction of the veteran
woodsman
.
As Joe predicted, however, they had but poor luck, a single herd of
deer was encountered, and they, after a hot pursuit, only lost two of their
number
.
Jarvis told the Governor's aids, at night, that them everlasting
trumpets
would have to be spiked, else they would all starve when the provisions
gave out.
That night they encamped among the head waters of the Mattapony river,
having left the beautiful banks of the Pamunky far in their rear, and
accomplished
,
during the day, even a better journey than on the previous one. All
were now in fine spirits, notwithstanding the fortune of the hunting parties,
upon which in a short time, not only the fate of the enterprise, but their very
lives were to depend. As yet, however, provisions were abundant, without
even trenching upon the stores of jerked beef, and hard bread and parched
corn laid up in their wagons, and on the backs of their mules. With the
young, and the gay, and the thoughtless, sufficient for the day were the evils
thereof.
The camp fires were enlivened with many a song and story, and to tell the
truth, the sparkling wine cup was not wanting to enliven the festivities of
the gay young cavaliers. The novelty of the scene around them had not yet
worn off, and bright hope painted to their mental vision more enrapturing
beauties and brighter landscapes beyond. The Governor failed not to
encourage
their glowing anticipations, from his own store of imaginary pictures.
It is true, he had ceased to quote Chunoluskee as authority, but nevertheless
he retailed many of
his
stories under new titles and editions. In fact he
believed
them himself, and far more than had ever been told. He was a very
imaginative man, but regulated by a sound judgment, and great military
experience
.
He had, however, so long suffered his fancy to well upon the El
Dorado beyond the mountains, that he had come to look upon those imaginary
scenes almost as certainties, which were in fact very far from the truth. Not
that he overrated the country, to which he was bound, but that he had
erroneous
conceptions of it, and still more erroneous views of the difficulties to
be encountered to get to it. The poor scout, ignorant as he was, had a far
truer conception of both, but the time had not yet come, to consult such
counsels
on any material point. Though Joe was required to blaze the route, the
Governor was himself on foot, a greater part of the time, compass in hand,
with young Dandridge by his side, taking notes of his observations. As they
crossed the river they came to an Indian village, on an island, one of the
loveliest
spots in nature. The young gentry were in raptures with the beauty of
the site. Not so with their old chief. He was pained to observe that the
Indians
even here had been induced to desert their homes and were retreating
before the march of his little army. Every indication, thus far, tended to
confirm
the suspicion that his enterprise was looked upon with fear and distrust
by the Indians. He knew, full well, from what source all this came, but how
they had all been moved, by one accord in so incredibly short a time,
confounded
all his calculations. He could only settle the difficulty by supposing his
late hostages and beneficiaries treacherous; far antecedent to the time of their
desertion. He was loth to believe all this, for he was a true friend to the race
and as genuine a philanthropist as ever lived. But here was one of the
locations
of his primary schools, and every inhabitant of the village was gone,
with all their stores and plunder, and the schoolmaster was perhaps murdered.
Of that, however, they had no evidence. He might have been carried off a
prisoner, beyond the mountains.
Poor Hall! for hours he detained his friend Lee, wandering among the
deserted wigwams, long after the sound of the trumpets and the tramp of the
horses had ceased. He had looked forward with eagerness to their arrival at
this spot, he had expected here to see some of that race in whose possession was
all that he prized on this earthhe had expected to be re-assured of her safety,
and had even hoped to procure a runner to send on after his lost Eugenia to
assure her of his speedy approach. To him the deserted wigwams looked
like her funeral pile. His heart sank within him as he beheld this new
evidence
of the old hostility still subsisting between the races. The fires of the
ancient feud had only been smothered for a time. During the three years of
Governor Spotswood's stewardship he had succeeded in making them believe
that he was their true friend, because he had never committed any
aggressions
upon them, but now he was about to outstrip all his predecessors in the
daring strides of his adventurous spirit. Hall would have lingered on among
the tenantless wigwams of the deserted village, but his friend Lee almost forced
him upon his horse.
That night. although encamped in a beautiful country, and general joy and
hiliarity pervaded the camp, he sat in one corner of his tent, and leaned his
head upon his hands in the most listless attitude imaginable. He took no
notice
of the entrance and departure of any one, and really performed the
routine
of his military duties in such a dead and alive manner, that Frank had
to apply to the Governor to have him invalided. So deeply absorbed was he
with his brooding sorrow that he scarcely noticed this change. Though cards
and wine and songs and revelry resounded all around him, and made the old
woods merry again with the dissipation and the wild mirth of the mad young
cavaliers, it passed all unheeded by poor Hall.
The same night Frank Lee, Nat. Dandridge, Hall and Moore, being invited
to the Governor's marquee, Jarvis asked permission of the former to write a
letter
in his tent, and to furnish him with the materials.
What! can you write, Joe? inquired Lee, with surprise.
No, not much Squire, but I can turn the pot-hooks and hangers into some
sort of signs that the man'll understand I'm goin' to write too.'
And who may that be, pray?
An old croney o'mine, Squire, and as his readin' aint no better nor my
writin' it'll be a dead match.
The worse you write Joe, the better he should read.
Oh, that's his business, so here goes
Frank stood for a few moments on the eve of his departure, and laughed
immoderately
at the awful faces which Joe made, as he turned his pen in its
travail
.
`That's harder work than fighting Indians, Joe!
Aye, Squire, you may say thatI reckon I could make a round O on one
of 'em in a leetle shorter time than I can fetch up one of these, but do you go
Squire, you put me out a lookin' at me. Frank departed accordingly,
dragging
poor Hall with him, and leaving Joe already bathed in a profuse perspiration.
The Governor had kindly invited his young friends in hopes to cheer up the
stranger whose unfortunate story he had hitherto been prevented from
listening
to with that attention which he desired, on account of his
engrossingengagements
.
He felt a deep interest in this young man, partly because of his
connexion
with Frank's strange adventures, and the mystery which he had
hitherto
thrown around his name, and partly on account of his known
engagement
to his unfortunate young kinswoman. Indeed the interest felt on account
of the latter, extended to many of the young gentry, who had heard Frank's
description of the ill fated but charming girl. In that day such a captivity was
not at all uncommon with the wives and daughters of the humbler farmers,
and we have seen individuals of the gentler sex in ours, who had spent years
in captivity among the aborigines; but seldom within the knowledge of the
young men had one so beautiful, so highly connected and so gently nurtured,
been carried off. Her misfortunes excited a profound interest among all such,
and not a little added to their eager desire to come up with their enemiesfor
enemies they were now acknowledged to be even by the Governor.
But we will leave Hall to drag out his weary game of whist among his kindly
disposed friends, while we take a glance at Joe's epistle to his friend.
Camp Nigger-foot
.
To Billy Divins
:
Well Bill, I'm dad shamed if I don't bust if I don't write to you a spellthe
fact is Bill, I've kept company with these here gold laced gentry so long that
I'm gettin' spiledfact! I rubbed myself all over last night head and ears
with salt for fear on't. Yes, and if you and Charley and Ikey don't take keer,
I'll cut you when I come back. But without any joke at all about it, I've got
into the greatest mess that ever the likes of you clapped eyes on. There's
that Mr. Hallthe real genuine Mr. Hall, the one as come last; O Lord if you
could only see how he takes ondash my flint, if I don't think he's a leetle
teched in the upper story. All day long he rides that black horse(and he's
dressed in black you know) and looks as if he was a goin' to his grandmother's
funeral. Poor lad, they say he's got cause enough, the yaller niggers have
run away with his sweet heart, but you don't know nothin' about them sort of
tender things, Bill, its only a throwin' of pearls before swine to tell you of 'em,
else I would tell you that Mr. Hall and me is exactly in the same fix. Yes,
you and Charley may laugh, confound you, if so be you ever spell this out,
We're exactly in the same situationthe yaller niggers has run away with
my sweet heart too. You know the little Ingin gal that asked me for that
lock 'o hair, but you know al about it and what's the use of swettin' over agin.
Well, Squire Lee, that Mr. Hall that was tried for killin' the Governor's son;
well, he says she's a ruined gal, and to hear him talk, you'd think that she
was dead and buried and he a sayin' of the funeral service over her. I tell you
Bill, these gentry are queerish folks, they don't know nothin' of human nature.
He says he wants to know if I would take another man's cast off mistress.
Now, Bill, ain't her lover dead, and could'nt I make an honest woman of her,
by a marryin' of her, I'd like to know that. But the best part of the story is
to come yit. The Governor's been axed about it, and he's all agreed, and says
moreover, that he'll settle fifty pounds a year on me, if the gal will have me.
So you see, Bill, she's a fortune. Did'nt I tell you that I was a goin to seek
my fortune, and that you had better come along. But I've talked about
myself
long enough, now let me tell you something of our betters. The old
Governor, I tell you what, he's a tip top old feller, in the field. He don't know
nothing about fightin' Ingins yit, but I'll tell you, he'll catch it mighty quick;
he makes every one stand up to the rack, and as for running away from an
enemy, it ain't in his dictionary. I am told he drinks gunpowder every mornin'
in his bitters, and as for shootin,' he's tip top at that, too. He thinks nothin'
of takin' off a wild turkeys' head with them there pistols of his'n. You may'nt
believe the story about the gunpowder, but I got from old June, his shoe black,
who sleeps behind his tent, and I reckon he ought to know, if any body does.
He rides a hoss as if he rammed down the gunpowder with half a dozen
ramrods
.
You ought to see him a ridin' a review of a mornin'. I swang if his
cocked hat don't look like a pictur', and I'm told he's all riddled with bullets
too, and that he sometimes picks the lead out of his teeth yit. He's a a whole
team, Bill; set that down in your books. The next man to the Governor is Mr.
Frank, that I told you of a while ago; he belongs to the gunpowder breed too
he's got an eye like a eagle, and, Bill when they made a gintleman of him they
spiled one of the best scouts in all these parts. If there's any fightin' you
take my word for it, he'll have his share. Some of the men do say that he was
for upsettin' the Queen when he was to England, and that's the reason he came
over in disguise. One thing I know, he's got no
airs
about him; he talks to
me just as he does to the Governor, and this present writin', as the lawyers say,
is writ on his camp stool and with his pen and paper. I guess he'll find his pen
druv up to the stump. Well, I suppose you want to know what I call this
camp nigger foot for. I'll tell you, for I christened it myself. I was a
followin'
of a fresh trail as hard as one of the Governor's bounds arter a buck
when what should we light upon, but the track of of a big nigger's foot in the
mud here among emfact! I told the Governor afore I seed the print of
the nigger's foot that they had had some spy or another at Williamsburg, else
they would'nt a know'd the waggons as had the powder in 'em. Oh, I forgot
to tell you that the yaller raskels killed one of the sentinels, and stole a heap
of powder and lead. Yes, and they had the wagon tops marked with red paint.
I hav'nt told the Governor about the mark yet, and I don't mean to, till I
sleep there a night or so. You know, Bill, how I'll sleep there! I'll skin my
eye open as tight as an old weasel in a hen roost. But Brag's a good dog
you say, and Hold-fast's a better. Well, well, Bill, the proof of the puddin' is in
chewin' of the bag; so let that stand over till next time. Howsomdever, you
know I'm good enough for twice my weight of the yaller raskels any day, and
call that no braggin' either. Oh, Bill, all I want now is one of you fellows
here for company to make this one of the greatest turn outs thats happened
in our time. This Trimountain expedition is agoin to be the makin of me.
The Governor's offered a reward for the Interpreter yes, a hundred pounds
for him, dead or alive. Whew! my stars, I would'nt give that for all the
Ingins
this side of the mountains, nor tother, neither. That's neither here nor
there, but I'm agoin to set a trap for the College bred rascal; but I won't
bait him with one of Dr. Blair's sermons. Howsomdever, you'll hear of that
all in good time. If you see old dad tell him I'm alive and a kickin,' and that
I've got that red sculp of mine all sound yit, and with the help of God, mean
to keep it. Oh! I like to forgot to tell you that we are agoin to take Germana
in our way, which I told the Governor was clear out of the route; but it seems
that's the place where the yonng lady, Miss Elliot, was carried off, and her
father sculped. Now, I would like to know what's the use of goin to look
at the hawk's nest when the old ones and young ones have all flew away.
They may pick up some of the feathers of the innocent creters they've killed
but, what's the use? I say. The Governor thinks, I expect, that as that's
near the front of the frontiersthe jumpin' off place as I may saythat the
Ingins may give him a little brush there. The fact is, the old gentleman's
appetite for a fresh smell of gunpowder, is gittin' stronger and stronger every
day. I'm deuced affraid he'll kill the Interpreter with his own hand if we
come up with them. Kase he killed his son, you know. Whenever any one
talks of that College bred raskel, the old soldier's eye flashes jist like my gun
when she burns primin'. Did you ever see a wild cat's eye away down in a
dark hole? Well, that's just the way he looks then; I suppose it all comes
of that gunpowder he drinks afore breakfast. I would like to see him cuttin'
and slashin' about a dozen Ingins when sich a fit is on him; if it was only to
drive them Ingin schools and colleges out of his head. He wants to give his
stomach a thump of that kind afore we comes plump into one of their
ambuscades
.
Take care of my dogs and remember me to Dad and Charley and Ikey.
Your's till death,
Joe Jarvis
.
CHAPTER XIX.
ADVENTURES IN CAMP.
The
next day's trail varied but little from the preceding one, except that it
was shorter, owing to the necessary fatigue of man and beast. At night the
scout, having received permission from the Commissary, quietly took his berth
in the wagon which had been before robbed, and which he stated had been
marked. Truth to say, however, the said mark looked very much like a dozen
other stains upon the cover, from the red clay which had soiled it by the
splashing of the wheels. The scout, however, was an important character,
and displayed so much more knowledge of the country and the habits of the
Indians, than had been anticipated, that he was suffered to have his own way,
in those things not pertaining to military discipline. The early part of the
evening was spent by the Governor and his associates, very much as the
previous ones had been, except that the latter began now to seek their rude
pallets much earlier than at first. Nothing occurred to disturb the solemn
tramp of the sentinels, and the more selemn cry of the whippoorwill, as they
resounded through the silent forests at midnight. Scarcely a soul stirred in
all that little city of canvass, except poor Hall, who walked about on the
outskirts
of the camp, like some disturbed spirit. The melancholy flickering of
the camp fires, as they died away, and the solemn moaning of the tree-tops
seemed more in unison with his depressed spirits, than the revelry of his
companions
.
He had just taken a walk within the line of sentries, and was
standing in front of his tent and gazing at the clear cold moonits silvery
tints falling over tree and shrub, and flower, when he was startled by a stealthy
tread. He drew himself within the shadow of a large tree, which stood near,
and watched and listened for a renewal of the sounds which had alarmed him.
But a few moments had elapsed before he heard a sharp ringing sound like the
springing of machinery, followed by a most hideous and unearthly screech,
and the next moment Joe's merry laughter was ringing through the woods.
He followed the sound toward the baggage wagons, and beheld, what he then
supposed, to be an enormous dog, with his forefoot fastened in a wolf-trap
and cutting the strangest antics on his hind legs, he had ever seen a
quadruped
perform. Joe had sprung upon the ground and was performing others
very little less extravagant, and exclaiming I told you I would trap the
varmints, I told you I would trap the varmints! By this time several of the
nearest sentinels also came running in to see the cause of alarm. To these
Joe consigned his prisoner, and darted off into the woods in the direction of
the river, which was some fifty yards off.
The dog turned out to be a young Indian, enveloped in the skin of the
animal
,
and he had passed the sentinel on all fours, doubtless, as they all averred
that no biped had crossed their walks. Lee, with many others of the young
officers had, by this time, gathered around, and the former ordered the young
rascal to be released from his agonizing position, which he was increasing
every moment, by his vain efforts to work himself loose. The wolf-trap was
made of parallel steel bars, without teeth, but clasping together with great
force. Nothing but the thick dog's hide had prevented it from crushing the
bones of the prisoner's wrist. He was now standing on his legs, and before
the bright pine torches at midnight, presented one of the strangest sights
imaginable
.
His very writhings and tortures from the pain of the steel-trap,
produced merriment among the soldiers, as he looked through his canine
mask, and whisked his tail about. While the crowd gathered around the
young Indian, each indulging his curiosity or his merriment according to the
taste of the new comer, the report of Joe's gun was heard, but a short
distance
off, immediately followed by that startling sound to all civilized ears, the
war-whoop.
The captive was quickly deserted by all except the two soldiers who had him
immediately in charge. When the party arrived at the bank of the river they
beheld
,
by the light of the moon, Joe in a truly perilous position. He was standing
in a canoe in the middle of the stream, and defending himself most manfully
against four stalwart warriors, and a negro, each scarcely inferior in size to
the scout himself. He had what appeared to be a handspike in his hand, with
which he was laying about him at a tremendous rate, while his foes each in
a separate canoe, (with the exception of the negro who sculled for one of the
party,) attempted to surround him at first, but when they discovered what a
formidable giant they had to deal with at close quarters, they changed their
method of attack and attempted to drown him. The anxious spectators on
shore could render no assistance, for there was not a canoe or plank to float
upon, along the shore. Frank Lee dashed down the banks with frantic speed
in search of some such thing, but to no purpose. The savages had been
careful
enough to leave only one for the escape of the young rogue who had been
caught in the steel-trap. By this time, Joe had reduced the numbers of his
antagonists to the warrior in the canoe with the negro, but the others were in
the water and would speedily swamp his canoe. He saw them approaching,
and knew that his scouting days were ended if they once got
round
him, and
he was powerless as to all direction of the frail thing in which he stood. At
this stage of the desperate rencounter, young Hall threw off his outer
garments
and would have thrown himself into the stream, had he not been forcibly
detained by Lee. At the same time Joe made a
coup de grace
worthy of a
more veteran scout. At one bound he sprang into the enemies' canoe and lit
right upon the negro sculling with a paddle in the stern. Down went Indian,
scout and negro; but in less time than we have taken to relate it, Joe rose to
the surface, dragging the negro by the hair with one hand, while he struck for
the shore with the other. Fortunately the negro came up with his back
towards
him, and whenever he made an effort to change his position, Joe
submerged
his nose until he completely cooled his courage. The Indians made
an attempt to follow, but the scout in a few yards touched bottom, and then the
crowd from the shore rushed in pell mell to his rescue. As soon as he was
completely separated from his antagonists, the bullets began to whistle and
skip over the water among the swimming heads, while the savages dived like
ducks. They tried hard to save their canoes, but so hot became the shower
of lead around them, that they were glad to escape with the broken crowns
which the scout had given three of them.
Why Csar, exclaimed Lee, is it possible? Why Csar,
repeated
many voices. He was but lately a servant near the person of Harry Lee.
Every one from the capital knew him at once. Joe shook off the water from
his mane like a lion, and then gave a snort to blow it from his pipes, which if it
had been on the ocean might have been mistaken for a whale's.
The Governor was roused by the first report from the scout's gun, and by
the time the party from the river returned, he was dressed and met them on
the way. Old times you see a coming back, Governor, with the Inginsthey,
hav'nt all gone to Heaven yit.
No Jarvis, and I am afraid you will not teach them the way there soon.
I don't know that Governor, if you had seen some of the hard knocks I
give some of their knowledge boxes jist now, you would 'a sworn I was in a
fair way to sendone or two on 'em to the happy huntin' ground.
At this moment the Governor cast a scrutinizing glanoe at the shrinking
negro, whom the scout still continued to drag by the hair.
Why Csar! exclaimed he also; but in a moment after, a dark suspicion
seemed to cross his mind, and he turned to one side and led Frank by the arm
a few yardsdistant, and then they talked and gesticulated with great
earnestness
for a quarter of an hour, when they resumed their walk towards head
quarters, Frank expostulating and the Governor insisting upon some measure
which he had proposed.
Well, well, Lee, said the latter at length, I will send the rascal back
to the capital in irons, and we can investigate the matter privately when we
return.
No privacy on my account your Excellencytuck him up now, and learn
the extent of the treachery at once; it may be important to the success of our
expedition.
Impossibleimpossible, it requires a laborious and pains-taking
investigation
to get at the bottom of such affairs. As for the treachery, I think the scout
has pretty well blown their present schemes of annoyance. One thing I want
to know of himhere Jarvis! Was the interpreter in that cut-throat gang?
I'll tell you how it was your Excellencywhen I tuck yon young
varmint
in the steel trap, (here he had to stop and indulge in one of his
heart-some
chuckles,) when I tuck the varmint in the trap, he was compelled to
give way in a loud guffaw.
Why, what is there so amusing in it, Jarvis?it seems to me quite a
serious
business.
You know Governor, the first day out, you snubbed me off short about
callin' of 'em
varmints
, and said they had souls as much as we had. Well
jist step here and look if this is'nt a varmint I've tuck in my wolf, trap?
Saying which he walked up to the wagon where the guard held the young
rogue a close prisoner, and taking him by the throat led him into the
presence of the old chief. Governor Spotswood started back as the strange
animal stood before him, apparently on its hind legs.
Now, said Joe, do you see this here wolf in sheep's clothin'if that is'nt
a varmint, I don't know what is?
Well, said the Governor, I give it up for the presentgo on with your
account of this affair.
Jist soas I was a sayin', when I saw this here dog's hide, I know'd it
in a minute, the yaller niggers ai'nt got no such dog among 'em, and thinkin'
of the nigger track we saw on the trail last night, I jist popped out of the
wagon, give this here
thing
to the guard, and made chase. When I came to
the bank of the river, it was swelled monstrous with the rains, and not a thing
in sight but a leetle bark canoe. In I jumped, determined to scout along the
banks, and catch the nigger if I could. You see I thought it was that ere
snow ball all the time, kase I know'd his dog, or the varmints would'nt a
caught me nappin' as they did. Well, when I got into the canoe, there was
nothin' to paddle with but a club which this son of a bitch left in it.
Fie, fie, Jarvis, remember in whose presence you speak.
I beg ten thousand pardons; but I thought if ever so mout be I could use
the word at all, now's the time, seein' he's made a dog of himself! But that's
neither here nor there. When I had got some twenty yards or more from
shore, I hearn a sort of snake in the grass, and when I looks round, what
should I see but four canoes stealin' out of the bushes from round a point of
land, and cutting me completely off. I soon seed how the cat jumped; there
was five on 'em to me one. So I ups with old Sally Wagoner (his gun,) and
let fly at the biggest lookin' of 'em; they did'nt know I had her a layin'
asleep in the bottom.
Did you kill him?
I'm ashamed to say I did'nt, but I commenced a sculpin of him, which I'll
finish some day, please God.
Scalping him?why how did you commence scalping him?
I sent a bullet, you Excellency, a scoutin' right along the top of his
knowledge box, for I seed the blood a tricklin' down his face, arter the water
had washed all the paint off.
You have not yet answered one of my questions, Jarvis?
Oh, I ax your pardon, Sir; but I can't say whether the interpreter was
one on 'em or not. The one I shot is exactly his size; but if so be it's him,
he's changed all them ere red cloaks, and gold lace, and grand feathers, he
used to wear down to Temple Farm. If it was him, I guess he smel't hell.
Jarvis, Jarvis, this sort of disrespectful language will never dofor tho'
not belonging to the regular command, your example breeds disrespect and
insubordination among those who are; saying which, he walked off in such
an offended manner, that Joe was alarmed, and appealed in a whisper to.
Frank Lee, to know if he was really angry.
It will all blow over, Joe, by morning, especially when he remembers the
timely and excellent services which you have rendered to-night.
The Governor did not proceed far, before he stopped and called Nat.
Dandridge
to him, and told him to have the dog's hide taken from the young rogue,
and to put handcuffs upon Csar, and have them carefully guarded till daylight
Egad! I think Csar had an idea of imitating his great patronymic,
said Carter to Moore, as they turned away to seek their tents again.
Yes, replied Moore, if we may take the poetical license of naming this
stream the Rubicon.
It's a far nobler one, I assure you, but poor Csar looks very little like
the hero now.
The same dark suspicions crossed Moore's thoughts as he was thus
forcibly
reminded who Csar's master was, and of all the other suspicious
circumstances
of the case, and knowing Carter's friendship for Harry Lee, and
not wishing to provoke a quarrel by giving utterance to them, he changed the
subject, and they soon after separated for the night.
CHAPTER XX.
THE CAPTIVES.
Csar
, the captive negro, was, as we have before represented him, not
only a family servant, brought up about the house, but he was a personal
attendant upon the younger Lee. As soon as Frank heard the exclamations
of surprise from those who knew the negro, he at once drew back in the
crowd, and did not again present himself before him, until complete quiet was
restored in the camp. Then he sought the solitary quarters of his father's
old servant, and it may readily be imagined that it was a painful meeting on
both sides. Frank had not seen Csar before, since he left College, and the
first sight of such a living memento of by-gone years, would under any
circumstances
call up painful reflections, but when he thought of the old negro's
equivocal position, and the suspicion which others entertained as well as
himself
,
that he was not there of his own accord, he could have wept over the
deep degradation and mortification of the African. Csar looked as if he
could have fallen down at his young master's feet and wept too, and yet he
did not dare to approach him. Frank, on his part, was in fully as painful a
position towards the old servanthe felt for him, on account of the
considerations
before mentioned, but he could not accept the negro's atonement, through
the inculpation of his only brother.
I will tell you allde whole trut, 'fore God, Mass Frank, exclaimed the
poor penitent.
Not a single word to me, CsarI will not hear it. You are to be sent
back to the capital to-morrow, and it will be time enough to make your
disclosures
when the Governor returns; but even then he will not listen to you,
unless you have white testimony to corroborate your statements. You see,
therefore, unless you produce that testimony, you are likely to suffer in your
own person. Nay, do not answer me. I understand all you would say, and
it is with the hope of saving you from punishment, that I have called to see
you. I will endeavor so to explain the matter to the Governor, that he will
make your punishment at all events light, if not remit it altogether; but it
can only be brought about by your master and yourself leaving the country.
I will write to him this night, or rather this morning, and point out to him his
proper course. I did purpose, likewise, to ask you many questions about the
old place, but I had not anticipated how painful the sight of you thus would
be. I will, therefore, defer it to a more fitting opportunity. By that time, I
trust you will be far from scenes that may bring back to your recollection
this degradation. Little did I think when last I saw you, as one of the time
honored servants of my father, ever to look upon you in chains as a criminal.
I am as much mortified as if you had been one of my own kinsmen.
Farewell
,
Csar!
The old fellow stretched out his hand, amidst a plentiful shower of tears,
and could only exclaim, between his agonizing sobs, Oh! Mass Frank, God
bless you!
Frank returned at once to write the promised letter, for it may be readily
imagined that he felt little disposed to sleep. It was short, but to the point.
Camp Negro Foot
.
To Henry Lee, Esq.
:
The ink would blister the paper, could I be guilty of the hypocrisy of
commencing
a letter to you with an endearing epithet, after all that is past and
gone. Indeed, it was my intention never to have addressed you again in
any manner this side of the grave. I thought you had done your worst
towards me and mine, and I was resolved, if I could not forgive, that I would
at least bear it in silence. But I was mistaken, you had not done your worst,
as this night's experience teaches me. I find that my heart yearns towards every
thing connected with the happy days of our infancy. Over many of these
you have power, and through these you can wound me grievously. I do not,
and will not, charge you with suborning one of our father's faithful servants
to his own ruin and disgrace. I leave it entirely with you and your God.
But if even innocent, (which I trust in God you are,) yet you are responsible
for their conduct. Nay, the world, even your old associates here, hold you
now as the accessory before the fact, to this poor fellow's crime. Oh, Henry,
how have your passions led you on, from step to step, to this degradation!
Can you be the proud boy that I once knew as an affectionate brother? But
I will not be weak; my object in writing is merely a matter of business. I
have a proposition to make to youit is that you abandon your home and
country forever. Start not, but listen to me. You know that you will be
largely indebted to me for the yearly proceeds of my property, every cent of
which you have drawn, and which I understand you will not be able to repay,
without sacrificing your own property. Now, I propose to give you a clear
quittance for the whole of it, if you will sail for Europe before my return, and
take poor Csar with you. I know that you can find means to liberate him
indeed, I do not think the Governor himself will be much displeased to find
this scheme carried into effect upon his return. Reflect well upon it, and may
God forgive you for your past errors. I shall never cease to pray not only for
that, but that I may myself learn to grant you that tree and full forgiveness
which I daily ask him for myself.
Your brother,
Frank Lee
.
While Lee thus communed with his father's once faithful servant, and
afterwards
with his brother in writing, the Governor held a very different dialogue
with the other captive. In this emergency, the scout was found to be a real
treasure; for besides his woodman's craft, he could converse so as to be
understood
by the young rogue whom his own ingenuity had taken prisoner. Having
ascertained this, the Governor ordered Joe and his captive into his marquee.
We will not take the reader through the tedious process of the double
questions
and answers, but give Joe's version of the old chief's talk and the young
savage's replies, at least so far as they are pertinent to our narrative. And
thus he rendered his patron's exordium. Do you know, you dd young
raseal, that the great Father of all the white folks between the herring pond
and sun-down is a goin' to stretch your wind-pipe? Here there was a
pauseafter which, the captive made one or two short guttural exclamations.
What does he say, Jarvis? exclaimed His Excellency impatiently.
Why, Sir, he says he does not understand a word of your talk, nor what I
mean in his own lingo by a stretchin' of his wind-pipe. I reckon he never
seed the operation performed. As you've got to hang the
snow-ball
any how
down yonder, would'nt it be as well jist to let me tuck him up before this
young varmint? I guess he'd understand that, and then you could jist make
what you please out of him.
Pshaw, pshaw, Jarvis, don't make yourself out more brutal than you
really are. You would be the first man to rescue even that poor negro from
a watery grave.
You may say that, your Excellency, seein' I pulled him out of the water
no very long time ago; but to speak the truth and shame the devil, it was kase
I hated to see the gallows cheated out of its due.
Well, well, have your own way, but make this fellow understand that he
has fairly forfeited his life.
Look here, stranger, (in the Indian language,) you've got to pull hemp, a
standin' on nothin'.
Ugh! a sort of note of interrogation from the captive.
Oh! you don't know what hemp is, don't you? Well, it's a weed that
grows plenty in this Colony, one of the wholesomest bitters as grows, but
howsomdever it kills lots of people. What! you don't understand that
neither. Well, may be you'll understand this(and he took a cord laying
in one corner of the tent, and making a running noose, slipt it over the lad's
head, and began to tighten it apace.) You understand that, don't you?
Oh, I thought sowell, the Governor wants to know if you are willing to save
your neck by bein' of use to him?
To this he replied in the affirmative. The Governor then asked him through
Joe, if he had ever been over the mountains. He said he had often. When
asked if he would pilot the expedition overhe said he would. This matter
being arranged, he was next interrogated as to his agency in the massacre and
burning of Germana. He stoutly denied that he had been there at all, but
acknowledged that his father and brother had. He was next asked if he knew
anything of the young lady (Eugenia Elliot) who had been abducted from that
place. He said that he had not seen her, but he had heard that she had been
taken over the mountains, with the people from the Indian villages, who had
fled before the Governor's troops. After many other inquiries as to their
treatment of female captivestheir customs with regard to the marriage of
such persons to native chiefs, the nature of the country beyond the mountains,
&c., &c., he was remanded to the care of the guard on duty. These latter
replies were of such a consolatory nature, that the Governor, as soon as the
day had dawned, threw himself in the way of young Hall, to cheer him also
with the news. He stated to him (upon the authority of his captive) that his
people were in the hahit of disposing of female captives to the nearest
relations
of those who had fallen in the battle where such captives were taken.
But as no lives were lost in the sacking of Germana, he had understood that
the young lady (pale faced squaw) was to be given to the young Chief for
whom Wingina was originally intended, and that that very Chief had been
Joe's formidable antagonist last night.
All this was truly heart-cheering to poor Hall, especially that part which
assured him that the Chief for whom his Eugenia was intended, was still
hovering
upon their outskirts, and was likely to be, until the expedition was
triumphantly
completed, or abandoned in despair. He knew Gov. Spotswood's
character too well, to believe for one moment that he would ever abandon the
poor girl to her fate. There was one point that he interceded hard for, and
that was that the Governor would permit him to take the captive as his own,
set him free and go with him over the mountains, ahead of the troops. To
this, of course, the Governor would not listen for a moment.
26
It was a gallant sight to behold that bright and joyous band of cavaliers, in
their plumes and brilliant dresses and fluttering banners, not yet soiled by the
dust and toil of travel, as they wound through the green vistas fresh from the
hands of nature, and their prancing steeds still elastic and buoyant with high
blood and breeding. It cheered the heart of the veteran warrior, their
commander
,
to see the columns file off before him as he sat upon his horse and
received their salutes. The expedition numbered in its ranks some of the
most hopeful scions of the old aristocratic stock of Virginia, some, whose
descendants were destined to make imperishable names in the future history,
of their country, and many whose descendants still figure honorably in the
highest trusts of the republic.
The route to Germana was little varied by adventures or mishaps of any
kind; but the country through which they passed was hourly becoming more
bold and picturesque, and the scenery more grand and imposing. The land
commenced to be what, in the language of the country, is called rolling. It
was broken into long wavy or undulating lines, scarcely amounting to a hill,
and yet relieving the eye, in a great measure, from the monotony of the dead
level tide water country. The romantic and excited youths who surrounded
the Governor, were already expressing themselves in raptures at the new
views every moment bursting upon their vision. Many of them had never
in their lives beheld any thing so lovely. At these raptures the old chief
would smile, and sometimes encourage their enthusiasm, but always
foretelling
them of the Apalachian wonders which they would behold. Indeed, being
a native of a bold and mountainous country himself, he longed as much as
any of them to feast his eye on the top of a crag, from which he could
behold a horizon with mountains piled upon mountains, one behind another,
reaching, as it were, to meet the clouds.
Sometimes he would descant upon these mountain wonders, and tell of his
own boyish adventures in his native land, until his moist eye told of his still
clinging affections to that glorious land, rich in whatever delights the heart of
the patriot, and richer above all, in a border minstrelsy and traditionary
treasures, now consecrated to everlasting love and remembrance, with the
name of him who has made them familiar as household words in every
civilized
family, from the rising to the setting sun. We thank God that we have
lived in the days when those tales of witchery and romance were sent forth
from Abbotsford, to cheer the desponding hearts of thousands, and tens of
thousands. He not only threw a romantic charm around the scenes of his
stories, but he has actually made the world we live in more lovely in our
eyes. The visions which his magic wand created before our youthful eyes,
rise up in every hill and vale in our own bright and favored land. Who is there
that has not, ere now, found his imagination clothing some lass, as she burst
upon his view from a mountain defile in full canter, with the imperishable
vestments of
Die Vernon?
Gov. Spotswood was by no means singular in his ardent attachment to his
native hills. It has often been remarked how ardent is the attachment to
home of every mountaineer, and as this homely feeling is the basis of all
true patriotism, it is a feeling to be admired and cherished. Philosophers
may wonder why it is that the natives of these cloud capped regions should
be more devotedly attached to them, than the tide-landers are to their
ocean-washed
homes, and they may endeavor to fathom the why and the wherefore,
with no more success than hitherto. We simply state the fact from personal
experience. It has been our fate to exchange a home, combining the grandest
and the loveliest extremes of naturethe green valley and the rugged mountain
cliffthe serenest pictures of domestic comfort, in juxtaposition with the
wildest ravines and most towering precipicesfor one within the reach of old
Neptune's everlasting roarand our heart still yearns towards our native
mountains.
Germana, was alas! in ruins. The mill, which benevolence, more than
any hope of gain, had induced the Governor to have erected there, was a mere
shell, its stone walls black and disfigured with smoke. The water wheel was
still in perpetual revolution to a fruitless end, set in motion, no doubt, by the
wanton wickedness of the savages. But these things, seen from a distance,
were soon displaced by one of horror, which arrested their attention upon
the halt of the army at the ruins of the old stockade. The dead bodies of
their friends lay unburied and half consumed by wild beasts and birds of prey
or partially blackened and disfigured by fire.
As Frank Lee walked away in melancholy reverie from this disgusting
sight, his footsteps were followed by the scout, whom he heard muttering
every now and then, I'm glad of it! I am glad of it!
Lee wheeled upon him, almost fiercely, and demanded what there was to
rejoice him in such a sight?
Oh! I beg your pardon, Squire, I'm not glad the poor fellers were sculped!
by no manner o' means; I only meant to say, I was glad the Governor had
seen it. Now, he'll know how we scouts come to hate the yaller niggers as
we do. This will cure him of all the love he ever had for the etarnal critters,
and when we come to meet 'em face to face, if so be that ever is, why then
he'll let us go at them with a will.
Is that all, well here's my hand upon it, Jarvisyou are rightfor it has
produced exactly the effect on me, which you have predicted of our
commander
.
I know the critters, Squire, like a book, and a great deal better.
CHAPTER XXI.
FORE-SHADOWING OF THE HORSE-SHOE.
Notwithstanding
the horrors of the massacre at Germana, many of the
remains of which stared our adventurers in the face, upon their arrival there
the night was spent pretty much as the others had been, by the young gentry,
viz. over their wine and cards. Carter and some of his friends were thus
engaged during the evening, when Moore and Lee entered with the hope of
dissipating the melancholy feelings engendered by the ghastly sights which
still haunted them. As they entered, the former could not help but observe
that he had been the subject of conversation, for an embarrassing silence
ensued, some meaning smiles might have been detected, and one young
gentleman
unable well to control his risible faculties, burst into a loud laugh. Moore,
being a frank and straight-forward fellow, told them that he saw that he had
been the subject of their conversation, and begged to be informed of its cause.
To this appeal Carter was compelled to respond, for the eyes of all his
companions
turned to him at once.
Why, Moore, said he, I was only telling my messmates of the bargain
which you and I made in jest, about not prosecuting our suits with Kate until
our return, and how handsomely I had stolen a march upon you, before our
departure from the city.
Oh! said Moore, with a sly but bitter smile, and so you violated the
compact, and met with a rebuff for your pains?
I plead guilty to the first charge, Moore, but I have not spoken as to the
second count
Then, I suppose, we are to understand that you were successful, by the
cheerful manner in which you relate it?
Carter made no reply, but plied his cards busily, and Moore continued,
Silence is one sort of affirmation; am I so to understand you, Carter?
Still no reply, but renewed attention to the game. He evidently designed only
to annoy Moore, and amuse his friends with him. But placed as the latter
was, (as the reader has already been informed,) he felt bound to rescue the
fair name of his lady-love from the imputation of double dealing. In that light
he knew her conduct would appear to Lee, to whom he had confidentially
communicated her gracious answer to his proposal. Accordingly, he renewed
the attack pertinaciously and with some warmth. I insist, Carter, that you
give me an answer; now that you have carried the matter thus far, I demand
it as a right!
The devil you do! said Carter, dropping his cards, then I shall not give
any other answer than I have already given.
Moore rose to leave the tent in anger, but Lee begged him to stay a
moment
.
Gentlemen, said he, remember your positions, and think well of
whom you are about to quarrelno less than the daughter of our
commander
.
If it comes to the light, which it will do if you prosecute it farther, it
must annoy the Governor excessively, and throw a damp over our whole
enterprise.
Carter was excited with wine, and had been losing heavily at the game,
and was not in the most placid humor imaginable. True, he had been
consoling
himself with a laugh at his adversary, but that, too, was now turned to
bitterness, and he sat sullen and without a word of reply to Lee's appeal.
Truth to say, he liked not the source from which it came. The other
gentlemen
present, however, seeing the force of Lee's view of the case, interfered
and argued the matter with both belligerents, until they prevailed upon them
to drop it, at all events until their return to the capital. This armistice having
been thus concluded, Lee and Moore continued their walk, and the latter
remarked
as they went, did I not tell you that Carter would never resign his
pretensions without seeking a cause of quarrel? He betrayed me into a
basty acknowledgment of my rights, purposely. It was a settled and
premeditated
design, and not accidental, as it seemed.
But how could he know that we were coming to his tent?
Oh, that as well as the subject of discourse at the moment of our entrance,
was accidental, but the turn given after that to the conversation, was in
furtherance
of a preconceived design.
Well, well, Moore, let us drop the subject now, as you have agreed to
adjourn the point for a long time; meanwhile he will grow sober, and I hope
less bellicose.
The sentinels were placed this night with unusual care, as the Governor
had a suspicion that the Indians would make a combined attack upon him here,
this having been for some time the centre of their operations. But the night
passed with unusual quiet, and though the scout and his band were out most
of the time, no fresh signs were discovered. Young Hall accompanied them,
in the hope of discovering some trace of his lost Eugenia. Jarvis assured
him that she was already beating hominy and carrying water for the old
squawthe mother of her intended husband. Joe did not perceive that he was
every now and then thrusting a dagger into the heart of his new friend, by his
free and unbridled discourse, for the poor youth writhed in secret. The rude
scout was no sentimentalist, and had not the slightest conception of such
sorrows
as were weighing down his silent and moody companion. The reader
has seen how he bore his own troubles of the same sort, and he imagined that
there was a remarkable congeniality and fellow feeling between them, owing
to the similarity of their misfortunes. Every effort at consolation, however,
only made the matter worse, as will be perceived by the following portion of
their dialogue:
How is it, Jarvis, when a young woman is thus set apart for the wife of a
chief? Is her will nothing, or is she forced to compliance?
Why, Squire, the will of a woman does'nt pass for much among 'em, but
to tell you the truth and shame the devil, I believes they do sort o' ax their
consent
at first, for they carries corn and hominy, and skins, and other plunder,
to the wigwam of the gal's father, and if she takes 'em, then he carries her off
some night, by force.
And have they no ritesno marriage ceremony?
Oh, as to that, they may jump the broom stick, or the likes o' that, but
cuss me if I think they're even so much christenated as that comes to. As to
this gal of yourn, you see she's got no father among 'em to cozen with the
skins and plunder, and as she's already in the wigwam of that he rascal that I
knocked on the head tother night, what's the use of rites and ceremonies, as
you call 'em? When he gets to home, if ever he doesconsarn himhe'll
no doubt consider her as his'en already. Here a groan from his auditor
averted the flow of his discourse for a moment, but he speedily resumed, I'll
tell you what you've got to do, Squire Hall, you've got to slit his wind-pipe.
Oh, Scout, if I could only meet him in any sort of an encounter, however
unequal, how gladly would I seize the opportunity?
That's talking like a man, now! jist throw away them blue devils and
stick to that, and I'll bring you up with the rascals before we're clean over
the mountains. There's no need for you to take on so, any how, kase we've
to give them an etarnal thrashing afore they'll let us over the mountains,
or they will sculp us, in which case, you know, you won't want the gal.
Leaving Germana, the course of the expedition was directed for several
days in a diagonal line towards the direct route to the mountains. That time
brought our adventurers into a region of country such as many of them had
never seen before. The land was thickly strewn with rocks, and stones, and
pebbles. These were a subject of curiosity and admiration at first, but soon
turned to one of annoyance, as will be seen as we progress with our narrative.
Several spurs of mountains stretching in broken lines from the main chain
of the Blue Ridge, already presented their formidable barriers before them, and
being able to grasp an extended view from their base, they thought that they
had already arrived at the long desired point of their journey. Eager were
the emulous young cavaliers in their struggles to see who should first lead their
followers to the top of these heights, but, alas! they were only destined to
meet disappointment, for the same interminable view of broken and rolling
country met the view beyond, bounded still by that dim blue outline in the
back ground, and seeming rather to recede as they advanced. Hearty was the
laughter of the Scoutin which even the Governor joinedas they stood
upon the highest summit of the first of them, and surveyed with dismay the
mountains piled upon mountains beyond.
Governor Spotswood now, for the first time, began to have clear
conceptions
of the vast region which lay before himthe difficulties of the
undertaking
,
and the hardships which would have to be endured before he
accomplished
his design. Already the hunting department had been greatly
enlarged, and as they progressed farther into the wilderness, game became
more abundant. Several buffalo had been encountered and taken, after a
severe chase and many hair breadth escapes. Still they encountered not
their great adversariesthe combined savage forces, those who had sworn
that they should never cross the mountains alive. But a new difficulty,
wholly unanticipated, began now, for the first time, to present itself. The
baggage wagons had been left at Germana, and of course the burdens of
the sumpter mules and the supernumerary horses required to be doubled.
These were nearly all lame already. The first day the lame animals were
relieved by others taken from the soldiers, while the latter were required
to walk. But the substitutes in their turn became lame. Small as the
difficulty at first seemed, not many days elapsed ere the whole expedition
was brought to a complete stand-still, and what added not a little to their
discomfiture, their saddle horses began to share the same fate, insomuch
that the stragglers, with their crippled animals, strewed the route for miles.
The experienced judgment of the commander quickly perceived that this
was exposing them to the hazard of a murderous attack from the Indians,
and a general halt was ordered for several day's encampment, to recruit
the cavalry. The encampment was pitched upon a beautiful plain, in that
region of country now called Albermarle, one of the most charming spots
in America. The mountains were distinctly in view, on more sides than
one, but the dark blue boundaries of the horizon in the West, were
apparently
as far off as ever.
So badly were many of the horses lamed, that some of the stragglers did not
arrive until after midnight, and even then some of them had not made their
appearance. The Governor became alarmed, lest they might have been cut
off by the ever watchful enemy, and he ordered the scout and twenty
followers
,
with the soundest horses to return and bring them in, while large fires
were kindled to show the position of the encampment. Lee and Moore
determined
to be of the partypartly to amuse themselves and partly on account
of Moore's uneasiness about old June, who was among the missing. Indeed
Kate had specially charged her lover to have an eye to the safety of the
faithful
old fellow.
They found the wearied soldiers, some tugging along leading their limping
chargers, with loud and bitter curses, while others, less persevering, were
sitting in despair by the way side, and the worn out animals were lying down
to die, as it seemed.
For miles along their route, they encountered nothing but lame horses and
worn out soldiers. Many of the latter having lost the blazed track, were shouting
despairingly to their companions from remote distances in the forest. Some
cried lustily for help, their horses having laid down in utter helplessness. The
darkness of the night only served to render their accumulating disasters more
annoying to the soldiers.
Lee, seeing how much this state of things could be remedied by keeping
the soldiers together, ordered those in the lead to halt until their lost
companions
were found, and until those in the rear should come up. At the same
time he directed pine torches to be kindled and held aloft as a guide to the
poor stragglers. The whole scene resembled a defeated army during a retreat,
and the feeble minded and the wavering were already sunk in gloomy despair
at the prospect of such a termination of their enterprise. The distant
mountains
in view, only seemed to render their despair more hopeless, for they
seemed rather to recede as the expedition advanced, and such glimpses as had
been caught from the tops of the highest spurs which they had yet ascended,
presented one continued pile of mountains behind mountains, seemingly
interminable in their breadth. These things it must be confessed, were very
disheartening to the timid, but not so to the old veteran, who commanded the
expedition. All day he marched on foot in the front ranks, cheering those
around him and carrying his instruments and his arms upon his person, while
his noble war-horse, as yet but slightly lamed, was given to a sick soldier.
The reader's particular acquaintances of the orderLee, Dandrige, Moore,
and Carter, followed the Governor's example, and cheered up the drooping
spirits of the weary and despairing.
The former especially, now shone out in his true colours. He was every
inch a soldier, and the Governor relied on him now, with unreserved
confidence
twitting
him the while, notwithstanding, concerning his vagaries at
the capital.
Lee and his friends pursued their backward route for some miles and until
the soldiers with their lame horses were becoming few and far between, and
yet no tidings were heard of poor old June. He had not been seen since the
noon meal, and the last straggler declared that he had not heard a single
voice in his rear. Still they pursued their route, determined to persevere
until day light, rather than give up the old banjo player. When they had
passed the last horseman, some five or six miles, and were just coming to the
conclusion that they would find him at the lunch ground, still some four miles
off, Moore halted abruptly behind a projecting point of hill, descending to a
creek which they were just about to ford, and laid his hand upon the bridle of
Lee's horse. The latter drew his pistol upon the instant, and placed himself
so as to be ready for action, but presently his ear caught a well known sound,
which induced him to return his weapon to its holster, while he could scarcely
suppress a laugh, so strange did old June's voice and banjo sound in the still and
solitary forest. They moved as close as possible, so as to catch a glimpse of
the old fellow and yet not to be seen. He was leaning against the saddle
and portmantean, his horse lying dead by his side, while he chaunted the
following
words to one of his most melancholy airs,
Farewell old Beginny,
I lebe you now may be forebber,
Im gwine to lebe de Chesapeake,
I lebe you crab, you prawn, you oyster
Way down in Old Beginny.
My fishing smak, my net and tackle,
I lebe you by de riber side,
I gwine to lebe de swamp and woods,
Where de coon and possum sleep
Way down in Old Beginny.
All my friends I lebe behind me
Ben, Harry, Bill and old aunt Dinah,
Maum, Mary and te Sarah child,
And my young misses, I blige to lebe you
Way down in Old Beginny.
De rattle snake, de deer, de turkey,
He got dis country all to eself
He high like steeple, and deep like well,
No like de shore I lebe behind me
Way down in Old Beginny
A long farewell, my old Beginny,
I gwine fight bloody Ingin now,
He sculp old June, he broke he banjo,
He no more sing to he young missus
Way down in Old Beginny.
The chimney corner' is all dark now,
No banjo da to make him merry.
A long farewell to my old missus
A long farewell to my old missus
Way down in Old Beginny.
Why June, exclaimed Moore, has every one deserted you?
Oh, Mass Bernard, I glad to see you for true. I tought de Governor left
old June for good and all.
But your horse,could you not get him along at all?
Oh, Mass Bernard, he settle all he account in dis worldhe dead as a
makeral, and June glad ob it too.
Glad! why what are you glad for.
Case he grunt so solemcoly, go right trough June's heart like a funeral
sarmon.
Moore mounted the old fellow on behind his servant, proposing to leave the
saddle, portmanteau, and even the banjo, until he could send back for them, but
to the latter part of the proposition, June stoutly objected, and they were fair
to take him, banjo and all, as it was getting to be late.
Before day dawned, all the stragglers with most of their horses were brought
safely into camp without the Indians having discovered their helpless
condition
,
if indeed they still watched the movements of the troops. Jarvis and
those most conversant with their habits argued from this circumstance, that
they no longer hovered upon the outskirts of the army.
CHAPTER XXII.
HORSE-SHOE ENCAMPMENT.
Strange
that neither the Governor or any of his subordinates in command
had yet discovered the true reason of the disastrous condition of their cavalry;
but they had so long dwelt along the sandy shores of the Chesapeake and the
alluvial soil of the rivers, that they were not aware of the effects of the hard,
stony ground upon their horses' feet. A general council of the order, was
summoned after breakfast to take into consideration the condition of the army
and what it behooved them to do, under the circumstances. Various opinions
were expressed. Some were for abandoning the horses altogether, and
continuing
their route on foot, and some were for remaining in their present
encampment until their horses could be sufficiently recruited to prosecute the
journey. To this latter opinion the Governor was inclined. Lee, who had
been in consultation with his staunch friend and counsellor Jarvis, stated that
the latter had predicted this very state of things in his hearing, and he
attributed
it entirely to the want of shoes upon their horses' feet, to protect them
from the pebbles and small stones, which made them sore by the constant
wear and friction of travel. Jarvis was summoned and required to explain
the matter. Several of the lame horses were led up before the marquee,
where they were assembled, and Joe, taking up one of the poor animal's feet,
commenced quite an erudite lecture upon the complicated structure of that
admirably contrived apparatus. True, the scout indulged in no high sounding
technicalities, nor was he acquainted with the
art
of farriery, as laid down in
books, but he understood the true philosophy of the subject, upon which he had
undertaken to enlarge. By way of enforcing his views he brought his own
pony which he had shod himself, and holding up his foot to the astonished
young gentlemen pointed out to them how well he could stand the pressure
of his knife handle rudely thrust against the frog, and from which all the
other animals had shrunk with pain. It now became a subject of anxious
deliberation,
what they were to do?
Any one could now see that little would
be gained by rest alone, for no sooner would they have recommenced the
journey, than the same difficulty would occur again with ten fold aggravation
as the route yet to be traversed was of course more stony and precipitous.
Besides they were every day approaching nearer and nearer to the country of
the hostile Indians, where the Governor's peaceful tributary and missionary
systems had scarcely penetrated.
The only alternatives left seemed either to abandon the expedition and go
home, or to abandon their horses and pursue the route on foot. In their secret
hearts many preferred the former and hoped it would be forced upon the old
chief, whether he would or not, but no one dared to make such a proposition.
He must, however, have discovered their secret leaning that way, for he told
them that any one who was home-sick, or who felt disheartened by such
obstacles
as they had already encountered might return; as for himself he intended
to scale the mountain if he left his bones bleeching on the top.
All
responded
to his hardy perseverance, whatever some of them may have felt, while the
scout could scarcely refrain from raising his coon skin in triumph over those
of his comrades, who had confidently predicted to him their speedy return.
What was to be done? That was the question;
and one which, small as it
may appear at this distant day of graduated and McAdamized roads, was of
vital interest to them. To shoe several hundred horses, without the proper
artificers to do the work seemed such a chimera of the brain, that when the
Governor proposed it, he was answered by a general shout of laughter, in
which he joined as heartily as the youngest of them. Nevertheless, he said
be would show them that it could be done, and that he would set the example
himself. Accordingly, he ordered a shed to be immediately erected for a
blacksmith shopinto which the scout was installed as chief artificer. Joe
said that his father had once bound him apprentice to the trade of a blacksmith,
but that he was always mending old gun locks and pistols on his own hook,
for which his master licked him so often, that he ran away before his time
was half out. He expressed his sorrow, that he could not foresee at the
time, that he would have the Governor and all the young gentry, one day
under him as apprentices, in which case he would have acted very differently.
However, he went manfully to work, and really turned out horse-shoes, which
would have been creditable to his old master.
During the first day, most of the youngsters stood around and watched
Jarvis teaching the Governor of Virginia, the art of horse-shoeing.
Frequently
he required the assistance of the sledge hammer, which the old
veteran would suffer no one wield but himself, and most gallantly did the
old hero of many battles bare his brawny arms to wield the ponderous
instrument
.
More than once Joe had to let go his read hot iron, and fall back
against his rude forge, and laugh out right. He said he had never expected
to see the day when the Governor would be striker to him.
My old master, continued he, used to tell me that the devil would make
me striker to him when he cotch'd me, but I reckon he missed the figure.
By the second day, the Governor could make a very passable horseshoe,
and Jarvis nailed a set of his own making upon his old war-horse. When
the job was completed, the Governor mounted him and cantered round the
encampment, his whole face flushed with the double effects of his triumph and
his work at the forge. The young men were no longer sceptical, but turned
in, each one to shoe his own charger. Some were not gifted with mechanical
tact and ingenuity, while others fully equalled the Governor in skill. The
former were allowed to hire Jarvis, and such ingenious soldiers as he had
pressed into his service, to do the work for them, by which operation the
scout lined his pockets handsomely. He declared to Frank Lee that he had
never possessed as much money in all his life, as he made in that one week
but we anticipate. A new difficulty now presented itself, for all the iron,
which the foresight of the scout had provided, had given out, and great
numbers
of horses remained yet to be shod. In this emergency, some one luckily
remembered the wagons left at Germana, and a detachment was immediately
despatched with the horses already provided, to bring the tire from off the
wheels, and such other pieces of the metal as they could gather from them.
This expedient furnished an abundant supply, and the army was rapidly
recruiting its strength and spirits, while the horses were as fresh as the day
they left the capital. Game was found in great abundance, and the tables
of our adventurers smoked each day of their unwonted labors with haunches
of venison, which their sovereign might have envied, and truth to say, they
did not render tardy justice to the good things set before them. Celebrated
as the Cavaliers of Virginia were for their love of good eating, the members
of the Tramontane Order surpassed all the feats of their forefathers; never
were such trencher men seen; venison steaks and buffalo humps disappeared
with marvellous rapidity. Nor was the convivial glass wantinga few
bottles
here and there had been preserved from their previous wassail, which
were generously produced on these now joyful evenings. Songs and toasts
once more enlivened the festive board.
On the last night but one of the horse shoe encampment, the Governor
invited the whole of the order to sup with him, and as his stock of wines
were known to be almost untouched, most cheerfully was the summons
answered. Long tablesrude, it is truewere set out under a fine grove of
oaks, from the branches of which were hung such lamps as could be found
through the camp.
About eight o'clock the Governor gave the signal for the onslaught, taking
27
the head of the table himself, and assigning the second post of honor to Frank
Lee. On the right hand of the giver of the feast, sat the Rev. Hugh Jones,
Chaplain to the General Assembly of His Majesty's Colony in Virginia,
as he styles himself in the work which he has left behind him, and in which
he gives a short account of the Tramontane Expedition, though the work
was professedly written for other purposes.
*
*
There is a copy of this rare work in the old Franklin Library, Phil., and another at
Cambridge
University, and perhaps others. A short account of the expedition may also be found
in Oldmixon's British Empire in Americaone copy of which is now in possession of the
Georgia Historical Society.
The old hero felt that he had achieved a greater triumph over surrounding
obstacles, than when he led the charge at Blenheim, and he was consequently
neither chary of his wine nor his wit. After the saddles of venison, wild
turkeys, and pheasants, had all disappeared, the Governor led the way to the
festivities of the evening by his standing toast, as in duty bound, now altered
of course by the ascension of a male Sovereign to the throne. It was varied
also by the services which he supposed himself to be rendering to his royal
master. Every one rose up with him, as he filled his glass and gave,
Our
new Sovereign!
may the `Tramontane Order' push the boundaries of his
empire
in America to the banks of the Mississippi.
The Governor was too modest by halfhe ought to have said to Mexico.
It was drunk with three times three. It must be recollected by our readers,
however, that they supposed the Mississippi to be just beyond the mountains
before them.
Strange enough, that both Columbus and Spotswood, the one the pioneer
across the ocean, and the other across the mountains, should have both been
led on to their grand achievements by a geographical illusionthe one, in
search of the Indies, discovering Americaand the other, in search of the
Mississippi, discovering the fairest portion of what is now the United States.
The discoveries of the latter may fairly claim that much, for he was in reality
the great pioneer, who first led the chivalrous youths of the Old Dominion
upon those tramontane pilgrimages, which have already been so gloriously
commemorated upon the plains of San Jacinto, by one of the same peripatetie
race, and which we confidently predict will never rest this side of the gates of
Mexico. Never was there an individual so chiefly instrumental in the great
onward movements, which have since so distinguished our country and our
countrymen, and whose memory has been suffered to fall into such utter
forgetfulness
,
as the far-sighted soldier and statesman, to whose name we have
attempted to offer an humble tribute. How vast were the results of this
expedition
!
While we write, the Congress of the United States is endeavoring to
distribute those very lands to which his hardy enterprise and indomitable
gallantry
first led the way. We hear of Daniel Boon, and other hardy western
pioneers of a later day, but the name of the real first conqueror and disoverer
of that vast and almost boundless country is never mentioned, except by
historians
,
and by them, in the most meagre and unsatisfactory manner.
It is well that the old chief could not foresee the ingratitude which awaited
him even in his life-time, and doubly fortunate that he could not see that to
which we have alluded, else the festivities of the evening might have been
marred. As it was, every thing went on swimmingly, toast succeeded toast
in rapid succession, and the conversation began now to grasp the objects of
the enterprise, as something almost within their reach. The Governor told
them that he intended to offer a brilliant prize to the gentleman who should
first plant the British standard upon the summit of the great Apalachee. This
was the first faint adumbration of the Golden Horse Shoe which we can
discover
.
It was received with glowing enthusiasm, and every youth professed
himself ready to die in the attempt. The old tactician knew well how to fire
the ardor of the gallant youths under his command, and having brought their
spirits and their emulation to that point which he desired, and for which the
feast was given, he retired with his reverend friend, and left the youngsters
to their unrestrained merriment.
After the veteran had withdrawn, his health was drunk with great
enthusiasm
,
but it is doubtful whether the toast would have gone down so
unanimously
on the night of their arrival at the horse-shoe encampment, so
disheartened were many of the young cavaliers, and so fickle is popular
opinion. A toast to the lasses they had left behind them, was received and
drunk with much feeling. As the Chairman (Frank Lee) resumed his seat,
he discovered the scout leaning against a tree near, with his bare and brawny
arms folded, while they, as well as his face, were black with the smoke of his
smithy, which he had just deserted for the sounds of merriment in his near
neighborhood. Lee led him forward, and placed a flagon of undiluted
spirits in his hand, which he would have quaffed without much preface, but
that many youths gathered around him, and sang out for a toast. A toast
from the scout!A toast from the scout! was carried by acclamation. Joe
scratched his inheritance, as he called his red flock, and advanced one foot,
but his ideas did not seem to flow so readily under the process, as the sparks
from under his herculean hammer. At length, however, his eye was seen to
sparkle, and his fingers to cease the cultivation of his inheritance, at which
demonstration the chairman thumped the table with his knife for silence and
attention. Gents, said Joe, as you've drunk to the gals you have left
behind you, here's to the gals we have got before us, slapping poor Hall upon
the back, who was just sitting before him, leaning his head upon his hand.
Hall could not resist such an appeal, especially when urged by all the company
to join the scout in a bumper. Thus passed the evening, or rather the night,
for they kept up the revelry until a late hour, and then separated in a good
humor with themselves and all the world.
CHAPTER XXIII.
OLD FASHIONED LOVE LETTERS.
During
the lengthened encampment of the horsemen, a courier arrived
from the Capitol, bringing letters for the Governor, and for many of the young
gentry who were with him. Numerous were the epistles of the anxious
mothers and not less solicitous fathers, beseeching their sons to caution and
prudence in the hazardous enterprise in which they were embarked; but
with these we have no immediate business. We hope, however, that the
following
epistle may possess some interest for our readers:
Williamsburg
,
1714.
To Francis Lee, Esq.
Dear Frank
.But a few days have elapsed since your departure, yet it
seems an age. Short as the time is, however, I must write now in compliance
with my promise, or lose all opportunity of writing, until the expedition is on
its return. The courier who takes this, it is hoped, will overtake you near the
foot of the mountains. First and foremost, then, I must be selfish enough to
begin at home. Out of the fullness of the heart the mouth speaketh, and I
suppose the pen writeth. You will, I am sure, be surprised to learn that my
father seems to miss your society even more than I. After your departure,
he would sit up for hours, wrapped up in his own thoughts. At first I did not
heed this particularly, because he often does so, when any of his patients are
sick unto death; but I soon found that my caressesa successful remedy
generallywere entirely unheeded; and once I saw a tear stealing down
his dear and venerable face. I could submit tacitly no longer, but begged him
to tell me what disturbed him. He said he was beginning to find out my
value just as he was about to lose me. Dear father, said I I will never,
never leave you. We have been too long all in all to each other! Was I
not right, Frank, in giving him this assurance, and will you not doubly assure
him, when you come back? I know you will. How can you make any such
promise, my child, he asked, when you have given your whole heart and
soul to another? Now, was not this a strange speech for the good old man
to make? Do you not discover a littlejust a littlejealousy in it? I
thought I did, and I laughed at the idea, though the tears were coursing each
other down his cheeks faster than ever; and I taxed him with the strange
manifestation. Well, said he, have you not been wife, and daughter,
and companion, and comforter, and nurse, and every thing to meand how
can I live, when all that gives life and cheerfulness to my house is gone?
It will be putting out the light of mine eyesfor my Ellen, all is dark
and dreary, when your shadow does not fall within the range of these
fast failing orbs.
I again and again renewed the assurance that we would live with
him. Pooh, pooh, said he, I have thought of all that. Frank has a
large landed estate and negroes to look after, and when you are
married
,
you will have corresponding duties as a wealthy planter's wife. How,
then, can either of you remain here? Then, said I, you can go and
live with us in the country. No, no, said he, never, never will I leave
this spot. There is a silent history in these walls, my Ellen, which you
know not, for you were too young to know her whose sweet presence still
lingers around every chair, and table, and wainscot, and wall, which you
see. Little did he remember, Frank, that those very inanimate objects
had so long been telling me a sweet tale of my own, but I disturbed not his
hallowed memories. Oh, Frank, are there many such husbands in the
world? Your sex is sadly belied, if there are. My poor father is a lover
yet, though his head is silvered o'er with age and sorrow. Dear Frank,
will you thus cherish the homely household remembrances which I may
leave behind me? Yes, I have as full faith in you as I have in my own
father, and I declare to you that I would not entrust my happiness with one
in whom I had less. But we have not the hazards and uncertainties of
other people, for we know each other's every thought and sentiment. My
father went on in the same strain for a long time, until finally I succeeded
in imbuing him with some of my own trust and confidence, that you would
make any pecuniary sacrifice rather than separate us. An old man's life,
or rather the enjoyments of that life, are made up, in a great measure, of
the pastof these recollections of by-gone yearsand one of the first duties
of his children is to see that they are not rudely shocked. You know that
I studied to have the arrangements even of the furniture, so that my
excellent
father should see no change from old times, as he loves to call
them. I have shocked him with no innovations or modern improvements
in any thing that pertains to his own personal comfort. His cocked hat
hangs upon the very peg in the hall on which he was accustomed to hang
it in my mother's time, and I make it my business to take it down and brush
it regularly every morning before he goes out. I knit his woollen stockings
and gloves as exactly like the last made by my mother's hands as
possible
,
and I have endeavored, in all things, to let him feel his loss as little
as may be. Strange that he should, since your return, first begin to notice
all these little things. It is the prospect of losing me, that has now brought
them conspicuously before him, for I have studied to make them minister
almost unconsciously to his comforts. There is another thing which I have
observed since you went away. You know, that since his eye-sight began
to fail, I have read the family prayersat which, all the servants are
present
.
The other night he rose from his knees, with his face suffused in
tears, and told the servants to remain; it was Sunday night. I had before
observed the same evidence of recent emotion. He said to the servants
you had better lay these religious exercises to heart, for the time will soon
come when you will hear no more from your young mistress. That old
organ will soon be removed to a new home. True, said he, seeming to
recollect
himself, many of you will go along; of course, you will prefer to
accompany your young mistress. Is'nt he getting almost childishI fear
this bodes no good.
After he had said a good deal more of the same sort, I suffered them to
depart
,
and then begged him to be assured that I would never permit the
instrument
to be removed, even if I should go away myself, and that I would not
suffer one of the servants to leave him, except my own maid.
You see, dear Frank, that I make no apology for telling you of these
thingsgossip it may benevertheless, it is very near the heart. I think I
know you too well to suppose that you will be indifferent to them before
marriage
,
and far, far less afterwards. You will see, also, that I suffer no
mawkish
delicacy to prevent me from talking to you as unreservedly as I would to
my father. Are you not shortly to be my husband? and ought that
confidence
to begin in an instant of time? Can it be?does it ever so begin?
Nay, does not life often end without establishing it, when the parties have
begun by a false move in the first instance? I rejoice that I can repose this
unreserved confidence in you, even thus early. To you I know my little
domestic records will have the same interest as if you had thought and acted
them yourself. Kate has just been here. You see I am making for you a
sort of diary of my letter, and to tell the truth it has been written at several
sittings. Well, as I just told you, Kate has been here, and has made confidents
of you and me. The saucy baggage said she knew it was just the same
thing as telling it to you. You must know that she has promised her hand,
where her heart has long been given, to your friend Moore. Your friend
will find Kate a more charming girl than even he imagines. I know him to
be amiable and accomplished, as the polite world view these things, but I fear
he lacks the highest finish to be the true gentleman. What can make us
such
gentle
-men or
gentle
-women as that spirit within us which ever prompts
us to love our neigbors as ourselves? This germ of the christian doctrine, if
properly cultivated, will expand into an universal philanthropy. How
different
is this from your code of honor, which has one conscience for its
followers
,
and another for the world! The conscience of a gentleman of honor
substitutes what others think of us for that unerring monitor within our own
bosoms. Indeed, the conventional conscience often silences the still small
voice of the inward man, and this, too, often in supposed deference to the
opinions of
our
sex.
Now, I wish to set you and Mr. Moore both right on this point.
No lady
whose opinion is worth having, ever sides with these laws of honor
. True,
there are fashionable females, who
pretend
to applaud all the vaunting
and vain glorious chivalry of the world, but even they, in their secret
hearts, love to see men who dare to erect higher standards of excellence
and morality. Kate and I, at least, have the unfashionable ambition to
see our lovers repudiate the false standard which the world has
established
.
All this prating has been brought upon your head, by some
servants'
news which has come to Kate's ears. Do not throw down my
letter
she
could not help it. Some of Mr. Carter's servants have told her
maid, that their master would never suffer Mr. Moore to triumph over
him in his love. Now, do not laugh at our woman's fears, but attend to
what we say. For myself, I think it would be a very good test for Kate
to submit her beau tothis ordeal of the true monitor against the false
one. So many of the cavaliers emigrated to Virginia, during the old
troubles at home, that they established here, in undisputed sway, this
false and corrupt standard. I am very sure you would not follow itwould
you, dear Frank? No one could be more gratified at any honorable
distinction
of another, than I would be at yours, but I could never
accept that
hand in marriage
, which had been previously stained by the blood of a
fellowbeing
shed
in single combat, and in cold blood. Heigh ho. I find I have
commenced a lecture to your friend, or rather about your friend, and
brought it all down at last upon your own head. Forgive me, dear Frank.
You were brought up in the same school that I wastaught to pray,
kneeling
at the same family altar. Oh, may we long kneel at the same holy
shrine! To return to our mutual friendsas I said before, there has been
no unreserved confidence between them. He will write to Kate I know
indeed, I suppose his letters (with your own) are already on the waybut you
can very well imagine what a lover's first epistle will be, or what they
generally
are, always excepting yours, dear Frank. Now, could you not open his
eyes?above all, could you not guard him against falling an easy prey to
Mr. Carter's designs, if any such he has? Do watch over him, Frank, as you
would over a younger brother.
And now, dear Frank, I have little more to say, than how much I want to
see you, and how I do hope that you will return, before there is any
greater
change in my dear father(shall I say our father, Frank?) Farewell.
Take care of Mr. Moore, Kate says, and of old Juneand I say, above all,
take care of yourself.
Your own Ellen
.
It would have been quite amusing to a disinterested spectator to have sat
at the same camp-table, and watched Frank Lee and Bernard Moore reading
their several epistles. There was a spectator in the tent, and disinterested
enough in all conscienceJarvis the scout. He was sitting upon a
portmanteau
in one corner, availing himself of the light, to fix an old gun lock, which
had lost some of its proper functions. From time to time he ceased his filling
and screwing, and turned his blackened and greasy face towards the young
men, at first with an inquiring glance, as much as to say, why do you read
those letters over again, when you have already read every line? But when
they both, as if moved by one impulse, and wholly regardless of each other,
turned them over and over again, and read and re-read them, he could hold
in no longer, and burst out into a laugh. Both of them started as if roused
from one of the sweetest dreams imaginable, and laying their hands upon the
table, still holding the epistles, stared at Joe in turn. Their movements and
the expression of their countenances were so exactly alike, that Joe went off
again half cocked, as he called it, in the rude apology which he attempted
in his own justification.
Well well, said Lee, now that we are all attention, will you be so good
as to enlighten us as to the cause of your merriment?
Why, Squire, you and Mr. Moore put me so plagidly in mind of the time
when I used to go to school a gittin' my lessons over and over agin, that for
the life of me I could'nt a help'd larfin. Then Mr. Moore, he worked his
mouth and waved his hand so grand like, that he looked exactly like the
player men down to Williamsburg. I guess you're a goin to have some play
actin' here in camp some of these nights, aint you?or is them real ginuine
letters, sure enough?
As true letters, Joe, replied Lee, after the young men had indulged in their
laugh, both at their own ludicrous behavior and the impressions it made upon
their rude friend; as true letters, Joe, as ever were writtenat least I can
vouch for mine, and I think for Moore's, with safety. But how comes it, Joe,
that every one received letters by the courier but you? It strikes me you
have a correspondent. Were you not writing to some one but recently?
O aye, and the Governor gin me a letter too, out of the letter bag, from
the same feller I was a writing toone William Bivinswe calls him Billy,
for short. And Joe drew out of his shot pouch lying on the ground beside
him, a blackened and disfigured letter, which already looked worn enough to
take the heart of an antiquarian. But we will not detain the reader with
Joe's correspondence, as it in no way related to the interests of the expedition,
nor to the development of our story. In its stead, we will transcribe the
other letter alluded to. It was from Kate, of course.
Williamsburg
,
1714.
Dear Bernard
:
According to promise, you see I have begun to write you a letterand
one dozen have I commenced before, but tore them up, because I did not
know exactly what word to prefix to your name. First I tried plain
Bernard
that
looked too cold and abrupt; and then Mr. Mooreand that
appeared
too business like and formal; and then I began without any prefix at
all. At last, I went to Ellen in my distress, and she rated me roundly for
being ashamed to salute with an endearing epithet a man to whom I had
promised
my hand, and given my heart. Nor was that allshe took me to task
for still wrapping myself up in that reserve which the world compels us to
wear, instead of endeavoring, as is
my duty
, (you know I call her Mrs. Duty,)
to establish an unreserved confidence between us, and to learn and
betray
at
the same time all those peculiarities of thought and feeling which go to make
up our identity. As I told her, that is the very thing which I dread.
I am not so pure and holy in my thoughts, that I may, like her, lay them
open to the gaze even of a
conditionally accepted lover
. Nevertheless, she
has frightened me so, with the dread of future matrimonial unhappiness, that
I have resolved to make a clean breast of it, or at least to make the effort.
And so to begin fairly, I asked my demure friend to tell me honestly and
candidly
,
what she thought was my besetting sin? And what do you think she
said? Why, love of admiration! Just think of that. Now, is it so,
Bernard
?
Can you, in your heart, accuse me of that heartless thing,
coquetry
,
except just a little harmless flirting, with which the sages of our
country allow us to arm ourselves. Is it any thing more, Bernard? But
stopI must answer that myself, on my conscience; and though I almost
quarrelled with Ellen at her own house about it, I had scarcely seated myself in
the carriage, on my return home, before the silent monitor likewise began to
accuse me. I cried bitterly about it, and then sat myself down to make a
true and honest confession. You must be aware though, Bernard, that the
position of the Governor's eldest daughter is a little different from that
of other young ladies, even among the gentry. Alas! poor me! what
am I saying? Attempting a defence of the very thing which I
promised
to amend! No, no, the daughter of His Majesty's representative is
more bound, than any other young lady, to present a model even more
blameless than common, inasmuch as her example is looked up to and
followed by those, who are beneath her in rank and position. Ellen
says, that even the tradesmen's daughters are already imitating my dress
and manners, carricatured though they may be. Then I do confess, (as I
suppose I must,) that I have rather been pleased with the insidious
flattery
,
but I do assure you that it was unconsciouslythat I never knew it,
until I was induced to make a rigid self-examination. To know it, is to
amend it, for, since I have analyzed the passion, I am heartily disgusted
at its grossness. I am disgusted at myself, that I ever sought promiscuous
admiration. The player-women on the stage seek the same thing, and
have a better excuse for it, for it is to them a means of subsistence. Oh!
Bernard, the bare contemplation of what it leads to, if once it obtains
the mastery, fills me with the most profound self-abasement. I am sure,
at least I hope, you will find me a very different girl on your return.
There, now, if that is not as pretty a confession of a coquet, as could
be desired by Mrs. Duty herself? But tell me, dear Bernard, are you
willing to marry a coquette. Do answer your anxious and too
repentant
Kate
.
It is not consistent with our allotted limits to ransack the mail bag any
further at this time, though we may again present such of the
correspondence
of the parties on the other side as relates to their adventures,
or the progress of the great enterprise. Preparations were now busily
making to break up the celebrated encampment of the horse-shoe.
Nearly the whole cavalry had recovered their feet, and an abundance of
jerked venison, and dried buffalo and tongues, &c., had been also provided,
so that they were prepared to set out with renewed strength and spirits.
The murmnrs of the discontented had now nearly ceased, and the young
soldiers began to relish the rude, but exciting life of the camp. The old
chief at their head was in his glory. He had gained in health, and strength,
and spirits, with every day's journey, though he had performed as great a
share of it on foot as the meanest soldier in his ranks.
The scout, too, was in his true element, and besides, was now in high
favor with His Excellency, to the success of whose grand enterprise he was
found so indispensable an auxiliary. Many times a day the Governor would
exclaim, what a god-send it was that he had exchanged his promised guide
for the one he had picked up at the eleventh hour. He now saw that the wary
Indian had purposely deceived bim from the beginning, and especially with
regard to the face of the country. He was now, too, fully persuaded that the
young chiefs recently in College, had been preparing to dispute his passage
across the mountains, exactly as he advanced in his preparations to effect
that object. Already more than one had bnen seen and encountered, who had
never been at the College, a positive proof that far more were concerned
than the pupils. Then the desertion of the village, and the retreat of its
inhabitants before him towards the mountains, all showed that they either
intended to abandon the country wholly before the march of his troops, or
else to dispute the mountain passes with him, hand to hand. He knew too
well to suppose the former for a moment, and their constant annoyance of
his outskirts was proof enough, if any additional had been wanting, that
they entertained no such design.
Little information as to the movements of his people was gained from
the captive, though each night he had been brought to the Governor's
marquee
to be interrogated, and though Jarvis repeated more than once the
hempen admonition before administered. It is very questionable whether
Joe's feelings of philanthropy and benevolence were not such, that he would
willingly have extended that admonition, had the Governor permitted it. He
assured the old chief that the young rascal would tell every thing, if he
would only permit him (Jarvis) to hang him a littlejust a little; but the
Governor had seen too much of the scout's tender mercies towards the race,
to trust the captive in his hands.
CHAPTER XXIV.
FIRE IN THE MOUNTAINS.
At
length the army was again in motionthe horses having recovered the
use of their legs, and the riders their spirits. They were now passing thro'
a country wholly new, even to the scout, and one of surpassing magnificence
and beauty. The forest crowned hills, and the bright sparkling streams
tumbling over their rocky beds, succeeded each other with astonishing
rapidity, exhibiting some of the finest landscapes in nature.
The general course of the expedition was along the banks of these water
coursessupposed to have their rise near or beyond the mountainsbut their
devious windings were not pursuedso that they often crossed the same
stream some twenty times a day, in pursuance of the more direct compass
line of the old chief.
Towards night of the first day's march after leaving the horse-shoe,
some twenty miles, the great range of mountains began to appear distinctly
in view, so that it was confidently predicted that another day's journey would
bring them up to the base.
How gloriously the blue mountains loomed up in the distance to the
astonished and delighted gaze of the young Cavaliers, who supposed
themselves just ready to grasp the magnificent prize for which they
had so long toiled! But as the next day's march drew towards
its close, they were very much surprised to find the mountains still
apparently as far off, as though they pursued an
ignis fatus
so delusive
were the distances to eyes accustomed so long to view objects on a dead
level. These daily disappointments and vexations at length, however,
began to revive the Governor's youthful experience and recollection of
such things. Still that experience was not exactly in point, because here,
the towering heights were clothed in dense forests, over which the
changing
seasons were now throwing the gorgeous drapery of their autumnal
hues, so that he was nearly as much at fault as his juniors.
In enthusiastic admiration of the matchless succession of panoramas which
hourly greeted his sight, he was not a whit behind any of them. Often
would he halt his suite, as they preceded the main body over some high
hill, and all, with one voice, would burst out in admiration at the new
scenes presented, sometimes stretching far away into green secluded
valleys
,
and then towering up from their very borders into the most majestic
and precipitous heights. As they advanced nearer and nearer to the
mountains
,
these characteristics gradually thickened upon them, until now the
army was often closed up entirely between surrounding hills, and at other
times the front ranks of the imposing array would be ascending one hill.
while the rear guard was descending another. Often, too, were the echoes
of the mountains awakened by the martial music of the trumpets and bugles,
notwithstanding the oft repeated remonstrances of the scout. Any one
who has not heard a bugle among the mountains, can form but a faint
idea of the charming effect, produced by the reverberation resounding from
hill to valley, and from valley to hill. For the greater part of the journey,
it was more like a triumphal procession, than an army marching to new
conquests through an unknown country.
On one of the last nights spent on the eastern side of the mountains,
after the usual bustle of pitching tents and building fires had somewhat
subsided, when soldiers and officers were lying about in lazy attitudes,
seeking that repose made so necessary by the fatigue of a long day's
march, powerfully induced, likewise, by one of those delightful Virginia
autumnal twilightsLee and Moore were resting themselves on the grass
and exchanging congratulations upon their prosperous journey, thus far,
and the fine prospects of the morrow, when they observed the scout,
instead
of seeking that repose in which so many of his superiors were
indulging
,
bustling about at a great rate. Our two adventurers soon
discovered
that something more than common was in hand, and they called
the scout to them and inquired what new scheme against the varmints
he was now plotting?
Oh, Gents, replied Joe, its another sort of cattle I'm arter nowrare
sport a comin' Gents, but its a secret.
28A
No, no, Jarvis, replied Lee, as they both rose from their recumbent
position, no secrets from us, that is against our compact.
Well then, said Joe, we are to have a grand fight to night.
What! to night? exclaimed both with one accord, springing to their
feet, where, and with whom?
Ha! ha! ha! not so fast, not so fast, its not with the yaller niggers.
They both turned away disappointed, and as they walked off, Joe called
after them. It's a grand cock fight, Gents.
Both turned again almost as eagerly as before, and enquired of the scout
how, in the name of all the wonders, the game cocks had been brought so
far from home. Joe told them that the servants of some of the young gentry
had brought them by their master's orders, and as they found it impossible to
carry them farther, they were determined to have one fight out of them, before
they were abandoned to their fate. To tell you the truth continued the
scout, I thought the critters would 'a been made into cock broth afore now
along with that dog 'o mine, Squire Lee, and he indulged again in a sort of
inward chuckle, at the idea of eating the tough fowls, and dining from his
dog's carcass, to which he still persisted in saying, they were to come, before
they reached their journey's end. As the walked toward the hastily arranged
cock pit, he went on to tell them what the Governor had said, when he
(Jarvis) had made the prediction to him, that they would at last have to return
for want of forage and provisions. The Governor said, says he to me, do
you see those military boots, scout? Yes Sir, says I. Well, says he,
when I have supped upon them, and dined upon my saddle, then we may
talk about going back without crossing the mountains. That's the sort of
commander for me, there is no back out in his breed, depend upon it. They
do say among the messes of the old life guard that he's eat his boots afore
now, and June swears he had a bull frog cooked the other night, and that he
eat him up. Now I reckon that's the next thing to eating tanned leather.
By this time they arrived at the place already designated, by many torches
and a crowd gathered round a rope fastened to stakes driven in a circle of
considerable extent, on the borders of the encampment. A couple of cocks,
belonging to some of the soldiers, were already engaged by way of prelude,
while they waited the arrival of the young gentry. They fought without
gaffs;nevertheless it was a bloody encounter, and one of them was soon
gasping in the death struggle.
*
*
We trust that our countrymen of this day will not find fault with us for giving a true
picture
of the amusements of our ancesters. The cock fight was then almost a national game.
When the rest of the young gentry had arrived and the cocks were pitted,
how eagerly were the bets offered and taken!how excited became every
eye! The rope was bent almost to the ground, with the eager pressing
forward
of the excited men. The exclamations flew round ten to one on the
red and whitedone!an even bet on the brindle,hurra! that
was a home thrust! &c., &c.
Now it so happened, that the tents of the encampment were pitched just
under one of those spurs of the mountains, which they were daily
encountering
and which had more than once deceived them with the idea that they
had at last arrived at the foot of the real Apalachee. Whether this was the
real Blue Ridge, (for the Blue Ridge and the Alleganies were then all
confounded
together,) they had not yet ascertained, but an incident now occurred
which induced them to believe, that they had at last arrived at the base of the
true mountains. While so many were crowded round the cock pits absorbed
in the national amusement, an astounding crash was heard, like an avalanche
coming down the mountains. Some huge object seemed to be coming
directly
toward them, bending and crashing the trees, and tracking its course in
sparks of fire. Some thought a volcanic irruption had occurredwhile
others supposed it to be an avalanche; but in far less time, than we have
taken to record it, a huge fragment of reck, weighing several tons, and
carrying
before it a shower of lesser bodies of the same sort came leaping and
bounding toward the very spot where the cock pit was located. Fortunately
a large tree stood directly between the crowd and the track of the fragment,
or hundreds would have been instantly killed. As it was, several were badly
hurt by the bursting of the rock and the scattering of its fragments. Jarvis
shouted at once, that it was the Indians, and in a few moments his sagacity
was verified, for the whole side of the mountain seemed suddenly belted with
a ribbon of fire. Appalling as the salutation had been, the young cavaliers
stood lost in admiration at the grand and novel sight, which now saluted their
wondering eyes, until roused from their dangerous trance, by the loud and
commanding voice of Lee, who was already on horse-back, and calling his
comrades to arm, by the command of the Governor. When he had drawn
them sufficiently away from their dangerous propinquity to the base of the
mountains, and while they were speedily mounting, a thought occurred to
him, which was productive of the happiest results. He had ordered the
camp fires extinguished, but suddenly countermanded the order and directed
them to be furnished with fresh fuel, while he galloped off, to communicate
his scheme to the Governor.
He found the veteran already in the saddle, and eager for the contest,
which he supposed about to ensue. His first order was to remove the tents
and horses away from the base of the mountain, and out of reach of the new
sort of artillery with which they were threatened. This was executed with
alacrity and promptitudethe opposite side of the plain or valley
furnishing
an equally commodious site for the encapment and sure protection against
the enemy. The next was to extinguish the fires, as before ordered at first,
by Frank Lee, but here the latter interposed, and suggested to the Governor
to have them burning, and to avoid all signs of the kind at the new camp
ground. Scarcely were the tents and horses removed, before the wisdom of
this course was made manifestfor the thundering missiles were again heard
crashing down the mountain.
Frank also suggested, that a body of volunteers should be sent round the
spur or projection from the main body of the mountain, and thus out-flank the
enemy, while they were engaged in loosing and hurling down the huge
fragments
of rock. He expressed his belief that such a force, might ascend on
foot, before daylight, and either get above them, or hold them in check, while
the main body ascended more leisurely with the baggage.
The Governor listened with attention to his scheme and proposed that they
should ascend the eminence behind them on the other side of the valley and
reconnoitre, and suggested that then they could form a more accurate idea of
the position of the enemy and the feasibility of the plan. Accordingly he
took his aids-de-camp and those in whose sagacity he had confidence, and
ascended the eminence. By the time they had attained the desired elevation,
however, the whole scene on the opposite mountain had changed its
appearance
.
The wind, which had been sometime blowing a moderate breeze from
the north-west, suddenly chopped round to the north-east and blew almost a
gale, sweeping the belt or cordon of fire with which the savages had
surrounded
themselves on three sides, into magnificent eddies, and curling and
sweeping over the mountains with a rapidity inconceivable to those who have
never witnessed such a scene. For some moments, the Governor and his
party were lost in admiration at the grandeur of the spectacle, and the army,
the threatened battle, and every thing else, but the sight before them, were
forgotten for the moment. The towering objects around, threw fantastic and
collossal shadows over the sides of the mountain, and sometimes the entranced
officers imagined that they could see spires, and domes, and huge edifices,
encircled with the flames, when suddenly these fairy creations of the furious
element would vanish and leave nothing behind but a cluster of pine trees,
with the curling flames encircling their now livid trunks, and occasionally
pouring in one continuous sheet from their centres, presenting again an
almost exact resemblance to the stock of some huge furnace, burned white
hot with the ungovernable fury of its own fires. Sometimes too, they
imagined they saw a fearful array of grim warriors marshalled behind the
long line of fire, but as the fury of the latter would become exhausted for
lack of new combustibles in the course of the wind, or by the interposition of
a ledge of rock, the warriors would dwindle into the trunks of black jacks,
and mountain laurels and other products of the soil. The leaves were hung
with magnificent festoons of crimson and purple, constantly changing its
hues like the dying dolphin, as the fire burnt out over one track, and pursued
its resistless career to another.
Every one saw now, that they had indeed arrived at the veritable Blue
Ridge, for the fire that had commenced in the spur beneath which the army
had encamped, had by this time, swept around its base, and entered upon the
wider field of the main mountain, revealing what the Governor had been so
fearful of not being able to find, the gap of the mountains. This was a
depression
made by nature, as if on purpose to afford a passage for man. The
buffalo first make their path along the winding track of these, and the
Indians with true savage sagacity, are sure to follow in their foot-steps.
While one party on the hill were expressing their delight at this discovery,
the scout was heard, ascending just beneath them on foot, singing in loud
and joyous tones, the old song beginning:
Run boys, run boys, fire in the mountains, &c., &c.
When Jarvis had attained to the same level, the Governor suffered him to
run his eye over the scene, before he addressed him. The sagacious
woodsman
saw into the whole geography of the scene before him at a single survey,
and no sooner had he done so than he seized his old coon skin cap, and
tossed it into the air with boyish delight, exclaiming with the action, we've
caught 'em in there own trap! we've caught 'em in their own trap!
The Governor rode round to his side, and asked him if he thought it
possible
to convey the horses and baggage over the gap!
Sartin, sure, your honor, replied Joe without the least hesitation, haven't
they gone over before us, and is'nt there a buffalo path all the way over,
beginning at the hollow!(a ravine which separated the spur from the
main mountain,) and with his finger he traced out, along the sides of the
mountain, the probable course of the winding path. He was then told of
Lee's scheme of ascending with a picket company on the other side of the
spur, and getting behind the savages.
The very thing itself, said Joe, the very
idee
, I was going to propose to
you, and I'll tell you what it is, Governor, as fine a scout was spiled when
Squire Frank was made a gentlemen of, as ever wore a moccasin.
At this regret of Joe's, all the young cavaliers laughed.
It was evident enough to the veteran leader, that here the savages had
concentrated their whole force to make one last and desperate effort against
the encroachment of the whites. They were evidently determined to
dispute
the passage of the mountains.
CHAPTER XXV.
THE ENROLLMENT.
When
the Governor and his suite had descended once more into the valley,
then about ten o'clock at night, all the young gentry and the officers of
the Rangers were summoned to the Governor's presence. It was a solemn
eonclave in the open forest, without any other lights than those afforded
by the starry firmament above, and the fantastic reflections from the fires
in the mountains, which latter seemed sometimes to hang almost over them.
Every now and then, as they gravely deliberated upon the subjects before
mentioned, they were startled by the ponderous fragments of stone, leaping
and plunging against some old time-honored king of the forest, which would
stagger and quiver for a moment, and then plunge into the dark chaos
beneath, sending up a shower of sparks and fragments of burning branches
and living coals, until the whole scene beneath was as light as day for
an instant, and then covered with a pitchy darkness from the contrast.
The characteristic exclamations of Joe at these occasional interruptions,
as he sat smoking upon an old dead tree near by, would almost upset the
more youthful of the counsellors. Such as Oh the yaller rascalsold
Saatan
never had better journeymen nor them, and the intarpreter he's boss.
Oh, if Dr. Blair could only 'a seed this here night's work, he'd never
preach another sarmint to the varmintsno, nevernever. Then he would
break out into his old song again, Run boys, run boys, fire in the
mountains
,
&c., &c. Meanwhile the deliberations proceeded. The
Governor
laid the case before his youthful counsellors, pointing out to them,
with his sword, the probable route the Indians had takenwhere they
would be likely to make a standand the difficulties to be encountered.
He then unfolded to them Lee's scheme, and told them that he approved of it
highly, after having maturely examined its feasibility. At the same time he
did not disguise its difficulties, telling them that it would have to be undertaken
on foot, until they joined the main force. He placed Lee's claims to the
command
,
on the ground of his being the author of the plan. With most of them
this appeared reasonable enough, but there were others who were manifestly
reluctant to march under his orders, and others, perhaps, who preferred the
easier route along the beaten path. The old voteran assured them, that in his
opinion they would have fighting to then heart's content on either route. The
difficulty was soon settled, however, suffering the new scheme to be a
voluntary
thing with them. Such as chose to be of the expedition were invited to
step to one side, while those who preferred to remain under his immediate
command, filed to the other. Lee's party happening to place themselves near
the old log where Joe was entertaining Nat Dandridge with his songs and
stories, the scout immediately stood upon the log, intimating thereby that he,
too, intended to accompany the more desperate adventure.
The new expedition was to start within the hour; consequently, all of them
were soon in motion, filling their knapsacks with provisions, and replenishing
their stock of ammunition. Moore gave Lee one hearty grasp of the hand,
ere he entered the Governor's tent for his last instructions.
Farewell, Lee, said he, you, it seems, are going to make an attempt to
outflank the enemy, we will meet you, my fine fellow, more than half way.
By the time that Lee had received his commander's parting orders, the whole
of the adventurous band was drawn up immediately in front of the latter's
quarters
.
The old veteran stepped out, bare headed, and told them that he knew
perfectly
well that they required no incentive to daring deeds from him; that his
object
in having a few parting words was to charge them on the contrary to
caution and prudence in dealing with the wily enemy. Remember,
continued
he, that you are all young, and comparatively inexperienced, and that
young blood is proverbially hot. I feel deeply my responsibility to your parents
and friends, now more especially when I am about to trust you to your own
guidance for a short time. Do nothing to shake the confidence which I have
placed in you, or to bring our expedition into discredit. Twenty-four hours
will decide whether we are to become laughing stocks to the whole Colony,
or whether we are to earn glorious names, which shall live long after these
28B
mountains are traversed with the king's high way, I have only to add that I
have the highest confidence in the cool courage and judgment of your
commander
;
remember that there is no such thing as success in any military
enterprise
,
without discipline, and consequently without one recognized source of
command. I am the more particular in enforcing this, because each of you is
a gentleman born, and perhaps capable of taking the lead in his own person.
I have designated to your leader his successors in their order, should he
unfortunately fall, or be disabled. May the God of battles watch over you.
After this each of the young adventurers were permitted to stop in
rotation
and shake the old veteran by the hand. Following close in their
wake came Joe, who doffed his coon skin and even took his pipe out of
his mouth. The Governor, unreservedly held out his hand to him too,
which Jarvis seized eagerly, and wrung with the gripe of a vice, and
would have passed on then, but the Governor called out, Hark ye, Scout,
remember these lads are now greatly dependant for their success on the
manner in which you pilot them!
Aye, aye, your honor, I'll lead 'em right on the tip-top of yon yaller
camp, depend upon it; they shall have their bellies full of fightin' for once
in their lives, or you may call Joe Jarvis a liar at sight.
I shall draw no such drafts on you, Scout. I depend upon you fully.
Only picked men, of course, were taken by each of the young gentlemen who
had volunteered, because if each had taken his fifty men, the party would have
been entirely too unwieldybesides weakening too much the main body, upon
whom, in any event, much the heaviest part of the fighting would in all
probability
fall. They numbered something less than a hundred and fifty, all told.
The foremost of these were already, ascending, by a winding path, the spur
beneath which the main army were encamped, and in an opposite direction,
as it seemed, to that route in which the Governor contemplated marching at
daylight. Simply, one party purposed marching up the ravine on one side of
the mountain, and the other party were to encircle it until they should meet
the first, near the head of the
gap
. To one accustomed to the mountains, in
our day, this would seem no very difficult undertaking, but it must be
remembered
that this sort of travelling was wholly new to every one, except the
scout, and even he had never been tried upon such a gigantic scale. Any one
who has ascended a mountain for the first time, through a trackless forest,
may form some idea of the excessive toil and fatigue which our luxurious
youths endured that night. Often and often did Lee and his inseparable
companion
,
the scout, seat themselves upon some flat rock, or piece of table land,
and wait for their wearied and straggling companions. For more than half a
mile beneath, they could distinguish the sounds of the rolling stones, as they
were precipitated beneath the tread of their followers, and every now and then
the shrill whistle of some straggler, who had wandered from the main body.
This last device was one of Jarvis's suggesting, in order to exclude the
possibility
of alarming the savage camp on the other face of the mountain, or,
perchance
of arresting the attention of some straggling party of hunters, who
might be out on that side, for the purpose of supplying the camp. The latter
danger was the scout's whole dread, and therefore he pushed so far ahead of
the main body. His gun he kept constantly ready for use, not for game, for
every one had been charged not to fire upon any sort of animal short of a two
legged one, as Joe expressed it, and even the noise of this he deprecated, if
the flight of such an one could be arrested by any other means.
When they had ascended about half way up the mountain, (on the opposite
side from the encampment,
*
*
Often when we speak of the different sides, we mean only the several faces presented by
the huge angles of the spurs.
) about the first hour after midnight. the scout
(who was now some hundred or two yards ahead even of Lee,) suddenly
pounced upon a fire between two projecting rocks; and before the bright red
coals of which some fine venison steaks were even then broiling, suspended
upon sharpened sticks, after the Indian fashion. The fine buck, from whose
loins the meat had been taken, was also found neatly suspended on a stick in
the crotch of a small tree. The scout was very much alarmed at these
indubitable
signs of the near neighborhood of an Indian hunting party, not that he
feared anything such a party could do of themselvesbut he feared that the
whole plan of the attack would be blown by the hunter's running in and
sounding
the alarm, and thus bring down the whole force of the savages upon their
small party. Joe's dog immediately commenced running about and whining,
and snuffing the ground in the most unusual manner, until at length he struck
a trail and followed it to the foot of a large and thickly leaved black jack. There
he commenced barking furiously until the scout was compelled to choke him
off, and even then he would return to the charge. Jarvis took up his station
at this tree, and here also Lee followed him with many others, when they
arrived
at the same level. The young commander now despatched his fleetest
men up the sides of the mountain, to intercept any of the hunters who might
have escaped.
As for this varmint, said Joe, I guess he's treed as snug as any coon.
And yet no one could see him except the scout, and Lee even doubted
whether the scout and his dog had not both been mistaken. Joe rose up from
the stone on which he had seated himself, with his gun cocked and ready to
fire in case the savage should make a spring, and poking the end of it among
the leaves pulling them to one side, There Capting, don't you see his red
breeches now?
Yes, said Lee. I see what you mean, but they are no breeches, Joe.
Well, the old coon's there any how, and if his breeches aint long, his
leggins
makes up for 'em. We've got the longest end of ours fastened to our
waistbands, and he's got his'n fastened to his moccasins. I reckon if he could
get out of this tree, he would run leggins and breeches and all off, to let the
yaller niggers on tother side of the mountains know we're a commin.
The scout now addressed him in one of the abosiginal languages and ordered
him down, but he either would not or could not understand, more probably,
the latter. You don't understand that, hey? Well, here's talk I reckon's as
good Shawnese as 'tis English, and with that he unslung an axe from his
back and commenced cutting down the tree. He had not made a dozen
strokes, however, before the savage commenced sliding down like a bear.
Ho! ho! ho! ha! ha! ha! screeched Joe, there's no mistakin' that
ere kind of talk. Oh, Squire, if we had nothin' else to do, what fun we mont
a had a smokin' of this feller down. The scout, after he was down, again
attempted to make him understand, but he received nothing but guttural
answers
unintelligible to him. The parties which had been sent up the
mountain
now returned without any tidings of others of the hunting party, if such
there had been, and the scout was of opinion, after a careful examination of
the sticks of meat, the foot marks, or the trail, as Joe expressed it more
technically, that he was alone. He was, therefore, speedily bound, with his
hands behind him, and marched immediately in front. Too much time had
already been lost with this unexpected interruption. However the scout was
now in fine spirits, as he supposed they had encountered the only difficulty of
that sort which they were likely to meet. They were drawing towards
the summit of the first half of the gap. We say first half, for they discovered,
even before the dawn of day, that there was an intervening piece of table land,
between the spur and the mountain, and upon this the savages had encamped.
The fires could occasionally be seen by our company, as they wound round the
mountain. It was, therefore, necessary for Lee and his party to make a
detour
still farther round this table land, in order to be above the Indians, as
agreed upon with the old chief. This was accomplished with as much secrecy
and celerity as possible, Joe took the precaution, however of gagging his
prisoner, while they were circum venting the hostile encampment. A single
war-whoop, or the accidental discharge of a gun, would have been instant
destruction. The whole of the little band of adventurers now trod as lightly
as veteran scouts, for each one could see for himself the hazard. For more
than an hour they were winding round the hostile encampment, and every
moment dreading some momentary surprise. Jarvis even tied a withe round
his faithful dog's throat and held it in his hand, so that by a single twist he
could throttle him and stop his wind. He said he had two dogs in his charge
and both on 'em gagged, but that the four legged one was much the more to
be depended on of the two. Several times he raised the glittering blade of
his huge knife; and made a sign of drawing it across the Indian's wind pipe, and
pointing at the same time to his mouth, as much as to say that if he so
much as screeched through the gag, he would stop hiswar whoop forever.
It was a truly trying and perilous undertaking to conduct so many men
almost entirely round and above an Indian encampment, and within rifle
shot, sometimes, and not rouse those ever watchful sons of theforest. They
could see the smouldering fire beneath them, now that they were
ascending
the main mountain, and occasionally the parties engaged in
hurling
stones upon the white encampment beneath. It was fortunate for our
party that the Indians were so engaged, else they might not have passed so
easily. By the dawn of day the whole party was snugly stowed away behind
projecting rocks, trees, and undergrowth, so that not a glimpse of them could
be obtained by any eye in the savage encampment. Indeed the Indians seemed
wholly engrossed with the movements of the Governor's party below, which
Lee judged to be already in motion, from the great stir among their enemies.
The latter were, all hands, engaged with renewed energy hurling fragments
down the mountain. This, Lee and the scout, could distinctly see from their
well chosen retreat. The latter had placed a sentinel over the captive and the
dog, while his services were in requisition by his youthful commander.
As soon as Lee discovered the exact position of the enemy's encampment
he had despatched a trusty messenger to the Governor, informing him of
every important particular.
By the time this messenger reached the foot of the mountain, the
Governor's
party was already under way, threading their tedious and winding path,
far remote from the buffalo track across which the savages were hurling
their missiles; but the old veteran very soon perceived that it would be
entirely impracticable to convey his horses and sumpter mules by this route,
in time to co-operate with his
aid
. By the time, therefore, that Lee's
messenger
overtook him, he had already called a halt, and was detailing a small
party to return with the horses, mules and baggage, back to their late
encampment
.
He was delighted to hear of the admirable manner in which his
youthful adjunct had thus far conducted his secret and dangerous adventure,
and not less so to hear of the exact position of the enemy. This last
information
enabled him to lay down his own route definitely. He
determined
to abandon the path entirely, and to strike higher up the mountain,
still winding round it, so as to avoid the point, where the savages were
hurling
their new and formidable artillery. We shall leave them to plod their
way up the sides of the mountain, and in the next chapter relate the result of
the adventure.
CHAPTER XXVI.
THE BATTLE.
About
two hours after meridian, the Governor let fly the signal agreed
upon with his reserve, which was nothing less than a volley of musketry upon
the astounded enemy, who were still engaged in hurling stones and firing
the mountains along the supposed route of those who so unexpectedly
presented
themselves upon their flank, and rather above them. The Governor's
fire was answered by a sound, which made the hair of many a gallant youth
stand erectit was the war-whoop from fifteen hundred savage throats at
oncea thing once heard, never to be forgotten while memory lasts. The
Governor himself, veteran as he was, dropped his compase, and seized his
arms. The very trees of the forest seemed to have become moved by the
unearthly discord. The enemy, though completely taken by surprise and
disconcerted for the moment, were not long inactive. As if moved by one
common impulse, each warrior seized his arms and took to a tree or log, so
that, in a few moments, they seemed to have disappeared as if by magic, and
except for the stealthy fire, which they now commenced, the field might have
been supposed entirely abandoned. If any labored under this delusion, they
were ere long undeceived. Never had Gen. Spotswood been placed in such
a position before. He and his little army seemed stationed upon the
mountain
side, only as targets for his unseen enemy. He was just beginning to
wonder what had become of his adjunct, when the reserve came swooping
down behind the enemy like an avalancheLee and Jarvis seeming to vie
with each other in their eagerness to spring first to the deadly encounter.
At the same instant, the Governor's party advanced to the charge, so as to
assail the enemy at the very moment he was dislodged by the party in the
rear.
Such was the impetuosity of the charge, however, on both sides of the
field, that whites and Indians were very soon indiscriminately mingled in one
general melee, fighting hand to hand, in many instanceswhile in others,
one of each party fired from behind neighboring trees. Jarvis had early in
the engagement thus ensconced himself, and was loading and firing with
the greatest coolness and deliberation, picking off here and there the most
conspicuous of their leaders. He had been for some time thus engaged,
when, as if by a sudden impulse, he rushed from behind his hiding place,
and closed in deadly encounter with a warrior, his swarthy visage,
naturally
frightful, rendered still more hideous, by the ghastly effect of the paint
with which it was besmeared. The encounter between them was long
doubtful
,
but, as is generally the case in such struggles, the scout was triumphant.
He was not content with a mere nominal victory; for he tied his prisoner,
and immediately regained his arms and commenced firing from the very tree,
behind which his late antagonist had hid himself. The slaughter of the
savages was dreadful, for more than half of them were only armed with
bows, and arrows, and the tomahawk. Nor would they have maintained
their ground as long as they did, but for the precipitate manner in which the
two parties of whites rushed to the encounterthus giving their enemies
a chance to use their deadly knives and tomahawks. As soon as the
Governor
became certain that victory perched upon his standard, he issued orders
to his troops to deal in mercy with the enemy.
While the main body of both parties were thus engaged, in a hand to hand
conflict for the most part, on the very ground of the late Indian
encampment
,
other portions of the field presented different aspects of the battle.
Lee and a large part of his force had swept down the mountain side with
such impetuousity, that they were borne far past the table land, on which the
general battle ragedcarrying with them an equal number of the enemy.
These were engaged in a straggling sort of warfare far down the defile, so
that the whole side of the mountain presented one great battle-field
stretching
,
in some instances, for half a mile from the encampment. Long after that
portion of the enemy with which the Governor and his command were
engaged
,
was entirely vanquished or captured, straggling shots were heard down
the mountain, as if parties still pursued the retreating enemy. In vain the
Governor ordered his bugles to call in the scattered troops. Many of them
lay bleeding and helpless on their rocky beds. As Lee and his party returned
from the pursuit, most of his men were ordered by him to the assistance of the
woundedin many instances, four or five being required to carry one man up
the steep activity. When that young officer returned to the presence of
his commander, he fell prostrate, with exhaustion and loss of blood. The
Governor ordered his outer garments to be stripped off, and proceeded in
person
to examine his wounds. Luckily they were not found to be mortal. The
old veteran dressed them and bound them up with his own hands, and had him
carried to his tent. Here a new difficulty presented itself. No surgeon had
been provided for the expedition, and many of the troops were wounded with
poisoned arrows, and were suffering great pain. In this emergency, it was
remembered that a student of Dr. Evylin, who had made considerable
progress in his studies, belonged to the expedition. He was speedily
required
to doff his military gear, and resume his instruments. Never had
the poor fellow seen such a day of surgery; for the old chief required
the wounded Indians, as well as his own wounded, to be ministered to.
These behests of mercy all attended to, the Governor assembled the
young gentry and the officers of rangers around him, to witness the
interesting
ceremony of planting the British standard upon the highest peak
of the Blue Ridge, in the name of his sovereign. They still, however,
called it under the general term of Apalachee, under the mistaken
impression with which they set out, that there was but one chain of
mountains.
After a toilsome struggle from the table land before described, and
upon which the battle had been fought, they at length found themselves
on the real summit of the long sought eminence, and the Governor
planted the British standard upon the highest rock, with due form, and
in the name of his royal master.
It was a bleak and barren spot, made up wholly of huge fragments of
rock, piled up one upon the other, as if in some far remote age, they had
been cast there by a violent convulsion of nature. It was fortunate,
however
,
that it was thus barren of vegetation in one respectfor it gave
them an uninterrupted view of what has since been called the
Valley
of Virginia
! What a panorama there burst upon the enraptured vision
of the assembled young chivalry of Virginia! Never did the eye of
mortal
man rest upon a more magnificent scene! The vale beneath looked
like a great sea of vegetation in the moon-light, rising and falling in
undulating
and picturesque lines, as far as the eye could reach towards the
north-east and south-west; but their vision was interrupted on the opposite
side by the Alleghanies. For hours the old veteran chief stood on the
identical
spot which he first occupied, drinking in rapture from the vision which
he beheld. Few words were spoken by any-one, after the first exclamations
of surprise and enthusiasm were over. The scene was too overpowering
the grand solitudes, the sublime stillness, gave rise to profound emotions which
found no utterance. Nearly every one wandered off and seated himself
upon some towering crag, and then held communion with the silent spirit of
the place. There lay the valley of Virginia, that garden spot of the earth,
in its first freshness and purity, as it came from the hands of its Maker. Not
a white man had ever frod that virgin soil, from the beginning of the world.
What a solemn and sublime temple of nature was thereand who could
look upon it, as it spread far out to the east and west, until it was lost in the
dim and hazy horizon, and not feel deeply impressed with the majesty of its
Author.
Governor Spotswood carried his thoughts into the future, and imagined
the fine country which he beheld, peopled and glowing under the hands of
the husbandman, and all his bright anticipations were more than realized.
At length he turned to Moore, who sat near him not less entranced, and said,
They call me a visionary, but what imagination ever conjured up a vision
like that? Oh! 'tis a magnificent panorama; but tell me do you not see,
smoke curling up there among the trees like a blue thread?
The young officer rose instantly, and gazed into the leafy world below,
and after a long and searching inspection, confirmed the Governor's suspicion.
It is doubtless the camp of the Indian women and children, waiting for
their warriors, whom they suppose still engaged with us on the east side of
the mountain. It is a happy discoveryhaste Mr. Moore, and call our
young men together, and ascertain who is willing to bear a flag of truce to
them. Now is the time to rescue Miss Eiliot, before they hear the
disastrous
news respecting their own party from other lips.
It requires no prophet to tell who will go, even without summoning
them, replied Moore.
You mean Hall! true, truebut would it be prudent, think you, to
suffer
him to set out upon such an errand?
I do not know, Sir, but Lee says that he fought like a lion, and behaved
in every way in the most prudent as well as gallant manner.
Then bring him here, with the scout.
In the course of little more than an hour, young Hall stood before the
Governor, with the scout by his side.
Are you willing to carry a flag of truce to the enemy's camp or
village
,
as the case may be? enquired His Excellency.
I desire that privilege of all things, Sir, and am ready to set out.
The Governor then turned to Jarvis, but started back, and said, Why,
who the dl have you got there?
This is one of the yaller niggers, your honorI
fout
him myself, and
hearin' that you was a goin' to send this young gent with me to the Ingin
village, I thought it best to take him along, 'case he can tell his folks that
we've got lots more of 'em up here, and that your honor will hang one on
'em for every hair in Mr. Hall's head that they meddle withfor your
Excellency
knows that they've got quite a curious way of medlin' with people's
hair sometimes.
A good idea, Jarvis; but I did hear that you had captured the interpreter,
Chunoluskeeis it so?
Sartin sure, but I am, too old a coon to take him down yonder. He's the
best card we've got in our pack, and you know, Governor, it aint always the
best plan to lead off with your trumps, unless you've got a desperate bad
hand, which aint the case with us, by no manner o' means.
Without farther parley, the Governor instructed Hall to go with Jarvis, and
search out the spot from which the smoke rose, and if he found out the
encampment
or village, to offer ten of their best warriors among the prisoners for
the release of Miss Elliotindeed, to go to any extent in like offers, if
necessary
,
besides promising them valuable presents, which, said he, we
will ratify when we descend to the mountain. Should they, however, turn
a deaf ear to all your overtures, and break up the encampment and move off,
kindle fires on their trail, Jarvis, and we will station parties ready to cut off
their retreat in either direction.
The Governor then returned to his own encampment, and our
adventurers
commenced their perilous enterprise.
CHAPTER XXVII.
A RESCUE.
Hall
and the scout, with their captured warrior, proceeded down the
mountain, guided by the smoke from the Indian wigwams, Jarvis beguiling
the way, as usual, with his rude humor, and every now and then making the
woods ring with his merriment, but a more inattentive auditor he could
not have selected from the entire encampment. Hall's whole mind and soul
was absorbed with the intensely interesting business on handwith the
hope, the near prospect of soon beholding and releasing the youthful idol
of his heart. Before they had near descended into the valley, however, night
was approaching; still they pursued their way, invigorated by what Jarvis
drew from the captive warrior, viz: that they would find the pale-faced
squaw in the very encampment to which they were bound. Hall was no
longer oppressed with lethargy. He bounded over the rocks and
precipices
,
as if he would annihilate both time and space. After several hours
of such running and leaping, our adventurers found themselves at sun-set
in a beautiful valley, watered by one of those sparkling mountain streams,
which gathered its waters from the ravines of the mountain itselfhere
receiving a tributary, tumbling in beautiful cascades over its rocky bed,
and there taking up some quiet little brook, which bubbled along its course
in more modest guise. On the banks of the main stream, about half a
mile distant, they could plainly perceive the fires of the savages'
encampment
.
And here they called a halt, while the scout should reconnoitre
the enemy's position. He was gone about half an hour, which seemed to
Hall an age, so impatient was he to hear tidings of Eugenia. The scout
came back quite chop-fallen, and proposed their instant retreat up the
mountain
.
The very first piece of information which he communicated, (and Hall
would listen to nothing else until he heard that,) determined the young
officer
to proceed at all hazards to himself. It was, that the scout had seen
with his own eyes the object of their search. He stated, moreover, that
the stragglers who had escaped from the battle were pouring into the
encampment
,
and that the squaws and relations of the slain were already setting up
their hideous lamentations, which indeed they could hear from where they
stood.
Jarvis told him that it would be certain death, and perhaps torture, to
present
themselves under such circumstances, and while they were smarting
under defeat and the loss of their kindred. Hall pointed with a confident air
to the white handkerchief, which he was busily fastening to its staff.
They won't mind it, Squire, to the
vally
of this, said the scout, tossing
out of his mouth a huge chew of tobacco.
Well, said Hall, you may return, with or without the prisoner, scout,
but as for me I go forward with this flag of truce, if I were certain that they
would tear me to pieces the next moment with red hot pincers.
Jarvis seemed irresolute what to do. He did not like to suffer the young
man to go forward by himself, and yet he knew, if he accompanied him, he
would thereby render himself powerless as to all assistance, in case of Hall's
being detained. Besides, he considered the young man, though his superior
officer, as really under his guidance. He scratched his head for full a
quarter
of an hour, and thought maturely of all the perilous circumstances
surrounding
them. In fact, he considered the responsibility of the adventure upon
his own shoulders. At length he seemed to have formed his plans, and taking
Hall a little distance from his bound captive, still keeping his beagle eye on
him, however, whispered to the young man that he (Hall) had better take
the warrior, and go on to the camp alone; that in case they should detain
him, then he (Jarvis) could make the signal agreed upon with the Governor,
and be at hand moreover to attempt his release, in case they should practice any
of their bloody experiments upon him, before a party could come to the rescue.
This plan, although putting Hall forward into the post of immediate
danger
,
was by no means desired by the scout, in order to avoid any such thing
himself, but because he knew that it was impracticable to leave his
companion
to wait patiently while he should venture into the camp. He knew that
Hall was not in a proper state of mind for such a thing, and was besides
ignorant
of that stealthy and wary mode of watching, necessary to avoid the
Indians and accomplish any thing, in case of the worst. He adopted his plan,
therefore, with a single eye to Hall's ultimate safety, and without the slightest
consideration of self. When the time came for the trial, he walked along
with Hall, as if he intended to bear him company all the way, but soon left
him, carefully concealing his whereabouts from the wary and sly old warrior,
who kept his stealthy eye always upon their movements, as much as he could
without attracting attention.
After the scout had left the young man, the latter bethought him of a
difficulty
which had not before occurred to him, and that was how he was to
communicate
with the enemy. He was in a state of mind, however, not to be
deterred from his purpose by even greater difficulties than this, and he moved
steadily forward, keeping the captive immediately in frontthe stream on one
side, and the foot of the mountain but a few yards distant, on the other
until they arrived immediately opposite the encampment, and separated from
it only by the small creek, upon the surface of which were reflected the
Indian fires and wigwams. He could see the groups of savages as they sat,
and lounged, and stood around the various firesand the frantic gestures of
those who had lost husbands and sons in the late battle. It was but a few
moments that he took to examine the various attitudes of those with whom
he would so soon have to deal, or who might so soon have to deal with him.
He was nothing daunted by all those sinister portents which had alarmed
the more experienced scout, but loosing his prisoner, pointed across the
stream, an intimation that he was at liberty. He did not require a second
telling, but bounded across the narrow stream like a deer, and soon stood in
the midst of his friends. His arrival was received with many
demonstrations
of joy; but when he had exchanged a few words with them, and
pointing
and gesticulating all the while in the direction where Hall stood, and
where they had left Jarvis, such a hideous yell as they sent up might well
have appalled a stouter heart than Hall's. The savages immediately seized
their weapons, and some score of them dashed down the stream, where the
scout had been last seen.
Hall saw that now was the time to approach, if at all, and he walked
deliberately across the stream, bearing his flag of truce aloft. Never was
joy, exultation and malignity more manifest than it was in the countenances of
the demoniacs who now crowded around the bearer of that flag, not excepting
even the women and children. Not that they were ignorant of the meaning
attached to a flag of truce. Hall was bewilderedhis faculties already
weakenedhe was lost in the whirl and excitement of the moment, and he
stood like a statue in the midst of his enemies. His face was pale, but his
eye bright. He made a faint effort to speak at first, but seeing that he was
not understood, and that his late captive was still haranguing his people
gesticulating
all the while, and pointing to him and the flag, and the spot where
he had left the scout, he remained a passive prisoner in their hands. That he
might consider himself a prisoner, he did not doubt for a moment.
When his late prisoner had got through with his harangue or narrative or
whatever it might be, one of the oldest warriors took the flag from his hand
and then calling to a hideous old parchment faced hag placed it in her hands
amidst the peculiar merriment of Indian women and children. He then
proceeded to disarm the young man, and to strip him of his garments. While
these preparations were going forward others of more fearful portent were
also under way. Armsfull of finely split pine wood were in a pile
and some of the squaws and children were already building them into the
peculiar shape required for the immolation of a victim. Luckily Hall was
not familiar with the horrid details of their barbarities and he was, therefore
29
spared the dreadful anticipation. When they had stripped him to a state of
nudity, and during a calm and quiet moment, which had succeeded to the
late strong exhibitions of triumphthe wild and solemn scene was disturbed
by a scream which might have waked the dead. Scarcely had its echoes died
away among the solemn forest ere a youthful and beautiful creature, dressed
something after the Indian fashion came bounding like a deer through `the
bushes, dropping one of the rude earthen vessels of the Indians, as she ran,
and clasped the captive in her arms. There she clung like a vine which had
grown to a sturdy oak, but Hall could return no corresponding endearments,
for his hands were already tied behind him. Once or twice she turned her
head partially around and caught glimpses, first, of the grim warriors around,
and next of the fearful pile in the course of construction, and then she would
bury her head in his bosom as if she would seek protection there, exclaiming
in agonized sobs, Oh Harry, your efforts to save me have destroyed you
they are going to put you to the torture. Why, oh why, did you come alone?
Hall, in a whisper, informed her that he had borne a flag of truce from the
Governor and that the scout could not be far off, as he had accompanied him
within sight of the camp. While they thus exchanged a few hurried
explanations
,
a sudden thought seemed to strike the distressed maiden, and she
ran off toward the spring, to which she had been when Hall first made his
appearance. In a few moments she returned, dragging along with feeble
steps our old acquaintance, Wingina. When she had brought her face to
face with the chiefs, she, with the energy and eloquence of despair, bid
Wingina inform her cruel kinsmen of the sacred nature of a flag of truce,
and what signal vengeance the Governor would take upon them if they
violated
it. To all this the same old chief before pointed out, answered that
before the Governor was done his breakfast, they would be half way across
the valley, and hence their hasty preparations for the torture. Eugenia
clasped her hands and wrung them in frantic despair, alternately praying, and
wailing in the most distracted and heart-rending appeals. But it all fell
powerless upon the strong hearts of the grim savages who surrounded her.
While they were in the very act of dragging poor Hall to the spot
appointed
for his last agonies, a bright light burst upon the scene, followed by another,
and another, encircling the camp at the distance of a quarter of a mile, with
a complete helt; and so rapidly were they kindled that the Indians supposed
themselves surrounded, and stood upon their arms. Poor Eugenia fell upon
her knees and alternately calling upon her earthly friends for help and
returning thanks to her God for the prospect of deliverance. The horrors of
Germana were still rising up vividly before her mental vision with renewed
terrors.
The Indians knew not what to do. They were afraid to move in any
direction, for their enemies seemed to be all around them. Yet the
death-like
stillness of the forest was uninterrupted, except by the wailing of the
white maiden, and she was soon effectually silenced by the threatened attitude
of a warrior with uplifted tomahawk. There stood the savages, each warrior
behind a treestealthily peeping out every now and then, in the direction of
the fires, and the women and children flat upon the ground, behind logs, if
they could find them, but all as far as possible from their own fires, so that
they did not approach too near the light of those that surrounded them. After
remaining in this position for some twenty minutes, the savages began to
wonder why their enemies did not close in upon them as they at first
apprehended
they would. Then one warrior was seen to steal to the hiding place of
another, until they were soon broken into little groups again, still keeping
within the shadows of the trees, and without the light of the fires. Hall,
Eugenia
and Wingina, were in bright relief, surrounded with all these dark and
stealthy figures, and for somes minutes the two latter had been consulting
together, the result of which was made manifest in an attempt of Wingina to
put out the fire, and Eugenia to loose her lover. The latter movement, was,
alas, discovered instantly, by their enemies, and one of them occupying a tree
nearest to them came out from his hiding place, threw the blazing faggots
again into a heap, and approached with uplifted tomahawk to make short work
with the punishment of Hall and effectually prevent his escape. The
glittering
blade was suspended almost over his head, when a deadly messenger
arrested the murderous arm. It was shot from the mountain side. In that
direction there were no fires. Every Indian again darted to his hiding place
and the squaws and papooses who had risen to their knees to see the
savage sport fell prostrate again, and all was as quiet as the grave. Nothing
was heard, but the solemn moaning of the majestic forest, swayed by the
night breeze, as they bent their towering heads to the majesty of the
winds. 'Twas just before dawnthe moon having gone down and a night
to make a savage, even, superstitious, and the mysterious circumstances
surrounding them, added not a little to their terror; for whatever may have
been said or sung to the contrary the aborigines of this country are
superstitious
to the last degree. After waiting another half hour, again the attempt
was made to approach the group near the middle of the original encampment
and with the same unerring result, only that the shot came from a different
direction. Hall, Engenia and Wingina, now began to wonder, themselves,
why their friends did not close in upon their enemies, when the former
seemed to have the latter so completely in their power. The same solemn
and mysterious calm again reigned throughout the forest, and this time it
lasted until the suspense to our three sufferers became almost unsupportable.
The savages maintained their position, and the squaws even put their
papooses to sleep as they lay, but they were destined to a fearful wakening.
The measured tramp of troops, apparently at some little distance, was now
distinctly heard, and this again mystified the savages, as well as their
captives
.
Were they approaching or departing? It was not long left doubtful.
Nearer and nearer approached the glad and welcome harbingers to the
prisoners
.
The former only waited to ascertain from which direction the sounds
proceeded, when they simultaneously burst from their hiding places, dodging
from tree to tree, as they ran. More than one attempted to wreak his
vengeance
upon the captive, before they departed, but the same unerring aim
seemed to be pointed always ready to pick them off. When the whole body
of savages had approached near to the fires in the opposite direction from
that whence the tramp of troops had been heard, they were unexpectedly saluted
with a volley or carbines. Such as escaped the deadly weapons ran back in
the opposite direction, and there met the same welcome. Many of them
escaped, nevertheless, and for many hours, even after daylight the woods rang
with the report of fire arms, that sort of stealthy warfare pecullar to the
American savage, having been kept up.
No sooner was the original encampment cleared, however, than Jarvis
stood beside the bound captive, and with one stroke of his knife severed the
thongs which pinioned him in his painful position. In the very act of freeing
his late companion and fellow-adventurer, the same low guttural chuckle was
heard. You may think it strange, said he, that I
larf
at such a thing as
this, but by the long chase I cant help it, just to think that I, one, by myself
one, surrounded a whole camp of the yaller niggers. Let no body tell me
arter to night, that they ain't cowards, and fools to boot.
You dont mean to say, enquired Hall, in surprise, that you were alone?
I am dad shamed if I dont mean to say jist that same thing. For two
long hours I sot yonder on the hill and popped off the rascals as they started
up at you. I kindled the fires you know, 'case that was the signal agreed upon
with the Governor, and as we were to mark the route they took by the fires,
I thought like as not if I kindled one all round, even the old codger would
know what it meant, and sure enough he did too, know more than I thought
for, 'case he must a started the boys long before he seed these fires from the
top of the mountain. Lord, Mr. Hall, with a leetle, jist a leetle more
practice
,
he'd be the very devil among these
Ingins
. He suspicioned 'em, he
did. He
warnt
a going to trust you and that
dilicate
young thing there with
nothing but a flag o' truce over your heads. He knowed a devilish sight
better nor that. A flag o' truce to an
Ingin!!
Why, Mr. Hall, you mout
as well whistle jigs to a mile stone, or sing psalms to a dead horse. But
mercy on us, do jist see how that little sweet-heart of you'rn is a takin on
when the danger's all overshe'll cry her eyes out. What! larfin and cryin
at the same time? Well, I'm smoked up a holler tree if that aint woman all
over. I have seed a maneven a man, cry in my time, but I never seed a
man cry and larf too at the same time. It looks exactly like rain when the
sun's a shinin'. Come go to her Squire, I guess she's about the prettiest
squaw you ever seed with moccasins and leggins on, while I have a word or
too with this tother one, and she's a real squaw sure enough. No larfin and
cryin' there Squire. Saying which, the scout snubbed Wingina with his
thumb, by way of a friendly salutation.
We will leave him to advance his suit as best he might, and Hall to resume
his clothes, while we inform our readers of Eugenia Elliot's costume and
how she looked in it.
She was dressed partly in the Indian and partly in the European style.
She wore the leggins and moccasins of the former, while the remainder of
her dress was made up of such articles as she had preserved from Indian
cupidity. About her person was an old riding dressthe skirts cut short,
while her hair floated in natural ringlets, about her neck. Every ornament,
with which she was wont to confine it, had been either purloined or given by
her as peace offerings to her captors. As long as none but savage eyes rested
upon her, she felt neither shame nor embarrassment, but no sooner did she
find herself alone with her lover, even in that strange wild scene, than all her
conventional feelings returned.
It may be conceived how interesting was the conversation between the
lovershow much they had to tellyet she every now and then cast her eyes
over her strange appearance, and then covered her face with her hands.
On the horrors of the massacre at Germana, and her father's cruel murder,
and her own subsequent sufferings, Hall would not suffer her to dwell. He
barely listened to a short and abbreviated narrative, because he saw that it
was necessary for her to disburden her distracted thoughts. Then he led
her gently to more hopeful themesto the bright prospect which was still
left to them. He told her of Lee's free pardon, the news of which he had
the happiness to be the first to bring over. After two hours of conversation
upon such interesting matters, he succeeded in restoring her to something
like hope and composure. Her fitful moods of crying and laughingwhich
had excited Jarvis's special wonderwere now supplanted by a gentle and
winning melancholy. She walked about the encampment, her hand clasped
in her lover's, with the fondness of a child. She seemed to dread the separation
of a moment, and was even yet startled at the continued but distant report
of fire-arms.
At the suggestion of Hall, she took Wingina as a guide, and went about
among the tents to collect such pieces of her wardrobe as the squaws had
left in the hurry of their flight, and of which they had previously robbed her.
They found Jarvis seated on the ground beside the Indian girl, apparently not
having made much progress in his suit, for they were conversing in a sharp
and rather angry mood. The fact was, Wingina had been rather effectually
spoiled for Jarvis's purposein other words, her notions were too high for the
poor scout, and he could not exactly comprehend it. The home-thrusts which
he gave her towards the conclusion of their conversation, about her loss of
easte, and all that, it would not be exactly proper for us to repeat in his
homely and rude phraseology. Suffice it to say, that when they were
separated
by the approach of Hall and Eugenia, they were thoroughly angered
with each other.
Eugenia was compelled to forego the protection of her lover's hand for a
time, while she and Wingina rummaged the tents, and while Hall turned his
attention once more to his military duties.
He soon found, however, that one superior in command to himself had headed
the party to whose timely interference he owed his life, and the rescue of his
mistress. Bernard Moore met them as they were making the rounds of the
camp, and the three proceeded on together, to call in the scattered troops.
Jarvis's
tongue was in no measure silenced by the presence of the commander of the
scouting party. He had been too much exasperated and disappointed for that.
While Moore and Hall conversed together upon other matters, the scout would
break out into a soliloquy, after the following fashion:
The pampered heifer, to turn up her yaller nose at an honest man's son
like me. I reckon there's as good fish in the sea as ever was cotched. And
she to tell methe likes of herto tell me, that she was the daughter of a
King! I reckon she wants for to come for to go to marry Mr. Lee, or Mr.
Moore, or Mr. Hall, at the very least.
What's that, scout? said both, as they turned round, upon hearing their
names mentioned.
Oh, it's nothin' worth talking about gentsI was only arguin' the
matter
betwixt that
sassy
little yaller baggage and me. She curls up her royal
nose so high at me, that you would a thought I had just come in from a skunk
huntin'. I reckon an honest white man's as good as an Inginwhewfal,
lal de liddleand here he cut a few fandangoes to his own music, and
snapped his fingers; after which, he continued:I reckon I am as well
out of the scrape as she isif it war'nt for Bill, and Ikey, and them fellers
to Williamsburg, a larfin at me, I would'nt care a chew tabacco. What a
fool I was to go and balb the thing beforehand.
The troops were by this time dropping in from pursuit of the enemy, and
such as had been wounded or killed in the skirmish were borne into camp,
upon rude litters. Moore's attention was now required to his military
duties
,
and Hall, being relieved, he returned once more to the presence of her
whom he had followed to the wilderness. She clung to him like a frightened
bird, and all night long they sat by the camp-fire and conversed of the past,
and sometimes, too, of the brighter future. Truth to say, however, her young
life had suffered a blight in its first morning bloom, which was not to be
dispelled
in an hour, even by one who was now all in all to her. There was a
shade of melancholy cast over her most cheerful glimpses of the future, and
there was that constant looking forward to, and dread of, some new horror,
about to be enacted, so common to those who have suffered appalling disasters.
CHAPTER XXVIII.
ENTRANCE INTO THE VALLEY.
As the morning dawned, the main body of the Governor's force was
perceived
coming down the mountain. The shouts of the soldiers could be
heard from time to time. These were led by one of the younger officers.
The old chief himself was detained by two causesfirst, to bring up the
horses and mules left behind; and secondly, lay out a wide military road
from the gap down the western side of the mountain. Some days after this
a similar one was cut on its eastern side.
Every one was now in the highest spiritsthe main objects of the
expedition
were already attained. They had cut their way across the mountains
defeated the savages, who had sworn they should never penetrate beyond the
mountains, except over their dead bodiesand they had discovered that long
looked for El Dorado, so ardently desired by the Governor and his friends.
True, they nowhere discovered the sources of the Mississippi, but that was
now sufficiently explained, by the towering barriers which every where
presented
themselves along the western horizon, verifying exactly the
descriptions
which Chunoluskee had given to the Governor, as detailed in the early
part of our narrative. They had, however, discovered a beautiful and
extensive
country between the mountains, and they were satisfied for the present.
Towards evening the Governor, with the horses and wounded, joined the
main force, and pitched his encampment upon the very ground lately
occupied
by his enemies, and where Hall had so nearly lost his life. The first
person who presented himself at the Governor's quarters was the scout. He
had left a captive on the other side, about whom he was very solicitous.
Well, scout, said the Governor, so you have come to claim your
reward, I suppose, for capturing the traitor and murderer, Chunoluskee; but
why did you not bring him to me immediately after the battle?
To tell you the truth, Governor, I was afeer'ed you would exchange him,
as he would be a big bate among his people, but I hope you have made sure of
the yaller rascal.
Aye, certainly; but you had no design to propitiate his sister, by
retaining
this captive upon your own account?
What! me, your honor? none in the world! the deuce take his sister, I
say; she turns up her royal nose at your honor's scout, as if she would'nt
let me touch her with a ten foot pole.
So, then, you have met with a rebuff already! What reason did she give
for her refusal of such an advantageous offer?
None, Sir, noneexcept that it was the woodpecker seeking to mate
with the eagle!
The Governor laughed, and so did Joenothing discomfited, apparently, by
his recent rejection. He seemed already to have forgotten almost that such
a scheme had ever entered his head. In fact, he was at the time at which we
have arrived, upon a very different errandhe was waiting to receive his
reward for capturing the interpreter. And while we are upon the subject of
the traitor, we may as well despatch it at once. Some days after, he was
summoned before a court-martial, tried, found guilty, and condemned to death.
He was, however, never executedthe Governor was so much elated with the
success of his grand enterprise, that before his departure from the valley, he
set all the captives free, and fully pardoned the murderer of his own son. He
required but one condition to his clemency, and that was, that they and their
people were to abandon the valley at once and forever. He charged them that
if ever they were found; this side of the western ridge, that they
would be shot down like wild beasts. All this was done to the utter horror
of the scout and all his class. It is true, the former was somewhat
mollified, by seeing that the Governor no longer attempted to put in force
his christianizing and tributary systems.
He was heard to declare, that the licking which the Governor had
given them on the other side of the mountains, had done more to
humanize
'em, than all the book larnin' they had eyer got to Williamsburg, and
at schools among the nations.
On the second day of the encampment in the valley, the usual notice
was posted up, that the Governor would the next morning despatch a
courier for the capital. Many letters were written on the joyful
occasion
,
some of which we will give to our readers.
To the Rev. Dr. Blair
:
Valley of Virginia
,
1714.
My Dear, Sir
At length we have scaled the Blue Mountains, but
not without a sharp skirmish with the savages, and many of them, I am
sorry to say, were of those who so lately received our bounty, and were
besides objects of such deep solicitude to us. All our labors, my dear
Sir, towards civilizing and christianizing even the tributaries, have been
worse than thrown away. Mr. Boyle's splendid scheme of philanthropy is
a failure, and we, his humble agents, have no other consolation left, but
a consciousness of having done our duty, with a perseverance which
neither scorn nor scepticism could not turn aside. Let it not be
said hereafter, that no effort was made in Virginis to treat the Aborigines
with the same spirit of clemency and mildness which was so successful
in Pennsylvania. Far greater efforts have been made by us, than was
ever made in that favored colony. The difference in the result is no
doubt owing to the fact, that the subjects with whom we have had to
deal were irretrievably spoiled before they came under our chargenot
so with those of Pennsylvania. I mention these things to you, because you
know that it was my determination when I sat out, to cross the mountains,
peaceably if I could, and forcibly if I must. The latter has been the
alternative
forced upon me. From almost the very moment of setting out, our
steps have been dogged, and our flanks harrassed by these lawless men, and
more than one murder has been committed upon our sentries. But of
these things we can converse when we meet. I suppose you are anxious to
hear something of the country, which I have so long desired to see with my
own eyes. Well, Sir, the descriptions given to us at Temple Farm by the
interpreter were not at all exaggerated, and were, besides, wonderfully
accurate
in a geographical point of view. It is indeed true enough that there are
double ranges of mountains, and that the sources of the Mississippi do not
rise here. We are now in a valley between these ranges, with the western
mountains distinctly in view, and the eastern ones immediately in our rear.
This valley seems to extend for hundreds of miles to the northeast and
south-west
,
and may be some fifty or sixty broad. I learn from my prisoners that
it has been mostly kept sacred by the Indians as a choice hunting ground, and
has not been the permanent residence of any of them, but that they came
and squatted during the hunting season. All this the interpreter kept (very
wisely, as he thought, no doubt) to himself. We have not yet seen the
miraculous boiling and medicinal springs, nor the bridge across the
mountains
;
but parties of exploration are daily going out, and such extravagant
accounts as they give of the game, and the country, and the rivers, and the
magnificent prospects, beggar my pen to describe. I can see enough, my dear
Sir, from the heights in my near neighborhood, to know that it is one of the
most charming retreats in the world. I do not hesitate to predict that a
second Virginia will grow up here, which will rival the famed shores of the
Chesapeake; but the products will be different, and the people must be
different
;
for it is a colder region. We have already had nipping frosts, and some
ice upon the borders of the streams.
The Indian prisoners tell me that the springs before mentioned are
beyond
the second range of mountains, and that there also are to be found
the sources of the Mississippithe French settlements and many other
of the objects for which we set out. They must now be left for another
campaign. In the meantime, the frontiers of the Colony must be speedily
pushed hitherward. This country will suit admirably for our Scotch and
Irish emigrants, and inducements must be held out to them to venture into
the wilderness, while we see to making roads for them and affording them
protection. I am delighted with my adventure so far, and only one
subject
of disappointment remains. I cannot have a brush with our ancient
enemies. These captives tell me that the French and the six nations
have uninterrupted intercourse from the lakes to the Mississippi. This
great tramontane highway must be broken up at all hazards, else all that
magnificent western country slips from our grasp, and besides we will be
constantly subject to be harrassed by these disagreeable neighbors. In short,
my dear Sir, the boundaries of Virginia must be pushed to the banks of
the Mississippi. I know you will say that my towering military ambition
is running away with me, but I feel very sure that I can submit such
representations to the council, as will induce them to unite with me in
an earnest appeal to the ministry at home for aid in the magnificent
conquest
.
You will readily perceive from what I have already said, that I
consider our enterprise but half accomplished, and that another far more
extensive will be prepared as soon as we can hear from the other side of
the water.
*
*
We have every reason to suppose that this was the very subject upon which the
Governor
subsequently quarrelled with the ministry. They attempted to retrace their steps at an
immense loss of blood and treasure afterwards, at the celebrated defeat of Braddock.
My young men have behaved most gallantly. Young Lee
will make a fine soldier, his daring bravery is among the least of his
qualifications. He has rendered me most important services, so indeed
have Moore, and Carter, and Hall, and even my protege Dandridge. I
send you a list of others of the young gentry who distinguished
themselves
.
I wish you to have a Golden Horse-Shoe made for each of them
to wear upon the breast, as a distinction for meritorious services: with the
motto on one side,
Sic juval transcendere montes
, and on the other,
The
Tramontane Order
. Have them ready if possible by our return, which you
may now expect in a few weeks. I shall despatch letters for my own family
I have only therefore, farther to say, that I remain your friend,
A.
Spotswood
.
Valley Camp
,
1714.
Dear Ellen
:
I am once more writing from a couch of some pain and suffering, but thank
God not like the last from which I addressed you that dismal letter, which I
then supposed would be my last. I have no such apprehensions now. My
wounds are in a fair way, and I am even permitted to walk about this large
tent(the Governor's marquee) and above all, I am permitted to write to you.
Our camp is now pitched near to a rising knoll at the western base of the
mountains, commanding a magnificent view of one of the most charming
valleys
that ever blessed the vision of enthusiasts. And I am told by the parties
which nightly come in from exploring expeditions, that I have not seen half
of its beauties. You never heard such enthusiastic accounts of a country,
and the Governor is not a whit behind the youngest of them in admiration of
its charms. But I must postpone my raptures about the country until I tell
you something of your friend's young kinswoman, who has been so long in
captivity. I am sure that this time you will not be jealous, if I tell you a great
deal about that charming creature. First, then, we have recovered her, but
nearly at the expense of Hall's life. Nothing prevented such a catastrophe
but the foresight of our experienced chief, and the admirable presence of mind
of our chief scout, Joe Jarvisbut of these things we can converse more fully
when we meet face to faceI trust to part no more.
When Eugenia first made her appearance in camp, she was less strange in
her appearance than was her state of mind. She was dressed something as
you have seen Wingina, half in the European and half in the Indian costume,
and to tell the truth, she looked exceedingly pretty: but, alas! there was a
wild vacancy about her eyes and countenance generally, which alarmed me.
It was more perceptible to me, because I had known her in her better days
and under more favorable circumstances. This, as I expected and feared,
terminated
in sickness, and she has been lying ever since in an ample tent,
almost touching ours. She has been constantly attended by Hall, and by a
young man who was formerly a pupil of your excellent father. Since I have
been permitted to move about, I have visited her almost every hour. Her case
would have furnished a curious study for some one more philosophically
disposed
,
than any one we can boast of in our ranks. Her disease seemed like
Ophelia's, a rooted sorrow from which no mere mortal physician could pluck
the sting. Even her mental faculties seemed in a sort of eclipsenot that
she wandered, as it is called, or was at all frantic, but she appeared imbecile
and childish. This was succeeded by such a load of oppression, that I, who
knew her, feared her heart would break; but good old mother nature always
came to her relief in the shape of a plentiful shower of hysterical tears,
mingled
sometimes with frightful laughter. The latter ugly concomitant has
been gradually subsiding, and true and genuine tears have taken their place.
At first they forbid her to talk upon the melancholy particulars of the sad affair
at Germana, but I saw that this was all wrong, and I at length persuaded the
Governor to let me try the opposite plan; I am happy to say it has succeeded
beyond my most sanguine expectations. She now loves to talk over her
melancholy story, and I left her but a few moments ago, talking and crying
with poor Hall. Her sensibility is evidently returning, and with it her mental
strength. By the time she reaches Williamsburg, you will see that she is
worthy of all the commendations I have bestowed upon her. I have not and
will not say that she has attained to that excellence which my Ellen has
aimed at, but she possesses all the native materials to work upon, and will
doubtless attain, as she grows in experience and knowledge of the world, to a
point worthy of moving in your delightful circle. You must recollect that she
early lost her mother. True, you were equally unfortunate, but then her place
was supplied to you by such a father as seldom blesses the orphan female in
this world. You must recollect, too, that the lamented uncle who adopted her
was a purely military character, and how poorly calculated were his daily
associates to refine and model the forming character of our young friend. It
was the brightness with which she shone under such disadvantageous
circumstances
,
which first attracted my attention. I thought then what a
charming
creature she would be if she could only possess the advantages which
you possessed. Dreadful has been her experiencethe hand of affliction has
been laid heavily upon her, and I regret of all things, that she cannot be at
this very moment under your care as well as that of your father.
You would like to hear something doubtless of your former protege Wingina.
I have been loth to say any thing about her, because I could not say any thing
that would be pleasing to you. She, I fear, brought nothing away from
civilized
life, but its evils. Jarvis, the scout, seems to have a rude sort of a
passion
for her, but she treats him with scorn and detestation; and to tell you
the truth, I am rejoiced at it, on account of both. He is almost as much a
savage as one of her race, but there is this differencethe scout has a
substratum
(if I may be allowed the expression) in his character, which
promises
better things than any which he now exhibits, while the Indian, I fear,
is just the reverse.
I have learned to feel something like an attachment for the scout. The
native soil is a good one, and with judicious attention and skilful guidance,
he might be made a useful man in his sphere. I have proposed to him to go
home with me, when we return, and live upon my land, but he declares that
he means to live in this valley. Time will show whether he is to be moved
from his purpose.
The Governor's benevolent views towards the Indians have received a
terrible
shock with his Tramontane experience, and I suspect that we shall
hear little of Mr. Boyle's plans in future, and less of his own tributary schools.
30
Why, what a love letter is this, that Frank has written to me, you will say.
Think of it again, my dear Ellen, and you will consider it a compliment to
your understanding, as well as to your heart. Certainly I feel proud that I
can already discourse of such reasonable matters to my promised wife.
I will fulfil all your promises to your dear and venerable father, with
interest
,
my Ellen. Is he not mine also?has he not been more than a father to
me, and how much more than father will he be, when he entrusts to my
keeping
such a daughter? We will consult his prejudices, and should he have
even whims in old age, his second childhood shall be as sacred to me, as my
first was to him. God evidently looks with peculiar benignity upon those
children who lead the steps of the aged (even in senility) with tender care
and affection. Trust me, my Ellen, that the very peg upon which his cocked
hat hangs, shall be as sacred in my eyes, as it is in those of his dutiful and
affectionate daughter. Every pledge of filial affection which you make to
your venerable parent, I cherish as guarantees of the excellencies of my future
wife. That the worthy object of them may long live to bless our lives, is the
sincere prayer of your own
Frank
.
CHAPTER XXIX.
LIFE IN THE WILDERNESS.
Two
delightful weeks were spent in the valley of Virginia by the
Governor
and his followers, during which time the magnificent forests of that
region
underwent a daily transmutation. At first, the leaves began to wither,
and then fade to a sickly greenbefore they assumed their gorgeous
autumnal
dress. The tenderest and earliest of their kind had already fallen and
strewed the ground with a carpet little less rich than the canopy over head.
The migratory birds were already on their passage southward, sometimes
making
their
encampments in the near and dangerous neighborhood of their
human contemporaries. The tops of the highest mountains were already
covered with snow, and though the days were of a delightful temperature, the
nights were bitter cold to our thinly clad adventurers. All these signs and
changes admonished the Governor that it was time to turn his face homeward.
He was reluctant to leave the country which he had discovered and
conquered
.
*
*
This is the region which ought to have been called Spotsylvania.
Gladly would he have pitched his tent there for life, but his responsible
position at the head of his Majesty's Colony, required that he should be
elsewhere
,
and orders were accordingly issued for striking the tents and
recrossing
the mountains. Nearly all his followers obeyed the summons with
alacrity
.
The wounded and the sick (many suffering with cold) were sufficiently
recovered to travel on horseback. Lee, looked pale and wan, but his eye was
bright, his countenance cheerful, and his spirits elastic as ever. A sort of
side-saddle had benn constructed out of one of the dragoon saddles for Eugenia,
and she professed herself fully able to undertake the journey. The
Governor
had her carried across the mountain in a litter, over his new military road,
which, by the by, was nothing but an enlargement and widening of the Indian
and buffalo paths. Even in its improved state, it would have made McAdam
laugh. Wingina professed herself desirous of returning to her civilized
friends. Whether this determination, so different from the instincts of the
native savagewas produced by fear of her now liberated brother, or by
delicate
considerations of another nature, it is not for us to determine. She was
also mounted on horse-back, and formed one of the Governor's own
immediate
party. Though there was this general willingness and alacrity to
commence
the return march, there was one exception to it. The Governor had
his foot in the stirrup, when the Scout approached with his coon skin in
hand, and unusually polite.
Well Jarvis, said the Governor, casting his eye to the Indian girl at the
same time, what's your will now? Do you wish to form one of our escort?
The Scout saw the direction of the Governor's eye and readily understood
his meaning, and he replied accordingly, Not I, your Excellency, a
woodpecker
would make but a sorry show a flying along side of an eagle; and
he chuckled as he looked up at the scornful Indian beauty, seated upon her
high horse in more senses of the word than one.
What, then, is it, Jarvis?you have but to ask any thing reasonable, at
our hands, to have it granted forthwith.
I'm mighty glad to hear your Honor say so, 'case I am come to ask a
whoppin'
big thingIt's a plantation!
A plantation, Jarvis? why, are you going to retire to the shades of private
life?
Jist exactly the very words Governor, only they wer'nt no where in
my dictionary. You've struck the very trail. I want to retire to the shades
of private life, and I guess you'll call this private life, and them shades enough
down here in this valley.
The Governor, laughed at the conceits of the woodsman ere he replied:
Certainly, Jarvis, you have fully earned your plantation, and I think I may
guarantee that a grant
*
*
Whether the present Joe Jarvis, who still inhabits the mountain side, and with whom we
have had many a merry drive, is a lineal descendant of Old Joe, we leave to those curious in
such matters to ascertain.
will be made out for you in due time, but you have
no idea of remaining here at present.
Yes, but I have though, got that very idea in my head, and if your
Excellency
will just let me collect about fifty recruits from these hunting shirt boys,
we'll fall to work out of hand, and by the time you come back, you will see
log cabins a plenty sprinkled about these woods.
The Governor meditated upon this strange proposition a few moments, and
then replied; Not now, Jarvisnot nowI want you to return with us to the
Capital. It will be time enough next spring. Then your fifty shall be increased
to a thousand.'
We believe that it was more than ten years afterwards before any effectual settlements
were made in the valley. Our own ancestors were among the pioneers.
Jarvis knew that it was useless to talk farther on the subject, when the
Governor had once made up his mind. He was, nevertheless, disappointed
for the moment. No one would have found it out, however, two hours after,
when his merry voice was heard on the mountain side. His unsuccessful
love-making soon became bruited about among his boon companions, and it
may readily be imagined with what avidity they showered their jeers and jibes
upon one so ready to crack his jokes upon others. He bore it all patiently
for a while, but his naturally pugnacious temperament, broke forth at last,
and as he said, when they gave him mustard he sent them back pepper.
Poor Wingina came in for not a few of his sallies. Not that he durst offer
her any indignity in the Governor's presence, but as she would appear
occasionally
,
in windings of the mountain defile, he would let fly a few shafts at the
eagle in her lofty flights.
It is not our intention to follow the party step by step on its return, over
the same ground which we have once already conducted it. Suffice it then
to say, that in due time the Governor and his followers encamped within a
day's march of the Capital, and the same night a courier was despatched to
the senior councillor, Dr. Blair, informing him that he had arrived safe so far
on his return.
Great was the rejoicing next day at Williamsburgand the expected
arrival
of the Governor of the Colony was announced early in the morning by
the discharge of cannon, bon-fires, and ringing of bells. Large parties of
ladies and gentlemen were all day leaving the city to escort the mountain
adventurers home; so that toward evening when they came once more in
sight of the Capital, their numbers were greatly increased.
As Lee rode along side of Ellen Evylin, the old Doctor being on the other,
the Scout came cantering up on his poney, and hailed the former loudly. So
absorbed, however, was that young gentleman with the interesting conversation,
that Jarvis had almost to shout in his car before he could command his
attention
.
What is it Jarvis? said he almost petulantly.
I didn't know, Squire, that you were so much engaged, but as I was a
ridin' along the ranks jist now I couldn't help a wonderin' what had become
of all the gold lace and ruffles that travelled over this road a few weeks ago.
This remark of the Scout induced Lee to cast his eye over his own
outward man, and to remove his now slouched (instead of cocked) hat from
his head. The result was a hearty laugh from the whole party, including
the Scout of course.
Seldom had such a way-worn, dusty and ragged army made their
appearance
in any city, since the days of Jack Falstaff. It was hard to imagine
the contrast which they presented to their former selves on the day of their
departure, at which time they literally glittered with finery. But if their
outward man was shabby and raggedtheir inward man was in a
corresponing
ratio, bright and joyous.
Ellen at first looked with apprehension at the pale and emaciated features
of her lover, but when she heard once more that joyous laugh which had
made her father's house merry in the days of their infancy, she was satisfied.
Her heart was full, she did little as she rode by Frank's side but to listen to
the narration of their tramontane adventures.
Eugenia Elliot was seized upon and monopolized by Kate and Dorothea,
her cousins, much to the discomfiture of poor Moore. He might well have
been called the Knight of the rueful countenance. He ought, however, to
have been satisfied, for Kate was doing nothing but her duty, and besides, if
lovers were not the most unreasonable creatures in the world, he would have
been fully compensated by the glances of pride and affection which the now
subdued beauty cast upon him. If he had had more reason and less passion
about him, he would have seen a visible improvement in Kate at a single
glance. The very shake of her hand was more hearty, frank and
confidential
than, it had ever been before, and even her countenance had
undergone
a change. There was before almost a boldness in her free and easy
carriage, but now this was softened down into the most winning grace
a little arch, sometimes, perhaps, as she could not resist the really absurd
and ludicruous deportment of Moore.
There was one keen and close observer of all these things, not far off, and
he was abundantly gratified. It was Carter. He was not enough behind
the curtain to understand all this by-play, but he saw enough to know that his
rival was discomfited and morfied. The Governor rode into the city in the
highest spirits imaginable. The sun was just sinking behind the western
horizon as the troops defiled own Gloucester street, and arrived in front of
the Church. There stood the same platform which had been erected a few
weeks ago, and upon it the good old Doctor in his canonicals, and his
prayer-book
in his hand. The Governor took the hint, and the troops were formed
as before, and the adventurous band kneeled down to return thanks to Al
mighty God for their safe return. Thus did our chivalrous ancestors; let
their children go and do likewise.
CHAPTER XXX.
THE KNIGHTS OF THE HORSE-SHOE.
We
do not know why it is (and always has been) that winter is described
in gloomy colors. It may be that the hoar frosts, and the glittering icicles,
and the snow clad fields and the leafless trees and plants, convey such
impressions
to a majority of mankind, but it is not so with all. There is
something
bracing and invigorating in a snow storm to some, (we speak not of the
bleak and extreme north,) one of those old fashioned steady falls of large flat
flakes, which sometimes herald in the Christmas Holidays. Such a day was
the twenty-fifth of December, seventeen hundred and fourteen. There was
little wind, the cold was not intense, and the merry lads let loose from school,
and the negroes freed from labor were making merry with the snow balls in
the ancient city. But beside the usual gaiety and freedom from care of the
festive season, there were indications abroad that this day had been set apart
for some extraordinary ceremony other than those incident to the season.
Martial music was heard in various directions, and soldiers almost blinded
by the snowthe same troops who but a few weeks ago presented such a
tatterdemalion
appearancewere threading their way towards the capital. The
bells, too, were pouring a merry peal over the town, and carriages and horses
lined the way from the church in Gloucester street to the aforementioned
edifice
.
Many of the ladies, occupying the vehicles, had just come from
attending
the usual church service on that day, but now the altars and the church
hung with mistletoe, were deserted even by the Rev. Prelate
*
*
He was truly a Bishop in every thing but the name.
who statedly
officiated there. He was still robed in his canonicals, and occupied a seat in
one of the carriages. When the Hall of the House of Burgesses was thrown
open, the Governor was presented to the people, occupying the elevated seat
usually filled by the speaker. On his right hand sat the chaplain to the
General
Assembly, the Rev. Hugh Jones, in his sacred robes, and round them in a
semi-circle sat the members of the Tramontane order. After the usual
solemn opening of the meeting by the chaplain, the Governor stepped down
the small flight of steps which led to a platform still elevated above the people.
He was dressed in full court costume, wigcrimson velvet coatruffles at
the throat and wrist. Before him was placed a table on which were spread
out various ornaments of jewelry, many of them studded with gems and
precious
stones, but all of them wrought into the shape of horse shoes. He
took one of them in his hand and read the inscription on one side, The
Tramontane
Order, and turning it over, read also the motto on the other,
Sic
juvat transcendere montes
. Here a great clapping of hands and waving
of ladies' handkerchiefs in the gallery arrested its progress for a moment,
during
which time a happy and benignant smile played over the noble old man's
features. He was evidently well pleased, but struggling with his emotions,
for his eye glistened unwentedly. Whether he was thinking at the moment
of other important ceremonies which were soon to be performed and in which
those near and dear to him were deeply interestedor whether he was
thinking
of the separation which was about to take place between him and his
young associates in arms, and some of them perhaps, forever, we know not.
His address was brief, and something like the following: Friends and mem
bers of the order. I hold in my hand a simple and unostentatious ornament,
designed for the purpose of perpetuating the remembrance of one of the most
glorious achievements of our lives. I am sure it is of mine (which has been
longer and more eventful than that of any of my late associates in arms) and
I would fain hope it is so considered by them. [Appleuse.] I knew that you
would dearly cherish the remembrance of our mountain expedition, and it is
my wish that you may continue to do so through whatever may be your
future
adventures. From a military experience now somewhat extended, I am
proud to say, that I never yet was in command of a nobler little army. Your
conduct, gentlemen, one and all, during the trying scenes through which we
have passed, met with my most hearty approbation. Such a commencement
of your martial career is a sure guarantee, that should our Sovereign again
require the aid of your arms, no second call will be necessary to bring you
forth again from your peaceful and happy homes. Some of you I learn are
about to embark for the shores of our father-land in pursuit of a wider and
more extended field of observationand in furtherance of a laudable
ambition
to improve your understanding by examining the institutions of the old
world. These insignia which I am about to present to you, will be new to
the chivalry of that time-honored country, but I trust not unrecognized. I
am sure when you bear these to the presence of Majesty itself, and when you
inform our gracious Sovereign what a new and glorious empire you have
added to his dominions, he will recognize you as a part of the chivalry of the
empireof that glorious band of Knights and gentlemen who surround his
throne like a bulwark. [Applause.]
I have only now to say farther, that I have been authorized by his Majesty's
council to invest each of the following named young gentlemen with one of
these badges.
Francis Lee, Ralph Wormley, Mann Page, John Randolph, Dudley Diggs,
John Peyton, Thomas Bray, Theodoric Bland, Wm. Beverley, Benjamin
Harrison
,
Oliver Yelverton, Peyton Skipwith, Peter Berkly, William Byrd,
Charles Ludweli, John Fitzhugh, Thomas Fairfax, Bernard Moore, Nathaniel
Dandridge, Kit Carter, Francis Brooke, John Washington, Hugh Taylor,
Alexander Nott, Charles Mercer, Edward Saunders, William Moseley,
Edmund
Pendleton, George Hay, George Wythe, John Munroe.
May you wear them gentlemen through long and happy lives, and when
you descend honored and lamented to your graves, may they descend as
heirlooms
to your children. When the wilderness which you have discovered
and conquered shall blossom as the rose,as most assuredly it willthese
badges may be sought after by the antiquarians of a future age, as honored
mementos of the first pioniers of their happy and favored country. Let them
be religiously preserved then, I charge you. The simple words which form
the inscription, may some day reveal the history of a portion of our country
and its honored founders, when the revolutions of empires and the passing
away of generations, may have submerged every other record.
Your own names, gentlemen, honored and distinguished as they now are,
by illustrious ancestry, may by the mutations and instability of human
greatness
,
be yet rescued from oblivion by these simple memorials.
The members of the order then kneeled down and were invested in due
form with the insignia of the Knights of the Horse Shoe.'
*
*
Whether they received the acolade after the established custom of investing a Knight, and
whether the Governor of a colony was authorized to confer such a distinction, are questions
with which we have not ventured to meddle. We have only stated what we know to be true,
of which some evidence will be offered to the reader.
After which the assembly dispersed, the Knights to dine with the master
and founder of their order, and the people to join in the festivities of the season.
CONCLUSION.
During
the same Christmas holidays, when the cheerful fires burned bright,
and the serene and happy faces around them beamed brighter still, and when
the snow storm had blown over and the sun poured his cheerful rays over the
bright winter sceneon such a day, a plain but elegant carriage and four
stood before the modest and vine-clad dwelling of Dr. Evylin; and sundry
other vehicles of different kinds, were packed with travelling trunksand
servants, male and female, were marshalled in the rear. The one first
described
was, as yet empty, and various groups of idlers stood round the gate
to catch a glimpse of those whom madam rumor assigned as its intended
occupants
.
As the hour hand pointed to a certain figure on the dial plate, and the last
tones of the bell died away, the Old Doctor and his daughter rose
simultaneously
and were locked in each other's embrace. Lee stood by, and any one, (if
not by his dress, at least by his bright face,) might have told that he was
the
happy man. Ellen shed tears, as she saw the gittering drops falling fast
from her father's eyes, and as she felt his trembling frame locked in the last
embrace. Lee brought the old gentleman's cocked hat, and handed him his
gloves, and assisted him in wrapping up his feeble frame in a fur-lined cloak,
after which all three entered the carriage and drove to the church.
When they arrived at the door two more bridal parties already awaited
their arrival. We need scarcely say that they consisted of Moore and Kate,
and Hall and Eugenia. There was a serene melancholy upon the faces of
most of those presentespecially on those of the brides. Even Kate looked
subdued and rather apprehensive, not that she doubted the man at all, to whom
she was about to plight her faith, but the ceremony was so solemnthe
change so importantthe new relations about to be assumed for weal, or wo,
so enduring. These were far more oppressive to her at the altar, than to
Ellen, because the latter had longer and more maturely deliberated upon
them. Eugenia was the most melancholy of the three, but it was pleasing,
and had more relation to things past, than to those future. As Ellen walked
up the aisle, hand in hand with her lover, and her father immediately in the
rear, she really looked charming in her simple white dress, and her slightly
flushed cheeks. Some one in the gallery uttered a sort of exclamation of
applause. Lee looked over his shoulder and discovered Jarvis screwed up into
one corner near the organ, and making a feint with his coon-skin cap, as much
as to say that he would wave it over his head and shout if he dared. Lee
placed his finger on his lip to enjoin silence, which the scout answered by
placing his hand over his mouth. Few observed these things but the actors.
Kate's toilet had been more elaborately and expensively made than Ellen's,
but it was still elegantly simple. A single necklace was the only costly
ornament
of jewelry which she wore, and it her mother had worn before her on a
similar occasion. The Rev. Dr. Blair was already at the altar with his book
open before him; all the parties, except Eugenia and Hall, were more to him
like his own children than ordinary parishioners, and the good old man's eye
betrayed his deep sympathy with the parties, and his solemn appreciation of
the importance of the change which was about to pass over so many of his
former pupils. The Governor gave away his own daughter as well as his
young kinswoman, and the old Doctor gave away Ellen.
The bridal ceremony concluded, the whole party drove to the palace where
a cold collation was served up for them preparatory to their departure to their
several places of destination. Lee and Hall with their brides, were to spend
the Chrismas holidays at the country establishment of the former, and old
Doctor Evylin had been persuaded to acompany them for the visit only.
Kate and Moore determined to spend their honey-moon at Temple Farm,
partly because their happiest days of courtship had been spent there, and
partly because it would give such unmeasured delight to their humble
dependants
,
old June among the number. The old fellow was nowsince his
mountain adventuresquite a hero in the kitchen chimney corner, and Kate
had presented him with a new banjo, which, together with his new materials of
song, had quite set him up in business.
Time and death have both set their seals upon these marriages, and
contrary
to what is usual at the announcement of such events, we can look forward
at once to their results. We know that they were eminently happy, that the
parties lived long in as much felicity as is ever vonchsafed to mortals on this
earth. With the descendants of Gen. Bernard Moore and Catherine Ann
Spotswood, we have long been intimate, and we can pronounce from a
knowledge
so attained, that many of their fine qualities still adonrn, the lives and
characters of those who fill their places.
Ellen and Frank lived with the old Doctor, and fulfilled together to the
utmost those filial duties which the former had made so much the business
and pleasure of her days of single blessedness. The old man lived, to fondle
on his knee several of the descendants of his happy children, and was at last,
full of honors and full of years, buried beneath the stones of that Church,
which he had helped to build, and in which he had so long been a devout and
faithful worshipper. A tablet to his memory, erected by Gov. Spotswood,
and stating on its face the grief of his Excellency at the death of the old
man, still adorns one of the niches of the Church at Williamsburg; at least it
did but a few years ago.
Jarvis moved to the valley of Virginia and built a log cabin on the side,
where he had first fallen in love with that beautiful country. Whether he
married a Squaw or not we have no means of knowing. Those of the same
name inhabiting the same region to this day, have, however, a slight bronze
tinge to their complexion.
Governor Spotswood ruled over the affairs of Virginia for six years from the
date of the Tramontane Expedition, and after his surrendering the
Gubernatorial
chair, was appointed Post Master General of His Majesty's Colonies,
and subsequently Commander-in-Chief of an expedition against the Spaniards
in Florida. He, however, died at Annapolis, Maryland, on his way to assume
that command. His mortal remains lie there to this day, unhonored we
believe
,
even by a tablet.
And now our story is told, and as in duty bound, we would most respectfully
make our bow to those kind readers who have followed us thus far. Before,
however, we bid them farewell, we would gossip with them a little longer
we would fain prolong our pleasant evening talks by the fire-side, and discourse
still farther of the cocked hat gentry in the old dominion. And were we to
consult our own feelings alone, most assuredly they would be prolonged, and
our story should have engrafted upon it a sequel, or another concerning the
same old time-honored gentry, but when we cast our thoughts back over the
time of our kind readers, which we have already engrossed, we are
admonished
that it is indeed time to bring our story to a close. We have now only to
effer some evidence that our story was indeed founded upon the traditions
which have descended to our times. The venerable jurist from whom the
following letter was received has so long adorned the highest judicial tribunals
in Virginia, and is, therefore, so extensively known, that it would be useless to
multiply testimony upon the point to which he alludes; if it were, we could do
so, to any reasonable extent. Many are the persons still living in Virginia,
who have seen with their own eyes these Golden Horse-Shoes. Indeed we
were some time upon the trace of one of the curious relics itself, and were
only prevented from pursuing our researches to a successful issue, by the want
of time and the distance of our present residence, from the scene of the
celebrated
adventure.
To the descendants of Governor Spotswood and General Bernard Moore, we
are under many obligations for the materials with which they have so kindly
furnished us. To Colonel Spotswood of Indiana, and Charles Campbell, Esq.
editor of the Petersburg Statesman, in particular, we are greatly indebted, and
we return them our hearly thanks, and only regret that we have not been able to
do greater and more merited justice to the character of their common ancestors.
Western Virginia should erect some enduring monument to the memory of
the far-sighted statesman and gallant soldier who first discovered that noble
country.
The following is a copy of Judge Brooke's letter to the Author:
CONCLUSION.
St. Julien
, (near Fredericksburg,) Va.,
February 25th, 1841.
To Dr. Win. A. Caruthers:
My Dear Sir: I have received your letter of the 5th inst., and in reply to it,
can only say what I some years past said to my friend George W. Summers,
*
*
The Hon. Geo. W. Summers, the present representative in Congress, from the Kenawha
District
,
in Virginia.
on the subject of your letter. I said to him, that I had seen in the possession
of the eldest branch of my family, a Golden Horse-Shoe set with garnets,
and having inscribed on it the motto:
Sic juval transcendere montes
, which
from tradition, I always understood was presented by Governor Spotswood, to
my Grandfather, as one of many gentlemen who acompanied him across the
mountains.
With great respect, yours,
Francis Brooke
.London
,
1714.
To His Excellency, Alexander Spotswood, Esq.
Dear Sir
This letter will be handed to you by one of the most
unfortunate
adherents of the Pretender. Start not my dear Sirhe is but one of the
Scottish jacobins, and will in no wise compromise you. The very fact of his
seeking your country is evidence enough if it were wanting, that he desires to
be at peace from the toils and dangers of political partizanship. These are
claims enough for citizenship you may think, but not warrant sufficient to
claim your personal friendship. He has these also, for he was one of those
unfortunate men who befriended and supported your late kinsman to the last.
He protests that he will in no wise compromise your Excellency with the
ministry
or their adherents on your side of the water, and has begged me not to
write, but knowing that you would delight to befriend so staunch an adherent
of the unfortunate General, I have insisted on his taking a sealed packet at
all events, as it would contain other matters than those relating purely to
himself. And now for those matters. He will be accompanied by a great
many ruined families of rather a higher class than that from which your
immigrants
are generally furnishedthey, too, are worn out in spirit and in
fortune
,
with the ceaseless struggles between the hereditary claimant of the
crown and the present occupant. They see, also, breakers ahead. The
Queen's health is far from being stable, and in case of her sudden demise
there will be an awful struggle here. Are they not right then to gather up
the little remnant of their property and seek an asylum on your peaceful
shores?
Your scheme of scaling the mountains, and cutting asunder the French
settlements, meets with the hearty approbation of all the military men about
the Court, and not a question of the Queen's approbation would remain, were
it not for the everlasting squabbles between Bolinbroke and Oxford. Your
friend Mr. , ceaselessly urges the matter, and contends that now is
the very time to strike the blow; but my dear Sir, there is a desire for peace
on the other side of the channel, and I would advise you to have your
preparations
in readiness to set out upon the first intimation of her Majesty's
consent
,
so that the news of it cannot possibly reach here before your grand
scheme is accomplished.
It is a magnificent one, and at any other time would fire the minds, of our
young military men. Hold on then, my dear Sir, to the end, and you will be the
ultimate means of laying the foundation of a future Empire, greater than all
Europe in extent, and pregnant with a vast future which even your
experienced
and sagacious eye cannot as yet discover.
There is a young lady to accompany this gentleman, but she is even more
loth han himself to burden your Excellency with what she calls the taint of the
rebel. I know full well, that you will be a father to this poor heart-broken
houseless
girl, thrown upon our unfeeling world; not only poor, but suffering untold
wretchedness, whether she looks to the past or the future. God Almighty
have mercy upon her tender years. All her gentle rearing will now be turned
into sources of sorrow. Her cup is poisoned forever, where she is known
and where she is not, she will bear with her recollections enough, to
overshadow
her future days with a vision so dark, that no human hand may ever
raise the veil. I cannot say more, for I have promised that I would not, but I
think that I have said enough to interest you in these most unfortunate
strangers
,
and make you cherish them. Your heart has changed since we served
together, if I have not directed them to the very man of all the world, and in
the very position to most befriend them. There is a new world opened to
them in more senses of the word than onelet it be as happy as possible.
Your old friend and companion in arms,
G. B. L.Williamsburg
,
July, 1714.
Dear Father:
Your note of last night, containing an invitation to Temple Farm, from
Kate, has just been received. I will go, but for a reason, among others,
which I fear my ever kind friend, Kate, will consider any thing but
complimentary
it
is because this house is haunted, and I can no longer stay in it.
Look not so grave, dear father, 'tis no ghost. I wish it was, or he was, for
it is that same tedious, tiresome, persecuting, Harry Lee. I have been most
anxiously expecting your return; but, as it seems, you have become a
permanent
fixture at Temple Farm, it is but right that I should grow along side
of the parent stem. The townsfolk are even more anxious for your return
than I am. I tell them you ran away from practice, but it seems the more
you desire to run away from it, the more they run after you. Few people in
this dreary world have been able to effect so much unmixed good as you have,
and for that, I thank God. Dear Father, I have no desire to live but for your
sake, and that the short time we are to live together may not be diminished by
any act of mine, I will be with you presently. Our poor pensioners and
invalids
are all doing as well as usual, and I leave them in the hands of the Rev.
Mr. Jones, who, I know, will care for them as we would. He is surely one
of God's chosen instruments for doing good in this world. He has shouldered
his cross in earnest, and devoutly does he labor to advance the Redeemer's
kingdom.
The week that you have been absent, dear father, has appeared the longest
seven days of my life. I do not know what my flowers and birds will do
without
me, but I am sure they can better spare my presence than I can yours.
Ever your affectionate and devoted daughter,
ELLEN EVYLIN.James City Jail, Williamsburg
.
To His Excellency, Sir Alexander Spotswood.
Dear Sir
.You will no doubt be surprised that I date this letter from
the county jail, instead of the barracks, but, Sir, so it isdeeply mortifying
as it is to me to state the fact. I had scarcely alighted in the capital, after
marching the soldiers to the garrison, before I was waited upon by the
Deputy
Sheriff of the county, with a bail writ, (or whatever that process is called
by which the law seizes a man's person,) at the suit of Henry Lee, Esq.,
and for the very money which your Excellency was mainly instrumental in
procuring at his hands for me. You will recollect, no doubt,
that as a mere
matter of form
, (so the gentleman expressed it,) I gave him a note of hand
for the amount. Unfortunately I paid away part of the sum for my passage
money, and the remainder to recruit my dilapidated wardrobe, so that instant
payment was out of the question. None of my new and kind friends were
in the city. I had, indeed, hoped to find the good Doctor at home, but
unfortunately
for me he was absent in the country.
I had no other friend upon whom I dared callindeed, to confess the
truth to your Excellency, I have not a friend left in the whole world, now
living, upon whom I have any right to make a demand for such help as my
circumstances require. This, my honored Sir, is but a passage in the
chapter
of accidents which have fallen to my lot in the last few years, and until
the storm has spent its fury, it would seem useless to attempt to assist me.
I will honestly confess to you, that I came to this country at this time to
avoid those very difficulties (or kindred ones) which have assailed me here.
A superstitious man might be inclined under such circumstances to imagine
himself pursued by some invisible agency, but I have no such idle fears.
I
know my persecutors well
, and I can afford, even in my humble lodgings, to
pity them. I am very sure that I am a happier man this evening, than he at
whose suit I am thus deprived of my liberty.
I have accidentally heard that he utters very bitter and unwarrantable
things against me, and even threatens a prosecution for swindling. My ears
tingle as I write the word, but I may as well write that which I may soon be
compelled to endure the odium of in a more tangible shape. All that I can
say to your Excellency, and to those who have hitherto espoused my humble
cause, is, that I rest for the present in the calm and perfect security of an
injured
and innocent man, trusting that that God who has permitted the snares
of the wicked thus to gather round me, will clear them away in his own good
time. This, you may think and say, is poor evidence with which to furnish
you, against one so rich and powerful as my adversary; but, Sir, it is even
soit is all I have to give at present. Under such circumstances, I shall not
be the least surprised to find that you have turned me over to the tender
mercies
of my creditor. I cannot hope that my unsustained protestations of
innocence
of the charges that I hear he brings against me, will be sustained.
So let it be. I am willing to sojourn even in this dreary prison for a while,
well assured that the time will come, when my name will once again be
redeemed
from reproachuntil then, I must be content to subscribe myself
your Excellency's obliged humble servant.
Harry Hall
.Williamsburg
.
To his Excellency, Sir Alexander Spotswood, Lieutenant Governor of
Virginia
,
and Commander of Her Majesty's forces.
Dear Sir
: I owe you an apology for the very abrupt manner in which I
left your house, where I had been tacitly, as it were, left in charge of the
ladies; but the fact is, Sir, that I found the young person whom you had
hastily
employed as Tutor, presumptuous and impertinent, and that I must either
degrade myself by a personal encounter with him, or leave the premises. I
chose the latter, and had hoped to have paid my respects to your Excellency
before you left the capital, but was detained by unavoidable legal business until
you had unfortunately left the city. It is useless now to enter into
particulars
as to his conduct in your absence; for the evidence is now before
me, that he is such a gross impostor and swindler, that it is scarcely worth
while to inquire into minor particulars of conduct. While I was in the very
act of consulting Attorney General Clayton, (who is also my own legal
adviser
,)
about the steps necessary to be taken in order to repossess the funds
out of which I weakly suffer myself to be cheated, I received a ship letter by
way of York. Whom does your Excellency suppose that letter was from?
Why, sir, from Mr. Henry Hall, my cousin, the real gentleman, whose name
and character this base impostor had assumed for the lowest purposes. You
will recollect that I had written to the young man before this person
appeared
at your house, informing him of my aunt's will. This letter which I
have received is in answer to that one, and states among other things that
the writer would sail in the very first vessel for this country after the one
which would bring the letter, so that by the time that this pseudo Mr. Hall
manages to release himself from prison, where I have snugly stowed him,
the real personage, whose name he has assumed, will be here to confront
him. I am delighted that I am thus able to relieve your Excellency from
the disagreeable duty of unmasking the impostor; for if your Excellency
will permit me to say so, your kindly nature had so far led you astray with
regard to this man, that you might have found it rather unpleasant to deal
with him. Leave all that to me, SirI will give him his deserts, be well
assured
;
and if he escapes with whole ears and a sound skin, he may thank
the clemency of the law, and not mine.
I have the honor to be your Excellency's most obedient, humble servant,
Henry Lee
, of Westmoreland,Dear Ellen: Such a friendship as ours can bear the imposition with which
I am about to tax you. You know the sad tale of this poor Indian girl, and
how it lacerates all our hearts afresh, even to look upon her; and knowing
this, you will do all those little kindnesses for her that we cannot, and which
her situation requires. She sees that we
cannot
look upon her with
complacency
,
and
now
she misinterprets it. God knows we wish to wreak no
vengeance
upon her for my poor brother's death. Do make her sensible of all
this. You, my dear Ellen, that know so well how to compass these delicate
offices so much better than any one elsedo give her all the comfort the case
admits of, and administer such consolation as her peculiar nature requires.
Explain to her our feelings, and that they are the farthest in the world
removed from unkindness Oh, Ellen, you know what a shock we have
sustained
,
and will, I know, acquit us of any mawkish sensibility in the case.
I trust her entirely to your kindness and discretion. My father has just
stepped in, and anticipating my object, begged to see this note; and he now
begs me to say to you, that Wingina must be closely watched, else her brother
will contrive some subtle scheme to whisk her off again.
Dear Ellen, I love to turn to you in my distress, as you have often turned
to me in like circumstances. May we ever lean upon each other with a
confiding faith that knows no doubt.
Sincerely, your friend,
Kate
.Dearest Ellen
:
I again resume my sweet correspondence with you, after an interval it
seems to me of an age: computed by what I have (may I not say we have)
suffered. But during all my unexampled difficulties and trials, one constant
soarce of consolation remained to me. It was your steady constancy. It is
true, that for a time, I was laboring under a delusion in regard to it, but even
during that time, you were as unwavering as before. No portion of blame
can attach to you, that I was led astray. You, my Ellen, have been like my
evening and morning starthe last ray of serene comfort at night, and the
brightest dawn of hope in the morning. From day to day, and from year to
year, have you clung to the memory of the youth to whom you plighted your
young affectionsthrough good and through evil reportthrough life and in
death, (as was supposed) you have without wavering or turning aside,
cherished
the first bright morning dream of youthful love. Do you know, my
Ellen, that the world scarcely believes in the reality of such early attachments
enduring to the end. The heartless throng know not, my sweet playmate, of
the little romantic world we possess within ourselves. They have all gone
astray after strange gods, and cannot believe that others will be more true and
devoted than they have been. Especially has the odium of all such failures
been laid to the charge of your sex, but I am sure unjustly. The first slight
or unkindness nearly always proceeds from the other, and this slight or
unkindness
cannot be blazoned to the worldit is hidden within the recesses of
the sufferer's heart, and pride (perhaps proper maidenly pride) prevents it from
ever being known. How happy are we my Ellen, that not a shadow of
distrust
has fallen out between usif indeed I except your momentary
confounding
me with the gentleman whose name I had assumed, and my temporary
mistake about my brother's marriage with you. You see I have brought
myself to write that name. While I am upon the subject of Miss Elliot's
engagement, permit me to explain one thing which I omitted in the hurry of
departure, and the confusion which attended all its exciting scenes. That
young lady though present at the masking scene at the Governor's house, and
knowing of my design to present myself in disguise, among my old associates,
was not made acquainted with the name or occupation which I would assume.
The resolution to adopt that name was seized upon after the departure of that
young lady and her father. Hence her supposition, on hearing that Mr. Hall
had arrived in the Colony, that it was her own Henry. I am led to think of
these things, by seeing, so frequently, this young gentleman, with whom I
was, and am, on the most intimate terms. His distress of mind is truly
pitiable
he
appears like one physically alive and well, and yet dead to all hope.
Not absolutely dead to all hope either, for you should have seen how the
blessed
,
but dormant, faculty flashed up for a moment or two, when I told him, a
little while ago, that there was a prospect of an expedition being sent ahead of
the troops, in pursuit of the assassins and robbers who murdered our old friend
and stole his mistress. Oh, if he could be sent off upon such an expedition,
what a blessed relief the activity and excitement of the pursuit would be to
him. But the Governor, though sympathizing fully with him and me, would
not consent to it, and I must say his reasons were to me, satisfactory; not so,
however, with my poor friend; he is dissatisfied with the Governor on account
of it, and if it were not for my restraining and urgent counsel, he would start
off, single handed, in pursuit. The fact is, his apprehensions for the fate of
the poor girl,
whether dead or alive
, are so desponding, that the madness and
rashness of such an adventure, only add new charms to it, in his eyes, and I
can only seduce him from such wild designs by dwelling upon the known
clemency of the Indians to other females, who have for months and years
remained captives with them. I have exhausted all my recollections of the
kind, and I have put the scout, Jarvis, in possession of his dreadful secret, and
commanded him to detail all his knowledge favorable to my views. At this
very moment he is walking with Joe, among the tall pines, his melancholy
eye wandering among the stars, while Joe is telling a long story of a Mrs.
Thompson, who was taken prisoner by them and carried beyond the
mountains
.
I at first suspected my new forest friend, of romancing in the wildest
vein, and inventing as he went along, for the justifiable purpose, as it seemed
to me, of plucking the rooted sorrow from the heart of my friend, but I am
satisfied now that it is a true narrative, because he recounted several
circumstances
about the route to the mountains, which he had before told me he had
procured from an old lady, who had been a prisoner among the Indians.
Seeing
that he was, for the time, so absorbed with the story of the scout, I have
stolen away, my Ellen, to hold this sweet converse with you. If you had but
known the charming girl, about whom my friend thus mourns, you would
neither be surprised nor jealous that even I feel an anxious interest in her fate.
Think too of her sad history,the loss of her uncle by whom she was adopted,
and upon whom she doted as a father, little less fond than the real one whom
she has now lost, also. Think, too, of the dreadful manner of their two deaths
of her nearest and dearest kinsmen. Then bring before your mind the
highly educated, delicate and sensitive girl herselftorn from the reeking
body of her deceased parent; and borne a captive among a rude and wild
people
,
not one word of whose language she understands. Oh its a dreadful fate
for one like her. She is a most lovely girl in every sense of the word, and as
good as she is beautiful! I feel a double interest in her fate, because her
sad lot is so much like my own. We were first wrecked by the same
disastrous
political stormthrown upon the same shores, and among the same
people for a time.
The Governor, you know, is her distant kinsman, and of course he feels as
5*
lively an interest in the pursuit of her captors as it is possible under the
circumstances
,
but he is a stern old soldier, and will not risk the success of his
expedition for any mere private feelings, however near home they may come.
Poor Hall! we are of the same mess, and of course our tent is to be a
melancholy
place, for he walks about like a troubled spirit. Many a time at
midnight, I will turn to you for companionship, for though distant in body we
are ever present I trust in spirit.
Before I close this scrawl, scratched upon a camp stool, as I sit upon the
ground, I cannot help recurring to the last letter which I wrote to you. It
was penned under circumstances scarcely more favorable to my caligraphy
than this, for I was then propped up in my bed and wrote upon my portfolio.
Little did I imagine then, my Ellen, that that letter would ever be productive of
some of the most delightful moments of my life. It is almost impossible for
you to conceive of the delight with which I surreptitiously stole away the
treasured memories stored up in your heart. You thought then, my Ellen, did
you not, that they were garnered up, never to be again gazed upon by mortal
man upon this earth?but by the talisman of that real letter I produced a key
one, it is true, crusted over with the deepest sorrows known to the human
heart. Nor did you even then have a sly suspicion that your long lost lover
had risen from the dead to be the hearer of his own last dying words. No,
no, my own Ellen, your affliction was too real to have suffered any suspicion
of the bearer to intrudeit was not until I began to unfold those habits of
thought which touched upon old times, those dearest treasures of the heart,
those associations linked in inseparably with the very fibres of our being, that
you began to suspect me. Do you remember the walk we had by the little
romantic brook where we were talking of the falling of the leavesand I
ventured upon the dangerous experiment of reproducing some of
our old
talk.
Methinks I see your stare of astonishment now, and your startling turn of
the head every now and then, as link by link I touched those dear old
associations
;
every word gushing and teeming with meanings only known to
ourselves
?
I expected every moment to hear your startled scream, but if you
penetrated my disguise, your prudence triumphed, and you suffered me to wear
my masquerading dress until such time as my own circumstances should point
out the time of unmasking. I know that you must have been frightfully
mystified
just at that time, and until all doubt vanished. I sympathized fully in
your distress, but I would not make you an accessory, even after the fact, to
my treason. Had I failed in my application to my sovereign, I might have
proposed to you to desert your venerable and excellent father, and your own
dear and delightful home, for other and strange lands, but I had not fully come
to the resolve, and would not have done so, until that application failed. Even
then I could scarcely have had the heart to tear you away from all the
endearments
which now cluster around you. Do you know my own Ellen, that I
love your homeyour flowersyour booksyour musicyour pictures
your chairsevery thing that is yours. This little Testament of our Lord
and Master, with your name written in it, which lies before me, looks like no
other book. The very letters seem to be illuminatedthe book actually has
an appearance about it belonging to no other, and that with which it is
invested
,
is far more vividly impressed upon those household objects which
daily surround you. Could I have torn you away from all these? My
memory
wanders, even now among your books, and music, and flowers, and birds
and everything that goes to make up that dear home, which you have so
inseparably
stamped with your own identity. How vividly the charming
domestic
picture rises up before my fancy! Indeed, it is scarcely ever absent
from my thoughts, sleeping or waking.
Even over these wild scenes into which we are penetrating each hour,
deeper and farther, these blessed visions throw a softened and mellowed light.
What a blessed thing is memory,
to all the virtuous creatures of the earth!
that magic store-house of the heart's treasures. It is surely the divinest of
faculties, it penetrates the farthest back, and will last longest of them all, for
it will constitute the connecting link between this and a higher and purer state
of existence. It is the most distinguishing characteristic of our race, and
above every thing else marks us ont as immortals. Oh, what true wisdom
and beneficence in that provision which confines its wondrous powers to man.
Did you ever reflect what an awful thing, this truly blessed thing to us, would
have been to the lower orders of creation? It would have made the earth to
them a Hell, teeming and multiplying with horrors. That it has been given
to us alone, is at once a testimony and a guarantee of our immortality. Do
you know that I doubt the capacity of any one for enduring attachments,
who doubts the immortality of the soul? The mere hope and belief elevates
us above common sensuality, and refines and purifies our nature.
All good
men desire and believe it
. You may smile at my thus founding, what is
ordinarily
called an effort of the understanding in the heart; but those who have
observed human nature most, will be most ready to believe it.
The pure sentiment of love, though blended with passion, is very near kin
to
the divine
, especially that sublimated phase of it, which, you exhibited for
your dead lover. Your trials of the heart, my Ellen, have been truly great,
and I feel humbled in the comparison with you. Though I cannot approach
your excellence and exaltation of character, I hope to blend my future
existence
so inseparably with yours, that I may catch a portion of its exaltation.
I have often heard you say, that if required, you could lay down your life
with me, and that you would far rather do it than survive me, either married
or unmarried. This is a test of which I solemnly believe many of your sex
capable, but alas for ours, there is not one in ten thousand capable of it.
You were suprised at my shrinking from the question, my love, because you
had not understood, and could not, thoroughly understand the
characteristic
difference of the sex. You were loth to believe that your
lover was so earthly as to desire the earth for its own sake, and when
all that bright halo which sentiment throws around its dreary paths, was
blotted
out; but you reasoned from within and not from without, from your own
experience and not from the world's. Oh when the world is all thus purified
and sublimated, then will the lion lie down with the lamb. Your heart has
been purified by a high faith and a bright hope. God's holy spirit has poured
its benign influence on your heartalready, more than commonly elevated
above its kindand most truly did you say that your affection for me was
blended with all your holiest and highest aspirations; no wonder then that you
could die a martyr in a double sense. I will strive, my own Ellen, to make
myself worthy of an attachment so pure, so far above the dross of this earth.
It might be a wise question for moralists, how such an attachment could hold
to one so confessedly impure as your correspondent; one so weighed down
with the grosser passions of selfishness in its thousand phases, and ambition
with its earthly means. But I do not desire to perplex your sensitive mind
with the question. I am sufficiently happy that my youthful fancy was
fated
to select one so every way worthy of my maturest approbation.
I will write to you daily. You see I have already renewed our old subjects
of conversation. I cannot now exist without communing in the spirit with
you. I cannot ask you to answer my letters, but should a courier be
despatched
after the army, for any purpose, I am sure I shall hear from you.
Yours, most affectionately,
Frank Lee
.To Billy Divins
:
Well Bill, I'm dad shamed if I don't bust if I don't write to you a spellthe
fact is Bill, I've kept company with these here gold laced gentry so long that
I'm gettin' spiledfact! I rubbed myself all over last night head and ears
with salt for fear on't. Yes, and if you and Charley and Ikey don't take keer,
I'll cut you when I come back. But without any joke at all about it, I've got
into the greatest mess that ever the likes of you clapped eyes on. There's
that Mr. Hallthe real genuine Mr. Hall, the one as come last; O Lord if you
could only see how he takes ondash my flint, if I don't think he's a leetle
teched in the upper story. All day long he rides that black horse(and he's
dressed in black you know) and looks as if he was a goin' to his grandmother's
funeral. Poor lad, they say he's got cause enough, the yaller niggers have
run away with his sweet heart, but you don't know nothin' about them sort of
tender things, Bill, its only a throwin' of pearls before swine to tell you of 'em,
else I would tell you that Mr. Hall and me is exactly in the same fix. Yes,
you and Charley may laugh, confound you, if so be you ever spell this out,
We're exactly in the same situationthe yaller niggers has run away with
my sweet heart too. You know the little Ingin gal that asked me for that
lock 'o hair, but you know al about it and what's the use of swettin' over agin.
Well, Squire Lee, that Mr. Hall that was tried for killin' the Governor's son;
well, he says she's a ruined gal, and to hear him talk, you'd think that she
was dead and buried and he a sayin' of the funeral service over her. I tell you
Bill, these gentry are queerish folks, they don't know nothin' of human nature.
He says he wants to know if I would take another man's cast off mistress.
Now, Bill, ain't her lover dead, and could'nt I make an honest woman of her,
by a marryin' of her, I'd like to know that. But the best part of the story is
to come yit. The Governor's been axed about it, and he's all agreed, and says
moreover, that he'll settle fifty pounds a year on me, if the gal will have me.
So you see, Bill, she's a fortune. Did'nt I tell you that I was a goin to seek
my fortune, and that you had better come along. But I've talked about
myself
long enough, now let me tell you something of our betters. The old
Governor, I tell you what, he's a tip top old feller, in the field. He don't know
nothing about fightin' Ingins yit, but I'll tell you, he'll catch it mighty quick;
he makes every one stand up to the rack, and as for running away from an
enemy, it ain't in his dictionary. I am told he drinks gunpowder every mornin'
in his bitters, and as for shootin,' he's tip top at that, too. He thinks nothin'
of takin' off a wild turkeys' head with them there pistols of his'n. You may'nt
believe the story about the gunpowder, but I got from old June, his shoe black,
who sleeps behind his tent, and I reckon he ought to know, if any body does.
He rides a hoss as if he rammed down the gunpowder with half a dozen
ramrods
.
You ought to see him a ridin' a review of a mornin'. I swang if his
cocked hat don't look like a pictur', and I'm told he's all riddled with bullets
too, and that he sometimes picks the lead out of his teeth yit. He's a a whole
team, Bill; set that down in your books. The next man to the Governor is Mr.
Frank, that I told you of a while ago; he belongs to the gunpowder breed too
he's got an eye like a eagle, and, Bill when they made a gintleman of him they
spiled one of the best scouts in all these parts. If there's any fightin' you
take my word for it, he'll have his share. Some of the men do say that he was
for upsettin' the Queen when he was to England, and that's the reason he came
over in disguise. One thing I know, he's got no
airs
about him; he talks to
me just as he does to the Governor, and this present writin', as the lawyers say,
is writ on his camp stool and with his pen and paper. I guess he'll find his pen
druv up to the stump. Well, I suppose you want to know what I call this
camp nigger foot for. I'll tell you, for I christened it myself. I was a
followin'
of a fresh trail as hard as one of the Governor's bounds arter a buck
when what should we light upon, but the track of of a big nigger's foot in the
mud here among emfact! I told the Governor afore I seed the print of
the nigger's foot that they had had some spy or another at Williamsburg, else
they would'nt a know'd the waggons as had the powder in 'em. Oh, I forgot
to tell you that the yaller raskels killed one of the sentinels, and stole a heap
of powder and lead. Yes, and they had the wagon tops marked with red paint.
I hav'nt told the Governor about the mark yet, and I don't mean to, till I
sleep there a night or so. You know, Bill, how I'll sleep there! I'll skin my
eye open as tight as an old weasel in a hen roost. But Brag's a good dog
you say, and Hold-fast's a better. Well, well, Bill, the proof of the puddin' is in
chewin' of the bag; so let that stand over till next time. Howsomdever, you
know I'm good enough for twice my weight of the yaller raskels any day, and
call that no braggin' either. Oh, Bill, all I want now is one of you fellows
here for company to make this one of the greatest turn outs thats happened
in our time. This Trimountain expedition is agoin to be the makin of me.
The Governor's offered a reward for the Interpreter yes, a hundred pounds
for him, dead or alive. Whew! my stars, I would'nt give that for all the
Ingins
this side of the mountains, nor tother, neither. That's neither here nor
there, but I'm agoin to set a trap for the College bred rascal; but I won't
bait him with one of Dr. Blair's sermons. Howsomdever, you'll hear of that
all in good time. If you see old dad tell him I'm alive and a kickin,' and that
I've got that red sculp of mine all sound yit, and with the help of God, mean
to keep it. Oh! I like to forgot to tell you that we are agoin to take Germana
in our way, which I told the Governor was clear out of the route; but it seems
that's the place where the yonng lady, Miss Elliot, was carried off, and her
father sculped. Now, I would like to know what's the use of goin to look
at the hawk's nest when the old ones and young ones have all flew away.
They may pick up some of the feathers of the innocent creters they've killed
but, what's the use? I say. The Governor thinks, I expect, that as that's
near the front of the frontiersthe jumpin' off place as I may saythat the
Ingins may give him a little brush there. The fact is, the old gentleman's
appetite for a fresh smell of gunpowder, is gittin' stronger and stronger every
day. I'm deuced affraid he'll kill the Interpreter with his own hand if we
come up with them. Kase he killed his son, you know. Whenever any one
talks of that College bred raskel, the old soldier's eye flashes jist like my gun
when she burns primin'. Did you ever see a wild cat's eye away down in a
dark hole? Well, that's just the way he looks then; I suppose it all comes
of that gunpowder he drinks afore breakfast. I would like to see him cuttin'
and slashin' about a dozen Ingins when sich a fit is on him; if it was only to
drive them Ingin schools and colleges out of his head. He wants to give his
stomach a thump of that kind afore we comes plump into one of their
ambuscades
.
Take care of my dogs and remember me to Dad and Charley and Ikey.
Your's till death,
Joe Jarvis
.To Henry Lee, Esq.
:
The ink would blister the paper, could I be guilty of the hypocrisy of
commencing
a letter to you with an endearing epithet, after all that is past and
gone. Indeed, it was my intention never to have addressed you again in
any manner this side of the grave. I thought you had done your worst
towards me and mine, and I was resolved, if I could not forgive, that I would
at least bear it in silence. But I was mistaken, you had not done your worst,
as this night's experience teaches me. I find that my heart yearns towards every
thing connected with the happy days of our infancy. Over many of these
you have power, and through these you can wound me grievously. I do not,
and will not, charge you with suborning one of our father's faithful servants
to his own ruin and disgrace. I leave it entirely with you and your God.
But if even innocent, (which I trust in God you are,) yet you are responsible
for their conduct. Nay, the world, even your old associates here, hold you
now as the accessory before the fact, to this poor fellow's crime. Oh, Henry,
how have your passions led you on, from step to step, to this degradation!
Can you be the proud boy that I once knew as an affectionate brother? But
I will not be weak; my object in writing is merely a matter of business. I
have a proposition to make to youit is that you abandon your home and
country forever. Start not, but listen to me. You know that you will be
largely indebted to me for the yearly proceeds of my property, every cent of
which you have drawn, and which I understand you will not be able to repay,
without sacrificing your own property. Now, I propose to give you a clear
quittance for the whole of it, if you will sail for Europe before my return, and
take poor Csar with you. I know that you can find means to liberate him
indeed, I do not think the Governor himself will be much displeased to find
this scheme carried into effect upon his return. Reflect well upon it, and may
God forgive you for your past errors. I shall never cease to pray not only for
that, but that I may myself learn to grant you that tree and full forgiveness
which I daily ask him for myself.
Your brother,
Frank Lee
.Williamsburg
,
1714.
To Francis Lee, Esq.
Dear Frank
.But a few days have elapsed since your departure, yet it
seems an age. Short as the time is, however, I must write now in compliance
with my promise, or lose all opportunity of writing, until the expedition is on
its return. The courier who takes this, it is hoped, will overtake you near the
foot of the mountains. First and foremost, then, I must be selfish enough to
begin at home. Out of the fullness of the heart the mouth speaketh, and I
suppose the pen writeth. You will, I am sure, be surprised to learn that my
father seems to miss your society even more than I. After your departure,
he would sit up for hours, wrapped up in his own thoughts. At first I did not
heed this particularly, because he often does so, when any of his patients are
sick unto death; but I soon found that my caressesa successful remedy
generallywere entirely unheeded; and once I saw a tear stealing down
his dear and venerable face. I could submit tacitly no longer, but begged him
to tell me what disturbed him. He said he was beginning to find out my
value just as he was about to lose me. Dear father, said I I will never,
never leave you. We have been too long all in all to each other! Was I
not right, Frank, in giving him this assurance, and will you not doubly assure
him, when you come back? I know you will. How can you make any such
promise, my child, he asked, when you have given your whole heart and
soul to another? Now, was not this a strange speech for the good old man
to make? Do you not discover a littlejust a littlejealousy in it? I
thought I did, and I laughed at the idea, though the tears were coursing each
other down his cheeks faster than ever; and I taxed him with the strange
manifestation. Well, said he, have you not been wife, and daughter,
and companion, and comforter, and nurse, and every thing to meand how
can I live, when all that gives life and cheerfulness to my house is gone?
It will be putting out the light of mine eyesfor my Ellen, all is dark
and dreary, when your shadow does not fall within the range of these
fast failing orbs.
I again and again renewed the assurance that we would live with
him. Pooh, pooh, said he, I have thought of all that. Frank has a
large landed estate and negroes to look after, and when you are
married
,
you will have corresponding duties as a wealthy planter's wife. How,
then, can either of you remain here? Then, said I, you can go and
live with us in the country. No, no, said he, never, never will I leave
this spot. There is a silent history in these walls, my Ellen, which you
know not, for you were too young to know her whose sweet presence still
lingers around every chair, and table, and wainscot, and wall, which you
see. Little did he remember, Frank, that those very inanimate objects
had so long been telling me a sweet tale of my own, but I disturbed not his
hallowed memories. Oh, Frank, are there many such husbands in the
world? Your sex is sadly belied, if there are. My poor father is a lover
yet, though his head is silvered o'er with age and sorrow. Dear Frank,
will you thus cherish the homely household remembrances which I may
leave behind me? Yes, I have as full faith in you as I have in my own
father, and I declare to you that I would not entrust my happiness with one
in whom I had less. But we have not the hazards and uncertainties of
other people, for we know each other's every thought and sentiment. My
father went on in the same strain for a long time, until finally I succeeded
in imbuing him with some of my own trust and confidence, that you would
make any pecuniary sacrifice rather than separate us. An old man's life,
or rather the enjoyments of that life, are made up, in a great measure, of
the pastof these recollections of by-gone yearsand one of the first duties
of his children is to see that they are not rudely shocked. You know that
I studied to have the arrangements even of the furniture, so that my
excellent
father should see no change from old times, as he loves to call
them. I have shocked him with no innovations or modern improvements
in any thing that pertains to his own personal comfort. His cocked hat
hangs upon the very peg in the hall on which he was accustomed to hang
it in my mother's time, and I make it my business to take it down and brush
it regularly every morning before he goes out. I knit his woollen stockings
and gloves as exactly like the last made by my mother's hands as
possible
,
and I have endeavored, in all things, to let him feel his loss as little
as may be. Strange that he should, since your return, first begin to notice
all these little things. It is the prospect of losing me, that has now brought
them conspicuously before him, for I have studied to make them minister
almost unconsciously to his comforts. There is another thing which I have
observed since you went away. You know, that since his eye-sight began
to fail, I have read the family prayersat which, all the servants are
present
.
The other night he rose from his knees, with his face suffused in
tears, and told the servants to remain; it was Sunday night. I had before
observed the same evidence of recent emotion. He said to the servants
you had better lay these religious exercises to heart, for the time will soon
come when you will hear no more from your young mistress. That old
organ will soon be removed to a new home. True, said he, seeming to
recollect
himself, many of you will go along; of course, you will prefer to
accompany your young mistress. Is'nt he getting almost childishI fear
this bodes no good.
After he had said a good deal more of the same sort, I suffered them to
depart
,
and then begged him to be assured that I would never permit the
instrument
to be removed, even if I should go away myself, and that I would not
suffer one of the servants to leave him, except my own maid.
You see, dear Frank, that I make no apology for telling you of these
thingsgossip it may benevertheless, it is very near the heart. I think I
know you too well to suppose that you will be indifferent to them before
marriage
,
and far, far less afterwards. You will see, also, that I suffer no
mawkish
delicacy to prevent me from talking to you as unreservedly as I would to
my father. Are you not shortly to be my husband? and ought that
confidence
to begin in an instant of time? Can it be?does it ever so begin?
Nay, does not life often end without establishing it, when the parties have
begun by a false move in the first instance? I rejoice that I can repose this
unreserved confidence in you, even thus early. To you I know my little
domestic records will have the same interest as if you had thought and acted
them yourself. Kate has just been here. You see I am making for you a
sort of diary of my letter, and to tell the truth it has been written at several
sittings. Well, as I just told you, Kate has been here, and has made confidents
of you and me. The saucy baggage said she knew it was just the same
thing as telling it to you. You must know that she has promised her hand,
where her heart has long been given, to your friend Moore. Your friend
will find Kate a more charming girl than even he imagines. I know him to
be amiable and accomplished, as the polite world view these things, but I fear
he lacks the highest finish to be the true gentleman. What can make us
such
gentle
-men or
gentle
-women as that spirit within us which ever prompts
us to love our neigbors as ourselves? This germ of the christian doctrine, if
properly cultivated, will expand into an universal philanthropy. How
different
is this from your code of honor, which has one conscience for its
followers
,
and another for the world! The conscience of a gentleman of honor
substitutes what others think of us for that unerring monitor within our own
bosoms. Indeed, the conventional conscience often silences the still small
voice of the inward man, and this, too, often in supposed deference to the
opinions of
our
sex.
Now, I wish to set you and Mr. Moore both right on this point.
No lady
whose opinion is worth having, ever sides with these laws of honor
. True,
there are fashionable females, who
pretend
to applaud all the vaunting
and vain glorious chivalry of the world, but even they, in their secret
hearts, love to see men who dare to erect higher standards of excellence
and morality. Kate and I, at least, have the unfashionable ambition to
see our lovers repudiate the false standard which the world has
established
.
All this prating has been brought upon your head, by some
servants'
news which has come to Kate's ears. Do not throw down my
letter
she
could not help it. Some of Mr. Carter's servants have told her
maid, that their master would never suffer Mr. Moore to triumph over
him in his love. Now, do not laugh at our woman's fears, but attend to
what we say. For myself, I think it would be a very good test for Kate
to submit her beau tothis ordeal of the true monitor against the false
one. So many of the cavaliers emigrated to Virginia, during the old
troubles at home, that they established here, in undisputed sway, this
false and corrupt standard. I am very sure you would not follow itwould
you, dear Frank? No one could be more gratified at any honorable
distinction
of another, than I would be at yours, but I could never
accept that
hand in marriage
, which had been previously stained by the blood of a
fellowbeing
shed
in single combat, and in cold blood. Heigh ho. I find I have
commenced a lecture to your friend, or rather about your friend, and
brought it all down at last upon your own head. Forgive me, dear Frank.
You were brought up in the same school that I wastaught to pray,
kneeling
at the same family altar. Oh, may we long kneel at the same holy
shrine! To return to our mutual friendsas I said before, there has been
no unreserved confidence between them. He will write to Kate I know
indeed, I suppose his letters (with your own) are already on the waybut you
can very well imagine what a lover's first epistle will be, or what they
generally
are, always excepting yours, dear Frank. Now, could you not open his
eyes?above all, could you not guard him against falling an easy prey to
Mr. Carter's designs, if any such he has? Do watch over him, Frank, as you
would over a younger brother.
And now, dear Frank, I have little more to say, than how much I want to
see you, and how I do hope that you will return, before there is any
greater
change in my dear father(shall I say our father, Frank?) Farewell.
Take care of Mr. Moore, Kate says, and of old Juneand I say, above all,
take care of yourself.
Your own Ellen
.Williamsburg
,
1714.
Dear Bernard
:
According to promise, you see I have begun to write you a letterand
one dozen have I commenced before, but tore them up, because I did not
know exactly what word to prefix to your name. First I tried plain
Bernard
that
looked too cold and abrupt; and then Mr. Mooreand that
appeared
too business like and formal; and then I began without any prefix at
all. At last, I went to Ellen in my distress, and she rated me roundly for
being ashamed to salute with an endearing epithet a man to whom I had
promised
my hand, and given my heart. Nor was that allshe took me to task
for still wrapping myself up in that reserve which the world compels us to
wear, instead of endeavoring, as is
my duty
, (you know I call her Mrs. Duty,)
to establish an unreserved confidence between us, and to learn and
betray
at
the same time all those peculiarities of thought and feeling which go to make
up our identity. As I told her, that is the very thing which I dread.
I am not so pure and holy in my thoughts, that I may, like her, lay them
open to the gaze even of a
conditionally accepted lover
. Nevertheless, she
has frightened me so, with the dread of future matrimonial unhappiness, that
I have resolved to make a clean breast of it, or at least to make the effort.
And so to begin fairly, I asked my demure friend to tell me honestly and
candidly
,
what she thought was my besetting sin? And what do you think she
said? Why, love of admiration! Just think of that. Now, is it so,
Bernard
?
Can you, in your heart, accuse me of that heartless thing,
coquetry
,
except just a little harmless flirting, with which the sages of our
country allow us to arm ourselves. Is it any thing more, Bernard? But
stopI must answer that myself, on my conscience; and though I almost
quarrelled with Ellen at her own house about it, I had scarcely seated myself in
the carriage, on my return home, before the silent monitor likewise began to
accuse me. I cried bitterly about it, and then sat myself down to make a
true and honest confession. You must be aware though, Bernard, that the
position of the Governor's eldest daughter is a little different from that
of other young ladies, even among the gentry. Alas! poor me! what
am I saying? Attempting a defence of the very thing which I
promised
to amend! No, no, the daughter of His Majesty's representative is
more bound, than any other young lady, to present a model even more
blameless than common, inasmuch as her example is looked up to and
followed by those, who are beneath her in rank and position. Ellen
says, that even the tradesmen's daughters are already imitating my dress
and manners, carricatured though they may be. Then I do confess, (as I
suppose I must,) that I have rather been pleased with the insidious
flattery
,
but I do assure you that it was unconsciouslythat I never knew it,
until I was induced to make a rigid self-examination. To know it, is to
amend it, for, since I have analyzed the passion, I am heartily disgusted
at its grossness. I am disgusted at myself, that I ever sought promiscuous
admiration. The player-women on the stage seek the same thing, and
have a better excuse for it, for it is to them a means of subsistence. Oh!
Bernard, the bare contemplation of what it leads to, if once it obtains
the mastery, fills me with the most profound self-abasement. I am sure,
at least I hope, you will find me a very different girl on your return.
There, now, if that is not as pretty a confession of a coquet, as could
be desired by Mrs. Duty herself? But tell me, dear Bernard, are you
willing to marry a coquette. Do answer your anxious and too
repentant
Kate
.To the Rev. Dr. Blair
:
Valley of Virginia
,
1714.
My Dear, Sir
At length we have scaled the Blue Mountains, but
not without a sharp skirmish with the savages, and many of them, I am
sorry to say, were of those who so lately received our bounty, and were
besides objects of such deep solicitude to us. All our labors, my dear
Sir, towards civilizing and christianizing even the tributaries, have been
worse than thrown away. Mr. Boyle's splendid scheme of philanthropy is
a failure, and we, his humble agents, have no other consolation left, but
a consciousness of having done our duty, with a perseverance which
neither scorn nor scepticism could not turn aside. Let it not be
said hereafter, that no effort was made in Virginis to treat the Aborigines
with the same spirit of clemency and mildness which was so successful
in Pennsylvania. Far greater efforts have been made by us, than was
ever made in that favored colony. The difference in the result is no
doubt owing to the fact, that the subjects with whom we have had to
deal were irretrievably spoiled before they came under our chargenot
so with those of Pennsylvania. I mention these things to you, because you
know that it was my determination when I sat out, to cross the mountains,
peaceably if I could, and forcibly if I must. The latter has been the
alternative
forced upon me. From almost the very moment of setting out, our
steps have been dogged, and our flanks harrassed by these lawless men, and
more than one murder has been committed upon our sentries. But of
these things we can converse when we meet. I suppose you are anxious to
hear something of the country, which I have so long desired to see with my
own eyes. Well, Sir, the descriptions given to us at Temple Farm by the
interpreter were not at all exaggerated, and were, besides, wonderfully
accurate
in a geographical point of view. It is indeed true enough that there are
double ranges of mountains, and that the sources of the Mississippi do not
rise here. We are now in a valley between these ranges, with the western
mountains distinctly in view, and the eastern ones immediately in our rear.
This valley seems to extend for hundreds of miles to the northeast and
south-west
,
and may be some fifty or sixty broad. I learn from my prisoners that
it has been mostly kept sacred by the Indians as a choice hunting ground, and
has not been the permanent residence of any of them, but that they came
and squatted during the hunting season. All this the interpreter kept (very
wisely, as he thought, no doubt) to himself. We have not yet seen the
miraculous boiling and medicinal springs, nor the bridge across the
mountains
;
but parties of exploration are daily going out, and such extravagant
accounts as they give of the game, and the country, and the rivers, and the
magnificent prospects, beggar my pen to describe. I can see enough, my dear
Sir, from the heights in my near neighborhood, to know that it is one of the
most charming retreats in the world. I do not hesitate to predict that a
second Virginia will grow up here, which will rival the famed shores of the
Chesapeake; but the products will be different, and the people must be
different
;
for it is a colder region. We have already had nipping frosts, and some
ice upon the borders of the streams.
The Indian prisoners tell me that the springs before mentioned are
beyond
the second range of mountains, and that there also are to be found
the sources of the Mississippithe French settlements and many other
of the objects for which we set out. They must now be left for another
campaign. In the meantime, the frontiers of the Colony must be speedily
pushed hitherward. This country will suit admirably for our Scotch and
Irish emigrants, and inducements must be held out to them to venture into
the wilderness, while we see to making roads for them and affording them
protection. I am delighted with my adventure so far, and only one
subject
of disappointment remains. I cannot have a brush with our ancient
enemies. These captives tell me that the French and the six nations
have uninterrupted intercourse from the lakes to the Mississippi. This
great tramontane highway must be broken up at all hazards, else all that
magnificent western country slips from our grasp, and besides we will be
constantly subject to be harrassed by these disagreeable neighbors. In short,
my dear Sir, the boundaries of Virginia must be pushed to the banks of
the Mississippi. I know you will say that my towering military ambition
is running away with me, but I feel very sure that I can submit such
representations to the council, as will induce them to unite with me in
an earnest appeal to the ministry at home for aid in the magnificent
conquest
.
You will readily perceive from what I have already said, that I
consider our enterprise but half accomplished, and that another far more
extensive will be prepared as soon as we can hear from the other side of
the water.
*
*
We have every reason to suppose that this was the very subject upon which the
Governor
subsequently quarrelled with the ministry. They attempted to retrace their steps at an
immense loss of blood and treasure afterwards, at the celebrated defeat of Braddock.
My young men have behaved most gallantly. Young Lee
will make a fine soldier, his daring bravery is among the least of his
qualifications. He has rendered me most important services, so indeed
have Moore, and Carter, and Hall, and even my protege Dandridge. I
send you a list of others of the young gentry who distinguished
themselves
.
I wish you to have a Golden Horse-Shoe made for each of them
to wear upon the breast, as a distinction for meritorious services: with the
motto on one side,
Sic juval transcendere montes
, and on the other,
The
Tramontane Order
. Have them ready if possible by our return, which you
may now expect in a few weeks. I shall despatch letters for my own family
I have only therefore, farther to say, that I remain your friend,
A.
Spotswood
.Valley Camp
,
1714.
Dear Ellen
:
I am once more writing from a couch of some pain and suffering, but thank
God not like the last from which I addressed you that dismal letter, which I
then supposed would be my last. I have no such apprehensions now. My
wounds are in a fair way, and I am even permitted to walk about this large
tent(the Governor's marquee) and above all, I am permitted to write to you.
Our camp is now pitched near to a rising knoll at the western base of the
mountains, commanding a magnificent view of one of the most charming
valleys
that ever blessed the vision of enthusiasts. And I am told by the parties
which nightly come in from exploring expeditions, that I have not seen half
of its beauties. You never heard such enthusiastic accounts of a country,
and the Governor is not a whit behind the youngest of them in admiration of
its charms. But I must postpone my raptures about the country until I tell
you something of your friend's young kinswoman, who has been so long in
captivity. I am sure that this time you will not be jealous, if I tell you a great
deal about that charming creature. First, then, we have recovered her, but
nearly at the expense of Hall's life. Nothing prevented such a catastrophe
but the foresight of our experienced chief, and the admirable presence of mind
of our chief scout, Joe Jarvisbut of these things we can converse more fully
when we meet face to faceI trust to part no more.
When Eugenia first made her appearance in camp, she was less strange in
her appearance than was her state of mind. She was dressed something as
you have seen Wingina, half in the European and half in the Indian costume,
and to tell the truth, she looked exceedingly pretty: but, alas! there was a
wild vacancy about her eyes and countenance generally, which alarmed me.
It was more perceptible to me, because I had known her in her better days
and under more favorable circumstances. This, as I expected and feared,
terminated
in sickness, and she has been lying ever since in an ample tent,
almost touching ours. She has been constantly attended by Hall, and by a
young man who was formerly a pupil of your excellent father. Since I have
been permitted to move about, I have visited her almost every hour. Her case
would have furnished a curious study for some one more philosophically
disposed
,
than any one we can boast of in our ranks. Her disease seemed like
Ophelia's, a rooted sorrow from which no mere mortal physician could pluck
the sting. Even her mental faculties seemed in a sort of eclipsenot that
she wandered, as it is called, or was at all frantic, but she appeared imbecile
and childish. This was succeeded by such a load of oppression, that I, who
knew her, feared her heart would break; but good old mother nature always
came to her relief in the shape of a plentiful shower of hysterical tears,
mingled
sometimes with frightful laughter. The latter ugly concomitant has
been gradually subsiding, and true and genuine tears have taken their place.
At first they forbid her to talk upon the melancholy particulars of the sad affair
at Germana, but I saw that this was all wrong, and I at length persuaded the
Governor to let me try the opposite plan; I am happy to say it has succeeded
beyond my most sanguine expectations. She now loves to talk over her
melancholy story, and I left her but a few moments ago, talking and crying
with poor Hall. Her sensibility is evidently returning, and with it her mental
strength. By the time she reaches Williamsburg, you will see that she is
worthy of all the commendations I have bestowed upon her. I have not and
will not say that she has attained to that excellence which my Ellen has
aimed at, but she possesses all the native materials to work upon, and will
doubtless attain, as she grows in experience and knowledge of the world, to a
point worthy of moving in your delightful circle. You must recollect that she
early lost her mother. True, you were equally unfortunate, but then her place
was supplied to you by such a father as seldom blesses the orphan female in
this world. You must recollect, too, that the lamented uncle who adopted her
was a purely military character, and how poorly calculated were his daily
associates to refine and model the forming character of our young friend. It
was the brightness with which she shone under such disadvantageous
circumstances
,
which first attracted my attention. I thought then what a
charming
creature she would be if she could only possess the advantages which
you possessed. Dreadful has been her experiencethe hand of affliction has
been laid heavily upon her, and I regret of all things, that she cannot be at
this very moment under your care as well as that of your father.
You would like to hear something doubtless of your former protege Wingina.
I have been loth to say any thing about her, because I could not say any thing
that would be pleasing to you. She, I fear, brought nothing away from
civilized
life, but its evils. Jarvis, the scout, seems to have a rude sort of a
passion
for her, but she treats him with scorn and detestation; and to tell you
the truth, I am rejoiced at it, on account of both. He is almost as much a
savage as one of her race, but there is this differencethe scout has a
substratum
(if I may be allowed the expression) in his character, which
promises
better things than any which he now exhibits, while the Indian, I fear,
is just the reverse.
I have learned to feel something like an attachment for the scout. The
native soil is a good one, and with judicious attention and skilful guidance,
he might be made a useful man in his sphere. I have proposed to him to go
home with me, when we return, and live upon my land, but he declares that
he means to live in this valley. Time will show whether he is to be moved
from his purpose.
The Governor's benevolent views towards the Indians have received a
terrible
shock with his Tramontane experience, and I suspect that we shall
hear little of Mr. Boyle's plans in future, and less of his own tributary schools.
30
Why, what a love letter is this, that Frank has written to me, you will say.
Think of it again, my dear Ellen, and you will consider it a compliment to
your understanding, as well as to your heart. Certainly I feel proud that I
can already discourse of such reasonable matters to my promised wife.
I will fulfil all your promises to your dear and venerable father, with
interest
,
my Ellen. Is he not mine also?has he not been more than a father to
me, and how much more than father will he be, when he entrusts to my
keeping
such a daughter? We will consult his prejudices, and should he have
even whims in old age, his second childhood shall be as sacred to me, as my
first was to him. God evidently looks with peculiar benignity upon those
children who lead the steps of the aged (even in senility) with tender care
and affection. Trust me, my Ellen, that the very peg upon which his cocked
hat hangs, shall be as sacred in my eyes, as it is in those of his dutiful and
affectionate daughter. Every pledge of filial affection which you make to
your venerable parent, I cherish as guarantees of the excellencies of my future
wife. That the worthy object of them may long live to bless our lives, is the
sincere prayer of your own
Frank
.CONCLUSION.
St. Julien
, (near Fredericksburg,) Va.,
February 25th, 1841.
To Dr. Win. A. Caruthers:
My Dear Sir: I have received your letter of the 5th inst., and in reply to it,
can only say what I some years past said to my friend George W. Summers,
*
*
The Hon. Geo. W. Summers, the present representative in Congress, from the Kenawha
District
,
in Virginia.
on the subject of your letter. I said to him, that I had seen in the possession
of the eldest branch of my family, a Golden Horse-Shoe set with garnets,
and having inscribed on it the motto:
Sic juval transcendere montes
, which
from tradition, I always understood was presented by Governor Spotswood, to
my Grandfather, as one of many gentlemen who acompanied him across the
mountains.
With great respect, yours,
Francis Brooke
.